


































3 1404 00233 682 1 



David (). McKay 
Learning Resources Center 




— 



This book belongs to the 
Laron Clifford Warner 

collection and has been 

DATE DUE 



: 



< " ■ " ■ * > » I4 



Digitized by the Internet Archive 

in 2012 with funding from 
Brigham Young University-Idaho 



http://archive.org/details/leotolstoyswarpe01bloo 



WAR AND PEACE 



^s&c>^c^^^^^^^^^^&^^^c^^^^^^^^^ 



COUNT LEO TOLSTOY 

WAR and PEACE 

DESIGNED TO BE READ AS A 
MODERN NOVEL 




THE BOOK LEAGUE OF AMERICA 

New York 



si^^c^c^^ec^c^^^c^c^c^c^gc^e^^^c^c^g^! 



CL 
PRINTED IN THE UNITED STATES OF AMERICA 



WAR AND PEACE 



PART I 



'Well, prince, Genoa and Lucca are now no more than private estates 
of the Bonaparte family. No, I warn you, that if you do not tell me we 
are at war, if you again allow yourself to palliate all the infamies and atroci- 
ties of this Antichrist (upon my word, I believe he is), I don't know you in 
future, you are no longer my friend, no longer my faithful slave, as you 
say. There, how do you do, how do you do? I see I'm scaring you, sit down 
and talk to me.' 

These words were uttered in July 1805 by Anna Pavlovna Scherer, a 
distinguished lady of the court, and confidential maid-of-honour to the 
Empress Marya Fyodorovna. It was her greeting to Prince Vassily, a 
man high in rank and office, who was the first to arrive at her soiree. 
Anna Pavlovna had been coughing for the last few days; she had an 
attack of la grippe, as she said— grippe was then a new word only used by 
a few people. In the notes she had sent round in the morning by a footman 
in red livery, she had written to all indiscriminately: 

'If you have nothing better to do, count (or prince), and if the prospect 
of spending an evening with a poor invalid is not too alarming to you, I 
shall be charmed to see you at my house between 7 and 10. Annette 
Scherer.' 

'Heavens! what a violent outburst!' the prince responded, not in the 
least disconcerted at such a reception. He was wearing an embroidered 
court uniform, stockings and slippers, and had stars on his breast, and a 
bright smile on his flat face. 

He spoke in that elaborately choice French in which our forefathers 
not only spoke but thought, and with those slow, patronising intonations 
peculiar to a man of importance who has grown old in court society. 
He went up to Anna Pavlovna, kissed her hand, presenting her with a 
view of his perfumed, shining bald head, and complacently settled him- 
self on the sofa. 

'First of all, tell me how you are, dear friend. Relieve a friend's anxiety,' 
he said, with no change of his voice and tone, in which indifference, and 
even irony, was perceptible through the veil of courtesy and sympathy. 

'How can one be well when one is in moral suffering? How can one help 
being worried in these times, if one has any feeling?' said Anna Pavlovna. 
'You'll spend the whole evening with me, I hope?' 

'And the fete at the English ambassador's? To-day is Wednesday. I 



2 WAR AND PEACE 

must put in an appearance there/ said the prince. 'My daughter is com- 
ing to fetch me and take me there.' 

'I thought to-day's fete had been put off. I confess that all these fes- 
tivities and fireworks are beginning to pall.' 

'If they had known that it was your wish, the fete would have been put 
off,' said the prince, from habit, like a wound-up clock, saying things he 
did not even wish to be believed. 

'Don't tease me. Well, what has been decided in regard to the Novo- 
siltsov dispatch? You know everything.' 

'What is there to tell?' said the prince in a tired, listless tone. 'What 
has been decided? It has been decided that Bonaparte has burnt his 
ships, and I think that we are about to burn ours.' 

Prince Vassily always spoke languidly, like an actor repeating his part 
in an old play. Anna Pavlovna Scherer, in spite of her forty years, was 
on the contrary brimming over with excitement and impulsiveness. To be 
enthusiastic had become her pose in society, and at times even when she 
had, indeed, no inclination to be so, she was enthusiastic so as not to 
disappoint the expectations of those who knew her. The affected smile 
which played continually about Anna Pavlovna's face, out of keeping as 
it was with her faded looks, expressed a spoilt child's continual conscious- 
ness of a charming failing of which she had neither the wish nor the power 
to correct herself, which, indeed, she saw no need to correct. 

In the midst of a conversation about politics, Anna Pavlovna became 
greatly excited. 

'Ah, don't talk to me about Austria! I know nothing about it, perhaps, 
but Austria has never wanted, and doesn't want war. She is betraying us. 
Russia alone is to be the saviour of Europe. Our benefactor knows his 
lofty destiny, and will be true to it. That's the one thing I have faith in. 
Our good and sublime emperor has the greatest part in the world to play, 
and he is so virtuous and noble that God will not desert him, and he will 
fulfil his mission— to strangle the hydra of revolution, which is more 
horrible than ever now in the person of this murderer and miscreant. . . . 
Whom can we reckon on, I ask you? . . . England with her commercial 
spirit will not comprehend and cannot comprehend all the loftiness of 
soul of the Emperor Alexander. She has refused to evacuate Malta. She 
tries to detect, she seeks a hidden motive in our actions. What have they 
said to Novosiltsov? Nothing. They didn't understand, they're incapable 
of understanding the self-sacrifice of our emperor, who desires nothing 
for himself, and everything for the good of humanity. And what have they 
promised? Nothing. What they have promised even won't come to any- 
thing! Prussia has declared that Bonaparte is invincible, and that all 
Europe can do nothing against him. . . . And I don't believe a single 
word of what was said by Hardenberg or Haugwitz. That famous Prussian 
neutrality is a mere snare. I have no faith but in God and the lofty destiny 
of our adored emperor. He will save Europe!' She stopped short abruptly, 
with a smile of amusement at her own warmth. 



WAR AND PEACE 3 

*I imagine,' said the prince, smiling, 'that if you had been sent instead 
of our dear Wintsengerode, you would have carried the Prussian king's 
consent by storm, you are so eloquent. Will you give me some tea?' 

'In a moment. By the way,' she added, subsiding into calm again, 'there 
are two very interesting men to be here to-night, the vicomte de Morte- 
mart; he is connected with the Montmorencies through the Rohans, one 
of the best families in France. He is one of the good emigrants, the real 
ones. Then Abbe Morio; you know that profound intellect? He has been 
received by the emperor. Do you know him?' 

'Ah! I shall be delighted,' said the prince. 'Tell me,' he added, as 
though he had just recollected something, speaking with special non- 
chalance, though the question was the chief motive of his visit: 'is it true 
that the dowager empress desires the appointment of Baron Funke as 
first secretary to the Vienna legation? He is a poor creature., it appears, 
that baron.' Prince Vassily would have liked to see his son appointed to 
the post, which people were trying, through the Empress Marya Fyo- 
dorovna, to obtain for the baron. 

Anna Pavlovna almost closed her eyes to signify that neither she nor 
any one else could pass judgment on what the empress might be pleased 
or see fit to do. 

'Baron Funke has been recommended to the empress-mother by her 
sister,' was all she said in a dry, mournful tone. When Anna Pavlovna 
spoke of the empress her countenance suddenly assumed a profound and 
genuine expression of devotion and respect, mingled with melancholy, 
and this happened whenever she mentioned in conversation her illustrious 
patroness. She said that her Imperial Majesty had been graciously pleased 
to show great esteem to Baron Funke, and again a shade of melancholy 
passed over her face. The prince preserved an indifferent silence. Anna 
Pavlovna, with the adroitness and quick tact of a courtier and a woman, 
felt an inclination to chastise the prince for his temerity in referring in 
such terms to a person recommended to the empress, and at the same 
time to console him. 

'But about your own family,' she said, 'do you know that your daughter, 
since she has come out, charms everybody? People say she is as beautiful 
as the day.' 

The prince bowed in token of respect and acknowledgment. 

'I often think,' pursued Anna Pavlovna, moving up to the prince and 
smiling cordially to him, as though to mark that political and worldly 
conversation was over and now intimate talk was to begin: 'I often think 
how unfairly the blessings of life are sometimes apportioned. Why lias 
fate given you two such splendid children— I don't include Anatolc, your 
youngest— him I don't like' (she put in with a decision admitting of no 
appeal, raising her eyebrows)— 'such charming children? And you really 
seem to appreciate them less than any one, and so you don't deserve them. 1 

And she smiled her ecstatic smile. 

'I am your faithful slave and to you alone I can confess. My children 



4 WAR AND PEACE 

are the bane of my existence. It's the cross I have to bear, that's how I 
explain it to myself. What would you have?' . . . He broke off with a 
gesture expressing his resignation to a cruel fate. Anna Pavlovna pon- 
dered a moment. 

'Have you never thought of marrying your prodigal son Anatole? 
People say,' she said, 'that old maids have a mania for matchmaking. I 
have never been conscious of this failing before, but I have a little person 
in my mind, who is very unhappy with her father, a relation of ours, the 
young Princess Bolkonsky.' 

Prince Vassily made no reply, but with the rapidity of reflection and 
memory characteristic of worldly people, he signified by a motion of the 
head that he had taken in and was considering what she said. 

'No, do you know that that boy is costing me forty thousand roubles 
a year?' he said, evidently unable to restrain the gloomy current of his 
thoughts. He paused. 'What will it be in five years if this goes on? These 
are the advantages of being a father. ... Is she rich, your young princess?' 

'Her father is very rich and miserly. He lives in the country. You know 
that notorious Prince Bolkonsky, retired under the late emperor. He's a 
very clever man, but eccentric and tedious. The poor little thing is as un- 
happy as possible. Her brother it is who has lately been married to Liza 
Meinen. He'll be here this evening.' 

'Listen, dear Annette,' said the prince, suddenly taking his companion's 
hand, 'arrange this matter for me and I am your faithful slave for ever 
and ever. She's of good family and well off. That's all I want.' 

Anna Pavlovna's drawing-room gradually began to fill. The people of 
the highest distinction in Petersburg were there, people very different in 
ages and characters, but alike in the set in which they moved. The 
daughter of Prince Vassily, the beauty, Ellen, came to fetch her father 
and go with him to the ambassador's fete. She w T as wearing a ball-dress 
with an imperial badge on it. The young Princess Bolkonsky was there, 
celebrated as the most seductive woman in Petersburg. She had been 
married the previous winter, and was not now going out into the great 
world on account of her interesting condition, but was still to be seen at 
small parties. Prince Ippolit, the son of Prince Vassily, came too with 
Mortemart, whom he introduced. The Abbe Alorio was there too, and 
many others. 

'Have you not yet seen, or not been introduced to ma tante?'' Anna 
Pavlovna said to her guests as they arrived, and very seriously she led 
them up to a little old lady wearing tall bows, who had sailed in out of 
the next room as soon as the guests began to arrive. Anna Pavlovna men- 
tioned their names, deliberately turning her eyes from the guest to ma 
tante, and then withdrew. All the guests performed the ceremony of 
greeting the aunt, who was unknown, uninteresting and unnecessary to 
every one. Anna Pavlovna with mournful, solemn sympathy, followed 
these greetings, silently approving them. Ma tante said to each person the 
same words about his health, her own health, and the health of her 



WAR AND PEACE 5 

majesty, who was, thank God, better . to-day. Every one, though from 
politeness showing no undue haste, moved away from the old lady with 
a sense of relief at a tiresome duty accomplished, and did not approach 
her again all the evening. 

The young Princess Bolkonsky had come with her work in a gold- 
embroidered velvet bag. Her pretty little upper lip, faintly darkened with 
down, was very short over her teeth, but was all the more charming when 
it was lifted, and still more charming when it was at times drawn down to 
meet the lower lip. As is always the case with perfectly charming women, 
her defect— the shortness of the lip and the half-opened mouth— seemed her 
peculiar, her characteristic beauty. Every one took delight in watching 
the pretty creature full of life and gaiety, so soon to be a mother, and so 
lightly bearing her burden. 

The little princess, moving with a slight swing, walked with rapid little 
steps round the table with her work-bag in her hand, and gaily arranging 
the folds of her gown, sat down on a sofa near the silver samovar; it 
seemed as though everything she did was a festival for herself and all 
around her. 

'I have brought my work,' she said, displaying her reticule, and ad- 
dressing the company generally. 'Mind, Annette, don't play me a nasty 
trick,' she turned to the lady of the house; 'you wrote to me that it was 
quite a little gathering. See how I am got up.' 

And she flung her arms open to show her elegant grey dress, trimmed 
with lace and girt a little below the bosom with a broad sash. 

'Never mind, Lise, you will always be prettier than any one else,' 
answered Anna Pavlovna. 

'You know my husband is deserting me,' she went on in just the same 
voice, addressing a general; 'he is going to get himself killed. Tell me 
what this nasty war is for,' she said to Prince Vassily, and without waiting 
for an answer she turned to Prince Vassily's daughter, the beautiful Ellen. 

'How delightful this little princess is!' said Prince Vassily in an under- 
tone to Anna Pavlovna. 

Soon after the little princess, there walked in a massively built, stout 
young man in spectacles, with a cropped head, light breeches in the mode 
of the day, with a high lace ruffle and a ginger-coloured coat. This stout 
young man was the illegitimate son of a celebrated dandy of the days of 
Catherine, Count Bezuhov, who was now dying at Moscow. He had not 
yet entered any branch of the service; he had only just returned from 
abroad, where he had been educated, and this was his first appearance 
in society. Anna Pavlovna greeted him with a nod reserved for persons 
of the very lowest hierarchy in her drawing-room. But, in spite of this 
greeting, Anna Pavlovna's countenance showed signs on seeing Pierre of 
uneasiness and alarm, such as is shown at the sight of something too big 
and out of place. Though Pierre certainly was somewhat bigger than any 
of the other men in the room, this expression could only have reference 



6 WAR AND PEACE 

to the clever, though shy, observant and natural look that distinguished 
him from every one else in the drawing-room. 

'It is very kind of you, M. Pierre, to have come to see a poor invalid,' 
Anna Pavlovna said to him, exchanging anxious glances with her aunt, 
to whom she was conducting him. 

Pierre murmured something unintelligible, and continued searching 
for something with his eyes. He smiled gleefully and delightedly, bowing 
to the little princess as though she were an intimate friend, and went up 
to the aunt. Anna Pavlovna's alarm was not without grounds, for Pierre 
walked away from the aunt without waiting to the end of her remarks 
about her majesty's health. Anna Pavlovna stopped him in dismay with 
the words: 'You don't know Abbe Morio? He's a very interesting man,' 
she said. 

'Yes, I have heard of his scheme for perpetual peace, and it's very 
interesting, but hardly possible . . .' 

'You think so?' said Anna Pavlovna in order to say something and to 
get away again to her duties as hostess, but Pierre committed the opposite 
incivility. Just now he had walked off without listening to the lady who 
was addressing him; now he detained by his talk a lady who wanted to 
.get away from him. With head bent and legs planted wide apart, he began 
explaining to Anna Pavlovna why he considered the abbe's scheme 
chimerical. 

'We will talk of it later,' said Anna Pavlovna, smiling. 

And getting rid of this unmannerly young man she returned to her 
duties, keeping her eyes and ears open, ready to fly to the assistance at 
any point where the conversation was flagging. Just as the foreman of a 
spinning-mill settles the work-people in their places, walks up and down 
the works, and noting any stoppage or unusual creaking or too loud a 
whir in the spindles, goes up hurriedly, slackens the machinery and sets 
it going properly, so Anna Pavlovna, walking about her drawing-room, 
went up to any circle that was pausing or too loud in conversation and 
by a single word or change of position set the conversational machine 
going again in its regular, decorous way. But in the midst of these cares 
a special anxiety on Pierre's account could still be discerned in her. She 
kept an anxious watch on him as he went up to listen to what was being 
said near Mortemart, and walked away to another group where the abbe 
Was talking. 

Except the aunt, beside whom was sitting no one but an elderly lady 
with a thin, careworn face, who seemed rather out of her element in this 
brilliant society, the company was broken up into three groups. In one of 
these, the more masculine, the centre was the abbe; in the other, the group 
of young people, the chief attractions were the beautiful Princess Ellen, 
Prince Vassily's daughter, and the little Princess Bolkonsky, with her rosy 
prettiness, too plump for her years. In the third group were Mortemart 
and Anna Pavlovna. 

The vicomte was a pretty young gentleman with soft features and 



WAR AND PEACE 7 

manners, who obviously regarded himself as a celebrity, but with good- 
breeding modestly allowed the company the benefit of his society. Anna 
Pavlovna unmistakably regarded him as the chief entertainment she was 
giving her guests. As a clever maitre d'hotel serves as something superla- 
tively good the piece of beef which no one would have cared to eat seeing 
it in the dirty kitchen, Anna Pavlovna that evening served up to her 
guests— first, the vicomte and then the abbe, as something superlatively 
subtle. In Mortemart's group the talk turned at once on the execution of 
the due d'Enghien. The vicomte said that the due d'Enghien had been 
lost by his own magnanimity and that there were special reasons for 
Bonaparte's bitterness against him. 

'Ah, come! Tell us about that, vicomte,' said Anna Pavlovna gleefully. 
'Come over here, chere Helene. 1 

Princess Ellen smiled. She got up with the same unchanging smile of 
the acknowledged beauty with which she had entered the drawing-room. 
Her white ball-dress adorned with ivy and moss rustled lightly; her white 
shoulders, glossy hair, and diamonds glittered, as she passed between the 
men who moved apart to make way for her. Not looking directly at any 
one, but smiling at every one, as it were courteously allowing to all the 
right to admire the beauty of her figure, her full shoulders, her bosom 
and back, which were extremely exposed in the mode of the day, she 
moved up to Anna Pavlovna, seeming to bring with her the brilliance 
of the ballroom. Ellen was so lovely that she was not merely free from 
the slightest shade of coquetry, she seemed on the contrary ashamed of 
the too evident, too violent and all-conquering influence of her beauty. 
She seemed to wish but to be unable to soften the effect of her beauty. 

'What a beautiful woman!' every one said on seeing her. As though 
struck by something extraordinary, the vicomte shrugged his shoulders 
and dropped his eyes. 

'Madame, I doubt my abilities before such an audience,' he said, bow- 
ing with a smile. 

The princess leaned her plump, bare arm on the table and did not 
find it necessary to say anything. She waited, smiling. During the 
vicomte's story she sat upright, looking from time to time at her beautiful, 
plump arm, which lay with its line changed by pressure on the table, 
then at her still lovelier bosom, on which she set straight her diamond 
necklace. Several times she settled the folds of her gown, and when the 
narrative made a sensation upon the audience, she glanced at Anna 
Pavlovna and at once assumed the expression she saw on the maid-of- 
honour's face, then she relapsed again into her unvarying smile. 

The vicomte very charmingly related the anecdote then current, that 
the due d'Enghien had secretly visited Paris for the sake of an interview 
with the actress, Mile. Georges, and that there he met Bonaparte, who also 
enjoyed the favours of the celebrated actress, and that, meeting the due, 
Napoleon had fallen into one of the fits to which he was subject and had 
been completely in the due's power, how the due had not taken advantage 



8 WAR AND PEACE 

of it, and Bonaparte had in the sequel avenged this magnanimity by the 
due's death. 

The story was very charming and interesting, especially at the point 
when the rivals suddenly recognise each other, and the ladies seemed to 
be greatly excited by it. i Char?nantP said Anna Pavlovna, looking in- 
quiringly at the little princess. 'Charming!' whispered the little princess, 
sticking her needle into her work as an indication that the interest and 
charm of the story prevented her working. The vicomte appreciated this 
silent homage, and smiling gratefully, resumed his narrative. But mean- 
while Anna Pavlovna, still keeping a watch on the dreadful young man, 
noticed that he was talking too loudly and too warmly with the abbe 
and hurried to the spot of danger. Pierre had in fact succeeded in getting 
into a political conversation with the abbe on the balance of power, and 
the abbe, evidently interested by the simple-hearted fervour of the young 
man, was unfolding to him his cherished idea. Both were listening and 
talking too eagerly and naturally, and Anna Pavlovna did not like it. 

'The means?— the balance of power in Europe and the rights of the 
people,' said the abbe. 'One powerful state like Russia— with the prestige 
of barbarism— need only take a disinterested stand at the head of the 
alliance that aims at securing the balance of power in Europe, and it 
would save the world!' 'How are you going to get such a balance of 
power?' Pierre was beginning; but at that moment Anna Pavlovna came 
up, and glancing severely at Pierre, asked the Italian how he was sup- 
porting the climate. The Italian's face changed instantly and assumed 
the look of offensive, affected sweetness, which was evidently its habitual 
expression in conversation with women. 'I am so enchanted by the wit 
and culture of the society— especially of the ladies— in which I have had 
the happiness to be received, that I have not yet had time to think of the 
climate,' he said. Not letting the abbe and Pierre slip out of her grasp, 
Anna Pavlovna, for greater convenience in watching them, made them 
join the bigger group. 

At thafc^ moment another guest walked into the drawing-room. This 
was thek y oun g_ Prince Audrey Bolkonsky, the husband of the little 
princess. Prince BoIkbrisTty'wasna" vefy~Eandsome young man, of medium 
height, with clear, clean-cut features. Everything in his appearance, from 
his. weary, bored_^xpression fc©~ his slow, measured step , for med the most 
striking^ contrast to his"TIv^eIy~litTle~^wif e. DBviTTusly' all the people in the 
drawing-room were familiar figures to him, and more than that, he was 
unmistakably so sick of them that even to look at them and to listen to 
them was a weariness to him. Of all the wearisome faces the face of his 
pretty wife seemed to bore him most. With a grimace that distorted his 
handsome face he turned away from her. He kissed Anna Pavlovna's 
hand, and with half-closed eyelids scanned the whole company. 

'You are enlisting for the war, prince?' said Anna Pavlovna. 

'General Kutuzov has been kind enough to have me as an aide-de- 
camp,' said Bolkonsky. 



WAR AND PEACE 9 

'And Lise, your wife? — ' 

'She is going into the country.' 

l AndreJ said his wife, addressing her husband in exactly the same 
coquettish tone in which she spoke to outsiders, 'the vicomte has just 
told us such a story about Mile. Georges and Bonaparte!' 

Prince Andrey scowled and turned away. Pierre, who had kept his 
eyes joyfully and affectionately fixed on him ever since he came in, went 
up to him and took hold of his arm. Prince Andrey, without looking 
round, twisted his face into a grimace of annoyance at any one's touch- 
ing him, but seeing Pierre's smiling face, he gave him a smile that was 
unexpectedly sweet and pleasant. 

'Why, you! . . . And in such society too,' he said to Pierre. 

'I knew you would be here,' answered Pierre. 'I'm coming to supper 
with you,' he added in an undertone, not to interrupt the vicomte who 
was still talking. 'Can I?' 

'Oh no, impossible,' said Prince Andrey, laughing, with a squeeze of 
his hand giving Pierre to understand that there was no need to ask. 
He would have said something more, but at that instant Prince Vassily 
and his daughter got up and the two young men rose to make way for 
them. 

'Pardon me, my dear vicomte,' said Prince Vassily in French, gently 
pulling him down by his sleeve to prevent him from getting up from his 
seat. 'This luckless fete at the ambassador's deprives me of a pleasure 
and interrupts you. I am very sorry to leave your enchanting party,' he 
said to Anna Pavlovna. 

His daughter, Princess Ellen, lightly holding the folds of her gown, 
passed between the chairs, and the smile glowed more brightly than ever 
on her handsome face. Pierre looked with rapturous, almost frightened 
eyes at this beautiful creature as she passed them. 

'Very lovely!' said Prince Andrey. 

'Very,' said Pierre. 

As he came up to them, Prince Vassily took Pierre by the arm, and 
addressing Anna Pavlovna: 

'Get this bear into shape for me,' he said. 'Here he has been staying 
with me for a month, and this is the first time I have seen him in society. 
Nothing's so necessary for a young man as the society of clever women.' 

Anna Pavlovna smiled and promised to look after Pierre, who was, she 
knew, related to Prince Vassily on his father's side. The elderly lady, 
who had been till then sitting by the aunt, got up hurriedly, and overtook 
Prince Vassily in the hall. All the affectation of interest she had assumed 
till now vanished. Her kindly, careworn face expressed nothing but 
anxiety and alarm. 

'What have you to tell me, prince, of my Boris?' she s;ud, catching him 
in the hall. 'I can't stay any longer in Petersburg. Tell me what news 
am I to take to my poor boy?' 

Although Prince Vassily listened reluctantly and almost uncivilly to 



10 WAR AND PEACE 

the elderly lady and even showed signs of impatience, she gave him 
an ingratiating and appealing smile, and to prevent his going away she 
took him by the arm. 'It is nothing for you to say a word to the Emperor, 
and he will be transferred at once to the Guards,' she implored. 

'Believe me, I will do all I can, princess,' answered Prince Vassily; 
'but it's not easy for me to petition the Emperor. I should advise you to 
apply to Rumyantsov, through Prince Galitsin; that would be the wisest 
course.' 

The elderly lady was a Princess Drubetskoy, one of the best families 
in Russia; but she was poor, had been a long while out of society, and 
had lost touch with her former connections. She had come now to try 
and obtain the appointment of her only son to the Guards. It was simply 
in order to see Prince Vassily that she had invited herself and come to 
Anna Pavlovna's party, simply for that she had listened to the vicomte's 
story. She was dismayed at Prince Vassily's words; her once handsome 
face showed exasperation, but that lasted only one moment. She smiled 
again and grasped Prince Vassily's arm more tightly. 

'Hear what I have to say, prince,' she said. 'I have never asked you a 
favour, and never will I ask one; I have never reminded you of my 
father's affection for you. But now, for God's sake, I beseech you, do 
this for my son, and I shall consider you my greatest benefactor,' she 
added hurriedly. 'No, don't be angry, but promise me. I have asked 
Galitsin; he has refused. Be as kind as you used to be,' she said, trying 
to smile, though there were tears in her eyes. 

'Papa, we are late,' said Princess Ellen, turning her lovely head on 
her statuesque shoulders as she waited at the door. 

Influence in the world is a capital which must be carefully guarded 
if it is not to disappear. Prince Vassily knew this, and having once for 
all reflected that if he were to beg for all who begged him to do so, 
he would soon be unable to beg for himself, he rarely made use of his 
influence. In Princess Drubetskoy's case, however, he felt after her new 
appeal something akin to a conscience-prick. She had reminded him of 
the truth; for his first step upwards in the service he had been indebted 
to her father. Besides this, he saw from her manner that she was one of 
those women— especially mothers— who having once taken an idea into 
their heads will not give it up till their wishes are fulfilled, and till then 
are prepared for daily, hourly persistence, and even for scenes. This last 
consideration made him waver. 

l Chere Anna Mihalovna,' he said, with his invariable familiarity and 
boredom in his voice, 'it's almost impossible for me to do what you 
wish; but to show you my devotion to you, and my reverence for your 
dear father's memory, I will do the impossible— your son shall be trans- 
ferred to the Guards; here is my hand on it. Are you satisfied?' 

'My dear prince, you are our benefactor. I expected nothing less in- 
deed; I know how good you are — ' He tried to get away. 'Wait a mo- 
ment, one word. Once in the Guards . . .' She hesitated. 'You are on 



WAR AND PEACE 11 

friendly terms with Mihail Ilarionovitch Kutuzov; recommend Boris as 
his adjutant. Then my heart will be set at rest, then indeed . . .' 

Prince Vassily smiled. 'That I can't promise. You don't know how 
Kutuzov has been besieged ever since he has been appointed commander- 
in-chief. He told me himself that all the Moscow ladies were in league 
together to give him all their offspring as adjutants.' 

'No, promise me; I can't let you off, kind, good friend, benefactor . . .' 

'Papa,' repeated the beauty in the same tone, 'we are late.' 

'Come, an revoir, good-bye. You see how it is.' 

'To-morrow then you will speak to the Emperor? ' 

'Certainly; but about Kutuzov I can't promise.' 

'Yes; do promise, promise, BasileJ Anna Mihalovna said, pursuing 
him with the smile of a coquettish girl, once perhaps characteristic, 
but now utterly incongruous with her careworn face. Evidently she had 
forgotten her age and from habit was bringing out every feminine 
resource. But as soon as he had gone out her face assumed once more 
the frigid, artificial expression it had worn all the evening. She went 
back to the group in which the vicomte was still talking, and again 
affected to be listening, waiting for the suitable moment to get away, 
now that her object had been attained. 

'And what do you think of this latest farce of the coronation at 
Milan?' said Anna Pavlovna. 'And the new comedy of the people of 
Lucca and Genoa coming to present their petitions to Monsieur Buona- 
parte. Monsieur Buonaparte sitting on a throne and granting the petitions 
of nations! Adorable! Why, it is enough to drive one out of one's senses! 
It seems as though the whole world had lost its head.' 

Prince Andrey smiled sarcastically, looking straight into Anna Pav- 
lovna's face. 

'God gives it me; let man beware of touching it,' he said (Bonaparte's 
words uttered at the coronation). 'They say that he was very fine as he 
spoke those words,' he added, and he repeated the same words in Italian: 
'Dio ?ni la dona, gai a qui la tocca? 

'I hope that at last,' pursued Anna Pavlovna, 'this has been the drop 
of water that will make the glass run over. The sovereigns cannot con- 
tinue to endure this man who is a threat to everything.' 

'The sovereigns! I am not speaking of Russia,' said the vicomte, defer- 
entially and hopelessly. 'They are sending ambassadors to congratulate the 
usurper. If Bonaparte remains another year on the throne of France, things 
will have gone too far. By intrigue and violence, by exiles and executions, 
French society— I mean good society— will hove been destroyed for ever, 
and then . . .' 

He shrugged his shoulders, and made a despairing gesture with his 
hand. Pierre wanted to say something— the oonvcrsati m interested him 
—but Anna Pavlovna, who was keeping her eye on him, interposed. 

'And the Emperor Alexander,' she said with the pathetic note that 
always accompanied all her references to the imperial family, 'has dc- 



12 WAR AND PEACE 

clared his intention of leaving it to the French themselves to choose their 
own form of government. And I imagine there is no doubt that the whole 
nation, delivered from the usurper, would fling itself into the arms of 
its lawful king/ said Anna Pavlovna, trying to be agreeable to an emigre 
and loyalist. 

'That's not certain,' said Prince Andrey. i M. le vicomte is quite right 
in supposing that things have gone too far by now. I imagine it would 
not be easy to return to the old regime.' 

c As far as I could hear,' Pierre, blushing, again interposed in the con- 
versation, 'almost all the nobility have gone over to Bonaparte.' 

'That's what the Bonapartists assert,' said the vicomte without look- 
ing at Pierre. 'It's a difficult matter now to find out what public opinion 
is in France.' 

'Bonaparte said so,' observed Prince Andrey with a sarcastic smile. It 
was evident that he did not like the vicomte, and that though he was 
not looking at him, he was directing his remarks against him. 

4 "I showed them the path of glory; they would not take it," ' he said 
after a brief pause, again quoting Napoleon's words. ' "I opened my 
anterooms to them; they crowded in." ... I do not know in what 
degree he had a right to say so/ 

'None!' retorted the vicomte. 'Since the due's murder, even his warm- 
est partisans have ceased to regard him as a hero. If indeed some people 
made a hero of him/ said the vicomte addressing Anna Pavlovna, 'since 
the due's assassination there has been a martyr more in heaven, and 
a hero less on earth/ 

Anna Pavlovna and the rest of the company hardly had time to smile 
their appreciation of the vicomte's words, when Pierre again broke into 
the conversation, and though Anna Pavlovna had a foreboding he would 
say something inappropriate, this time she was unable to stop him. 

'The execution of the due d'Enghien/ said Monsieur Pierre, 'was a 
political necessity, and I consider it a proof of greatness of soul that 
Napoleon did not hesitate to take the whole responsibility of it upon 
himself.' 

i Dieu! mon DieuV moaned Anna Pavlovna, in a terrified whisper. 

'What, Monsieur Pierre! you think assassination is greatness of soul,' 
said the little princess, smiling and moving her work nearer to her. 

'Ah! oh!' cried different voices. 

Pierre looked solemnly over his spectacles at his audience. 

'I say so/ he pursued desperately, 'because the Bourbons ran away 
from the Revolution, leaving the people to anarchy; and Napoleon alone 
was capable of understanding the Revolution, of overcoming it, and so 
for the public good he could not stop short at the life of one man.' 

'Won't you come over to this table?' said Anna Pavlovna. But Pierre 
went on without answering her. 

'Yes,' he said, getting more and more eager, 'Napoleon is great because 
he has towered above the Revolution, and subdued its evil tendencies, 



WAR AND PEACE 13 

preserving all that was good— the equality of all citizens, and freedom 
of speech and of the press, and only to that end has he possessed himself 
of supreme power.' 

'Yes, if on obtaining power he had surrendered it to the lawful king, 
instead of making use of it to commit murder,' said the vicomte, 'then I 
might have called him a great man.' 

'He could not have done that. The people gave him power simply for 
him to rid them of the Bourbons, and that was just why the people 
believed him to be a great man. The Revolution was a grand fact,' pur- 
sued Monsieur Pierre, betraying by this desperate and irrelevantly pro- 
vocative statement his extreme youth and desire to give full expression 
to everything. 

'Revolution and regicide a grand fact? . . . What next? . . . but won't 
you come to this table?' repeated Anna Pavlovna. 

'Contrat social,' said the vicomte with a bland smile. 

'I'm not speaking of regicide. I'm speaking of the idea.' 

'The idea of plunder, murder, and regicide!' an ironical voice put in. 

'Those were extremes, of course; but the whole meaning of the Revo- 
lution did not lie in them, but in the rights of man, in emancipation from 
conventional ideas, in equality; and all these Napoleon has maintained 
in their full force.' 

'Liberty and equality,' said the vicomte contemptuously, as though 
he had at last made up his mind to show this youth seriously all the 
folly of his assertions: 'all high-sounding words, which have long since 
been debased. Who does not love liberty and equality? Our Saviour in- 
deed preached liberty and equality. Have men been any happier since 
the Revolution? On the contrary. We wanted liberty, but Bonaparte has 
crushed it.' 

Prince Andrey looked with a smile first at Pierre, then at the vicomte, 
then at their hostess. 

For the first minute Anna Pavlovna had, in spite of her social adroit- 
ness, been dismayed by Pierre's outbreak; but when she saw that the 
vicomte was not greatly discomposed by Pierre's sacrilegious utterances, 
and had convinced herself that it was impossible to suppress them, she 
rallied her forces and joined the vicomte in attacking the orator. 

'Mais, mon cher Monsieur Pierre,'' said Anna Pavlovna, 'what have 
you to say for a great man who was capable of executing the duc-or 
simply any human being— guiltless and untried?' 

'I should like to ask,' said the vicomte, 'how monsieur would explain 
the 18th of Brumaire? Was not that treachery?' 

'It was a juggling trick, not at all like a great man's way of acting. 

'And the wounded he killed in Africa?' said the little princess; 'that 
was awful!' And she shrugged her shoulders. 

'He's a plebeian, whatever you may say,' said Prince [ppollt. 

Monsieur Pierre did not know which to answer. I [e looked at than all 
and smiled. His smile was utterly unlike the half-smile of all the others. 



14 WAR AND PEACE 

When he smiled, suddenly, instantaneously, his serious, even rather 
sullen, face vanished completely, and a quite different face appeared^ 
childish, good-humoured, even rather stupid, that seemed to beg in- 
dulgence. The vicomte, who was seeing him for the first time, saw clearly 
that this Jacobin was by no means so formidable as his words. Every one 
was silent. 

'How is he to answer every one at once?' said Prince Andrey. 'Besides, 
in the actions of a statesman, one must distinguish between his acts a* 
a private person and as a general or an emperor. So it seems to me.' 

'Yes, yes, of course,' put in Pierre, delighted at the assistance that 
had come to support him. 

'One must admit,' pursued Prince Andrey, 'that Napoleon as a man 
was great at the bridge of Areola, or in the hospital at Jaffa, when he gave 
his hand to the plague-stricken, but . . . but there are other actions it 
would be hard to justify.' 

Prince Andrey, who obviously wished to relieve the awkwardness of 
Pierre's position, got up to go, and made a sign to his wife. 

Thanking Anna Pavlovna for her charmante soiree, the guests began 
to take leave. 

Pierre w T as clumsy, stout and uncommonly tall, with huge red hands; 
he did not, as they say, know how to come into a drawing-room and still 
less how to get out of one, that is, how to say something particularly 
agreeable on going away. Moreover, he was dreamy. He stood up, and 
picking up a three-cornered hat with the plume of a general in it instead 
of his own, he kept hold of it, pulling the feathers till the general asked 
him to restore it. But all his dreaminess and his inability to enter a 
drawing-room or talk properly in it were atoned for by his expression of 
good-nature, simplicity and modesty. Anna Pavlovna turned to him, 
and with Christian meekness signifying her forgiveness for his misbe- 
haviour, she nodded to him and said: 

'I hope I shall see you again, but I hope too you w T ill change your 
opinions, my dear Monsieur Pierre.' 

He made no answer, simply bowed and displayed to every one once 
more his smile, which said as plainly as words: 'Opinions or no opinions, 
you see what a nice, good-hearted fellow I am.' And Anna Pavlovna and 
every one else instinctively felt this. 

Pierre, arriving first, went to Prince Andrey's study, like one of the 
household, and at once lay down on the sofa, as his habit was, and taking 
up the first book he came upon in the shelf (it was Cesar's Commen- 
taries) he propped himself on his elbow, and began reading it in the 
middle. 

'What a shock you gave Mile. Scherer! She'll be quite ill now,' Prince 
Andrey said, as he came into the study rubbing his small white hands. 

Pierre rolled his whole person over so that the sofa creaked, turned his 
eager face to Prince Andrey, smiled and waved his hand to him. 



WAR AND PEACE 15 

'Oh, that abbe was very interesting, only he's got a wrong notion about 
it. . . . To my thinking, perpetual peace is possible, but I don't know 
how to put it. . . . Not by means of the balance of political power. . . .' 

Prince Andrey was obviously not interested in these abstract discus- 
sions. 

'One can't always say all one thinks everywhere, mon cher. Come tell 
me, have you settled on anything at last? Are you going into the cavalry 
or the diplomatic service?' 

Pierre sat on the sofa with his legs crossed under him. 

'Can you believe it, I still don't know. I don't like either.' 

'But you must decide en something; you know your father's expect- 
ing it.' 

At ten years old Pierre had been sent with an abbe as tutor to be edu- 
cated abroad, and there he remained till he was twenty. When he re- 
turned to Moscow, his father had dismissed the tutor and said to the 
young man: 'Now you go to Petersburg, look about you and make vour 
choice. I agree to anything. Here is a letter to Prince Vassily and here 
is money. Write and tell me everything; I will help you in everything.' 
Pierre had been three months already choosing a career and had not yet 
made his choice. It was of this choice Prince Andrey spoke to him now. 
Pierre rubbed his forehead. 

'But he must be a freemason,' he said, meaning the abbe he had seen 
that evening. 

'That's all nonsense,' Prince Andrey pulled him up again; 'we'd better 
talk of serious things. Have you been to the Horse Guards?' 

'No, I haven't; but this is what struck me and I wanted to talk to 
you about it. This war now is against Napoleon. If it were a war for 
freedom, I could have understood it, I would have been the first to go 
into the army; but to help England and Austria against the greatest man 
in the world— that's not right.' 

Prince Andrey simply shrugged his shoulders at Pierre's childish words. 
He looked as though one really could not answer such absurdities. But 
in reality it was hard to find any answer to this naive question than the 
answer Prince Andrey made. 'If every one would only fight for his own 
convictions, there'd be no war,' he said. 

'And a very good thing that would be too,' said Pierre. 

Prince Andrey smiled ironically. 'Very likely it would be a good 
thing, but it will never come to pass . . .' 

'Well, what are you going to the war for?' asked Pierre. 

'What for? I don't know. Because I have to. Besides, I'm going . . .' 
he stopped. 'I'm going because the life I lead here, this life is-not to my 
taste!' 

There was the rustle of a woman's dress in the next room. Prince Audrey 
started up, as it were pulling himself together, and his face assumed the 
expression it had worn in Anna Pavlovna's drawing-room. Pierre dropped 



16 WAR AND PEACE 

his legs down off the sofa. The princess came in. She had changed her 
gown, and was wearing a house dress as fresh and elegant as the other had 
been. Prince Andrey got up and courteously set a chair for her. 

'Why is it, I often wonder,' she began in French as always, while she 
hurriedly and fussily settled herself in the low chair, 'why is it Annette 
never married? How stupid you gentlemen all are not to have married her. 
You must excuse me, but you really have no sense about women. What an 
argumentative person you are, Monsieur Pierre!' 

'I'm still arguing with your husband; I can't make out why he wants lo 
go to the war,' said Pierre, addressing the princess without any of the 
affectation so common in the attitude of a young man to a young woman. 

The princess shivered. Clearly Pierre's words touched a tender spot. 

'Ah, that's what I say,' she said. 'I can't understand, I simply can't under- 
stand why men can't get on without war. Why is it we women want 
nothing of the sort? we don't care for it. See what egoists all men are; they 
are all, all egoists! Of his own accord, for his own whim, for no reason 
whatever, he is deserting me, shutting me up alone in the country.' 

^VVith my father and sister, remember,' said Prince Andrey quietly. 

It's just the same as alone, without my friends. . . . And he doesn't 
expect me to be afraid.' Her tone was querulous now, her upper lip was 
lifted, giving her face not a joyous expression, but a wild-animal look, like 
a squirrel. She paused as though feeling it indecorous to speak of her condi- 
tion before Pierre, though the whole gist of the matter lay in that. 

'I still don't understand what you are afraid of,' Prince Andrey said 
deliberately, not taking his eyes off his wife. The princess flushed red, and 
waved her hands despairingly. 

No, Andre, I say you are so changed, so changed . . .' 

'Your doctor's orders were that you were to go to bed earlier,' said 
Prince Andrey. 'It's time you were asleep.' 

The princess said nothing, and suddenly her short, downy lip began to 
quiver; Prince Andrey got up and walked about the room, shrugging his 
shoulders. 

Pierre looked over his spectacles in naive wonder from him to the prin- 
cess, and stirred uneasily as though he too meant to get up, but had 
changed his mind. 

'What do I care if Monsieur Pierre is here,' the little princess said sud- 
denly, her pretty face contorted into a tearful grimace; 'I have long wanted 
to say to you, Andrey, why are you so changed to me? What have J done? 
You go away to the war, you don't feel for me. Why is it?' 

'Liza!' was all Prince Andrey said, but in that one word there was entreaty 
and menace, and, most of all, conviction that she would herself regret her 
words; but she went on hurriedly. 

'You treat me as though I were ill, or a child. I see it all. You weren't 
like this six months ago.' 

'Liza, I beg you to be silent,' said Prince Andrey, still more expressively. 

Pierre, who had been growing more and more agitated during this con- 



WAR AND PEACE 17 

versation, got up and went to the princess. He seemed unable to endure the 
sight of her tears, and was ready to weep himself. 

'Please don't distress yourself, princess. You only fancy that because . . . 
I assure you, I've felt so myself . . . because . . . through . . . Oh, excuse 
me, an outsider has no business . . . Oh, don't distress yourself . . . good- 
bye.' 

Prince Andrey held his hand and stopped him. 

'No, stay a little, Pierre. The princess is so good, she would not wish to 
deprive me of the pleasure of spending an evening with you.' 

'No, he thinks of nothing but himself,' the princess declared, not attempt- 
ing to check her tears of anger. 

'Liza,' said Prince Andrey drily, raising his voice to a pitch that showed 
his patience was exhausted. 

All at once the angry squirrel expression of the princess's lovely little face 
changed to an attractive look of terror that awakened sympathy. 

l Mon Dieu! mon DieuP murmured the princess, and holding her gown 
with one hand, she went to her husband and kissed him on the forehead. 

'Good-night, Liza,' said Prince Andrey, getting up and kissing her hand 
courteously, as though she were a stranger. 

The friends were silent. Neither of them began to talk. Pierre looked at 
Prince Andrey; Prince Andrey rubbed his forehead with his small hand. 

'Never, never marry, my dear fellow; that's my advice to you; don't 
marry till you have faced the fact that you have done all you're capable of 
doing, and till you cease to love the woman you have chosen, till you see 
her plainly, or else you will make a cruel mistake that can never be set right. 
Marry when you're old and good for nothing . . . Or else everything good 
and lofty in you will be done for. It will all be frittered away over trifles. 
Yes, yes, yes! Don't look at me with such surprise.' 

Pierre took off his spectacles, which transformed his face, making it look 
even more good-natured, and looked wonderingly at his friend. 

'My wife,' pursued Prince Andrey, 'is an excellent woman. She is one 
of those rare women with whom one can feel quite secure of one's honour; 
but, my God! what wouldn't I give now not to be married! You are the first 
and the only person I say this to, because I like you. 

'You can't understand why I say this,' he went on. 'Why, the whole story 
of life lies in it. You talk of Bonaparte and his career,' he said, though Pierre 
had not talked of Bonaparte; 'you talk of Bonaparte, but Bonaparte when 
he was working his way up, going step by step straight to his aim, he was 
free; he had nothing except his aim and he attained it. But tie yourself up 
with a woman, and, like a chained convict, you lose all freedom. And all 
the hope and strength there is in you is only a drag on you, torturing you 
with regret. Drawing-rooms, gossip, balls, vanity, frivolity— that's the 
enchanted circle I can't get out of. I am setting off now to the war, the 
greatest war there has ever been, and I know nothing, and am good for 
nothing. ... If you only knew what these society women are, and, indeed, 
women generally! My father's right. Egoism, vanity, silliness, triviality in 



18 WAR AND PEACE 

everything— that's what women are when they show themselves as they 
really are. Looking at them in society, one fancies there's something in 
them, but there's nothing, nothing, nothing. No, don't marry, my dear 
fellow, don't marry!' Prince Andrey concluded. 

'It seems absurd to me,' said Pierre, 'that you, you consider yourself a 
failure, your life wrecked. You have everything, everything before you. 
And you . . .' 

Pierre regarded Prince Andrey as a model of all perfection, because 
Prince Andrey possessed in the highest degree just that combination of 
qualities in which Pierre was deficient, and which might be most nearly 
expressed by the idea of strength of will. Pierre always marvelled at Prince 
Andrey's faculty for dealing with people of every sort with perfect com- 
posure, his exceptional memory, his wide knowledge (he had read every- 
thing, knew everything, had some notion of everything), and most of all 
at his capacity for working and learning. If Pierre were frequently struck 
in Andrey by his lack of capacity for dreaming and philosophising (to 
which Pierre was himself greatly given), he did not regard this as a defect 
but as a strong point. 

'I am a man whose day is done,' said Prince Andrey. 'Why talk of me? 
let's talk about you,' he said after a brief pause, smiling at his own reassuring 
thoughts. The smile was instantly reflected on Pierre's face. 

'Why, what is there to say about me?' said Pierre, letting his face relax 
into an easy-going, happy smile. 'What am I? I am a bastard.' And he 
suddenly flushed crimson. Apparently it was a great effort to him to say this. 
'With no name, no fortune. . . . And after all, really . . .' He did not finish. 

Prince Andrey looked at him with kindly eyes. But in his eyes, friendly 
and kind as they were, there was yet a consciousness of his own superiority. 

'You are dear to me just because you are the one live person in all our 
society. You're lucky. Choose what you will, that's all the same. You'll 
always be all right, but there's one thing: give up going about with the 
Kuragins and leading this sort of life. It's not the right thing for you at all; 
all this riotous living and dissipation and all . . .' 

'What would you have, my dear fellow?' said Pierre, shrugging his 
shoulders; 'women, my dear fellow, women.' 

'I can't understand it,' answered Andrey. 'Ladies, that's another matter, 
but Kuragin's women, women and wine, I can't understand!' 

Pierre was living at Prince Vassily Kuragin's, and sharing in the dissipated 
mode of life of his son Anatole, the son whom they were proposing to 
marry to Prince Andrey's sister to reform him. 

'Do you know what,' said Pierre, as though a happy thought had suddenly 
occurred to him; 'seriously, I have been thinking so for a long while. 
Leading this sort of life I can't decide on anything, or consider anything 
properly. My head aches and my money's all gone. He invited me to-night, 
but I won't go.' 

'Give me your word of honour that you will give up going.' 

'On my honour!' 



WAR AND PEACE 19 

It was past one o'clock when Pierre left his friend's house. It was a cloud- 
less night, a typical Petersburg summer night. Pierre got into a hired coach, 
intending to drive home. But the nearer he got, the more he felt it impossible 
to go to bed on such a night, more like evening or morning. It was light 
enough to see a long way in the empty streets. On the way Pierre remem- 
bered that all the usual gambling set were to meet at Anatole Kuragin's 
that evening, after which there usually followed a drinking-bout, winding 
up with one of Pierre's favourite entertainments. 

'It would be jolly to go to Kuragin's,' he thought. But he immediately 
recalled his promise to Prince Andrey not to go there again. 

But, as so often happens with people of weak character, as it is called, he 
was at once overcome with such a passionate desire to enjoy once more 
this sort of dissipation which had become so familiar to him, that he 
determined to go. And the idea at once occurred to him that his promise 
was of no consequence, since he had already promised Prince Anatole to go 
before making the promise to Andrey. Finally he reflected that all such 
promises were merely relative matters, having no sort of precise significance, 
especially if one considered that to-morrow one might be dead or something 
so extraordinary might happen that the distinction between honourable and 
dishonourable would have ceased to exist. Such reflections often occurred to 
Pierre, completely nullifying all his resolutions and intentions. He went to 
Kuragin's. 

Driving up to the steps of a big house in the Horse Guards' barracks, 
where Anatole lived, he ran up the lighted steps and the staircase and went 
in at an open door. There was no one in the ante-room; empty bottles, 
cloaks, and over-shoes were lying about in disorder: there was a strong 
smell of spirits; in the distance he heard talking and shouting. 

The card-playing and the supper were over, but the party had not broken 
up. Pierre flung off his cloak, and went into the first room, where there 
were the remnants of supper, and a footman who, thinking himself unob- 
served, was emptying the half-full glasses on the sly. In the third room there 
was a great uproar of laughter, familiar voices shouting, and a bear growl- 
ing. Eight young men were crowding eagerly about the open window. 
Three others were busy with a young bear, one of them dragging at its 
chain and frightening the others with it. 

'I bet a hundred on Stevens!' cried one. 

'Mind there's no holding him up!' shouted another. 

'I'm for Dolohov!' shouted a third. 'Hold the stakes, Kuragin.' 

'I say, let Mishka be, we're betting.' 

'All at a go or the wager's lost!' cried a fourth. 

'Yakov, give us a bottle, Yakov!' shouted Anatole himself, a tall, handsome 
fellow, standing in the middle of the room, in nothing but a thin shirt, open 
over his chest. 'Stop, gentlemen. Here he is, here's Petrush;., the dear fellow,' 

he turned to Pierre. 

A man of medium height with bright blue eyes, especially remarkable 
from looking sober in the midst of the drunken uproar, shouted from the 



20 WAR AND PEACE 

window: 'Come here. I'll explain the bets!' This was Dolohov, an officer of 
the Semenov regiment, a notorious gambler and duellist, who was living 
with Anatole. Pierre smiled, looking good-humouredly about him. 

'I don't understand. What's the point?' 

'Wait a minute, he's not drunk. A bottle here,' said Anatole; and taking 
a glass from the table he went up to Pierre. 

'First of all, you must drink.' 

Pierre began drinking off glass after glass, looking from under his brows 
at the drunken group, who had crowded about the window again, and 
listening to their talk. Anatole kept his glass filled and told him that Dolohov 
had made a bet with an Englishman, Stevens, a sailor who was staying here, 
that he, Dolohov, would drink a bottle of rum sitting in the third story 
window with his legs hanging down outside. 

'Come, empty the bottle,' said Anatole, giving Pierre the last glass, 'or 
I won't let you go!' 

'No, I don't want to,' said Pierre, shoving Anatole away; and he went up 
to the window. 

Dolohov was holding the Englishman's hand and explaining distinctly 
the terms of the bet, addressing himself principally to Anatole and Pierre. 

Dolohov was a man of medium height, with curly hair and clear blue 
eyes. He was five-and-twenty, a man of small means and no connections. 
And yet though Anatole was spending ten thousand a year, Dolohov lived 
with him and succeeded in so regulating the position that Anatole and all 
who knew them respected Dolohov more than Anatole. Dolohov played at 
every sort of game, and almost always won. However much he drank, his 
brain never lost its clearness. Both Kuragin and Dolohov were at that time 
notorious figures in the fast and dissipated world in Petersburg. 

The bottle of rum was brought: the window-frame, which hindered any 
one sitting on the outside sill of the window, was being broken out by two 
footmen, obviously flurried and intimidated by the shouts and directions 
given by the gentlemen around them. 

Anatole with his swaggering air came up to the window. He was longing 
to break something. He shoved the footman aside and pulled at the frame, 
but the frame did not give. He smashed a pane. 

'Now then, you're the strong man,' he turned to Pierre. Pierre took hold 
of the cross beam, tugged, and with a crash wrenched the oak frame out. 

'All out, or they'll think I'm holding on,' said Dolohov. 

'The Englishman's bragging . . . it's a fine feat . . . eh?' said Anatole. 

'Fine,' said Pierre, looking at Dolohov, who with the bottle in his hand 
had gone up to the window, from which the light of the sky could be seen 
and the glow of morning and of evening melting into it. Dolohov jumped 
up on to the window, holding the bottle of rum in his hand. 'Listen!' he 
snouted, standing on the sill and facing the room. Every one was silent. 

'I take a bet' (he spoke in French that the Englishman might hear mm, 
and spoke it none too well) ... 'I take a bet for fifty imperials— like to 
make it a hundred?' he added, turning to the Englishman. 



WAR AND PEACE 21 

'No, fifty,' said the Englishman. 

'Good, for fifty imperials, that I'll drink off a whole bottle of rum without 
taking it from my lips. I'll drink it sitting outside the window, here on this 
place' (he bent down and pointed to the sloping projection of the wall 
outside the window) . . . 'and without holding on to anything. . . . That 
right? ' 

'All right,' said the Englishman. 

A thin, youthful hussar, who had been losing at cards that evening, slipped 
up to the window, poked his head out and looked down. 

'Oo! . . . oo! . . . oo!' he said, looking out of the window at the pave- 
ment below. 

'Shut up!' cried Dolohov, and he pushed the officer away, so that, tripping 
over his spurs, he went skipping awkwardly into the room. 

Setting the bottle on the window-sill, so as to have it within reach, 
Dolohov climbed slowly and carefully into the window. Lowering his legs 
over, with both hands spread open on the window-ledge, he tried the 
position, seated himself, let his hands go, moved a little to the right, and 
then to the left, and took the bottle. Anatole brought two candles, and set 
them on the window-ledge, so that it was quite light. Dolohov's back in his 
white shirt and his curly head were lighted up on both sides. All crowded 
round the window. The Englishman stood in front. Pierre smiled, and said 
nothing. One of the party, rather older than the rest, suddenly came 
forward with a scared and angry face, and tried to clutch Dolohov by his 
shirt. 

'Gentlemen, this is idiocy; he'll be killed,' said this more sensible man. 

Anatole stopped him. 

'Don't touch him; you'll startle him and he'll be killed. Eh? . . . What 
then, eh?' 

Dolohov turned, balancing himself, and again spreading his hands out. 

'If any one takes hold of me again,' he said, letting his words drop one 
by one through his thin, tightly compressed lips, 'I'll throw him down from 
here. Now . . .' 

Saying 'now,' he turned again, let his hands drop, took the bottle and 
put it to his lips, bent his head back and held his disengaged hand upwards 
to keep his balance. One of the footmen who had begun clearing away the 
broken glass, stopped still in a stooping posture, his eyes fixed on the 
window and Dolohov's back. Anatole stood upright, with wide-open eyes. 
The Englishman stared from one side, pursing up his lips. The man who 
had tried to stop it had retreated to the corner of the room, and lay on the 
sofa with his face to the wall. Pierre hid his face, and a smile strayed for- 
gotten upon it, though it was full of terror and icar. All were silent. Pierre 
took his hands from his eyes; Dolohov was still sitting in the same position, 
only his head was so far bent back that his curls touched his shirt collar, 
and the hand with the bottle rose higher and higher, trembling with evident 
effort. Evidently the bottle was nearly empty, and so was tipped higher, 
throwing the head back. 'Why is it so long?' thought Pierre. It seemed to 



22 WAR AND PEACE 

him that more than half an hour had passed. Suddenly Dolohov made a 
backward movement of the spine, and his arm trembled nervously; this was 
enough to displace his whole body as he sat on the sloping projection. He 
moved all over, and his arm and head trembled still more violently with 
the strain. One hand rose to clutch at the window-ledge, but it dropped 
again. Pierre shut his eyes once more, and said to himself that he would 
never open them again. Suddenly he was aware of a general stir about him. 
He glanced up, Dolohov was standing on the window-ledge, his face was 
pale and full of merriment. 

'Empty!' 

He tossed the bottle to the Englishman, who caught it neatly. Dolohov 
jumped down from the window. He smelt very strongly of rum. 

'Capital! Bravo! That's something like a bet. You're a devil of a fellow!' 
came shouts from all sides. 

The Englishman took out his purse and counted out the money. Dolohov 
frowned and did not speak. Pierre dashed up to the window. 

'Gentlemen. Who'll take a bet with me? I'll do the same!' he shouted 
suddenly. 'I don't care about betting; see here, tell them to give me a 
bottle. I'll do it. . . . Tell them to give it here.' 

'Let him, let him!' said Dolohov, smiling. 

'What, are you mad? No one would let you. Why, you turn giddy going 
downstairs,' various persons protested. 

'I'll drink it; give me the bottle of rum,' roared Pierre, striking the table 
with a resolute, drunken gesture, and he climbed into the window. They 
clutched at his arms; but he was so strong that he shoved every one far 
away who came near him. 

'No, there's no managing him like that,' said Anatole. 'Wait a bit, I'll get 
round him. . . . Listen, I'll take your bet, but for to-morrow, for we're all 
going on now to . . .' 

'Yes, come along,' shouted Pierre, 'come along. . . . And take Mishka 
with us.' . . . And he caught hold of the bear, and embracing it and lifting 
it up, began waltzing round the room with it. 

Prince vassily kept the promise he had made at Anna Pavlovna's soiree 
to Princess Drubetskoy, who had petitioned him in favour of her only son 
Boris. His case had been laid before the Emperor, and though it was not 
to be a precedent for others, he received a commission as sub-lieutenant 
in the Guards of the Semenovsky regiment. But the post of an adjutant 
or attache in Kutuzov's service was not to be obtained for Boris by all 
Anna Mihalovna's efforts and entreaties. Shortly after the gathering at 
Anna Pavlovna's, Anna Mihalovna went back to Moscow, to her rich 
relatives the Rostovs, with whom she stayed in Moscow. 

The Rostovs were keeping the name-day of the mother and the younger 
daughter, both called Natalya. Ever since the morning, coaches with six 
horses had been incessantly driving to and from the Countess Rostov's big 
house in Povarsky, which was known to all Moscow. The countess and her 



WAR AND PEACE 23 

handsome eldest daughter were sitting in the drawing-room with their 
visitors, who came in continual succession to present their congratulations 
to the elder lady. 

The countess was a woman with a thin face of Oriental cast, forty-five 
years old, and obviously exhausted by child-bearing. She had had twelve 
children. The deliberate slowness of her movements and conversation, 
arising from weak health, gave her an air of dignity which inspired respect. 
Princess Anna Mihalovna Drubetskoy, as an intimate friend of the family, sat 
with them assisting in the work of receiving and entertaining their guests. 

'Dear countess, it is such a long time . . . she has been laid up, poor child 
... at the Razumovskys' ball, and the Countess Apraxin ... I was so 
glad,' feminine voices chattered briskly, interrupting one another and 
mingling with the sound of rustling skirts and the scraping of chairs. The 
conversation touched on the chief items of news in the town, on the illness 
of the wealthy old Count Bezuhov, a man who had been renowned for his 
personal beauty in the days of Catherine, and on his illegitimate son, Pierre, 
who had behaved so improperly at a soiree at Anna Pavlovna's. 'I am very 
sorry for the poor count,' declared the visitor; 'his health in such a pre- 
carious state, and now this distress caused him by his son; it will be the 
-death of him!' 

'Why, what has happened?' asked the countess, as though she did not 
know what was meant, though she had heard about the cause of Count 
Bezuhov's distress fifteen times already. 

'This is what comes of modern education! When he was abroad,' the 
visitor pursued, 'this young man was left to his own devices, and now in 
Petersburg, they say, he has been doing such atrocious things that he has 
been sent away under police escort.' 

'Really!' said the countess. 

'He has made a bad choice of his companions,' put in Princess Anna 
Mihalovna. 'Prince Vassily's son— he and a young man called Dolohov, 
they say— God only knows the dreadful things they've been doing. And 
both have suffered for it. Dolohov has been degraded to the rank of a 
common soldier, while Bezuhov's son has been banished to Moscow. As to 
Anatole Kuragin ... his father managed to hush it up somehow. But he 
has been sent out of Petersburg too.' 

'Why, what did they do?' asked the countess. 

'They're perfect ruffians, especially Dolohov,' said the visitor. 'Only fancy, 
the three of them had got hold of a bear somewhere, put it in a carriage 
with them, and were taking it to some actress's. The police ran up to stop 
them. They took the police officer, tied him back to back to the bear, and 
dropped the bear into the Moika: the bear swam with the police officer on 
him. It was all they could do to rescue the unlucky man,' the visitor went 
on. 'And that's the intellectual sort of amusement the son of Count Kinll 
Vladimirovitch Bezuhov indulges in!' she added. 

'How handsome the old man was,' said the countess, 'only last year! A 
finer-looking man I have never seen.' 



24 WAR AND PEACE 

'Now he's very much altered,' said Anna Mihalovna. 'Well, I was just 
saying,' she went on, 'the direct heir to all the property is Prince Vassily 
through his wife, but the father is very fond of Pierre, has taken trouble 
over his education, and he has written to the Emperor ... so that no one 
can tell, if he dies (he's so ill that it's expected any moment, and Lorrain 
has come from Petersburg), whom that immense property will come to, 
Pierre or Prince Vassily. Forty thousand serfs and millions of money. I 
know this for a fact, for Prince Vassily himself told me so. And indeed 
Kirill Vladimirovitch happens to be a third cousin of mine on my mother's 
side, and he's Boris's godfather too,' she added, apparently attaching no 
importance to this circumstance. 

'Prince Vassily arrived in Moscow yesterday. He's coming on some 
inspection business, so I was told,' said the visitor. 

'Yes, between ourselves,' said the princess, 'that's a pretext; he has come 
simply to see Prince Kirill Vladimirovitch, hearing he was in such a serious 
state.' 

A silence followed. The countess looked at her guest, smiling affably, but 
still not disguising the fact that she would not take it at all amiss now if 
the guest were to get up and go. Suddenly they heard in the next room 
several girls and boys running to the door, and the grating sound of a chair 
knocked over and a girl of thirteen ran in. There appeared in the doorway 
a student with a crimson band on his collar, a young officer in the Guards, 
a girl of fifteen and a fat, rosy-cheeked boy in a child's smock. 

The prince jumped up, and swaying from side to side, held his arms out 
wide round the little girl. 

'Ah, here she is!' he cried, laughing. 'Our little darling on her fete day!* 

'My dear, there is a time for everything,' said the countess, affecting 
severity. 'You're always spoiling her, ElieJ she added to her husband. 

The dark-eyed little girl, plain, but full of life, with her wide mouth, her 
childish bare shoulders, which shrugged and panted in her bodice from 
her rapid motion, her black hair brushed back, her slender bare arms and 
little legs in lace-edged long drawers and open slippers, was at that charming 
stage when the girl is no longer a child, while the child is not yet a young 
girl. Wriggling away from her father, she ran up to her mother, and taking 
no notice whatever of her severe remarks, she hid her flushed face in her 
mother's lace kerchief and broke into laughter. 

Meanwhile all the younger generation, Boris, the officer, Anna Miha- 
lovna's son; Nikolay, the student, the count's elder son; Sonya, the count's 
niece; and little Petya, his younger son, had all placed themselves about 
the drawing-room, and were obviously trying to restrain within the bounds 
of decorum the excitement and mirth which was brimming over in their 
faces. Clearly in the back part of the house, from which they had dashed 
out so impetuously, the conversation had been more amusing than the small- 
talk in the drawing-room. 

The two young men, the student and the officer, friends from childhood, 
were of the same age, and both good-looking, but not like each other. 



WAR AND PEACE 25 

Boris was a tall, fair-haired lad with delicate, regular features, and a look 
of composure on his handsome face. Nikolay was a curly-headed youth, 
not tall, with an open expression. On his upper lip there were already signs 
of a black moustache coming, and his whole face expressed impulsiveness 
and enthusiasm. Nikolay flushed red as he came into the drawing-room. 

'Yes, via chere, 9 said the old count, addressing the visitor and pointing to 
his Nikolay; 'here his friend Boris has received his commission as an officer, 
and he's so fond of him he doesn't want to be left behind, and is giving up 
the university and his poor old father to go into the army, ma chere. And 
there was a place all ready for him in the archives department, and all. 
Isn't that friendship now?' said the count interrogatively. 

'But they do say that war has been declared, you know,' said the visitor. 

'They've been saying so a long while,' said the count. 'They'll say so 
again and again, and so it will remain. There's friendship for you, ma chereP 
he repeated. 'He's going into the hussars.' 

The visitor, not knowing what to say, shook her head. 

'It's not from friendship at all,' answered Nikolay, flushing hotly, and 
denying it as though it were some disgraceful imputation. 'Not friendship 
at all, but simply I feel drawn to the military service.' 

He looked round at his cousin and the young lady visitor; both looked 
at him with a smile of approval. 

'Schubert's dining with us to-night, the colonel of the Pavologradsky 
regiment of hussars. He has been here on leave, and is taking him with him. 
There's no help for it,' said the count, shrugging his shoulders and speaking 
playfully of what evidently was a source of much distress to him. 

'I've told you already, papa,' said his son, 'that if you're unwilling to 
let me go, I'll stay. But I know I'm no good for anything except in the army.' 

'Well, well, it's all right!' said the old count; 'he always gets so hot. 
Bonaparte's turned all their heads; they're all dreaming of how he rose 
from a lieutenant to be an emperor. Well, and so may it turn out again, 
please God,' he added, not noticing the visitor's sarcastic smile. 

The guests got up and went away, promising to come to dinner. 

'What manners! Staying on and on!' said the countess, when she had seen 
her guests out. 

The countess was longing for a tete-a-tete talk with the friend of her 
childhood, Anna Mihalovna, whom she had not seen properly since she had 
arrived from Petersburg. Anna Mihalovna, with her tear-worn and amiable 
face, moved closer up to the countess's easy-chair. 

'With you I will be perfectly open,' said Anna Mihalovna. 'We haven't 
many old friends left. That's how it is I value your friendship so.' 

The countess pressed her friend's hand. 

l Ah, chere,' said the countess, 'in my life, too, everything is not rose- 
coloured. Do you suppose I don't see that, in the way we arc going on, our 
fortune can't last long? When we're in the country it's nothing but theatri- 
cals, hunting parties, and God knows what. But we won't talk of me. Come, 
tell me how you managed it all. I often wonder at you, Annette, the w ay 



26 WAR AND PEACE 

you go racing off alone, at your age, to Moscow, and to Petersburg, to all 
the ministers, and all the great people, and know how to get round them 
all too. I admire you, really! Well, how was it arranged? Why, I could 
never do it.' 

'Ah, my dear!' answered Princess Anna Mihalovna, 'God grant that you 
never know what it is to be left a widow, with no one to support you, and 
a son whom you love to distraction. One learns how to do anything,' she 
said with some pride. 'My lawsuit trained me to it. If I want to see one of 
these great people, I write a note: "Princess so-and-so wishes to see so- 
and-so," and I go myself in a hired cab two or three times— four, if need be— 
till I get what I want. I don't mind what they think of me.' 

'Well, tell me, then, whom did you interview for Borinka?' asked the 
countess. 'Here's your boy an officer in the Guards, while my Nikolinka's 
going as an ensign. There's no one to manage things for him. Whose help 
did you ask? ' 

'Prince Vassily's. He was so kind. Agreed to do everything immediately; 
put the case before the Emperor,' said Princess Anna Mihalovna enthusi- 
astically, entirely forgetting all the humiliation she had been through to 
attain her object. 

'And how is he? beginning to get old, Prince Vassily?' inquired the 
countess. 'I dare say he has forgotten me. He paid me attentions,' the 
countess recalled with a smile. 

'He's just the same,' answered Anna Mihalovna, 'so affable, brimming 
over. Greatness has not turned his head. "I am sorry I can do so little for 
you, Princess," he said to me; "I'm at your command." Yes, he's a splendid 
man, and very good tc his relatives. But you know, Natalie, my love for 
my boy. I don't know what I would not do to make him happy. And my 
means are so scanty,' pursued Anna Mihalovna, dropping her voice mourn- 
fully, 'that now I am in a most awful position. My wretched lawsuit is 
eating up all I have, and making no progress. I have not, can you conceive 
it, literally, not sixpence in the world, and I don't know how to get Boris's 
equipment.' She took out her handkerchief and shed tears. 'I must have five 
hundred roubles, and I have only a twenty-five rouble note. I'm in such a 
position. . . . My one hope now is in Prince Kirill Vladimirovitch Bezu- 
hov. If he will not come to the help of his godson— you know he is Boris's 
godfather— and allow him something for his maintenance, all my efforts will 
have been in vain; I shall have nothing to get his equipment with.' 

The countess deliberated in tearful silence. 

'I often think— perhaps it's a sinful thought,' said the princess— 'but I often 
think: here is Prince Kirill Vladimirovitch Bezuhov living all alone . . . 
that immense fortune . . . and what is he living for? Life is a burden to 
him, while Boris is only just beginning life.' 

'He will be sure to leave something to Boris,' said the countess. 

'God knows, chere amie! These wealthy grand people are such egoists. 
But still I'm going to see him at once with Boris, and I will tell him plainly 
the state of the case. People may think what they choose of me, I really 



WAR AND PEACE 27 

don't care, when my son's fate depends on it.' The princess got up. 'It's 
now two o'clock, and you dine at four. I shall have time to drive there 
and back.' 

And with the air of a Petersburg lady, used to business, and knowing how 
to make use of every moment, Anna Mihalovna sent for her son, and with 
him went out into the hall. 

'Good-bye, my dear,' she said to the countess, who accompanied her to 
the door. 'Wish me good-luck,' she added in a whisper unheard by her son. 

'You're going to Prince Kirill Vladimirovitch's, ma chere?' said the 
count, coming out of the dining-room into the hall. 'If he's better, invite 
Pierre to dine with us. He has been here; used to dance with the children.' 

'Mon cher boris,' said Anna Mihalovna as the Countess Rostov's carriage 
drove along the street strewn with straw and into the wide courtyard of 
Count Kirill Vladimirovitch Bezuhov's house. i Mon cher Boris, 1 said the 
mother, putting her hand out from under her old mantle, and laying it on 
her son's hand with a timid, caressing movement, 'be nice, be attentive. 
Count Kirill Vladimirovitch is after all your godfather, and your future 
depends on him. Remember that, mon cher, be charming, as you know so 
well how to be. . . .' 

'If I knew anything would come of it but humiliation,' her son answered 
coldly. 'But I have promised, and I will do it for your sake.' 

Although the carriage was standing at the entrance, the hall-porter, 
scanning the mother and son (they had not sent in their names, but had 
walked straight in through the glass doors between two rows of statues 
in niches), and looking significantly at the old mantle, inquired whom they 
wanted, the princesses or the count; and hearing that they wanted to see 
the count, said that his excellency was worse to-day, and his excellency 
could see no one. 

'We may as well go away,' the son said in French. 

''Mon amir said the mother in a voice of entreaty, again touching her 
son's hand, as though the contact might soothe or rouse him. Boris said no 
more, but without taking off his overcoat, looked inquiringly at his mother. 

'My good man,' Anna Mihalovna said ingratiatingly, addressing the hall- 
porter, 'I know that Count Kirill Vladimirovitch is very ill . . . that is 
why I am here. ... I am a relation. ... I shall not disturb him, my good 
man. ... I need only see Prince Vassily Sergyevitch; he's staying here, I 
know. Announce us, please.' 

The hall-porter sullenly pulled the bell-rope that rang upstairs and turned 
away. 

'Princess Drubetskoy to see Prince Vassily Sergyevitch,' he called to a 
footman in stockings, slippers and a frockcoat, who ran down from above, 
and looked down from the turn in the staircase. 

The mother straightened out the folds of her dyed silk gown, looked at 
herself in the full-length Venetian looking-glass on the wall, and boldly 
walked up on the stair carpet in her shabby, shapeless shoes. 



28 WAR AND PEACE 

'My dear, you promised me,' she turned again to her son, rousing him 
by a touch on his arm. The son, with his eyes on the floor, walked sub- 
missively after her. 

They went into a large room, from which a door led to the apartments 
that had been assigned to Prince Vassily. 

At the moment when the mother and son reached the middle of the 
room and were about to ask their way of an old footman, who had darted 
out at their entrance, the bronze handle of one of the doors turned, and 
Prince Vassily, dressed in a house jacket of velvet, with one star, came out, 
accompanying a handsome, black-haired man. This man was the celebrated 
Petersburg doctor, Lorrain. 

'It is positive, then?' said the prince. 

'Prince, errare est humanum] answered the doctor, lisping, and pronounce 
ing the Latin words with a French accent. 

'Very well, very well . . .' 

Perceiving Anna Mihalovna and her son, Prince Vassily dismissed the 
doctor with a bow, and in silence, with an air of inquiry, advanced to meet 
them. The son noticed how an expression of intense grief came at once into 
his mother's eyes, and he smiled slightly. 

'Yes, in what distressing circumstances we were destined to meet again, 
prince. . . . Tell me how is our dear patient?' she said, apparently not 
observing the frigid, offensive glance that was fixed on her. Prince Vassily 
stared at her, then at Boris with a look of inquiry that amounted to per- 
plexity. Boris bowed politely. Prince Vassily, without acknowledging his 
bow, turned away to Anna Mihalovna, and to her question he replied by a 
movement of the head and lips, indicative of the worst fears for the patient. 

'Is it possible?' cried Anna Mihalovna. 'Ah, this is terrible! It is dreadful 
to think . . . This is my son,' she added, indicating Boris. 'He wanted to 
thank you in person.' 

Boris once more made a polite bow. 

'Believe me, prince, a mother's heart will never forget what you have 
done for us.' 

'I am glad I have been able to do you any service, my dear Anna Mihal- 
ovna,' said Prince Vassily, pulling his lace frill straight, and in voice and 
manner manifesting here in Moscow, before Anna Mihalovna, who was 
under obligation to him, an even greater sense of his own dignity than in 
Petersburg at Anna Pavlovna's soiree. 

'Try to do your duty in the service, and to be worthy of it,' he added, 
turning severely to him. 'I am glad . . . you are here on leave?' he asked 
in his expressionless voice. 

'I am awaiting orders, your excellency, to join my new regiment,' 
answered Boris, showing no sign either of resentment at the prince's abrupt 
manner, nor of desire to get into conversation, but speaking with such 
respectful composure that the prince looked at him attentively. 

'You are living with your mother? ' 



WAR AND PEACE 29 

'I am living at Countess Rostov's,' said Boris, again adding: 'your excel- 
lency.' 

'What do the doctors say?' asked the princess, after a brief pause, and 
again the expression of deep distress reappeared on her tear-worn face. 

'There is little hope,' said the prince. 

'And, I was so longing to thank uncle once more for all his kindness to 
me and to Boris. He is his godson,' she added in a tone that suggested that 
Prince Vassily would be highly delighted to hear this fact. 

Prince Vassily pondered and frowned. Anna Mihalovna saw he was 
afraid of finding in her a rival with claims on Count Bezuhov's will. She 
hastened to reassure him. 'If it were not for my genuine love and devotion 
for uncle,' she said, uttering the last word with peculiar assurance and 
carelessness, 'I know his character,— generous, upright; but with only the 
princesses about him. . . . They are young. . . .' She bent her head and 
added in a whisper: 'Has he performed his last duties, prince? How price- 
less are these last moments! He is as bad as he could be, it seems; it is 
absolutely necessary to prepare him, if he is so ill. We women, prince,' she 
smiled tenderly, 'always know how to say these things. I absolutely must 
see him. Hard as it will be for me, I am used to suffering.' 

The prince evidently understood, and understood too, as he had at Anna 
Pavlovna's, that it was no easy task to get rid of Anna Mihalovna. 

'Would not this interview be trying for him, chere Anna Mihalovna?' he 
said. 'Let us wait till the evening; the doctors have predicted a crisis.' 

'But waiting's out of the question, prince, at such a moment. Think, it is 
a question of saving his soul. Ah! how terrible, the duties of a Chris- 
tian. . . .' 

The door from the inner rooms opened, and one of the count's nieces 
entered with a cold and forbidding face, and a long waist strikingly out of 
proportion with the shortness of her legs. 

Prince Vassily turned to her. 'Well, how is he?' 

'Still the same. What can you expect with this noise? . . .' said the 
princess, scanning Anna Mihalovna, as a stranger. 

'Ah, dear, I did not recognise you,' said Anna Mihalovna, with a delighted 
smile, and she ambled lightly up to the count's niece. 'I have just come, and 
I am at your service to help in nursing my uncle. I imagine what you have 
been suffering,' she added, sympathetically turning her eyes up. 

The princess made no reply, she did not even smile, but walked straight 
away. Anna Mihalovna took off her gloves, and entrenched herself as it 
were in an armchair, inviting Prince Vassily to sit down beside her. 

'Boris!' she said to her son, and she smiled at him, 'I am going in to the 
count, to poor uncle, and you can go to Pierre, mort ami, meanwhile, and 
don't forget to give him the Rostovs' invitation. They ask him to dinner. 
I suppose he won't go?' she said to the prince. 

'On the contrary,' said the prince, visibly cast down. 'I should be very 
glad if you would take that young man off my hands. ... He sticks on 
here. The count has not once asked for him.' 



30 WAR AND PEACE 

He shrugged his shoulders. A footman conducted the youth downstairs 
and up another staircase to the apartments of Pyotr Kirillovitch. 

Pierre had not succeeded in fixing upon a career in Petersburg, and really 
had been banished to Moscow for disorderly conduct. The story told about 
him at Count Rostov's was true. Pierre had assisted in tying the police officer 
to the bear. He had arrived a few days previously, stopping as he always did 
at his father's house. Though he had assumed that this story would be 
already known at Moscow, and that the ladies who were about his father, 
always unfavourably disposed to him, would profit by this opportunity of 
turning the count against him, he went on the day of his arrival to his 
father's part of the house. Going into the drawing-room, where the 
princesses usually sat, he greeted the ladies. There were three of them. The 
eldest, a trim, long-waisted, severe maiden-lady, the one who had come out 
to Anna Mihalovna, was reading. The younger ones, both rosy and pretty, 
were both working at their embroidery frames. Pierre was received like 
a man risen from the dead or stricken with plague. The eldest princess 
paused in her reading and stared at him in silence with dismay in her eyes. 

'Good-morning, cousin,' said Pierre. 'You don't know me?' 

'I know you only too well, only too well.' 

'How is the count? Can I see him?' Pierre asked, awkwardly as always, 
but not disconcerted. 

'Hm ... if you want to kill him, to kill him outright, you can see 
him. Olga, go and see if uncle's broth is ready— it will soon be time for 
it,' she added, to show Pierre they were busy, and busy in seeing after 
his father's comfort, while he was obviously only busy in causing him 
discomfort. 

Olga went out. Pierre stood still a moment, looked at the sisters and 
bowing said: 'Then I will go to my room. When I can see him, you will 
tell me.' 

The next day Prince Vassily had come and settled in the count's house. 
He sent for Pierre and said to him: 

'My dear fellow, if you behave here as you did at Petersburg, you will 
come to a very bad end; that's all I have to say to you. The count is 
very, very ill; you must not see him.' 

Since then Pierre had not been disturbed, and he spent the whole day 
alone in his room upstairs. 

At the moment when Boris came in, Pierre was walking up and down 
his room, stopping now and then in the corners, making menacing ges- 
tures at the wall, as though thrusting some invisible enemy through with 
a lance, then he gazed sternly over his spectacles, then pacing up and 
down again, murmuring indistinct words, shrugging his shoulders and 
gesticulating. 

'England's day is over!' he said, scowling and pointing at some one 
with his finger. 'Mr. Pitt, as a traitor to the nation and to the rights of 
man, is condemned . . .' He had not time to deliver Pitt's sentence, 
imagining himself at that moment Napoleon, and having in the person 



WAR AND PEACE 31 

of his hero succeeded in the dangerous crossing of the Channel and in 
the conquest of London, when he saw a graceful, handsome young officer 
come in. He stood still. Pierre had seen Boris last as a boy of fourteen, 
and did not remember him in the least. But in spite of that he took his 
hand in his characteristically quick and warm-hearted manner, and smiled 
cordially at him. 

'You remember me?' Boris said calmly with a pleasant smile. 'I have 
come with my mother to see the count, but it seems he is not quite well. 
Count Rostov asks you to come to dinner with him to-day.' 

'Ah, Count Rostov,' began Pierre, delighted. 'So you are his son, Ilya? 
Can you believe it, for the first moment I did not recognise you.' 

'You are mistaken,' said Boris, deliberately, with a bold and rather 
sarcastic smile. 'I am Boris, the son of Princess Anna Mihalovna Drubet- 
skoy. It is the father of the Rostovs who is called Ilya, the son's Nikolay.' 

Pierre shook his hands and head, as though flies or bees were swarm- 
ing upon him. 

'Ah, how is it! I've mixed it all up. There are such a lot of relatives 
in Moscow! You are Boris . . . yes. Well, now, we have got it clear. 
Tell me, what do you think of the Boulogne expedition? Things will go 
badly with the English, you know, if Napoleon gets across the Channel. 
I believe that the expedition is very possible.' 

Boris knew nothing at all about the Boulogne expedition. 

'Here in Moscow we are more interested in dinner parties and scandal 
than in politics,' he said in his self-possessed, sarcastic tone. 'I know 
nothing and think nothing about it. Moscow's more engrossed in scandal 
than anything,' he went on. 'Just now they are all talking about you 
and about the count.' 

Pierre smiled his kindly smile, as though afraid for his companion's 
sake that he might say something he would regret. But Boris spoke dis- 
tinctly, clearly and drily, looking straight into Pierre's face. 

'There's nothing else to do in Moscow but talk scandal,' he went on. 
'Every one's absorbed in the question whom the count will leave his 
fortune to, though perhaps he will outlive us all, as I sincerely hope he 
may.' 

'Yes, all that's very horrid,' Pierre interposed, 'very horrid.' Pierre 
was still afraid this officer would inadvertently drop into some remark 
disconcerting for himself. 

'And it must seem to you,' said Boris, flushing slightly, but not chang- 
ing his voice or attitude, 'it must seem to you that every one's thinking 
of nothing but getting something from him.' 

'That's just it,' thought Pierre. 

•And that's just what I want to say to you to prevent misunderstand- 
ings, that you are very much mistaken if you reckon me and my mother 
among those people. We are very poor, but I-at least I speak for 
myself-just because your father is rich, I don't consider myself a rela- 



32 WAR AND PEACE 

tion of his, and neither I nor my mother would ever ask him for anything 
or take anything from him.' 

It was a long while before Pierre understood, but, when he did under- 
stand, he jumped up from the sofa, seized Boris's hand with his charac- 
teristic quickness and awkwardness, and blushing far more than Boris, 
began speaking with a mixed sensation of shame and annoyance. 

'Well, this is strange! Do you suppose I . . . how you could think 
... I know very well . . .' 

But Boris again interrupted him. 

'I am glad I have told you everything frankly. Perhaps you dislike it: 
you must excuse me,' he said, trying to put Pierre at his ease instead of 
being put at his ease by him; 'but I hope I have not offended you. I 
make it a rule to say everything quite plainly. . . . Then what message 
am I to take? You will come to dinner at the Rostovs'?' And Boris, with 
an evident sense of having discharged an onerous duty, having extricated 
himself from an awkward position, and put somebody else into one, 
became perfectly pleasant again. 

'No, let me tell you,' said Pierre, regaining his composure, 'you are a 
wonderful person. What you have just said was very fine, very fine. Of 
course you don't know me, it's so long since we've seen each other . . . 
we were children. . . . You might suppose I should ... I understand, 
I quite understand. I shouldn't have done it, I shouldn't have had the 
courage, but it's splendid. I'm very glad I have made your acquaintance. 
A queer idea,' he added, pausing and smiling, 'you must have had of 
me.' He laughed. 'But what of it? Let us know each other better, please!' 
He pressed Boris's hand. 'Do you know I've not once seen the count? He 
has not sent for me ... I am sorry for him, as a man . . . But what 
can one do?' 

'And so you think Napoleon will succeed in getting his army across?' 
Boris queried, smiling. 

Pierre saw that Boris was trying to change the conversation, and so 
he began explaining the advantages and difficulties of the Boulogne 
expedition. 

A footman came in to summon Boris; the princess was going. Pierre 
promised to come to dinner in order to see more of Boris. 

Prince Vassily accompanied the princess to the hall. The princess was 
holding her handkerchief to her eyes, and her face was tearful. 

'It is terrible, terrible!' she said; 'but whatever it costs me, I will do 
my duty. I will come to stay the night. He can't be left like this. Every 
minute is precious. I can't understand why his nieces put it off. Maybe 
God will help me to find a way to prepare him. Adieu, prince, may God 
support you . . .' 

'Adieu, my kind friend,' answered Prince Vassily, turning away from 
her. 

'Oh, he is in an awful position!' said the mother to her son, when they 
were sitting in the carriage again. 'He scarcely knows any one.' 



WAR AND PEACE 33 

'I don't understand, mamma, what his attitude is as regards Pierre.' 
'The will will make all that plain, my dear; our fate, too, hangs upon 
it . . .' 

'But what makes you think he will leave us anything?' 

'Oh, my dear! He is so rich, and we are so poor.' 

'Well, that's hardly a sufficient reason, mamma.' 

'Oh, my God, how ill he is, how ill he is!' cried his mother. 

Countess Rostov, with her daughters and the greater number of the 
guests, was sitting in the drawing-room. It was that interval just before a 
dinner when the assembled guests do not care to enter on a lengthy 
conversation, expecting to be summoned to the dining-room. 

Pierre arrived just at dinner-time, and awkwardly sat down in the 
middle of the drawing-room in the first easy-chair he came across, block- 
ing up the way for every one. The countess tried to make him talk, but 
he looked naively round him over his spectacles as though he were 
looking for some one, and replied in monosyllables to all the countess's 
questions. He was in the way, and was the only person unaware of it. 
The greater number of the guests, knowing the story of the bear, looked 
inquisitively at this big, stout, inoffensive-looking person, puzzled to 
think how such a spiritless and staid young man could have played such 
a prank. 

'You have only lately arrived?' the countess asked him. 

'Oui, madame? 

'You have not seen my husband?' 

Wotz, madame? He smiled very inappropriately. 

'You have lately been in Paris, I believe? I suppose it's very interest- 
ing.' 

'Very interesting.' 

The countess exchanged glances with Anna Mihalovna. Anna Mihal- 
ovna saw that she was asked to undertake the young man, and sitting 
down by him she began talking of his father. But to her as to the 
countess he replied only in monosyllables. The other guests were all 
busily engaged together. 'The Razumovskys ... It was very charming 
. . . You are so kind . . . Countess Apraxin . . .' rose in murmurs on 
all sides. The countess got up and went into the reception hall. 

'Marya Dmitryevna?' her voice was heard asking from there. 

'Herself,' a rough voice was heard in reply, and immediately after, 
Marya Dmitryevna walked into the room. All the girls and even the 
ladies, except the very old ones, got up. Marya Dmitryevna, a stout 
woman of fifty, stopped in the doorway, and holding her head with its 
grey curls erect, she looked down at the guests and as though tucking 
up her cuffs, she deliberately arranged the wide sleeves >f her gown. 
Marya Dmitryevna always spoke Russian. 

'Health and happiness to the lady whose name-day we are keeping and 
to her children,' she said in her loud, rich voice that dominated all other 



34 WAR AND PEACE 

sounds. 'Well, you old sinner,' she turned to the count who was kissing 
her hand, 'I suppose you are tired of Moscow— nowhere to go out with 
the dogs? Well, my good man, what's to be done? these nestlings will 
grow up. . . .' She pointed to the girls. 'Willy-nilly, you must look out 
for young men for them.' 

She took out of her huge reticule some amber earrings with drops, 
and giving them to Natasha, whose beaming birthday face flushed rosy 
red, she turned away immediately and addressed Pierre. 

'Ay, ay! come here, sir!' she said in an intentionally quiet and gentle 
voice. 'Come here, sir . . .' And she tucked her sleeve up higher in an 
ominous manner. 

Pierre went up, looking innocently at her over his spectacles. 

'Come along, come along, sir! I was the only person that told your 
father the truth when he was in high favour, and in your case it is a 
sacred duty.' She paused. Every one was mutely expectant of what was 
to follow, feeling that this was merely a prelude. 'A pretty fellow, there's 
no denying! a pretty fellow! . . . His father is lying on his deathbed, 
and he's amusing himself, setting a police-constable astride on a bear! 
For shame, sir, for shame! You had better have gone to the war.' 

She turned away and gave her hand to the count. 

'Well, I suppose dinner's ready, eh?' said Marya Dmitryevna. The 
^ount led the way with Marya Dmitryevna, then followed the countess, 
taken in by a colonel of hussars, a person of importance, as Nikolay was 
to travel in his company to join the regiment; then Anna Mihalovna with 
Shinshin, an old bachelor cousin of the countess's. They were followed by a 
string of other couples, stretching right across the hall, and behind all, the 
children with their tutors and governesses trooped in, walked singly. There 
was a bustle among the waiters and a creaking of chairs; the orchestra 
began playing, as the guests took their places. Then the strains of the 
count's household band were succeeded by the clatter of knives and forks, 
the conversation of the guests, and the subdued tread of the waiters. 
The countess presided at one end of the table. On her right was Marya 
Dmitryevna; on her left Anna Mihalovna and the other ladies of the 
party. At the other end sat the count, with the colonel of hussars on his 
left, and on his right Shinshin and the other guests of the male sex. On 
one side of the large table sat the more grown-up of the young people, 
Pierre beside Boris. On the other side were the children with their tutors 
and governesses. The count peeped from behind the crystal of the 
decanters and fruit-dishes at his wife and her high cap with blue ribbons, 
and zealously poured out wine for his neighbours, not overlooking himself. 
The countess, too, while mindful of her duties as hostess, cast significant 
glances from behind the pineapples at her husband, whose face and bald 
head struck her as looking particularly red against his grey hair. At the 
ladies' end there was a rhythmic murmur of talk, but at the other end of 
the table the men's voices grew louder and louder, especially the voice 
of the colonel of hussars. 



WAR AND PEACE 35 

Boris was telling his new friend Pierre the names of the guests, while 
he exchanged glances with Natasha sitting opposite him. Pierre said little, 
looked about at the new faces, and ate a great deal. Of the two soups he 
chose a la tortue, and from that course to the fish-pastries and the grouse, 
he did not let a single dish pass, and took every sort of wine that the 
butler offered him, as he mysteriously poked a bottle wrapped in a 
napkin over his neighbour's shoulder, murmuring, 'Dry Madeira,' or 
'Hungarian,' or 'Rhine wine.' Pierre took a wine-glass at random out of 
the four crystal glasses engraved with the count's crest that were set at 
each place, and drank with relish, staring at the guests with a countenance 
that became more and more amiable as the dinner went on. Natasha, who 
sat opposite him, gazed at Boris as girls of thirteen gaze at the boy whom 
they have just kissed for the first time, and with whom they are in love. 
This gaze sometimes strayed to Pierre, and at the look on the funny, 
excited little girl's face, he felt an impulse to laugh himself without 
knowing why. 

The German tutor was trying to learn by heart a list of all the kinds 
of dishes, desserts, and wines, in order to write a detailed description of 
them to the folks at home in Germany, and was greatly mortified that the 
butler with the bottle in the napkin had passed him over. The German 
knitted his brows, and tried to look as though he would not have cared 
to take that wine, but he was mortified because no one would under- 
stand that he had not wanted the wine to quench his thirst, or through 
greed, but from a conscientious desire for knowledge. 

At the men's end of the table the conversation was becoming more and 
more lively. The colonel was asserting that the proclamation of the 
declaration of war had already been issued in Petersburg, and that a 
copy, which he had seen himself, had that day been brought by a courier 
to the commander-in-chief. 

'And what evil spirit must make us go to war with Bonaparte?' said 
Shinshin. 'He has already made Austria take a back seat. I am afraid it 
may be our turn this time.' 

The colonel was a stout, tall, and plethoric German, evidently a zealous 
officer and good patriot. He resented Shinshin's words. 

'The reason why, my good sir,' he said, speaking with a German ac- 
cent, 'is just that the Emperor knows that. In his proclamation he i 
that he cannot behold with equanimity the danger threatening Russia, 
and that the security of the empire, its dignity, and the sac-redness of irs 
alliances. 7 He laid a special emphasis on the word alliances, as though the 
gist of the matter lay in that word. And with the unfailing memory for 
official matters that was peculiar to him, he repeated the introductory 
words of the proclamation . . . 'and the desire, which constitutes the 
Sovereign's sole and immutable aim, to establish peace on a secure 
foundation, have determined him to despatch now a part of the troops 
abroad, and to make dispositions for carrying out this new project. I hat 
is the reason why, my dear sir,' he concluded, tossing ff a glass of wilM 



36 WAR AND PEACE 

in edifying fashion, and looking towards the count for encouragement. 

'Do you know the proverb, "Erema, Erema, you'd better stay at 
home and mind your spindle"?' said Shinshin, frowning and smiling. 

'We ought to fight to the last drop of our blood/ said the colonel, 
thumping the table, 'and to die for our emperor, and then all will be 
well. And to discuss it as little as possible,' he concluded, turning again 
to the count, and drawling out the word 'possible.' 'That's how we old 
hussars look at it; that's all we have to say. And how do you look at it, 
young man and young hussar?' he added, addressing Nikolay. 

'I perfectly agree with you,' answered Nikolay, growing hot all over, 
twisting his plate round, and changing the places of the glasses with a 
face as desperate and determined as though he were exposed to great 
danger at that actual moment. 'I am convinced that the Russians must 
die or conquer,' he said. 

'That was very fine, what you just said,' Julie sitting beside him said 
breathlessly. Sonya trembled all over and crimsoned to her ears, and 
behind her ears, and down her neck and shoulders, while Nikolay was 
speaking. Pierre listened to the colonel's remarks, and nodded his head 
approvingly. 

'That's capital,' said he. 

'You're a true hussar, young man,' the colonel shouted, thumping on the 
table again. 

Before the ices, champagne was passed round. Again the band struck 
up, the count kissed the countess, and the guests getting up from the table 
congratulated the countess, and clinked glasses across the table with the 
count, the children, and one another. Again the waiters darted about, 
chairs grated on the floor, and in the same order, but with flushed faces, 
the guests returned to the drawing-room and the count's study. 

The card-tables were opened, parties were made up for boston, and the 
count's guests settled themselves in the two drawing-rooms, the divan 
room, and the library. 

Pierre was sitting in the drawing-room, where Shinshin had started a 
conversation with him on the political situation, as a subject likely to 
be of interest to any one who had just come home from abroad, though 
it did not in fact interest Pierre. Several other persons joined in the 
conversation. When the orchestra struck up, Natasha walked into the 
drawing-room, and going straight up to Pierre, laughing and blushing, 
she said, 'Mamma told me to ask you to dance.' 

'I'm afraid of muddling the figures,' said Pierre, 'but if you will be 
my teacher . . .' and he gave his fat hand to the slim little girl, putting 
his arm low down to reach her level. 

While the couples were placing themselves and the musicians were 
tuning up, Pierre sat down with his little partner. Natasha was perfectly 
happy; she was dancing with a grown-up person, with a man who had 
just come from abroad. She was sitting in view of every one and talking 
to him like a grown-up person. She had in her hand a fan, which some 



WAR AND PEACE 37 

lady had given her to hold, and taking the most modish pose (God 
knows where and when she had learnt it), fanning herself and smiling all 
over her face, she talked to her partner. 

'What a girl! Just look at her, look at her!' said the old countess, cross- 
ing the big hall and pointing to Natasha. Natasha coloured and laughed. 

'Why, what do you mean, mamma? Why should you laugh? Is there 
anything strange about it?' 

While in the Rostovs' hall they were dancing the sixth anglaise, while 
the weary orchestra played wrong notes, and the tired footmen and 
cooks were getting the supper, Count Bezuhov had just had his sixth 
stroke. The doctors declared that there was no hope of recovery; the 
sick man received absolution and the sacrament while unconscious. 
Preparations were being made for administering extreme unction, and 
the house was full of the bustle and thrill of suspense usual at such 
moments. Outside the house undertakers were crowding beyond the 
gates, trying to escape the notice of the carriages that drove up, but 
eagerly anticipating a good order for the count's funeral. The governor 
of Moscow, who had been constantly sending his adjutants to inquire 
after the count's condition, came himself that evening to say good-bye 
to the renowned grandee of Catherine's court, Count Bezuhov. 

The magnificent reception-room was full. Every one stood up respect- 
fully when the governor, after being half an hour alone with the sick 
man, came out of the sick-room. Bestowing scanty recognition on the 
bows with which he was received, he tried to escape as quickly as pos- 
sible from the gaze of the doctors, ecclesiastical personages, and relations. 
Prince Vassily, who had grown paler and thinner during the last few 
days, escorted the governor out. 

'Who was that? was it the governor himself?' they were asking at the 
other end of the room. 'What a young-looking man!' 

'And he's over sixty! . . . What, do they say, the count does not 
know any one? Do they mean to give extreme unction?' 

'I knew a man who received extreme unction seven times.' 

'There has never been a case,' said the German doctor to the adjutant, 
speaking broken Russian, 'of recovery after having a third stroke.' 

'And what a vigorous man he was!' said the adjutant. 'And to whom 
will this great wealth go?' he added in a whisper. 

'Candidates will be found,' the German replied, smiling. Every one 
looked round again at the door; it creaked, and the second princess hav- 
ing made the drink according to Lorrain's direction, carried it into the 
sick-room. The German doctor went up to Lorr.. n. 

'Can it drag on till to-morrow morning?' asked the German, with a 
vile French accent. 

Lorrain, with compressed lips and a stern face, moved his finger before 
his nose to express a negative. 

'To-night, not later,' he said softly, and with a decorous smile of satis- 



38 WAR AND PEACE 

faction at being able to understand and to express the exact position cf 
the sick man. 

Meanwhile Prince Vassily had opened the door of the princess's room. 

It was half dark in the room; there were only two lamps burning 
before the holy pictures, and there was a sweet perfume of incense and 
flowers. The whole room was furnished with miniature furniture, little 
sideboards, small bookcases, and small tables. Behind a screen could be 
seen the white coverings of a high feather-bed. A little dog barked. 

'Ah, is that you, mon cousin?'' 

She got up and smoothed her hair, which was always, even now, so 
extraordinarily smooth that it seemed as though made out of one piece 
with her head and covered with varnish. 

'Has anything happened?' she asked. 'I am in continual dread.' 

'Nothing, everything is unchanged. I have only come to have a little 
talk with you, Katish, about business,' said the prince, sitting down 
wearily in the low chair from which she had just risen. 'How warm it is 
here, though,' he said. 'Come, sit here; let us talk.' 

'I wondered whether anything had happened,' said the princess, and 
with her stonily severe expression unchanged, she sat down opposite the 
prince, preparing herself to listen. 'I have been trying to get some sleep, 
mon cousin, but I can't." 

'Well, my dear?' said Prince Vassily, taking the princess's hand, and 
bending it downwards as his habit was. 

It was plain that this 'well?' referred to much that they both com- 
prehended without mentioning it in words. 

The princess, with her spare, upright figure, so disproportionately long 
in the body, looked straight at the prince with no sign of emotion in her 
prominent grey eyes. She shook her head, and sighing looked towards the 
holy pictures. Her gesture might have been interpreted as an expression 
of grief and devotion, or as an expression of weariness and the hope of a 
speedy release. Prince Vassily took it as an expression of weariness. 

'And do you suppose it's any easier for me?' he said. 

The princess looked at him with the same dull immovable gaze. 

'Finally, we have to think of my family too,' continued Prince Vassily, 
angrily pushing away a little table and not looking at her: 'you know, 
Katish, that you three sisters and my wife,— we are the only direct heirs 
of the count. I know, I know how painful it is for you to speak and 
think of such things. And it's as hard for me; but, my dear, I am a 
man over fifty, I must be ready for anything. Do you know that I have 
sent for Pierre, and that the count, pointing straight at his portrait, has 
asked for him?' 

Prince Vassily looked inquiringly at the princess, but he could not 
make out whether she was considering what he had said, or was simply 
staring at him. 

*I pray to God for one thing only continually, mon cousin? she replied, 
*that He may have mercy upon him, and allow his noble soul to leave this . . .' 



WAR AND PEACE 39 

'Yes, quite so,' Prince Vassily continued impatiently, rubbing his bald 
head and again wrathfully moving the table towards him that he had 
just moved away, 'but in fact ... in fact the point is, as you are 
yourself aware, that last winter the count made a will by which, passing 
over his direct heirs and us, he bequeathed all his property to Pierre.' 

'He may have made ever so many wills!' the princess said placidly; 
'but he can't leave it to Pierre. Pierre is illegitimate.' 

l Ma chere] said Prince Vassily suddenly, pushing the table against 
him, growing more earnest and beginning to speak more rapidly: 'but 
what if a letter has been written to the Emperor, and the count has 
petitioned him to legitimise Pierre? You understand, that the count's 
services would make his petition carry weight . . .' 

The princess smiled, as people smile who believe that they know much 
more about the subject than those with whom they are talking. 

'I can say more,' Prince Vassily went on, clasping her hand; 'that letter 
has been written, though it has not been sent off, and the Emperor has 
heard about it. The question only is whether it has been destroyed or not. 
If not, as soon as all is over,' Prince Vassily sighed, giving her thereby 
to understand what he meant precisely by the words 'all is over,' 'and 
they open the count's papers, the will with the letter will be given to 
the Emperor, and his petition will certainly be granted. Pierre, as the 
legitimate son, will receive everything.' 

'What about our share?' the princess inquired, smiling ironically as 
though anything but that might happen. 

'Why, my poor Katish, it is as clear as daylight. He will then be the 
only legal heir of all, and you won't receive as much as this, see. You 
ought to know, my dear, whether the will and the petition were written, 
and whether they have been destroyed, and if they have somehow been 
overlooked, then you ought to know where they are and to find them, 
because . . .' 

'That would be rather too much!' the princess interrupted him, smiling 
sardonically, with no change in the expression of her eyes. 'I am a 
woman, and you think we are all silly; but I do know so much, that an 
illegitimate son can't inherit . . . Un batard" she added, supposing that 
by this translation of the word she was conclusively proving to the prince 
the groundlessness of his contention. 

'How can you not understand, Katish, really! You are so intelligent; 
how is it you don't understand that if the count has written a letter to 
the Emperor, begging him to recognise his son as legitimate, then Pierre 
will not be Pierre but Count Bezuhov, and then he will inherit everything 
under the will? And if the will and the letter have not been destroyed, 
then except the consolation of having been dutiful and oi all that 
results from having done your duty, nothing is left for you. 1 hat's the 

fact.' ... 

'I know that the will was made, but I know, too, that it is invalid, ami 
you seem to take me for a perfect fool, won cousin; said the prma 



40 WAR AND PEACE 

with the air with which women speak when they imagine they are saying 
something witty and biting. 

'My dear princess, Katerina Semyonovna!' Prince Vassily began im- 
patiently, 'I have come to you not to provoke you, but to talk to you 
as a kinswoman, a good, kind-hearted, true kinswoman, of your own in- 
terests. I tell you for the tenth time that if the letter to the Emperor 
and the will in Pierre's favour are among the count's papers, you, my dear 
girl, and your sisters are not heiresses. If you don't believe me, believe 
people who know; I have just been talking to Dmitry Onufritch' (this 
was the family solicitor); 'he said the same/ 

There was obviously some sudden change in the princess's ideas; her 
thin lips turned white (her eyes did not change), and when she began 
to speak, her voice passed through transitions which she clearly did not 
anticipate. 

'That would be a pretty thing,' she said. 'I wanted nothing, and I want 
nothing.' She flung her dog off her lap and smoothed out the folds of 
her skirt. 

'That's the gratitude, that's the recognition people get who have sacri- 
ficed everything for him,' she said. 'Very nice! Excellent! I don't want 
anything, prince.' 

'Yes, but you are not alone, you have sisters,' answered Prince Vassily. 
But the princess did not heed him. 

'Yes, I knew it long ago, but I'd forgotten that I could expect nothing 
in this house but baseness, deceit, envy, scheming, nothing but ingrati- 
tude, the blackest ingratitude . . .' 

'Do you or do you not know where that will is?' asked Prince Vassily, 
the twitching of his cheeks more marked than ever. 

'Yes, I have been foolish; I still kept faith in people, and cared for 
them and sacrificed myself. But no one succeeds except those who are 
base and vile. I know whose plotting this is.' 

The princess would have risen, but the prince held her by the arm. 
The princess had the air of a person who has suddenly lost faith in the 
whole human race. She looked viciously at her companion. 

'There is still time, my dear. Remember, Katish, that all this was 
dene heedlessly, in a moment of anger, of illness, and then forgotten. Our 
duty, my dear girl, is to correct his mistake, to soften his last moments 
by not letting him commit this injustice, not letting him die with the 
thought that he has made miserable those . . .' 

'Those who have sacrificed everything for him,' the princess caught 
him up; and she made an impulsive effort again to stand up, but the 
prince would not let her, 'a sacrifice he has never known how to appre- 
ciate. No, mon cousin] she added, with a sigh, 'I will remember that 
one can expect no reward in this world, that in this world there is no 
honour, no justice. Cunning and wickedness is what one wants in this 
world.' 

'Come, voyons, calm yourself and let us talk sensibly while there is time— 



WAR AND PEACE 41 

perhaps twenty-four hours, perhaps one. Tell me all you know about the 
will, and what's of most consequence, where it is; you must know. We 
will take it now at once and show it to the count. He has no doubt 
forgotten about it and would wish to destroy it. You understand that my 
desire is to carry out his wishes religiously. That is what I came here for. 
I am only here to be of use to him and to you.' 

'Now I see it all. I know whose plotting this is. I know,' the princess 
was saying. 

'That's not the point, my dear.' 

'It's all your precious Anna Mihalovna, your protegee whom I wouldn't 
take as a housemaid, the nasty creature.' 

'Do not let us waste time.' 

'Oh, don't talk to me! Last winter she forced her way in here and told 
such a pack of vile, mean tales to the count about all of us, especially 
Sophie— I can't repeat them— that it made the count ill, and he wouldn't 
see us for a fortnight. It was at that time, I know, he wrote that hateful, 
infamous document, but I thought it was of no consequence.' 

'There we are. Why didn't you tell us about it before?' 

'It's in the inlaid portfolio that he keeps under his pillow. Now I know,' 
said the princess. 'Yes, if I have a sin to my account, a great sin, it's 
my hatred of that infamous woman,' almost shrieked the princess, utterly 
transformed. 'And why does she force herself in here? But I'll have it out 
with her. The time will come!' 

At the time that these conversations were taking place in the reception- 
room and the princess's room, a carriage with Pierre (who had been sent 
for) and Anna Mihalovna (who had thought fit to come with him) in it 
was driving into the court of Count Bezuhov's mansion. When the sound 
of the carriage wheels was muffled by the straw in the street, Anna 
Mihalovna turned with words of consolation to her companion, discovered 
that he was asleep in his corner of the carriage, and waked him up. 
Rousing himself, Pierre followed Anna Mihalovna out of the carriage, 
and only then began to think of the interview with his dying father that 
awaited him. He noticed that they had driven not up to the visitors' 
approach, but to the back entrance. As he got down from the carriage 
step, two men in the dress of tradesmen hastily scurried away from the 
entrance into the shadow of the wall. Pierre, as he stood waiting, noticed 
several other similar persons standing in the shadow of the house on 
both sides. But neither Anna Mihalovna nor the footman and coachman, 
who must have seen these people, took any notice of them. So it must 
be all right, Pierre decided, and he followed Anna Mihalovna. With 
hurrying footsteps Anna Mihalovna walked up t' e dimly lighted, narrow 
stone staircase, urging on Pierre, who lagged behind. Though Pierre had 
no notion why he had to go to the count at all, and still less why lie had 
to go by the back stairs, yet, impressed by Anna Mihalovna's assurance 
and haste, he made up his mind that it was undoubtedly necessary for 
him to do so. Half-way up the stairs they were almost knocked over by 



42 WAR AND PEACE 

some men with pails, who ran down towards them, tramping loudly with 
their big boots. 

is this the princess's side of the house?' Anna Mihalovna asked of 
one of them . . . 

'Yes, it is,' answered the footman in a bold, loud voice, as though any- 
thing were permissible at such a time; 'the door on the left, ma'am.' 

'Perhaps the count has not asked for me,' said Pierre, as he reached 
the landing. 'I had better go to my own room.' Anna Mihalovna stopped 
for Pierre to catch her up. 

'Ah, mon ami, she said, touching his hand with just the same gesture 
as she had used in the morning with her son. 'Believe me, I am suffering 
as much as you; but be a man.' 

'Really, had I not better go?' Pierre asked affectionately, looking -at 
her over his spectacles. 

'Ah, ?non ami, forget the wrong that may have been done you, think 
that it is your father . . . and perhaps in his death agony,' she sighed. 
i have loved you like a son from the first. Trust in me, Pierre. I shall 
not forget your interests.' 

Pierre did not understand a word. Again he felt more strongly than 
before that all this had to be so, and he obediently followed Anna Mihal- 
ovna, who was already opening the door. The door led into the vestibule 
of the back stairs. In the corner sat the princess's old man-servant knit- 
ting stockings. Pierre had never been in this part of the house, and had 
not even suspected the existence of these apartments. A maid-servant 
carrying a tray with a decanter overtook them, and Anna Mihalovna 
(calling her 'my dear' and 'my good girl') asked her after the princesses' 
health, and drew Pierre further along the stone corridor. The first door 
to the left led out of the corridor into the princesses' living rooms. The 
maid with the decanter was in a hurry (everything seemed to be done 
in a hurry at that moment in the house), and she did not close the door 
after her. Pierre and Anna Mihalovna, as they passed by, glanced uncon- 
sciously into the room where the eldest princess and Prince Vassily were 
sitting close together talking. On catching sight of their passing figures, 
Prince Vassily made an impatient movement and drew back, the princess 
jumped up, and with a despairing gesture she closed the door, slamming 
it with all her might. This action was so unlike the princess's habitual 
composure, the dismay depicted on the countenance of Prince Vassily 
was so out of keeping with his dignity, that Pierre stopped short and 
looked inquiringly over his spectacles at his guide. Anna Mihalovna mani- 
fested no surprise; she simply smiled a little and sighed, as though to 
show that she had anticipated all that. 

'Be a man, mon ami, I am looking after your interests,' she said in 
response to his look of inquiry, and she walked more quickly along the 
corridor. 

Pierre had no notion what was going on, and no inkling of what was 
meant by watching over his interests. But he felt that all this had had 



WAR AND PEACE 43 

to be so. From the corridor they went into the half -lighted hall adjoining 
the count's reception-room. This was one of the cold, sumptuously fur- 
nished rooms which Pierre knew, leading from the visitors' staircase. But 
even in this apartment there was an empty bath standing in the middle 
of the floor, and water had been spilt on the carpet. They were met here 
by a servant and a church attendant with a censer, who walked on tiptoe 
and took no notice of them. They went into the reception-room opening 
into the winter garden, a room Pierre knew well, with its two Italian 
windows, its big bust and full-length portrait of Catherine. The same 
persons were all sitting almost in the same positions exchanging whispers 
in the reception-room. All ceased speaking and looked round at Anna 
Mihalovna, as she came in with her pale, tear-stained face, and at the 
big, stout figure of Pierre, as with downcast head he followed her sub- 
missively. 

The countenance of Anna Mihalovna showed a consciousness that the 
crucial moment had arrived. With the air of a Petersburg lady of ex- 
perience, she walked into the room even more boldly than in the morn- 
ing, keeping Pierre at her side. She felt that as she was bringing the 
person the dying man wanted to see, she might feel secure as to her recep- 
tion. With a rapid glance, scanning all the persons in the room, and 
observing the count's spiritual adviser, she did not precisely bow down, 
but seemed somehow suddenly to shrink in stature, and with a tripping 
amble swam up to the priest and reverentially received a blessing first 
from one and then from another ecclesiastic. 

'Thank God that we are in time,' she said to the priest; 'all of us, his 
kinsfolk, have been in such alarm. This young man is the count's son,' 
she added more softly. 'It is a terrible moment.' 

Having uttered these words she approached the doctor. 

'Dear doctor,' she said to him, 'this young man is the count's son. Is 
there any hope?' 

The doctor did not speak but rapidly shrugged his shoulders and 
turned up his eyes. With precisely the same gesture Anna Mihalovna 
moved her shoulders and eyes, almost closing her eyelids, sighed and 
went away from the doctor to Pierre. She addressed Pierre with peculiar 
deference and tender melancholy. 

'Have faith in His mercy,' she said to him, and indicating a sofa for 
him to sit down and wait for her, she went herself with inaudible steps 
towards the door, at which every one was looking, and after almost noise- 
lessly opening it, she vanished behind it. 

Pierre, having decided to obey his monitress in everything, moved 
towards the sofa she had pointed out to him. As soon as Anna Mihalovna 
had disappeared, he noticed that the eyes of all the persons in the room 
were fixed upon him with something more than curiosity and sympathy 
in their gaze. He noticed that they were all whispering together, ooking 
towards him with something like awe and even obsequious deference. 
They showed him a respect such as had never been shown him before. 



44 WAR AND PEACE 

A lady, a stranger to him, the one who had been talking to the priest, 
got up and offered him her place. An adjutant picked up the glove Pierre 
had dropped and handed it to him. The doctors respectfully paused in 
their talk when he passed by them and moved aside to make way for 
him. Pierre wanted at first to sit somewhere else, so as not to trouble 
the lady; he would have liked to pick up the glove himself and to walk 
round the doctors, who were really not at all in the way. But he felt all 
at once that to do so would be improper; he felt that he was that night 
a person who had to go through a terrible ceremony which every one 
expected of him, and that for that reason he was bound to accept service 
from every one. He took the glove from the adjutant in silence, sat down 
in the lady's place, laying his big hands on his knees, sitting in the 
naively symmetrical pose of an Egyptian statue, and decided mentally 
that it must all inevitably be like this, and that to avoid losing his head 
and doing something stupid, he must for that evening not act on his own 
ideas, but abandon himself wholly to the will of those who were guiding 
him. 

Two minutes had not elapsed before Prince Vassily came majestically 
into the room, wearing his coat with three stars on it, and carrying his 
head high. He looked as though he had grown thinner since the morning. 
His eyes seemed larger than usual as he glanced round the room, and 
caught sight of Pierre. He went up to him, took his hand (a thing he 
had never done before), and drew it downwards, as though he wanted 
to try its strength. 

'Courage, courage, mon ami. He has asked to see you, that is well . . .' 
and he would have gone on, but Pierre thought it fitting to ask: 'How 
is . . . ?' He hesitated, not knowing whether it was proper for him to 
call the dying man 'the count'; he felt ashamed to call him 'father.' 

'He has had another stroke half-an-hour ago. Courage, mon ami.'' 

Pierre was in a condition of such mental confusion that the word 
stroke aroused in his mind the idea of a blow from some heavy body. 
He looked in perplexity at Prince Vassily, and only later grasped that 
an attack of illness was called a stroke. Prince Vassily said a few words 
to Lorrain as he passed and went to the door on tiptoe. He could not 
walk easily on tiptoe, and jerked his whole person up and down in an 
ungainly fashion. He was followed by the eldest princess, then by the 
clergy and church attendants; some servants too went in at the door. 
Through that door a stir could be heard, and at last Anna Mihalovna, 
with a face still pale but resolute in the performance of duty, ran out 
and, touching Pierre on the arm, said: 

'The goodness of heaven is inexhaustible; it is the ceremony of extreme 
unction which they are beginning. Come.' 

Pierre went in, stepping on to the soft carpet, and noticed that the 
adjutant and the unknown lady and some servants too, all followed him 
in, as though there were no need now to ask permission to enter that room. 

Pierre knew well that great room, divided by columns and an arch, and 



WAR AND PEACE 45 

carpeted with Persian rugs. The part of the room behind the columns, 
where on one side there stood a high mahogany bedstead with silken 
hangings, and on the other a huge case of holy pictures, was brightly 
and decoratively lighted up, as churches are lighted for evening service. 
Under the gleaming ornamentation of the case stood a long invalid 
chair, and in the chair, on snow-white, uncrumpled, freshly changed pil- 
lows, covered to the waist with a bright green quilt, Pierre recognised the 
majestic figure of his father, Count Bezuhov, with the grey shock of 
hair like a lion's mane over his broad forehead, and the characteristically 
aristocratic, deep lines on his handsome, reddish-yellow face. He was 
lying directly under the holy pictures: both his great stout arms were 
lying on the quilt. In his right hand, which lay with the palm downwards, 
a wax candle had been thrust between the thumb and forefinger, and 
an old servant bending down over the chair held it in it. About the 
chair stood the clergy in their shining ceremonial vestments, with their 
long hair pulled out over them. They held lighted candles in their 
hands, and were performing the service with deliberate solemnity. A 
little behind them stood the two younger princesses holding handkerchiefs 
to their eyes, and in front of them the eldest, Katish, stood with a vin- 
dictive and determined air, never for an instant taking her eyes off the 
holy image, as though she were declaring to all that she would not 
answer for herself, if she were to look round. Anna Mihalovna with a 
countenance of meek sorrow and forgiveness stood at the door. Prince 
Vassily was standing close to the invalid chair on the other side of the 
door. 

Behind him stood the adjutant, the doctors, and the men-servants; 
the men and the women had separated as though they were in church. 
All were silently crossing themselves, nothing was audible but the read- 
ing of the service, the subdued, deep bass singing, and in the intervals 
of silence sighs could be heard and the shuffling of feet. With a sig- 
nificant air, which showed she knew what she was about, Anna Mihalovna 
walked right across the room to Pierre and gave him a candle. He lighted 
it, and absorbed in watching the people around him, he absent-mindedly 
crossed himself with the hand in which he held the candle. 

In the middle of the service the voices of the priests suddenly ceased, 
and they whispered something to one another. The old servant, who 
was holding the count's hand, got up and turned to the ladies. Anna 
Mihalovna stepped forward and, stooping over the sick man, she beckoned 
behind her back to Lorrain. The French doctor had been leaning against 
the column without a candle, in the respectful attitude of the foreigner, 
who would show that in spite of the difference of religion, he com- 
prehends all the solemnity of the ceremony and even approves of it. 
With the noiseless steps of a man in full vigour of his age, he went up 
to the sick man. His delicate, white fingers lifted his disengaged hand 
from the quilt, and turning away, the doctor began feeling the pulse 
Vi absorbed attention. They gave the sick man some drink; there was 



46 WAR AND PEACE 

a slight bustle around him, then all went back to their places and the 
service was continued. During this break in the proceedings Pierre noticed 
that Prince Vassily moved away from his chair-back, and with that 
same air of being quite sure of what he was about, and of its being so 
much the worse for others, if they failed to understand it, he did not go 
up to the sick man, but passed by him and joined the eldest princess. Then 
together they went away to the further end of the room to the high 
bedstead under the silk canopy. 

The sounds of the church singing ceased and the voice of the chief 
ecclesiastic was heard, respectfully congratulating the sick man on his 
reception of the mystery. The dying man lay as lifeless and immovable 
as before. Every one was moving about him, there was the sound of 
footsteps and of whispers, Anna Mihalovna's whisper rising above the rest. 

Pierre heard her say: 'Undoubtedly he must be moved on to the bed; 
it's impossible . . .' 

The sick man was so surrounded by the doctors, the princesses and the 
servants, that Pierre could no longer see the reddish-yellow face with 
the grey mane, which he had never lost sight of for one instant during 
the ceremony, even though he had been watching other people too. Pierre 
guessed from the cautious movements of the people about the chair that 
they were lifting the dying man up and moving him. 

'Hold on to my arm; you'll drop him so,' he heard the frightened 
whisper of one of the servants. 'Lower down . . . another one here,' said 
voices. And their heavy breathing and hurried tread seemed to show that 
the weight they carried was too heavy for them. 

As they passed him— Anna Mihalovna among them— the young man 
caught a glimpse over people's backs and necks of the great muscular 
open chest, the grey, curly, leonine head, and the massive shoulders of 
the sick man, which were pushed up, as he was supported under the arm- 
pits. His head, with extraordinarily broad brow and cheek-bones, its 
beautiful sensual mouth, and haughty, cold eyes, was not disfigured by 
the proximity of death. It was just the same as Pierre had seen it three 
months before, when his father had been sending him off to Petersburg. 
But the head swayed helplessly with the jerky steps of the bearers, and 
the cold, apathetic eyes did not know on what to rest. 

They were busy for several minutes round the high bed; then the 
people who had moved the count dispersed. Anna Mihalovna touched 
Pierre's arm and said, 'Come along.' With her Pierre approached the 
bed, on which the sick man had been laid in a ceremonial position in 
keeping with the sacred rite that had just been performed. He was lying 
with his head propped high on the pillows. His hands were laid sym- 
metrically on the green silk quilt with the palms turned downwards. 
When Pierre came up, the count looked straight at him, but he looked 
at him with a gaze the intent and significance of which no man could 
fathom. Either these eyes said nothing, but simply looked because as 
eyes they must look at something, or they said too much. Pierre stopped. 



WAR AND PEACE 47 

not knowing what he was to do, and looked inquiringly at his monitress. 
Anna Mihalovna gave him a hurried glance, with a gesture indicating 
the sick man's hand and with her lips wafting towards it a phantom 
kiss. Pierre did as he was bid, and carefully craning his neck to avoid 
entanglement with the quilt, kissed the broad-boned, muscular hand. 
There was not the faintest stir in the hand, nor in any muscle of the 
count's face. Pierre again looked inquiringly at Anna Mihalovna to learn 
what he was to do now. Anna Mihalovna glanced towards the armchair 
that stood beside the bed. Pierre proceeded obediently to sit down there, 
his eyes still inquiring whether he had done the right thing. Anna 
Mihalovna nodded approvingly. Again Pierre fell into the naively sym- 
metrical pose of an Egyptian statue, obviously distressed that his ungainly 
person took up so much room, and doing his utmost to look as small 
as possible. He looked at the count. The count still gazed at the spot 
where Pierre's face had been, when he was standing up. Anna Mihalovna's 
attitude evinced her consciousness of the touching gravity of this last 
meeting between father and son. It lasted for two minutes, which seemed 
to Pierre an hour. Suddenly a shudder passed over the thick muscles and 
furrows of the count's face. The shudder grew more intense; the beautiful 
mouth was contorted (it was only then that Pierre grasped how near 
death his father was) and from the contorted mouth there came a husky, 
muffled sound. Anna Mihalovna looked intently at the sick man's mouth, 
and trying to guess what he wanted, pointed first to Pierre, then to some 
drink, then in an inquiring whisper she mentioned the name of Prince 
Vassily, then pointed to the quilt. The eyes and face of the sick man 
showed impatience. He made an effort to glance at the servant, who 
never moved away from the head of his bed. 

'His excellency wants to be turned over on the other side,' whispered 
the servant, and he got up to turn the heavy body of the count facing 
the wall. 

Pierre stood up to help the servant. 

While the count was being turned over, one of his arms dragged help- 
lessly behind, and he made a vain effort to pull it after him. Whether 
the count noticed the face of horror with which Pierre looked at that 
lifeless arm, or whether some other idea passed through his dying brain, 
he looked at the refractory arm, at the expression of horror on Pierre's 
face, again at his arm, and a smile came on to his face, strangely out of 
keeping with its features; a weak, suffering smile, which seemed mocking 
at his own helplessness. Suddenly, at the sight of that smile, Pierre felt 
a lump in his throat and a tickling in his nose, and tears dimmed his eyes. 
The sick man was turned towards the wall. He sighed 

'He has fallen into a doze/ said Anna Mihalovna, noticing the princess 
coming to take her turn by the bedside. 'Let us go.* 

Pierre went out. • 

There was by now no one in the reception-room except Prince \ assily 
and the eldest princess who were in eager conversation together, sitting 



48 WAR AND PEACE 

under the portrait of Catherine. They were mute at once on seeing Pierre 
and his companion, and the princess concealed something as Pierre fancied 
and murmured: 'I can't stand the sight of that woman.' 

'Katish has had tea served in the little drawing-room,' Prince Vassily said 
to Anna Mihalovna. 'Go, my poor Anna Mihalovna, take something or 
you will not hold out.' 

To Pierre he said nothing; he simply pressed his arm sympathetically. 
Pierre and Anna Mihalovna went on into the little drawing-room. 

'There is nothing so reviving as a cup of this excellent Russian tea, after 
a sleepless night,' said Lorrain with an air of restrained briskness, sipping it 
out of a delicate china cup without a handle, as he stood in the little circular 
drawing-room close to a table laid with tea-things and cold supper-dishes. 
All who were in Count Bezuhov's house on that night had, with a view to 
fortifying themselves, gathered around the table. Pierre remembered well 
that little circular drawing-room with its mirrors and little tables. When 
there had been balls in the count's house, Pierre, who could not dance, had 
liked sitting in that little room full of mirrors, watching the ladies in ball- 
dresses with pearls and diamonds on their bare shoulders, as they crossed 
that room and looked at themselves in the brightly lighted mirrors that 
repeated their reflections several times. Now the same room was dimly 
lighted with two candles, and in the middle of the night the tea-set and 
supper-dishes stood in disorder on one of the little tables, and heterogenous, 
plainly dressed persons were sitting at it, whispering together, and showing 
in every word that no one could forget what was passing at that moment 
and what was still to come in the bedroom. Pierre did not eat anything, 
though he felt very much inclined to. He looked round inquiringly towards 
his monitress, and perceived that she had gone out again on tiptoe into the 
reception-room where Prince Vassily had remained with the eldest princess. 
Pierre supposed that this too was an inevitable part of the proceedings, and, 
after a little delay, he followed her. Anna Mihalovna was standing beside the 
princess, and they were both talking at once in excited tones. 

'Allow me, madam, to know what is and what is not to be done,' said the 
princess, who was apparently in the same exasperated temper as she had 
been when she slammed the door of her room. 

'But, dear princess,' Anna Mihalovna was saying mildly and persuasively, 
blocking up the way towards the bedroom and not letting the princess pass. 
'Would that not be too great a tax on poor uncle at such a moment, when 
he needs repose? At such moments to talk of worldly matters when his 
soul is already prepared . . .' 

Prince Vassily was sitting in a low chair in his habitual attitude, with one 
leg crossed high above the other. He wore the air of a man little interested 
in the two ladies' discussion. 

'No, my dear Anna Mihalovna, let Katish act on her own discretion. 
You know how the count loves her.' 

'I don't even know what is in this document,' said the princess, addressing 
Prince Vassily, and pointing to the inlaid portfolio which she held in her 



WAR AND PEACE 49 

hand. 'All I know is that the real will is in the bureau, and this is a paper 
that has been forgotten. . . .' 

She tried to get round Anna Mihalovna, but the latter, with another little 
skip, barred her way again. 

'I know, dear, sweet princess,' said Anna Mihalovna, taking hold of the 
portfolio, and so firmly that it was clear she would not readily let go of it 
again. 'Dear princess, I beg you, I beseech you, spare him. I entreat you.' 

The princess did not speak. All that was heard was the sound of a scuffle 
over the portfolio. There could be no doubt that if she were to speak, she 
would say nothing complimentary to Anna Mihalovna. The latter kept a 
tight grip, but in spite of that her voice retained all its sweet gravity and 
softness. 

Tierre, come here, my dear boy. He will not be one too many, I should 
imagine, in a family council; eh, prince?' 

'Why don't you speak, ?non cousin?'' the princess shrieked all of a sudden, 
so loudly that they heard her voice, and were alarmed by it in the drawing- 
room. 'Why don't you speak when here a meddling outsider takes upon 
herself to interfere, and make a scene on the very threshold of a dying 
man's room? Scheming creature,' she muttered viciously, and tugged at the 
portfolio with all her might, but Anna Mihalovna took a few steps forward 
so as not to lose her grasp of it and changed hands. 

'Ah,' said Prince Vassily, in reproachful wonder. He got up. 'It is ridicu- 
lous. Come, let go, I tell you.' The princess let go. 

'And you.' 

Anna Mihalovna did not heed him. 

'Let go, I tell you. I will take it all upon myself. I will go and ask him. 
I . . . you let it alone.' 

'But, prince,' said Anna Mihalovna, 'after this solemn sacrament, let him 
have a moment's peace. Here, Pierre, tell me your opinion,' she turned to 
the young man, who going up to them was staring in surprise at the 
exasperated face of the princess, which had thrown off all appearance of 
decorum, and the twitching cheeks of Prince Vassily. 

'Remember that you will have to answer for all the consequences,' said 
Prince Vassily sternly; 'you don't know what you are doing.' 

'Infamous woman,' shrieked the princess, suddenly pouncing on Anna 
Mihalovna and tearing the portfolio from her. Prince Vassily bowed his 
head and flung up his hands. 

At that instant the door, the dreadful door at which Pierre had gazed so 
long, and which had opened so softly, was flung rapidly, noisily open, 
banging against the wall, and the second princess ran out wringing her 
hands. 

'What are you about?' she said, in despair. 'He is passing away, and you 

leave me alone.' 

The eldest princess dropped the portfolio. Swiftly Anna Mihalovna 
stooped and, snatching up the object of dispute, ran into the bedroom. I lie 
eldest princess and Prince Vassily recovering themselves followed her. 



50 WAR AND PEACE 

A few minutes later the eldest princess came out again with a pale, dry face, 
biting her underlip. At the sight of Pierre her face expressed irrepressible 
hatred. 

'Yes, now you can give yourself airs,' she said, 'you have got what you 
wanted.' And breaking into sobs, she hid her face in her handkerchief and 
ran out of the room. 

The next to emerge was Prince Vassily. He staggered to the sofa, on 
which Pierre was sitting, and sank on to it, covering his eyes with his hand. 
Pierre noticed that he was pale, and that his lower jaw was quivering and 
working as though in ague. 

'Ah, my dear boy,' he said, taking Pierre by the elbow— and there was a 
sincerity and a weakness in his voice that Pierre had never observed in him 
before—what sins, what frauds we commit, and all for what? I'm over fifty, 
my dear boy. ... I too. ... It all ends in death, all. Death is awful.' He 
burst into tears. 

Anna Mihalovna was the last to come out. She approached Pierre with 
soft, deliberate steps. 'Pierre,' she said. Pierre looked inquiringly at her. 
She kissed the young man on the forehead, wetting him with her tears. 
She did not speak for a while. 

'He is no more. . . .' 

Pierre gazed at her over his spectacles. 

'Come. I will take you back. Try to cry. Nothing relieves like tears.' 

She led him into the dark drawing-room, and Pierre was glad that no one 
could see his face. Anna Mihalovna left him, and when she came back he 
was fast asleep with his arm under his head. 

The next morning Anna Mihalovna said to Pierre: 'Yes, my dear boy, it 
is a great loss for us all. I do not speak of you. But God will uphold you; 
you are young, and now you are at the head of an immense fortune, I hope. 
The will has not been opened yet. I know you well enough to know that 
this will not turn your head, but it will impose duties upon you and you 
must be a man.' 

Pierre did not speak. 

'Perhaps, later, I may tell you, my dear boy, that if I had not been there 
God knows what would have happened. You know, my uncle promised me, 
only the day before yesterday, not to forget Boris. But he had no time. 
I hope, dear friend, that you will fulfil your father's desire.' 

Pierre did not understand a word, and colouring shyly, looked dumbly 
at Anna Mihalovna. After talking to him, Anna Mihalovna drove to the 
Rostovs', and went to bed. On waking in the morning, she told the Rostovs 
and all her acquaintances the details of Count Bezuhov's death. She said 
that the count had died, as she would wish to die herself, that his end had 
been not simply touching, but edifying; that the last interview of the father 
and son had been so touching that she could not recall it without tears; 
and that she did not know which had behaved more nobly in those terrible 
moments: the father, who had remembered everything and every one so 
well at the last, and had said such moving words to his son; or Pierre, whom 



WAR AND PEACE 51 

it was heartbreaking to see, so utterly crushed was he, though he yet tried 
to conceal his grief, so as not to distress his dying father. 'It is painful, but 
it does one good; it uplifts the soul to see such men as the old count and his 
worthy son,' she said. She told them about the action of the princess and 
Prince Vassily too, but in great secrecy, in whispers, and with disapproval. 

At Bkak Hills, the estate of Prince Nikolay Andreivitch Bolkonsky, the 
arrival of young Prince Andrey and his wife was daily expected. But this 
expectation did not disturb the regular routine in which life moved in the 
old prince's household. Prince Nikolay Andreivitch, once a commander- 
in-chief, known in the fashionable world by the nickname of 'the Prussian 
king,' had been exiled to his estate in the reign of Paul, and had remained 
at Bleak Hills ever since with his daughter, Princess Marya, and her com- 
panion, Mademoiselle Bourienne. Even in the new reign, though he had 
received permission to return to the capital, he had never left his home in 
the country, saying that if any one wanted to see him, he could travel the 
hundred and fifty versts from Moscow to Bleak Hills, and, for his part, he 
wanted nobody and nothing. He used to maintain that human vices all 
sprang from only two sources— idleness and superstition, and that there were 
but two virtues-energy and intelligence. He had himself undertaken the 
education of his daughter; and to develop in her these important qualities, 
he continued giving her lessons in algebra and geometry up to her twentieth 
year, and mapped out her whole life in uninterrupted occupation. He was 
himself always occupied in writing his memoirs, working out problems in 
higher mathematics, turning snuff-boxes on his lathe, working in his garden, 
or looking after the erection of farm buildings which were always being 
built on his estate. Since the great thing for enabling one to get through 
work is regularity, he had carried regularity in his manner of life to the 
highest point of exactitude. His meals were served in a fixed and invariable 
manner, and not only at a certain hour, but at a certain minute. With those 
about him, from his daughter to his servants, the count was sharp and 
invariably exacting, and so, without being cruel, he inspired a degree of 
respect and awe that the most cruel man could not readily have commanded. 
In spite of the fact that he was now on the retired list, and had no influence 
whatever in political circles, every high official in the province in which 
was the prince's estate felt obliged to call upon him, and had, just like the 
architect, the gardener, or Princess Marya, to wait till the regular hour at 
which the prince always made his appearance in the lofty waiting-room. 
And every one in the waiting-room felt the same veneration, and even awe, 
when the immensely high door of the study opened and showed the small 
figure of the old man in a powdered wig, with his little withered hands and 
grey, overhanging eyebrows, that, at times when he scowled, hid the gleam 
in his shrewd, youthful-looking eyes. 

On the day that the young people were expected to arrive, Princess 
Marya went as usual at the fixed hour in the morning into the waiting-room 
to say good-morning to her father, and with dread in her heart crossed 



52 WAR AND PEACE 

herself and mentally repeated a prayer. Every day she went in to her father 
in the same way, and every day she prayed that her interview with her 
father might pass off well that day. The old man-servant, wearing powder, 
softly got up from his seat in the waiting-room and whispered: 'Walk in.' 

Through the door came the regular sounds of the lathe. The princess 
kept timidly hold of the door, which opened smoothly and easily, and 
stood still in the doorway. The prince was working at his lathe, and glanc- 
ing round, he went on with what he was doing. 

The immense room was filled with things obviously in constant use. The 
large table, on which lay books and plans, the high bookcases with keys 
in the glass-covered doors, the high table for the prince to write at, standing 
up, with an open manuscript-book upon it, the carpenter's lathe with tools 
ranged about it and shavings scattered around, all suggested continual, 
varied, and orderly activity. The movements of the prince's small foot in its 
Tatar, silver-embroidered boot, the firm pressure of his sinewy, lean hand, 
showed the strength of vigorous old age still strong-willed and wiry. After 
making a few more turns, he took his foot from the pedal of the lathe, 
wiped the plane, dropped it into a leather pouch attached to the lathe, and 
going up to the table called his daughter. He never gave the usual blessing 
to his children; he simply offered her his scrubby, not yet shaved cheek, and 
said sternly and yet at the same time with intense tenderness, as he looked 
her over: 'Quite well? . . . All right, then, sit down! ' He took a geometry 
exercise-book written by his own hand, and drew his chair up with his leg. 

'For to-morrow,' he said quickly, turning to the page and marking it 
from one paragraph to the next with his rough nail. The princess bent over 
the exercise-book. 'Stop, there's a letter for you,' the old man said suddenly, 
pulling out of a pocket hanging over the table an envelope addressed in a 
feminine hand. 

The princess's face coloured red in patches at the sight of the letter. 
She took it hurriedly. 

'From Heloise?' asked the prince, showing his still strong, yellow teeth 
in a cold smile. 

'Yes, from Julie,' said the princess, glancing at him, and timidly smiling. 

'Two more letters I'll let pass, but the third I shall read,' said the prince 
severely; Tm afraid you write a lot of nonsense. The third I shall read.' 

'Read this one, father,' answered the princess, colouring still more and 
handing him the letter. 

'The third, I said the third,' the prince cried shortly; pushing away the 
letter and leaning his elbow on the table, he drew up to him the book with 
the figures of geometry in it. 

'Now, madam,' began the old man, bending over the book close to his 
daughter, and laying one arm on the back of the chair she was sitting on, so 
that the princess felt herself surrounded on all sides by the peculiar acrid 
smell of old age and tobacco, which she had so long associated with her 
father. 'Come, madam, these triangles are equal: kindly look; the angle 
ABC....' 



WAR AND PEACE 53 

The princess glanced in a scared way at her father's eyes gleaming close 
beside her. She could see and hear nothing; she could feel nothing but the 
dry face of her stern father near her, his breath and the smell of him, and 
could think of nothing but how to escape as soon as possible from the study 
and to make out the problem in freedom in her room. The old man lost 
his temper. 

'Well, you are too stupid!' cried the prince, pushing away the book, and 
turning sharply away. 'This won't do; it won't do,' he said, when Princess 
Marya, taking the exercise-book with the lesson set her, and shutting it, was 
about to leave the room, 'mathematics is a grand subject, madam. And to 
have you like the common run of our silly misses is what I don't want at all. 
Patience, and you'll get to like it.' He patted her on the cheek. 'It will 
drive all the nonsense out of your head.' 

Princess Marya went back to her own room with that dejected, scared 
expression that rarely left her, and made her plain, sickly face even plainer. 
She sat down at her writing-table, which was dotted with miniature 
portraits, and strewn with books and manuscripts. The princess was as 
untidy as her father was tidy. She put down the geometry exercise-book 
and impatiently opened the letter. The letter was from the princess's dearest 
friend from childhood; this friend was none other than Julie Karagin, who 
had been at the Rostovs' name-day party. 

Julie wrote in French: 

'Dear and excellent Friend,— What a terrible and frightful thing is 
absence! I say to myself that half of my existence and of my happiness is in 
you, that notwithstanding the distance that separates us, our hearts are 
united by invisible bonds; yet mine rebels against destiny, and in spite of 
the pleasures and distractions around me, I cannot overcome a certain 
hidden sadness which I feel in the bottom of my heart since our separation. 
Why are we not together as we were this summer in your great study, on 
the blue sofa, the confidential sofa? Why can I not, as I did three months 
ago, draw new moral strength from that gentle, calm, penetrating look of 
yours, a look that I loved so well and that I seem to see before me as I 
write to you.' 

When she reached this passage, Princess Marya sighed and looked round 
into the pier-glass that stood on her right. The glass reflected a feeble, un- 
graceful figure and a thin face. The eyes, always melancholy, were looking 
just now with a particularly hopeless expression at herself in the Looking- 
glass. She flatters me, thought the princess, and she turned away and went 
on reading. But Julie did not flatter her friend: the princess's eyes-large, 
deep, and luminous (rays of warm light seemed at times to radiate m 
streams from them), were really so fine, that very often in spite of die 
plainness of the whole face her eyes were more attractive than beaut) . But 
the princess had never seen the beautiful expression of her eyes; the expres- 
sion that came into them when she was not thinking of herself. As in the 



54 WAR AND PEACE 

case with every one, her face assumed an affected, unnatural, uglv expression 
as soon as she looked in the looking-glass. 
She went on reading: 

'All Moscow talks of nothing but war. One of my two brothers is already 
abroad, the other is with the Guards, who are starting on the march to the 
frontier. Our dear Emperor has left Petersburg, and, people declare, intends 
to expose his precious existence to the risks of war. God grant that the 
Corsican monster who is destroying the peace of Europe may be brought 
low bv the angel whom the Almighty in His mercy has given us as sover- 
eign. Without speaking of my brothers, this war has deprived me of one of 
my heart's dearest alliances. I mean the young Nicholas Rostov, whose 
enthusiasm could not endure inaction, and who has left the university to 
go and join the army. Well, dear Marie, I will own to you that, in spite of 
his extreme youth, his departure for the army has been a great grief to me. 
This young man, of whom I spoke to you in the summer, has so much 
nobilitv, so much real youthfulness, rarely to be met with in our age, among 
our old men of twenty 7 . Above all, he has so much openness and so much 
heart. He is so pure and poetic that my acquaintance with him, though so 
transient, has been one of the dearest joys known by my poor heart, which 
has already had so much suffering. Some day I will tell you about our 
farewells and all that we said to each other as we parted. As yet, all that is 
too fresh. Ah, dear friend, you are fortunate in not knowing these joys and 
these pains which are so poignant. You are fortunate, because the latter are 
generally stronger! I know very well that Count Nicholas is too young ever 
to become more to me than a friend, but this sweet friendship, this poetic 
and pure intimacy have fulfilled a need of my heart. No more of this. The 
great news of the day, w r ith which all Moscow is taken up, is the death of 
old Count Bezuhov, and his inheritance. Fancy, the three princesses have 
hardly got anything, Prince Vassily nothing, and everything has been left 
to M. Pierre, who has been acknowledged as a legitimate son into the bar- 
gain, so that he is Count Bezuhov and has the finest fortune in Russia. 
People say that Prince Vassily behaved very badly in all these matters and 
that he has gone back to Petersburg quite cast down. 

'I own that I understand very little about all these details of legacies and 
w T ills; what I know is that since the young man whom we all used to know 
as plain M. Pierre has become Count Bezuhov and owner of one of the 
largest fortunes in Russia, I am much amused to observe the change in the 
tone and the manners of mammas burdened with marriageable daughters 
and of those young ladies themselves, towards that individual— who I may 
say in passing has always seemed to me a poor creature. As people have 
amused themselves for the last two years in giving me husbands whom I 
don't know, the matrimonial gossip of Moscow generally makes me Countess 
Bezuhov. But you, I am sure, feel that I have no desire to become so. About 
marriage, by the by, do you know that the universal aiint, Anna Mihalovna, 



WAR AND PEACE 55 

has confided to me, under the seal of the deepest secrecy, a marriage scheme 
for you? It is no one more or less than Prince Vassily's son, Anatole, whom 
they want to settle by marrying him to some one rich and distinguished, 
and the choice of his relations has fallen on you. I don't know what view 
you will take of the matter, but I thought it my duty to let you know 
beforehand. He is said to be very handsome and very wild; that is all I have 
been able to find out about him. 

'But enough of gossip. I am finishing my second sheet and mamma is 
sending for me to go and dine with the Apraxins. Read the mystical book 
which I send you, and which is the rage here. Though there are things in 
this book, difficult for our human conceptions to attain to, it is an admirable 
book, and reading it calms and elevates the soul. Farewell. My respects to 
your father and my compliments to Mile. Bourienne. I embrace you as I 
love you. Julie. 

T.5.— Let me hear news of your brother and his charming little wife.' 

Princess Marya thought a minute, smiling dreamily (her face, lighted 
up by her luminous eyes, was completely transformed). Suddenly the 
princess glanced at her watch, and seeing that it was already five minutes 
later than the hour fixed for her practice on the clavichord, she went with 
a face of alarm into the divan-room. In accordance with the rules by which 
the day was mapped out, the prince rested from twelve to two, while the 
young princess practised on the clavichord. 

At that moment a carriage and a little cart drove up to the steps, and 
Prince Andrey got out of the carriage, helped his little wife out and let her 
pass into the house before him. Grey Tihon in his wig, popping out at the 
door of the waiting room, informed him in a whisper that the prince was 
taking a nap and made haste to close the door. Tihon knew that no extraor- 
dinary event, not even the arrival of his son, would be permitted to break 
through the routine of the day. Prince Andrey was apparently as well 
aware of the fact as Tihon. 

'He will get up in twenty minutes. Let's go to Marie,' he said. 

When the twenty minutes had elapsed, and the time for the old prince 
to get up had come, Tihon came to call the young man to his father. 'I he 
old man made a departure from his ordinary routine in honour of his son's 
arrival. He directed that he should be admitted into his apartments during 
his time for dressing, before dinner. 

'Ah! the warrior! So you want to fight Bonaparte?' said the old man, 
shaking his powdered head as far as his plaited tail, which was in I ihon s 
hands, would permit him. 

'Mind you look sharp after him, at any rate, or he'll soon be putting us 
on the list of his subjects. Come, tell me, how have the Germans trained 
you to fight with Bonaparte on their new scientific method- ftrategy as Che) 

call it?' 
Prince Andrey smiled. 



56 WAR AND PEACE 

'Give me time to recover myself, father/ he said, with a smile that showed 
that his father's failings did not prevent his respecting and loving him. 
'Why, I have only just got here.' 

'Nonsense, nonsense,' cried the old man, shaking his tail to try whether 
it were tightly plaited, and taking his son by the hand. 'The house is ready 
for your wife. Marie will look after her and show her everything, and 
talk nineteen to the dozen with her too. That's their feminine way. I'm 
glad to have her. Sit down, talk to me. Mihelson's army, I understand, 
Tolstoy's too ... a simultaneous expedition . . . but what's the army 
of the South going to do? Prussia, her neutrality ... I know all that. What 
of Austria?' he said, getting up from his chair and walking about the room, 
with Tihon running after him, giving him various articles of his apparel. 
'What about Sweden? How will they cross Pomerania? ' 

Prince Andrey, seeing the urgency of his father's questions, began 
explaining the plan of operations of the proposed campaign, speaking at 
first reluctantly, but becoming more interested as he went on, and uncon- 
sciously from habit passing from Russian into French. He told him how an 
army of ninety thousand troops was to threaten Prussia so as to drive her 
out of her neutrality and draw her into the war, how part of these troops 
were to join the Swedish troops at Strahlsund, how two hundred and 
twenty thousand Austrians were to combine with a hundred thousand 
Russians in Italy and on the Rhine, and how fifty thousand Russians and 
fifty thousand English troops were to meet at Naples, and how the army, 
forming a total of five hundred thousand, was to attack the French on 
different sides at once. The old prince went on dressing, apparently not 
listening, and when Prince Andrey was just finishing the old man hummed 
in French, in his falsetto old voice: 'Malbrook goes off to battle, God knows 
when he'll come back.' 

His son only smiled. 

'I don't say that this is a plan I approve of,' he said; 'I'm only telling you 
what it is. Napoleon has made a plan by now as good as this one.' 

'Well, you have told me nothing new.' And thoughtfully the old man 
repeated, speaking quickly to himself: 'God knows when he'll come back. 
Go into the dining-room.' 

At the exact hour, the prince, powdered and shaven, walked into the 
dining-room, where there were waiting for him his daughter-in-law, 
Princess Marya, Mademoiselle Bourienne, and the prince's architect, who, 
though an insignificant person of no social standing, dined at his table. The 
prince, who was in practice a firm stickler for distinctions of rank, and 
rarely admitted to his table even important provincial functionaries, had 
suddenly pitched on the architect Mihail Ivanovitch, blowing his nose in a 
check pocket-handkerchief in the corner, to illustrate the theory that all 
men are equal. 

In the dining-room, which, like all the other rooms in the house, was 
immensely lofty, the prince's entrance was awaited by all the members of 
his household and the footmen, standing behind each chair. Prince Andrey 



WAR AND PEACE 57 

stared at an immense golden frame on the wall that was new to him. It 
contained the genealogical tree of the Bolkonskys, and hanging opposite it 
was a frame, equally immense, with a badly painted representation (evi- 
dently the work of some household artist) of a reigning prince in a crown, 
intended for the descendant of Rurik and founder of the family of the 
Bolkonsky princes. Prince Andrey looked at this genealogical tree shaking 
his head, and he laughed as one laughs at a portrait ridiculously like. 

'There you have him all over!' he said to Princess Mary a as she came 
up to him. 

Everything her father did inspired in her a reverence that did not admit 
of criticism. 

Princess Marya was making ready to protest, when the step they were 
all listening for was heard coming from the study. The prince walked in 
with a quick, lively step, as he always walked, as though intentionally con- 
trasting the elasticity of his movements with the rigidity of the routine of 
the house. At that instant the big clock struck two, and another clock in 
the drawing-room echoed it in thinner tones. The prince stood still; his keen, 
stern eyes gleaming under his bushy, overhanging brows scanned all the 
company and rested on the little princess. 

'I'm glad, glad to see you,' he said, and looking intently into her eyes he 
walked away and sat down in his place. 'Sit down, sit down, Mihail Ivano- 
vitch, sit down.' 

He pointed his daughter-in-law to a seat beside him. The footman moved 
a chair back for her. 

'Ho, ho!' said the old man, looking at her rounded figure. 'You've not 
lost time; that's bad!' He laughed a dry, cold, unpleasant laugh, laughing 
as he always did with his lips, but not with his eyes. 'You must have exercise, 
as much exercise as possible, as much as possible,' he said. 

The little princess did not hear or did not care to hear his words. She sat 
dumb and seemed disconcerted. The prince asked after her father, and she 
began to talk and to smile. He asked her about common acquaintances; the 
princess became more and more animated, and began talking away, giving 
the prince greetings from various people and retailing the gossip of the 
town. 

'Poor Countess Apraxin has lost her husband; she has quite cried her 
eyes out, poor dear,' she said, growing more and more lively. 

As she became livelier, the prince looked more and more sternly at her, 
and all at once, as though he had studied her sufficiently and had formed a 
clear idea of her, he turned away and addressed Mihail Ivanovitch: 

'Well, Mihail Ivanovitch, our friend Bonaparte is to have a bad time of it. 
Prince Andrey' (this was how he always spoke of his son) 'has been telling 
me what forces are being massed against him! While you and I have alw.u s 
looked upon him as a very insignificant person.' 

The conversation turned again on the war, on Bonaparte, and the gen- 
erals and political personages of the day. The old prince was, it seemed, 
convinced that all the public men of the period were mere babes who had 



58 WAR AND PEACE 

no idea of the A B C of military and political matters. He was even per- 
suaded firmly that there were no political difficulties in Europe, that there 
was no war indeed, but only a sort of marionette show in which the men of 
the day took part, pretending to be doing the real thing. 

'No, my dear,' he went on. 'No, my lad, either you have all lost your wits, 
or I have outlived mine. God help you, and we shall see. Bonaparte's become 
a great military leader among them! H'm! . . .' 

'I don't say at all that all those plans are good,' said Prince Andrey; only 
I can't understand how you can have such an opinion of Bonaparte. Laugh, 
if you like, but Bonaparte is any way a great general!' 

'Bonaparte was born with a silver spoon in his mouth. He has splendid 
soldiers. And he attacked the Germans first too. And any fool can beat the 
Germans. From the very beginning of the world every one has beaten the 
Germans. And they've never beaten any one. They only conquer each 
other. He made his reputation fighting against them. God knows when he'll 
come back . . .' the prince hummed in falsetto, laughed still more falsetto, 
and got up from the table. 

Prince Andrey was leaving the following evening. The old prince, not 
departing from his regular routine, went away to his own room after dinner. 
The little princess was with her sister-in-law. Prince Andrey had been 
packing with his valet in the rooms set apart for him. Nothing was left 
in the room but a travelling-case, a big silver wine-case, two Turkish pistols 
and a sabre, a present from his father. Catching the sound of footsteps in 
the outer room, he stood at the table, engaged in fastening the cover of the 
case. 

'They told me you had ordered the horses,' Princess Marya said, panting 
(she had evidently been running), 'and I did so want to have a little more 
talk with you alone. God knows how long we shall be parted again. You're 
not angry with me for coming? ' 

'And where's Liza?' he asked, only answering her question by a smile. 

'She was so tired that she fell asleep on the sofa in my room. O Andrey, 
what a treasure of a wife you have,' she said. 'She is a perfect child; such a 
sweet, merry child. I like her so much.' Prince Andrey did not speak, but 
the princess noticed the ironical and contemptuous expression that came 
into his face. 

'But one must be indulgent to little weaknesses. Who is free from them, 
Andrey? You mustn't forget that she has grown up and been educated in 
society. Only think what it must be for her, poor girl, after the life she has 
been used to, to part from her husband and be left alone in the country, and 
in her condition too. It's very hard." 

Prince Andrey smiled, looking at his sister as we smile listening to people 
whom we fancy we see through. 

'You live in the country and think the life so awful?' he said. 

'I— that's a different matter. Why bring me in? But only think, Andrey, 
what it is for a young woman used to fashionable society to be buried for 
the best years of her life in the country, alone, because papa is always busy, 



WAR AND PEACE 59 

and I . . . you know me ... I am not a cheerful companion for women 
used to the best society. Mademoiselle Bourienne is the only person . . .' 

'I don't like her at all, your Bourienne,' said Prince Andrey. 

'Oh, no! she's a very good and sweet girl, and what's more, she's very 
much to be pitied. She has nobody, nobody. Mon pere picked her up an 
orphan in the streets, and she's very good-natured. And mon pere likes her 
way of reading. She reads aloud to him in the evenings. She reads very well.' 

'Come, tell me the truth, Marie, you suffer a good deal, I expect, some- 
times from our father's character?' Prince Andrey asked suddenly. Princess 
Marya was at first amazed, then aghast at the question. 

'Me? . . . me? . . . me suffer!' she said. 

'He was always harsh, but he's growing very tedious, I should think,' said 
Prince Andrey, speaking so slightingly of his father with an unmistakable 
intention either of puzzling or of testing his sister. 

'You are good in every way, Andrey, but you have a sort of pride of 
intellect,' said the princess, evidently following her own train of thought 
rather than the thread of the conversation, 'and that's a great sin. Do you 
think it right to judge our father? But if it were right, what feeling but 
veneration could be aroused by such a man as mon pere? And I am so con- 
tented and happy with him. I could only wish you were all as happy as 
I am.' 

Her brother shook his head incredulously. 

'The only thing that troubles me,— I'll tell you the truth, Andrey— is our 
father's way of thinking in religious matters. I can't understand how a man 
of such immense intellect can fail to see what is as clear as day, and can fall 
into such error. That is the one thing that makes me unhappy. But even in 
this I see a slight change for the better of late. Lately his jeers have not been 
so bitter, and there is a monk whom he received and talked to a long time.' 

'Well, my dear, I'm afraid you and your monk are wasting your powder 
and shot,' Prince Andrey said ironically but affectionately. 

'Ah, mon ami! I can only pray to God and trust that He will hear me. 
Andrey,' she said timidly after a minute's silent, 'I have a great favour to 
ask of you.' 

What is it, dear? ' 

'No; promise me you won't refuse. It will be no trouble to you, and there 
is nothing beneath you in it. Only it will be a comfort to me. Promise, 
Andryusha,' she said, putting her hand into her reticule and holding some- 
thing in it, but not showing it yet, as though what she was holding was the 
object of her entreaty, and before she received a promise to grant it, she 
could not take that something out of her reticule. c ^he looked timidly with 
imploring eyes at her brother. 

'Even if it were a great trouble . . .' answered Prince Andrey, seeming 
to guess what the favour was. 

'You may think what you please about it. I know you are like mon pi re. 
Think what you please, but do this for my sake. Do, please. The father of 
my father, our grandfather, always wore it in all his wars . . .' She still did. 



60 WAR AND PEACE 

not take out what she was holding in her reticule. 'You promise me, then?' 

'Of course, what is it?' 

'Andrey, I am blessing you with the holy image, and you must promise 
me you will never take it off. . . . You promise?' 

'If it does not weigh a ton and won't drag my neck off . . . To please 
you,' said Prince Andrey. The same second he noticed the pained expression 
that came over his sister's face at this jest, and felt remorseful. 'I am very 
glad, really very glad, dear,' he added. 

'Against your own will He will save and will have mercy on you and turn 
you to Himself, because in Him alone is truth and peace,' she said in a voice 
shaking with emotion, and with a solemn gesture holding in both hands 
before her brother an old-fashioned, little, oval holy image of the Saviour 
with a black face in a silver setting, on a little silver chain of delicate work- 
manship. She crossed herself, kissed the image, and gave it to Andrey. 

'Please, Andrey, for my sake.' 

Rays of kindly, timid light beamed from her great eyes. Those eyes 
lighted up all the thin, sickly face and made it beautiful. 

'So as I was telling you, Andrey, you must be kind and generous as you 
always used to be. Don't judge Liza harshly,' she began; 'she is so sweet, so 
good-natured, and her position is a very hard one just now.' 

'I fancy I have said nothing to you, Masha, of my blaming my wife for 
anything or being dissatisfied with her. What makes you say all this to me?' 

Princess Marya coloured in patches, and was mute, as though she felt 
guilty. 

'I have said nothing to you, but you have been talked to. And that makes 
me sad.' 

The red patches grew deeper on the forehead and neck and cheeks of 
Princess Marya. She would have said something, but could not utter the 
words. Her brother had guessed right: his wife had shed tears after dinner, 
had said that she had a presentiment of a bad confinement, that she was 
afraid of it, and had complained of her hard lot, of her father-in-law and 
her husband. After crying she had fallen asleep. Prince Andrey felt sorry 
for his sister. 

'Let me tell you one thing, Masha, I can't reproach my wife for anything, 
I never have and I never shall, nor can I reproach myself for anything in 
regard to her, and that shall always be so in whatever circumstances I may 
be placed. But if you want to know the truth ... if you want to know if 
I am happy. No. Is she happy? No. Why is it so? I don't know.' 

Princess Marya got up and moved toward the door. She stopped. 'Andrey, 
if you had faith, you would have appealed to God, to give you the love 
that you do not feel, and your prayer would have been granted.' 

'Yes, perhaps so,' said Prince Andrey. 

On the way to his sister's room, Prince Andrey encountered Mademoiselle 
Bourienne smiling sweetly. It was the third time that day that she had 
thrown herself in his way in secluded passages. 

'Ah, I thought you were in your own room,' she said, for some reason 



WAR AND PEACE 61 

blushing and casting down her eyes. Prince Andrey looked sternly at her. 

When he reached his sister's room, the little princess was awake and her 
gay little voice could be heard through the open door, hurrying one word 
after another. She talked as though, after being long restrained, she wanted 
to make up for lost time, and, as always, she spoke French. 

'No, but imagine the old Countess Zubov, with false curls and her mouth 
full of false teeth as though she wanted to defy the years. Ha, ha, ha, Marie!' 

Just the same phrase about Countess Zubov and just the same laugh Prince 
Andrey had heard five times already from his wife before outsiders. He 
walked softly into the room. The little princess, plump and rosy, was 
sitting in a low chair with her work in her hands, trotting out her Petersburg 
reminiscences and phrases. Prince Andrey went up, stroked her on the head, 
and asked if she had got over the fatigue of the journey. She answered him 
and went on talking. 

The coach with six horses stood at the steps. It was a dark autumn night. 
The coachman could not see the shafts of the carriage. Servants with 
lanterns were running to and fro on the steps. The immense house glared 
with its great windows lighted up. The house-serfs were crowding in the 
outer hall, anxious to say good-bye to their young prince. Prince Andrey 
had been summoned to the study of his father, who wanted to take leave 
of him alone. 

When Prince Andrey went into the study, the old prince was in his 
old-age spectacles and his white dressing-gown, in which he never saw 
any one but his son. He was sitting at the table writing. He looked round. 

'Going?' And he went on writing again. 

'I have come to say good-bye.' 

'Kiss me here,' he touched his cheek; 'thanks, thanks!' 

'What are you thanking me for?' 

'For not lingering beyond your fixed time, for not hanging about a 
woman's petticoats. Duty before everything. Thanks, thanks!' And he went 
on writing, so that ink spurted from the scratching pen. 

'If you want to say anything, say it. I can do these two things at once,' 
he added. 

'About my wife ... I'm ashamed as it is to leave her on your 

hands. . . .' 

'Why talk nonsense? Say what you want.' 

'When my wife's confinement is due, send to Moscow for an accoucheur 
. . . Let him be here.' 

The old man stopped and stared with stern eyes at his son, as though not 

understanding. 

'I know that no one can be of use, if nature does not assist,' said Prince 
Andrey, evidently confused. 'I admit that out of a million rases only one 
goes wrong, but it's her fancy and mine. They've been telling her things; 
she's had a dream and she's frightened.' 

'H'm . . . h'm . . .' the old prince muttered to himself, going on with 



62 WAR AND PEACE 

his writing. 'I will do so.' He scribbled his signature, and suddenly turned 
quickly to his son and laughed. 

'It's a bad business, eh?' 

'What's a bad business, father?' 

'Wife!' the old prince said briefly and significantly. 

'I don't understand,' said Prince Andrey. 

'But there's no help for it, my dear boy,' said the old prince; 'they're all 
like that, and there's no getting unmarried again. Don't be afraid, I won't 
say a word to any one, but you know it yourself.' 

He grasped his hand with his thin, little, bony fingers, shook it, looked 
straight into his son's face with his keen eyes, that seemed to see right 
through any one, and again he laughed his frigid laugh. 

The son sighed, acknowledging in that sigh that his father understood 
him. The old man, still busy folding and sealing the letters with his 
habitual rapidity, snatched up and flung down again the wax, the seal, and 
the paper. 

'It can't be helped. She's pretty. I'll do everything. Set your mind at rest,' 
he said jerkily, as he sealed the letter. 

Andrey did not speak; it was both pleasant and painful to him that his 
father understood him. The old man got up and gave his son the letter. 

'Listen,' said he. 'Don't worry about your wife; what can be done shall 
be done. Now, listen; give this letter to Mihail Ilarionovitch. I write that 
he is to make use of you on good work, and not to keep you long an 
adjutant; a vile duty! Tell him I remember him and like him. And write to 
me how he receives you. If he's all right, serve him. The son of Nikolay 
Andreivitch Bolkonsky has no need to serve under any man as a favour.' 

He spoke so rapidly that he did not finish half of his words, but his son 
was used to understanding him. 

'There's another thing I wanted to ask you,' went on Prince Andrey; 
'if I'm killed, and if I have a son, don't let him slip out of your hands, as 
I said to you yesterday; let him grow up with you . . . please.' 

'Not give him up to your wife?' said the old man, and he laughed. 

They stood mutually facing each other. The old man's sharp eyes were 
fixed on his son's eyes. A quiver passed over the lower part of the old 
prince's face. 

'We have said good-bye ... go along!' he said suddenly. 'Go along!' he 
cried in a loud and wrathful voice, opening the study door. 

'What is it, what's the matter?' asked the two princesses on seeing Prince 
Andrey, and catching a momentary glimpse of the figure of the old man 
in his white dressing-gown, wearing his spectacles and no wig, and shouting 
in a wrathful voice. 

Prince Andrey sighed and made no reply. 

'Now, then,' he said, turning to his wife, and that 'now then' sounded like 
a cold sneer, as though he had said, 'Now, go through your little per- 
formance.' 

'Andrey? Already!' said the little princess, turning pale and looking with 



WAR AND PEACE 63 

dismay at her husband. He embraced her. She shrieked and fell swooning 
on his shoulder. 

He cautiously withdrew the shoulder, glanced into her face and carefully 
laid her in a low chair. 

'Good-bye, Masha,' he said gently to his sister, and they kissed one 
another's hands, then with rapid steps he walked out of the room. 

The little princess lay in the arm-chair; Princess Marya, supporting her 
sister-in-law, still gazed with her fine eyes full of tears at the door by which 
Prince Andrey had gone, and she made the sign of the cross at it. From 
the study she heard like pistol shots the repeated and angry sounds of the 
old man blowing his nose. Just after Prince Andrey had gone, the door of 
the study was flung open, and the stern figure of the old man in his white 
dressing-gown peeped out. 

'Gone? Well, and a good thing too!' he said, looking furiously at the 
fainting princess. He shook his head reproachfully and slammed the door. 



PART II 



In October of 1805 the Russian troops were occupying the towns and 
villages of the Austrian archduchy, and fresh regiments kept arriving from 
Russia and encamping about the fortress of Braunau, burdening the in- 
habitants on whom they were billeted. Braunau was the chief headquarters 
of the commander-in-chief, Kutuzov. 

On the nth of October 1805, one of the infantry regiments that had just 
reached Braunau had halted half a mile from the town, awaiting the 
inspection of the commander-in-chief. In spite of the un-Russian character 
of the country and the environment (the fruit gardens, the stone walls, the 
tiled roofs, the mountains in the distance, the foreign peasants, who looked 
with curiosity at the Russian soldiers), the regiment looked exactly as every 
Russian regiment always looks when it is getting ready for inspection any- 
where in the heart of Russia. In the evening, on the last stage of the march, 
the order had been received that the commander-in-chief would inspect 
the regiment on the march. Though the wording of the order did not seem 
quite clear to the general in command of the regiment, and the question 
arose whether they were to take it to mean, in marching order or not, it was 
decided on a consultation between the majors to present the regiment in 
parade order on the ground, since, as the saying is, it is better to bow too 
low than not to bow low enough. And the soldiers after a twenty-five mile 
march had not closed their eyes, but had spent the night mending and 
cleaning, while the adjutants and officers had been reckoning up and cal- 
culating. And by the morning the regiment, instead of the straggling, 
disorderly crowd it had been on the last march, the previous evening, 
presented the spectacle of an organised mass of two thousand men, of 
whom every one knew his part and his duty, and had every button and 
every strap in its proper position, and shining with cleanliness. 

It was not only the outside that was in good order; if the commander-in- 
chief should think fit to peep below the uniform, he would see on every 
man alike a clean shirt, and in every knapsack he would find the regulation 
number of articles. There was only one circumstance which no one could 
feel comfortable about. That was their foot-gear. More than half the 
soldiers had holes in their boots. But this deficiency was not due to any 
shortcoming on the part of their commanding officer, since in spite of his 
repeated demands the boots had not yet been granted him by the Austrian 
authorities, and the regiment had marched nearly a thousand miles. 

64 



WAR AND PEACE 65 

The commander of the regiment was a sanguine-looking general past 
middle age, with grey whiskers and eyebrows, broad and thick-set, and 
thicker through from the chest to the back than across the shoulders. He 
wore a brand-new uniform with the creases still in it where it had been 
folded, and rich gold epaulettes, which seemed to stand up instead of lying 
down on his thick shoulders. He walked about in front of the line, and 
quivered as he walked, with a slight jerk of his back at each step. 

'Well, sir,' he said, addressing a major, 'we have had our hands full all 
night . . . But it'll do, I fancy; the regiment's not so bad as some ... eh? ' 

At that moment two figures on horseback came into sight on the road 
from the town, where sentinels had been posted to give the signal. They 
were an adjutant, and a Cossack riding behind him. 

The adjutant had been sent by the commander-in-chief to confirm to 
the commander what had not been clearly stated in the previous order, 
namely, that the commander-in-chief wished to inspect the regiment exactlv 
in the order in which it had arrived— wearing their overcoats, and carrying 
their baggage, and without any sort of preparation. 

A member of the Hofkriegsrath from Vienna had been with Kutuzov 
the previous day, proposing and demanding that he should move on as 
quickly as possible to effect a junction with the army of Archduke 
Ferdinand and Mack; and Kutuzov, not considering this combination ad- 
visable, had intended, among other arguments in support of his view, to 
point out to the Austrian general the pitiable condition in which were the 
troops that had arrived from Russia. It was with this object, indeed, that he 
had meant to meet the regiment, so that the worse the condition of the 
regiment, the better pleased the commander-in-chief would be with it. 
Though the adjutant did not know these details, he gave the general in 
command of the regiment the message that the commander-in-chief abso- 
lutely insisted on the men being in their overcoats and marching order. 

On hearing this the general's head sank; he shrugged his shoulders, and 
flung up his hands. 

'Here's a mess we've made of it,' he said. 'Why, didn't I tell you that on 
the march meant in their overcoats,' he said reproachfully to the major. 
'Ah, my God!' he added, and stepped resolutely forward. 'Captains of the 
companies!' he shouted in a voice used to command. 'Sergeants! . . . Will 
his excellency be coming soon?' he said, turning to the adjutant with an 
expression of respectful deference, that related obviously only to the person 
he was speaking of. 

'In an hour's time, I believe.' 

'Have we time to change clothes?' 

'I can't say, general. . . .' 

The general, going himself among the ranks, gave orders for the men to 
change back to their overcoats. The captains ran about among the com- 
panies, the sergeants bustled to and fro (the overcoats were not quite Up to 
the mark), and instantaneously the squadrons, that had been in regular order 
and silent, were heaving to and fro, straggling apart and humming with 



66 WAR AND PEACE 

talk. The soldiers ran backwards and forwards in all directions, stooping 
with their shoulders thrown back, drawing their knapsacks off over their 
heads, taking out their overcoats and lifting their arms up to thrust them 
into the sleeves. 

Half an hour later everything was in its former good order again, only 
the squadrons were now grey instead of black. The general walked in 
front of the regiment again with his quivering strut, and scanned it from 
some distance. 

' What next? what's this!' he shouted, stopping short. 'Captain of the 
third company!' 

'You'll soon be dressing your men in petticoats! What's the meaning of 
it?' shouted the general, thrusting out his lower jaw and pointing in the 
ranks of the third division to a soldier in an overcoat of a colour different 
from the rest. Til teach you to rig your men out in dressing-gowns for 
inspection! . . . Eh?' 

'Your excellency, that's Dolohov, the degraded officer,' the captain said 
softly. 

'Well, is he degraded to be a field-marshal, or a common soldier? If he's 
a soldier, then he must be dressed like ail the rest, according to regulation.' 

'Your excellency, you gave him leave yourself on the march.' 

'Gave him leave? Gave him leave? If one says a word to you, you go 
and . . .' The general, looking round at the adjutant, walked with his 
quivering strut towards the regiment. 

'Why are you in a blue coat? Off with it! . . . Sergeant! change his 
coat . . . the dir . . .' Before he had time to finish the word 

'General, I am bound to obey orders, but I am not bound to put up with 
. . .' Dolohov hastened to say. 

'No talking in the ranks! . . . No talking, no talking!' 

'Not bound to put up with insults,' Dolohov went on, loudly and clearly. 
The eyes of the general and the soldier met. The general paused, angrily 
pulling down his stiff scarf. 

'Change your coat, if you please,' he said as he walked away. 

'Coming!' the sentinel shouted at that moment. The general, turning red, 
ran to his horse, with trembling hands caught at the stirrup, swung himself 
up, settled himself in the saddle, drew out his sword, and with a pleased 
and resolute face opened his mouth on one side, in readiness to shout. 

'Silence!' roared the general, in a soul-quaking voice, expressing at once 
gladness on his own account, severity as regards the regiment, and welcome 
as regards the approaching commander-in-chief. 

A high, blue Vienna coach with several horses was driving at a smart 
trot, rumbling on its springs, along the broad unpaved high-road, with 
trees planted on each side of it. The general's suite and an escort of Croats 
galloped after the coach. Beside Kutuzov sat an Austrian general in a 
white uniform, that looked strange among the black Russian ones. The 
coach drew up on reaching the regiment. Kutuzov and the Austrian 
general were talking of something in low voices, and Kutuzov smiled 



WAR AND PEACE 67 

slightly as, treading heavily, he put his foot on the carriage step, exactly as 
though those two thousand men gazing breathlessly at him and at their 
general did not exist at all. 

The word of command rang out, again the regiment quivered with a 
clanking sound as it presented arms. In the deathly silence the weak voice 
of the commander-in-chief was audible. The regiment roared: 'Good health 
to your Ex . . lency . . lency . . lency!' And again all was still. At first 
Kutuzov stood in one spot, while the regiment moved; then Kutuzov began 
walking on foot among the ranks, stopping now and then and saying a few 
friendly words to officers he had known in the Turkish war, and sometimes 
to the soldiers. Looking at their boots, he several times shook his head 
dejectedly, and pointed them out to the Austrian general, with an expres- 
sion as much as to say that he blamed no one for it, but he could not help 
seeing what a bad state of things it was. 

Behind Kutuzov followed his suite, consisting of some twenty persons. 
These gentlemen were talking among themselves, and sometimes laughed. 
Nearest of all to the commander-in-chief walked a handsome adjutant. It 
was Prince Bolkonsky. Beside him was his comrade Nesvitsky, a tall staff- 
officer, excessively stout, with a good-natured, smiling, handsome face, and 
moist eyes. Nesvitsky could hardly suppress his mirth, which was excited 
by a swarthy officer of hussars walking near him. This officer, without a 
smile or a change in the expression of his fixed eyes, was staring with a 
serious face at the commanding officer's back, and mimicking every move- 
ment he made. Every time the commanding officer quivered and darted 
forward, the officer of hussars quivered and darted forward in precisely the 
same way. Nesvitsky laughed, and poked the others to make them look at 
the mimic. 

Kutuzov walked slowly and listlessly by the thousands of eyes which 
were almost rolling out of their sockets in the effort to watch him. 

The third company was the last, and Kutuzov seemed pondering, as 
though trying to recall something. Prince Andrey stepped forward and said 
softly in French: 'You told me to remind you of the degraded officer, 
Dolohov, serving in the ranks in this regiment.' 

'Where is Dolohov?' asked Kutuzov. 

Dolohov, attired by now in the grey overcoat of a private soldier, did not 
wait to be called up. The slender figure of the fair-haired soldier, with his 
bright blue eyes, stepped out of the line. He went up to the commander-in- 
chief and presented arms. 

'A complaint to make?' Kutuzov asked with a slight frown. 

'This is Dolohov,' said Prince Andrey. 

'Ah!' said Kutuzov. 'I hope this will be a lesson to you, do your duty 
thoroughly. The Emperor is gracious. And I shall not forget you, if you 

deserve it.' 

The bright blue eyes looked at the commander-in-chief just as impudently 
as at the general of his regiment, as though by his expression tearing down 



68 WAR AND PEACE 

the veil of convention that removed the commander-in-chief so far from 
the soldier. 

'The only favour I beg of your most high excellency,' he said in his firm, 
ringing, deliberate voice, 'is to give me a chance to atone for my offence, 
and to prove my devotion to his majesty the Emperor, and to Russia.' 

Kutuzov turned away and frowned, as though to express that all Dolohov 
had said to him and all he could say, he had known long, long ago, that he 
was sick to death long ago of it, and that it was not at all what was wanted. 
He turned away and went towards the coach. 

Although so short a time had passed since Prince Andrey had left Russia, 
he had changed greatly during that time. In the expression of his face, in 
his gestures, in his gait, there was scarcely a trace to be seen now of his 
former affectation, ennui, and indolence. He had the air of a man who has 
not time to think of the impression he is making on others, and is absorbed 
in work, both agreeable and interesting. His face showed more satisfaction 
with himself and those around him. His smile and his glance were more 
light-hearted and attractive. 

Kutuzov, whom he had overtaken in Poland, had received him very 
cordially, had promised not to forget him, had marked him out among the 
other adjutants, had taken him with him to Vienna and given him the more 
serious commissions. From Vienna, Kutuzov had written to his old com- 
rade, Prince Andrey's father. 

'Your son,' he wrote, 'gives promise of becoming an officer, who will 
make his name by his industry, firmness, and conscientiousness. I consider 
myself lucky to have such an assistant at hand.' 

On Kutuzov's staff, among his fellow-officers, and in the army generally, 
Prince Andrey had, as he had had in Petersburg society, two quite opposite 
reputations. Some, the minority, regarded Prince Andrey as a being different 
from themselves and from all other men, expected great things of him, 
listened to him, were enthusiastic in his praise, and imitated him, and with 
such people Prince Andrey was frank and agreeable. Others, the majority, 
did not like Prince Andrey, and regarded him as a sulky, cold, and dis- 
agreeable person. But with the latter class, too, Prince Andrey knew how 
to behave so that he was respected and even feared by them. 

The report in circulation of the defeat of the Austrians and the surrender 
of the whole army at Ulm turned out to be the truth. It was evident that 
the Russian troops which had hitherto been inactive, were destined soon to 
meet the enemy. 

Prince Andrey was one of those rare staff-officers whose interests were 
concentrated on the general progress of the war. On seeing Mack and 
learning the details of his overthrow, he grasped the fact that half the 
campaign was lost; he perceived all the difficulty of the position of the 
Russian troops, and vividly pictured to himself what lay before the army, 
and the part he would have to play in the work in store for them. He could 
not help feeling a rush of joyful emotion at the thought of the humiliation 
of self-confident Austria, and the prospect within a week, perhaps, of 



WAR AND PEACE 69 

seeing and taking part in the meeting of the Russians with the French. But 
he was afraid of the genius of Bonaparte, which might turn out to be more 
powerful than all the bravery of the Russian troops. 

Excited and irritated by these ideas, Prince Andrey went towards his 
own room to write to his father, to whom he wrote every day. In the 
corridor he met Nesvitsky, the comrade with whom he shared a room, 
laughing at some joke. 

'What are you looking so dismal about? ' asked Nesvitsky. 'Come, what is 
the matter, my dear boy?' 

'What's the matter?' said Prince Andrey, standing still from excitement. 
'Why, you ought to understand that we're either officers, who serve their 
Tsar and their country and rejoice in the success, and grieve at the defeat 
of the common cause, or we're hirelings, who have no interest in our 
master's business. Forty thousand men massacred and the army of our allies 
destroyed, and you find something in that to laugh at?' 

The Pavlogradsky regiment of hussars was stationed two miles from 
Braunau. The squadron in which Nikolay Rostov was serving as ensign was 
billeted on a German village, Salzeneck. The officer in command of the 
squadron, Captain Denisov, had been assigned the best quarters in the village. 
Ensign Rostov had been sharing his quarters, ever since he overtook the 
regiment in Poland. 

On the 8th of October, the very day when at headquarters all was astir 
over the news of Mack's defeat, the routine of life was going on as before 
among the officers of this squadron. 

Denisov, who had been losing all night at cards, had not yet returned 
home, when Rostov rode back early in the morning from a foraging expedi- 
tion. Rostov, in his ensign's uniform, rode up to the steps, with a jerk to 
his horse, swung his leg over with a supple, youthful action, stood a 
moment in the stirrup as though loath to part from the horse, at last sprang 
down. 

'Ah, Bondarenko, friend of my heart,' he said to the hussar who rushed 
headlong up to his horse. 'Walk him up and down, my dear fellow,' he said, 
with that gay and brotherly cordiality with which good-hearted young 
people behave to every one, when they are happy. 

'Yes, your excellency,' answered the Little Russian, slinking his head 
good-humouredly. 

'Mind now, walk him about well!' Rostov stroked the horse on the neck. 

'Splendid! What a horse he will be!' he said to himself, and smiling and 
holding his sword, he ran up the steps, clanking his spurs. The German on 
whom they were billeted, looked out of the cowshed, wearing a jerkin and 
2. pointed cap, and holding a fork, with which he was clearing out the 
dung. The German's face brightened at once when he saw Rostov, lie 
smiled good-humouredly and winked. 'Good-morning, good-morning!' he 
repeated, apparently taking pleasure in greeting the young man. 

'At work already!' said Rostov, still with the same happy, fraternal smile 



70 WAR AND PEACE 

that was constantly on his eager face. 'Long live the Austrians! Long live 
the Russians! Hurrah for the Emperor Alexander!' he said, repeating 
phrases that had often been uttered by the German. The German laughed, 
came right out of the cowshed, pulled off his cap, and waving it over his 
head, cried: 

'And long live all the world!' 

Rostov too, like the German, waved his cap over his head, and laughing 
cried: 'And hurrah for all the world!' Though there was no reason for any 
special rejoicing either for the German, clearing out his shed, or for 
Rostov, coming back from foraging for hay, both these persons gazed at 
one another in delighted ecstasy and brotherly love, wagged their heads at 
each other in token of their mutual affection, and parted with smiles, the 
German to his cowshed, and Rostov to the cottage he shared with Denisov. 

'Where's your master?' he asked of Lavrushka, Denisov's valet, well 
known to all the regiment as a rogue. 

'His honour's not been in since the evening. He's been losing, for sure,' 
answered Lavrushka. 'I know by now, if he wins, he'll come home early to 
boast of his luck; but if he's not back by morning, it means that he's lost,— 
he'll come back in a rage. Shall I bring coffee?' 

'Yes, bring it.' 

Ten minutes later, Lavrushka brought in the coffee. 

'Ah! you are up already,' said Denisov, coming into the room. 

c Long ago,' said Rostov; 'I've been out already after hay.' 

'Really? And I've been losing, my boy, all night. ... As soon as you left^ 
my luck was gone.' 

Denisov, puckering up his face as though he were smiling, and showing 
his short, strong teeth, began with his short-fingered hands ruffling up his 
thick, black hair, that was tangled like a forest. 

'The devil was in me to go to that rat,' he said, rubbing his brow and face 
with both hands. 'Only fancy, he didn't deal me one card, not one, not one 
card! If there were only women. But here, except drinking, there's nothing 
to do. If only we could get to fighting soon. . . . Hey, who's there?' he 
called towards the door, catching the sounds of thick boots and clanking 
spurs that came to a stop, and of a respectful cough. 

'The sergeant!' said Lavrushka. Denisov puckered up his face more than 
ever. 

'That's a nuisance,' he said, flinging down a purse with several gold coins 
in it. 'Rostov, count, there's a dear boy, how much is left, and put the purse 
under the pillow,' he said, and he went out to the sergeant. Rostov took the 
money and mechanically sorting and arranging in heaps the old and new 
gold, he began counting it over. 

'Ah, Telyanin! Good-morning! I was cleaned out last night,' he heard 
Denisov's voice saying from the other room. 

'Where was that? At the rat's? ... I knew it,' said a thin voice, and 
thereupon there walked into the room Lieutenant Telyanin, a little officer 
in the same squadron. 



WAR AND PEACE 71 

Rostov put the purse under the pillow, and shook the damp little hand 
that was offered him. Telyanin had for some reason been transferred from 
the guards just before the regiment set out. He had behaved very well in 
the regiment, but he was not liked, and Rostov, in particular, could not 
endure him. 

'Well, young cavalryman, how is my Rook doing for you?' (Rook was 
a riding-horse Telyanin had sold to Rostov.) The lieutenant never looked 
the person he was speaking to in the face. His eyes were continually flitting 
from one object to another. 'I saw you riding to-day . . .' 

'Oh, he's all right; a good horse,' answered Rostov, though the horse, for 
which he had paid seven hundred roubles, was not worth half that sum. 
'He's begun to go a. little lame in the left fore leg . . .' he added. 

'The hoof cracked! That's no matter. I'll teach you, I'll show you the 
sort of thing to put on it.' 

'Yes, please do,' said Rostov. 

'I'll show you, I'll show you; it's not a secret. But you'll be grateful to me 
for that horse.' 

'Then I'll have the horse brought round,' said Rostov, anxious to be rid 
of Telyanin. He went out to order the horse to be' brought round. 

In the outer room Denisov was squatting on the threshold with a pipe, 
facing the sergeant, who was giving him some report. On seeing Rostov, 
Denisov screwed up his eyes, and pointing over his shoulder with his 
thumb to the room where Telyanin was sitting, he frowned and shook his 
head with an air of loathing. 

'Ugh! I don't like the fellow,' he said, regardless of the presence of the 
sergeant. 

Rostov shrugged his shoulders as though to say, 'Nor do I, but what's one 
to do?' And having given his order, he went back to Telyanin. 

The latter was still sitting in the same indolent pose in which Rostov 
had left him, rubbing his little white hands. 

'What nasty faces there are in this world!' thought Rostov as he went 
into the room. 

'Well, have you given orders for the horse to* be fetched out? 1 
Telyanin, getting up and looking carelessly about him. 

'Yes.' 

'Well, you come along yourself. I only came round to ask Denisov about 
yesterday's order. Have you got it, Denisov?' 

'Not yet. But where are you off to?' 

'I'm going to show this young man here how to shoe a horse, said 

Telyanin. 

They went out down the steps and into the stable. The Lieutenant sho* Bd 
how to put on the remedy, and went away to his own quarters. 

When Rostov went back there was a bottle of vodka and some sausage 
on the table. Denisov was sitting at the tabic, and his pen was squeaking 
over the paper. He looked gloomily into Rostov's face. 

'I am writing to her,' he said. He leaned his elbow on the table * Kb the 



72 WAR AND PEACE 

pen in his hand, and, obviously rejoicing at the possibility of saying by 
word of mouth all he meant to write, he told the contents of his letter to 
Rostov. 'You see, my dear boy/ he said, 'we are plunged in slumber, we are 
the children of dust and ashes, until we love . . . but love, and you are a 
god, you are pure, as on the first day of creation. . . . Who's that now? 
Send him to the devil! I've no time!' he shouted to Lavrushka, who, not in 
the slightest daunted, went up to him. 

'Why, who should it be? You told him to come yourself. The sergeant 
has come for the money.' 

Denisov frowned. 'How much money was there left there in the purse?' 
he asked Rostov. 

'Seven new and three old gold pieces.' 

Denisov went to the bed to take the purse from under the pillow. 

'Where did you put it, Rostov?' 

'Under the lower pillow.' 

'But it's not there.' Denisov threw both the pillows on the floor. There 
Was no purse. 'Well, that's a queer thing.' 

'Wait a bit, haven't you dropped it?' said Rostov, picking the pillows up 
one at a time and shaking them. He took off the quilt and shook it. The 
purse was not there. 

'Could I have forgotten? No, for I thought that you keep it like a secret 
treasure under your head,' said Rostov. 'I laid the purse here. Where is it?' 
He turned to Lavrushka. 

'I never came into the room. Where you put it, there it must be.' 

'But it isn't.' 

Lavrushka ransacked the whole bed, glanced under it and under the table, 
ransacked the whole room and stood still in the middle of the room. Denisov 
watched Lavrushka's movements in silence, and when Lavrushka flung up 
his hands in amazement to signify that it was nowhere, he looked round at 
Rostov. 

'Rostov, none of your schoolboy jokes.' 

Rostov, feeling Denisov's eyes upon him, lifted his eyes and instantly 
dropped them again. He could hardly draw his breath. 

'And there's been no one in the room but the lieutenant and yourselves. 
It must be here somewhere,' said Lavrushka. 

'Now then, you devil's puppet, bestir yourself and look for it!' Denisov 
shouted suddenly, turning purple and dashing at the valet with a threatening 
gesture. 

'Denisov, let him be; I know who has taken it,' said Rostov. 

Denisov stopped, thought a moment, and evidently understanding 
Rostov's hint, he clutched him by the arm. 

'Nonsense!' he roared so that the veins stood out on his neck and forehead 
like cords. 'I tell you, you've gone out of your mind; I won't allow it. The 
purse is here; I'll flay the skin off this rascal, and it will be here.' 

But Rostov looked at Denisov with as much fury as if he had been his 
greatest enemy. 



WAR AND PEACE 73 

'Do you understand what you're saying?' he said in a trembling voice; 
'except me, there has been no one else in the room. So that, if it's not so, 
why then . . .' 

Rostov went to Telyanin's quarters. 

'The master's not at home, he's gone to the staff,' Telyanin's orderly told 
him. 'Has something happened?' the orderly added. 

'No, nothing.' 

'You've only just missed him,' said the orderly. 

The staff quarters were two miles and a half from Salzeneck. Rostov took 
his horse and rode to the quarters of the staff. In the village, where the 
staff was quartered, there was a restaurant which the officers frequented 
Rostov saw Telyanin's horse at the entry. 

In the second room the lieutenant was sitting over a dish of sausages and 
a bottle of wine. 

'Ah, you have come here too, young man,' he said, smiling and lifting his 
eyebrows. 

'Yes,' said Rostov, speaking as though the utterance of the word cost him 
great effort; and he sat down at the nearest table. 

Both were silent; there were two Germans and a Russian officer in the 
room. Every one was mute, and the only sounds audible were the clatter 
of knives on the plates and the munching of the lieutenant. When Telyanin 
had finished his lunch, he took out of his pocket a double purse; with his 
little white fingers, that were curved at the tips, he parted the rings, took 
out some gold, and raising his eyebrows, gave the money to the attendant. 

'Make haste, please,' he said. 

The gold was new. Rostov got up and went to Telyanin. 

'Let me look at the purse,' he said in a low voice, scarcely audible. 

With shifting eyes, but eyebrows still raised, Telyanin gave him the purse. 

'Yes, it's a pretty purse . . . yes . . .' he said, and suddenly he turned 
white. 

Rostov took the purse in his hand and looked both at it and at the money 
in it, and also at Telyanin. 

'What are you going to do? have lunch too? They give you decent food,' 
Telyanin went on. 'Give it me.' He put out his hand and took hold of the 
purse. Rostov let go of it. Telyanin took the purse and began carelessly 
dropping it into the pocket of his riding trousers, while his eyebrows were 
carelessly lifted and his mouth stood a little open, as though he would say: 
'Yes, yes, I'm putting my purse in my pocket, and that's a very simple 
matter, and no one has anything to do with it.' 

'Well, young man?' he said with a sigh, and from under his lifted eve- 
brows he glanced into Rostov's eyes. 

'Come here,' said Rostov, taking Telyanin by the arm. He almost dragged 
him to the window. 'That's Denisov's money; you took it . . .' he w hispered 
in his ear. 

'What? . . . what? . . . How dare you? What?' . . . said Telyanin. But 
the words sounded like a plaintive, despairing cry and prayer for forgive- 



74 WAR AND PEACE 

ness. As soon as Rostov heard the sound of his voice, a great weight of 
suspense, like a stone, rolled off his heart. He felt glad, and at the same 
instant he pitied the luckless creature standing before him. 

'I know that, and I'll prove it,' said Rostov. 

The terrified, white face of Telyanin began twitching in every muscle; 
his eyes still moved uneasily, but on the ground, never rising to the level of 
Rostov's face, and tearful sobs could be heard. 

'Count! . . . don't ruin a young man . . . here is the wretched money, 
take it.' . . . He threw it on the table. 'I've an old father and mother!' . . . 

Rostov took the money, avoiding Telyanin's eyes, and without uttering 
a word, he went out of the room. But in the doorway he stopped and 
turned back. 

'My God!' he said, with tears in his eyes, 'how could you do it?' 

'Count,' said Telyanin, coming nearer. 

'Don't touch me,' said Rostov, drawing back. 'If you're in need, take the 
money.' 

He thrust a purse on him and ran out of the restaurant. 

In the evening of the same day a lively discussion was taking place in 
Denisov's quarters between some officers of the squadron. 

'But I tell you, Rostov, that you must apologise to the colonel,' the tall 
staff-captain was saying, addressing Rostov, who was crimson with excite- 
ment. 

'I permit no one to tell me I'm lying!' cried Rostov. 'He told me I was 
lying and I told him he was lying. And there it rests. He can put me on duty 
every day, he can place me under arrest, but no one can compel me to 
apologise.' 

'But you wait a bit, my good fellow; you listen to me,' interrupted the 
staff-captain in his bass voice. 'You tell the colonel in the presence of other 
officers that an officer has stolen ' 

'I'm not to blame for the conversation being in the presence of other 
officers. Possibly I ought not to have spoken before them, but I'm not a 
diplomatist. That's just why I went into the hussars; I thought that here I 
should have no need of such finicky considerations, and he tells me I'm a 
liar ... so let him give me satisfaction.' 

'That's all very fine, no one imagines that you're a coward; but that's not 
the point. Ask Denisov if it's not utterly out of the question for an ensign 
to demand satisfaction of his colonel?' 

Denisov was biting his moustache with a morose air, listening to the con- 
versation, evidently with no desire to take part in it. To the captain's 
question, he replied by a negative shake of the head. 

'No, he didn't. He said I was telling an untruth.' 

'Quite so, and you talked nonsense to him, and you must apologise.' 

'Not on any consideration!' shouted Rostov. 

'I shouldn't have expected this of you,' said the staff-captain seriously 
and severely. 'You won't apologise, but, my good sir, it's not only him, but 
all the regiment, all of us, that you've acted wrongly by; you're to blame aU 



WAR AND PEACE 75 

round. Look here; if you'd only thought it over, and taken advice how to 
deal with the matter, but you must go and blurt it all straight out before 
the officers. What was the colonel to do then? Is he to bring the officer up 
for trial and disgrace the whole regiment?' The staff-captain's voice began 
to quaver. 'You, sir, have been next to no time in the regiment; you're here 
to-day, and to-morrow you'll be passed on somewhere as an adjutant; you 
don't care a straw for people saying: "There are thieves among the 
Pavlograd officers!" But we do care! Don't we, Denisov? Do we care?' 

'That's the truth, damn it!' shouted Denisov, jumping up. 'Come, Rostov, 
come!' 

Rostov, turning crimson and white again, looked first at one officer and 
then at the other. 

'No, gentlemen, no . . . you mustn't think ... I quite understand, 
you're wrong in thinking that of me . . . I . . . for me . . . for the honour 
of the regiment I'd ... but why talk? I'll prove that in action and for me 
the honour of the flag . . . well, never mind, it's true, I'm to blame!' . . . 
There were tears in his eyes. 'I'm wrong, wrong all round! Well, what 
more do you want?' . . . 

'Come, that's right, count,' cried the staff-captain, turning round and 
clapping him on the shoulder with his big hand. 

'I tell you,' shouted Denisov, 'he's a capital fellow.' 

'That's better, count,' repeated the captain, beginning to address him by 
his title as though in acknowledgment of his confession. 'Go and apologise, 
your excellency.' 

'Gentlemen, I'll do anything, no one shall hear a word from me,' Rostov 
protested in an imploring voice, 'but I can't apologise, by God, I can't, say 
what you will! How can I apologise, like a little boy begging pardon!' 

Denisov laughed. 

'It'll be the worse for you, if you don't.' 

'By God, it's not obstinacy! I can't describe the feeling it gives me. I can't 
do it.' 

'Well, as you like,' said the staff-captain. 'What has the scoundrel done 
with himself?' he asked Denisov. 

'He has reported himself ill; to-morrow the order's given for him to be 
struck off,' said Denisov. 

'It is an illness, there's no other way of explaining it,' said the staff- 
captain. 

'Whether it's illness or whether it's not, he'd better not cross my path-I'd 
kill him,' Denisov shouted bloodthirstily. 

The regimental adjutant came in; they were under orders to advance 
next day. 

'To the front, gentlemen!' 

'Well, thank God! we've been sticking here too long.' 

Kutuzov fell back to Vienna, destroying the bridges behind him. On the 
23rd of October the Russian troops crossed the river Enns. The Russian 



76 WAR AND PEACE 

baggage-waggons and artillery and the columns of troops were in the 
middle of that day stretching in a long string across the town of Enns on 
both sides of the bridge. The day was warm, autumnal, and rainy. The wide 
view that opened out from the heights where the Russian batteries stood 
guarding the bridge was at times narrowed by the slanting rain that shut 
it in like a muslin curtain, then again widened out, and in the bright sunlight 
objects could be distinctly seen in the distance, looking as if covered with 
a coat of varnish. The little town could be seen below with its white houses 
and its red roofs, its cathedral and its bridge, on both sides of which 
streamed masses of Russian troops, crowded together. At the bend of the 
Danube could be seen ships and the island and a castle with a park, sur- 
rounded by the waters formed by the Enns falling into the Danube, and the 
precipitous left bank of the Danube, covered with pine forest, with a 
mysterious distance of green tree-tops and bluish gorges. Beyond the pine 
forest, that looked wild and untouched by the hand of man, rose the turrets 
of a nunnery; and in the far distance in front, on the hill on the further 
side of the Enns, could be seen the scouts of the enemy. 

Between the cannons on the height stood the general in command of the 
rear-guard and an officer of the suite scanning the country through a field- 
glass. A little behind them, there sat on the trunk of a cannon, Nesvitsky, 
who had been despatched by the commander-in-chief to the rear-guard. The 
Cossack who accompanied Nesvitsky had handed him over a knapsack and 
a flask, and Nesvitsky was regaling the officers with pies and real doppel- 
kiimmel. 

'Look, prince,' said one of the officers, who would dearly have liked to 
take another pie but was ashamed to, and therefore affected to be gazing at 
the countryside; 'look, our infantry have just got in there. Over there, near 
the meadow behind the village, three of them are dragging something. They 
will clean out that palace nicely,' he said, with evident approval. 

'No doubt,' said Nesvitsky. 'No; but what I should like,' he added, 
munching a pie in his moist, handsome mouth, 'would be to slip in there.' 
He pointed to the turreted nunnery that could be seen on the mountainside. 

Meanwhile the officer of the suite, who was standing in front, pointed 
something out to the general; the general looked through the field-glass. 

'Yes, so it is, so it is,' said the general angrily, taking the field-glass away 
from his eye and shrugging his shoulders; 'they are going to fire at them at 
the crossing of the river. And why do they linger so?' 

With the naked eye, looking in that direction, one could discern the 
enemy and their batteries, from which a milky -white smoke was rising. The 
smoke was followed by the sound of a shot in the distance, and our troops 
were unmistakably hurrying to the place of crossing. 

Nesvitsky got up puffing and went up to the general, smiling. 

'Wouldn't your excellency take some lunch?' he said. 

'It's a bad business,' said the general, without answering him; 'our men 
have been too slow.' 

Shouldn't I ride over, your excellency,' said Nesvitsky. 



WAR AND PEACE 77 

'Yes, ride over, please,' said the general, repeating an order that had 
already once before been given in detail; 'and tell the hussars that they are 
to cross last and to burn the bridge, as I sent orders, and that they're to 
overhaul the burning materials on the bridge.' 

'Very good,' answered Nesvitsky. He called the Cossack with his horse, 
told him to pick up the knapsack and flask, and lightly swung his heavy 
person into the saddle. 

'Upon my word, I am going to pay a visit to the nuns,' he said to the 
officers who were watching him, smiling, and he rode along the winding 
path down the mountain. 

'Now then, captain, try how far it'll carry,' said the general, turning to 
the artillery officer. 'Have a little fun to pass the time.' 

'Men, to the guns!' commanded the officer, and in a moment the gunners 
ran gaily from the camp fires and loaded the big guns. 

'One!' they heard the word of command. Number one bounded back 
nimbly. The cannon boomed with a deafening metallic sound, and whistling 
over the heads of our men under the mountainside, the grenade flew across, 
and falling a long way short of the enemy showed by the rising smoke 
where it had fallen and burst. 

The faces of the soldiers and officers lightened up at the sound. Every 
one got up and busily watched the movements of our troops below, which 
could be seen as in the hollow of a hand, and the movements of the advanc- 
ing enemy. At the same instant, the sun came out fully from behind the 
clouds, and the full note of the solitary shot and the brilliance of the bright 
sunshine melted into a single inspiriting impression of light-hearted gaiety. 

Over the bridge two of the enemy's shots had already flown and there was 
a crush on the bridge. In the middle of the bridge stood Nesvitsky. He had 
dismounted and stood with his stout person jammed against the railings. 
He looked laughingly back at his Cossack, who was standing several paces 
behind him holding the two horses by their bridles. Every time Nesvitsky 
tried to move on, the advancing soldiers and waggons bore down upon him 
and shoved him back against the railings. There was nothing for him to do 
but to smile. 

'Hi there, my lad,' said the Cossack to a soldier in charge of a w aggon- 
load who was forcing his way through the foot-soldiers that pressed right 
up to his wheels and his horses; 'what are you about? No, you wait a bit; 
you see the general wants to pass.' 

But the convoy soldier, taking no notice of the allusion to the general, 
bawled to the soldiers who blocked the way: 'Hi! fellows, keep to the left! 
wait a bit!' But the fellows, shoulder to shoulder, with their bayonets inter- 
locked, moved over the bridge in one compact mass. 

Looking down over the rails, Prince Nesvitsky saw the noisy, rapid, but 
not high waves of the Enns, which, swirling in eddies round the piles of the 
bridge, chased one another down stream. Looking on the bridge he saw 
the living waves of the soldiers, all alike as they streamed by: shakoes with 
covers on them, knapsacks, bayonets, long rifles, and under the shakoes 



78 WAR AND PEACE 

broad-jawed faces, sunken cheeks, and looks of listless weariness, and legs 
moving over the boards of the bridge, that were coated with sticky mud. 
Sometimes among the monotonous streams of soldiers, like a crest of white 
foam on the waves of the Enns, an officer forced his way through, in a 
cloak, with a face of a different type from the soldiers. Sometimes, like a 
chip whirling on the river, there passed over the bridge among the waves 
of infantry a dismounted hussar, an orderly, or an inhabitant of the town. 
Sometimes, like a log floating down the river, there moved over the bridge, 
hemmed in on all sides, a baggage-waggon, piled up high and covered with 
leather covers. 

'Why they're like a river bursting its banks,' said the Cossack, stopping 
hopelessly. 'Are there many more over there?' 

'A million, all but one!' said a cheerful soldier in a torn coat, winking, as 
he passed out of sight. Then came some hilarious soldiers, who had un- 
mistakably been drinking. 

'And didn't he up with the butt end of his gun and give him one right in 
the teeth,' one soldier was saying gleefully with a wide sweep of his arm. 

'It just was a delicious ham,' answered the other with a chuckle. And 
they passed on, so that Nesvitsky never knew who had received the blow 
in his teeth, and what the ham had to do with it. 

'Nesvitsky! Nesvitsky! You, old chap!' he heard a husky voice shouting 
from behind at that instant. 

Nesvitsky looked round and saw, fifteen paces away, separated from 
him by a living mass of moving infantry, the red and black and towzled 
face of Vaska Denisov with a forage-cap on the back of his head, and a 
pelisse swung jauntily over his shoulder. 

'Tell them to make way, the damned devils!' roared Denisov, who was 
evidently in a great state of excitement. He rolled his flashing, coal-black 
eyes, showing the bloodshot whites, and waved a sheathed sword, which he 
held in a bare hand as red as his face. 

'Eh! Vaska!' Nesvitsky responded joyfully. 'But what are you about?' 

'The squadron can't advance!' roared Vaska Denisov, viciously showing 
his white teeth, and spurring his handsome, raven thoroughbred. 

The soldiers, with terrified faces, squeezed together, and Denisov joined 
Nesvitsky. 

'How is it you're not drunk to-day?' said Nesvitsky, when he came up. 

'They don't even give us time to drink!' answered Vaska Denisov. 
'They've been dragging the regiment to and fro the whole day. Fighting's all 
very well, but who the devil's to know what this is!' 

'How smart you are to-day!' said Nesvitsky, looking at his new pelisse 
and fur saddle-cloth. 

Denisov smiled, pulled out of his sabretache a handkerchief that diffused 
a smell of scent, and put it to Nesvitsky's nose. 

'To be sure, I'm going into action! I've shaved, and cleaned my teeth and 
scented myself!' 

Nesvitsky's imposing figure, accompanied by his Cossack, and the deter- 



WAR AND PEACE 79 

mination of Denisov, waving his sword and shouting desperately, produced 
so much effect that they stopped the infantry and got to the other end of 
the bridge. Nesvitsky found at the entry the colonel, to whom he had 
to deliver the command, and having executed his commission he rode back. 

The rest of the infantry pressed together into a funnel shape at the 
entrance of the bridge, and hastily marched across it. At last all the baggage- 
waggons had passed over; the crush was less, and the last battalion were 
stepping on to the bridge. Only the hussars of Denisov's squadron were left 
on the further side of the river facing the enemy. Denisov could not keep 
still in one place, but galloped to and fro before the squadron. 

The staff-captain on his stout, steady charger rode at a walking pace to 
meet him. The staff-captain's face with its long whiskers was serious, as 
always, but his eyes looked brighter than usual. 

'Well,' he said to Denisov, 'it won't come to a fight. You'll see, we shall 
retreat again.' 

'Devil knows what they're about!' growled Denisov. 'Ah, Rostov!' he 
called to the ensign, noticing his beaming face. 'Well, you've not had long 
to wait.' And he smiled approvingly, unmistakably pleased at the sight of 
the ensign. Rostov felt perfectly blissful. At that moment the colonel 
appeared at the bridge. Denisov galloped up to him. 

'Your excellency, let us attack! we'll settle them.' 

'Attack, indeed!' said the colonel in a bored voice, puckering his face up 
as though at a teasing fly. 'And what are you stopping here for? You see 
the flanks are retreating. Lead the squadron back.' 

The squadron crossed the bridge and passed out of range of the enemy's 
guns without losing a single man. It was followed by the second squadron, 
and the Cossacks last of all crossed, leaving the further side of the river 
clear. 

An orderly rode up from the commander of the rear-guard. 'Colonel, 
there's an order to go back and burn the bridge.' 

'An order, who to?" asked the colonel grimly. 

'Well, I don't know, colonel, who to?" answered the cornet, seriously, 
'only the prince commanded me: "Ride and tell the colonel the hussars 
are to make haste back and burn the bridge." ' 

An officer of the suite rode up to the colonel with the same command. 
After the officer of the suite the stout figure of Nesvitsky was seen riding 
up on a Cossack's horse, which had some trouble to gallop with him. 

'Why, colonel,' he shouted, while still galloping towards him, 'I told 
you to burn the bridge, and now some one's got it wrong; they're all 
frantic over there, there's no making out anything.' 

The colonel in a leisurely way stopped the regiment and turned to 

Nesvitsky. 

'You told me about burning materials,' he said; 'but about burning it, 

you never said a word.' . 

'Why, my good man,' said Nesvitsky, as he halted, taking oil Ins forage- 
cap and passing his plump hand over his hair, which was drenched with 



80 WAR AND PEACE 

sweat, 'what need to say the bridge was to be burnt when you put burning 
materials to it?' 

'I'm not your "good man," M. le staff-officer, and you never told me 
to set fire to the bridge! I know my duty, and it's my habit to carry out 
my orders strictly. You said the bridge will be burnt, but who was going 
to burn it I couldn't tell.' 

'Well, that's always the way,' said Nesvitsky, with a wave of his arm. 

'You said, M. le staff-officer . . .' pursued the colonel in an aggrieved 
tone. 

'Colonel,' interposed the officer of the suite, 'there is need of haste, or 
the enemy will have moved up their grape-shot guns.' 

The colonel looked dumbly at the officer of the suite, at the stout staff- 
officer, and scowled. 

'I will burn the bridge,' he said in a solemn tone, as though he would 
express that in spite of everything they might do to annoy him, he would 
still do what he ought. 

Beating his long muscular legs against his horse, as though he w T ere to 
blame for it all, the colonel moved forward and commanded the second 
squadron, the one under Denisov's command, in which Rostov was serving, 
to turn back to the bridge. 

'Yes, it really is so,' thought Rostov, 'he wants to test me!' His heart 
throbbed and the blood rushed to his face. 'Let him see whether I'm a 
coward!' he thought. 

Their swords catching in the reins and their spurs jingling, the hussars 
dismounted in haste, not knowing themselves what they were to do. The 
soldiers crossed themselves. Rostov did not look at the colonel now; he 
had no time. He dreaded, with a sinking heart he dreaded, being left 
behind by the hussars. 

'Stretchers!' shouted a voice behind him. Rostov did not think of the 
meaning of the need of stretchers. He ran along, trying only to be ahead 
of all. But just at the bridge, not looking at his feet, he got into the slippery, 
trodden mud, and stumbling fell on his hands. The others outstripped him. 

'On both sides, captain,' he heard shouted by the colonel, who, riding 
on ahead, had pulled his horse up near the bridge, with a triumphant and 
cheerful face. 

Rostov, rubbing his muddy hands on his riding-breeches, looked round 
at his enemy, and would have run on further, imagining that the forwarder 
he went the better it would be. 

Meanwhile Nesvitsky and the officer of the suite were standing together 
out of range of the enemy, watching the little group of men in yellow 
shakoes, dark-green jackets, embroidered with frogs, and blue riding- 
breeches, swarming about the bridge, and on the other side of the river 
the blue tunics and the groups with horses, that might so easily be taken 
for guns, approaching in the distance. 

'Will they burn the bridge or not? Who'll get there first? Will they 
run there and burn it, or the French train their grape-shot on them and 



WAR AND PEACE 81 

kill them?' These were the questions that, with a sinking of the heart, 
each man was asking himself in the great mass of troops overlooking the 
bridge. In the brilliant evening sunshine they gazed at the bridge and 
the hussars, and at the blue tunics, with bayonets and guns, moving up 
on the other side. 

'Ugh! The hussars will be caught,' said Nesvitsky. 'They're not out of 
range of grape-shot now.' 

'He did wrong to take so many men,' said the officer of the suite. 

'Yes, indeed,' said Nesvitsky. 'If he'd sent two bold fellows it would 
have done as well.' 

'Ah, your excellency,' put in Zherkov, his eyes fixed on the hussars, 
though he still spoke with his naive manner, from which one could not 
guess whether he were speaking seriously or not. 'Ah, your excellency. 
How you look at things. Send two men, but who would give us the 
Vladimir and ribbon then? But as it is, even if they do pepper them, one 
can represent the squadron and receive the ribbon oneself. Our good 
friend knows the way to do things.' 

'I say,' said the officer of the suite, 'that's grape-shot.' 

On the French side, smoke rose among the groups that had cannon, 
One puff, a second and a third almost at the same instant; and at the 
very moment when they heard the sound of the first shot, there rose the; 
smoke of a fourth; two booms came one after another, then a third. 

'If I were Tsar, I'd never go to war,' said Nesvitsky, turning away. 

The French cannons were speedily loaded again. The infantry in their 
blue tunics were running towards the bridge. Again the puffs of smoke 
rose at different intervals, and the grape-shot rattled and cracked on the 
bridge. But this time Nesvitsky could not see what was happening at the 
bridge. A thick cloud of smoke had risen from it. The hussars had suc- 
ceeded in setting fire to the bridge, and the French batteries were firing 
at them now, not to hinder them, but because their guns had been brought 
up and they had some one to fire at. 

The French had time to fire three volleys of grape-shot before the 
hussars got back to their horses. Two were badly aimed, and the shot 
flew over them, but the last volley fell in the middle of the group of 
hussars and knocked down three men. 

Rostov stepped on the bridge, not knowing what- he had to do. There 
was no one to slash at with his sword (that was how he always pictured 
a battle to himself), and he could be of no use in burning the bridge, be- 
cause he had not brought with him any wisps of straw, like the other soldiers. 
He stood and looked about him, when suddenly there was a rattle on the 
bridge, like a lot of nuts being scattered, and one of the hussars, the one 
standing nearest him, fell with a groan on the railing. Rostov ran up to 
him with the others. Again some one shouted, 'Stretchers! 1 Four men took 
hold of the hussar and began lifting him up. 'Oooo! . . . Let me be, for 
Christ's sake!' shrieked the wounded man, but still they lifted him up and 
laid him on a stretcher. 



82 WAR AND PEACE 

Nikolay Rostov turned away, and began staring into the distance, at 
the waters of the Danube, at the sky, at the sun, as though he were 
searching for something. How fair that sky seemed, how blue and calm 
and deep. How brilliant and triumphant seemed the setting sun. With 
what an enticing glimmer shone the water of the far-away Danube. And 
fairer still were the far-away mountains that showed blue beyond the 
Danube, the nunnery, the mysterious gorges, the pine forests, filled with 
mist to the tree-tops . . . there all was peace and happiness. . . . 'There 
is nothing, nothing I could wish for, if only I were there,' thought Rostov. 
'In myself alone and in that sunshine there is so much happiness, while 
here . . . groans, agonies, and this uncertainty, this hurry. . . . Here they 
are shouting something again and again, all of them are running back 
somewhere, and I'm running with them, and here is it, it, death hanging 
over me, all round me. . . . One instant, and I shall never see that sun- 
shine, that water, that mountain gorge again. . . .' At that moment the sun 
went behind the clouds; more stretchers came into view ahead of Rostov. 
And the terror of death and of the stretchers, and the loss of the sunshine 
and life, all blended into one sensation of sickening fear. 

'Good God, Thou who art in that sky, save and forgive, and protect 
me,' Rostov whispered to himself. 

The hussars ran back to their horses; their voices grew louder and 
more assured; the stretchers disappeared from sight. 

'Well, lad, so you've had a sniff of powder!' Vaska Denisov shouted 
in his ear. 

'It's all over, but I am a coward, yes, I am a coward,' thought Rostov. 

'What was that— grape-shot? ' he asked of Denisov. 

'Yes, and something like it too,' cried Denisov; 'they worked their 
guns in fine style. But it's a nasty business. A cavalry attack's a pleasant 
thing— slash away at the dogs; but this is for all the devil like aiming 
at a target.' 

'It seems as if no one noticed it, though,' Rostov thought to himself. 
And indeed no one had noticed it at all, for every one was familiar with 
the feeling that the ensign, never before under fire, was experiencing 
for the first time. 

'Inform the prince that I have burnt the bridge,' said the colonel, in- 
a cheerful and triumphant tone. 

'And if he inquires with what losses?' 

'Not worth mentioning,' boomed the colonel; 'two hussars wounded, 
and one stark dead on the spot/ he said, with undisguised cheerfulness. 

Pursued by the French army of a hundred thousand men under the com- 
mand of Bonaparte, received with hostility by the inhabitants, losing 
confidence in their allies, suffering from shortness of supplies, and forced 
to act under circumstances unlike anything that had been foreseen, the 
Russian army of thirty-five thousand men, under the command of Kutuzov, 



WAR AND PEACE 83 

beat a hasty retreat to the lower ground about the Danube. There they 
fought a few rear-guard skirmishes, avoiding an engagement, except in so 
far as it was necessary to secure a retreat without the loss of their baggage 
and guns. 

On the 28th of October, Kutuzov took his army across to the left 
bank of the Danube, and then for the first time halted, leaving the Danube 
between his army and the greater part of the enemy's forces. On the 
30th he attacked Mortier's division, which was on the left bank of the 
Danube, and defeated it. In this action for the first time trophies were 
taken— a flag, cannons, and two of the enemy's generals. For the first 
time, after retreating for a fortnight, the Russian troops had halted, and 
after fighting had not merely kept the field of battle, but had driven 
the French off it. Although the troops were without clothing and ex- 
hausted, and had lost a third of their strength in wounded, killed, and 
missing; although they had left their sick and wounded behind on the 
other side of the Danube, with a letter from Kutuzov commending them 
to the humanity of the enemy; although the great hospitals and houses 
in Krems could not contain all the sick and wounded— in spite of all 
that, the halt before Krems and the victory over Mortier had greatly 
raised the spirits of the troops. Throughout the whole army, and also at 
headquarters, there were the most cheerful but groundless rumours of 
the near approach of the columns from Russia, of some victory gained 
by the Austrians, and of the retreat of Bonaparte panic-stricken. 

Prince Andrey had been during the engagement in attendance on the 
Austrian general Schmidt, who was killed in the battle. His horse had 
been wounded under him, and he had himself received a slight wound on 
his arm from a bullet. As a mark of special favour on the part of the 
commander-in-chief, he was sent with the news of this victory to the 
Austrian court, now at Briinn, as Vienna was threatened by the French. 

Prince Andrey stayed at Briinn with a Russian of his acquaintance in 
the diplomatic service, Bilibin. 

Not his journey only, but all the time he had spent with the army 
on the march, deprived of all the conveniences of cleanliness and the 
elegancies of life, made Prince Andrey feel now an agreeable sense of 
repose among the luxurious surroundings to which he had been accus- 
tomed from childhood. Moreover, after his Austrian reception, he was 
glad to speak— if not in Russian, for they talked French— at least to a 
Russian, who would, he imagined, share the general Russian dislike (which 
he felt particularly keenly just then) for the Austrians. 

Bilibin was a man of five-and-thirty, a bachelor, of the same circle 
as Prince Andrey. They had been acquainted in Petersburg, but had 
become more intimate during Prince Andrcy's last stay at Vienna with 
Kutuzov. Just as Prince Andrey was a young man, who promised to rise 
high in a military career, Bilibin promised to do even better in diplomacy. 
He was still a young man, but not a young diplomat, as he had been 
in the service since he was sixteen. He had been in Paris ami in ('open- 



84 WAR AND PEACE 

hagen; and now in Vienna he filled a post of considerable importance. 

'Come, now, tell us about your victories,' he said. Bolkonsky in the 
most modest fashion, without once mentioning himself in connection with 
it, described the engagement, and afterwards his reception by the war 
minister. 

'They received me and my news like a dog in a game of skittles,' he 
concluded. 

Bilibin grinned. 

'I must own that I don't understand it; perhaps there are diplomatic 
subtleties in it that are beyond my feeble intellect; but I can't make it 
out. Mack loses a whole army, Archduke Ferdinand and Archduke Karl 
give no sign of life and make one blunder after another; Kutuzov alone 
gains at last a decisive victory, breaks the prestige of invincibility of the 
French, and the minister of war does not even care to learn the details!' 

'For that very reason, my dear boy, don't you see! Hurrah for the 
Tsar, for Russia, for the faith! That's all very nice; but what have we, 
I mean the Austrian court, to do with your victories? You bring us 
good news of a victory of Archduke Karl or Ferdinand— one archduke's 
as good as the other, as you know— if it's only a victory over a fire 
brigade of Bonaparte, and it will be another matter, it will set the cannons 
booming. But this can only tantalise us, as if it were done on purpose. 
Archduke Karl does nothing, Archduke Ferdinand covers himself with 
disgrace! . . . You must admit that anything more exasperating than the 
news you have brought could not be conceived. It's as though it were 
done on purpose, done on purpose. But apart from that, if you were 
to gain a really brilliant victory, if Archduke Karl even were to win a 
victory, what effect could it have on the general course of events? It's 
too late now, when Vienna is occupied by the French forces.' 

'Occupied? Vienna occupied?' 

'Not only is Vienna occupied, but Bonaparte is at Schonbrunn.' 

'But still that doesn't mean that the campaign is over,' said Prince Andrey. 

'But I believe that it is over. And so do all the big-wigs here, though 
they don't dare to say so. And so between ourselves, my dear boy, my 
instinct tells me of negotiations with France and projects of peace, a secret 
peace, concluded separately.' 

'Impossible!' said Prince Andrey. 'That would be too base.' 

'Time will show,' said Bilibin. 

Bolkonsky received invitations on all hands, and had to spend the 
whole morning paying visits to the principal personages in the Austrian 
Government. After paying his visits, Prince Andrey, at five o'clock in 
the evening, was returning homewards to Bilibin's, mentally composing 
a letter to his father about the battle and his reception at Briinn. At the 
steps of Bilibin's house stood a cart packed half full of things, and Franz^ 
Bilibin's servant, came out of the doorway, with difficulty dragging a 
travelling-trunk. 

'Ah, your excellency!' said Franz, with some exertion rolling the trunk 



WAR AND PEACE 85 

on the cart. 'We are to move on still farther. The scoundrel is already at 
our heels again!' 

'Eh? what?' queried Prince Andrey. 

Bilibin came out to meet Bolkonsky. His ordinarily composed face 
looked excited. 

'No, no, confess that this is charming/ he said, 'this story of the bridge 
of Tabor. They have crossed it without striking a blow. Murat is at this 
moment running along the road to Briinn, and to-day or to-morrow they'll 
be here.' 

'Here? But how is it the bridge wasn't blown up, since it was mined?' 

'Why, that's what I ask you. No one— not Bonaparte himself— can tell 
why.' Bolkonsky shrugged his shoulders. 

'But if they have crossed the bridge, then it will be all over with the 
army; it will be cut off,' he said. 

'That's the whole point,' answered Bilibin. 'Listen. The French enter 
Vienna, as I told you. Everything is satisfactory. Next day, that is yester- 
day, Messieurs les Marechaux, Murat, Lannes, and Beliard get on their 
horses and ride off to the bridge. "Gentlemen," says one, "you know 
that the Tabor bridge has been mined and countermined, and is protected 
by a formidable fortification and fifteen thousand troops, who have orders 
to blow up the bridge and not to let us pass. But our gracious Emperor 
Napoleon will be pleased if we take the bridge. Let us go us three and take 
it." "Yes, let us go," say the others; and they start off and take the bridge, 
cross it, and now with their whole army on this side of the Danube, they 
are coming straight upon us, and upon you and your communications.' 

'Leave of! jesting,' said Prince Andrey, with mournful seriousness. The 
news grieved Prince Andrey, and yet it gave him pleasure. As soon as he 
heard that the Russian army was in such a hopeless position, the idea 
struck him that he was the very man destined to extricate the Russian 
army from that position, and that it had come— the Toulon— that would 
lift him for ever from out of the ranks of unknown officers, and open the 
first path to glory for him! As he listened to Bilibin, he was already con- 
sidering how, on reaching the army, he would, at a council of war, give the 
opinion that alone could save the army, and how he would be entrusted 
alone to execute the plan. 

'Leave off joking,' he said. 

'I'm not joking,' Bilibin went on. 'Nothing could be more truthful or 
more melancholy. These three gentlemen advance to the bridge alone and 
wave white handkerchiefs; they declare that it's a truce, and that they, 
the marshals, are come for a parley with Prince Aucrspcrg. The officer on 
duty lets them into the tete du pont. They tell him a thousand Gascon 
absurdities; say that the war is over, that Emperor Francis has arranged 
a meeting with Bonaparte, that they desire to sec Prince Auersperg, and 
so on. The officer sends for Auersperg. These Gascon gentlemen embrace 
the officers, make jokes, and sit about on the cannons, while a French 
battalion meantime advances unnoticed on the bridge, flings the sacks 



86 WAR AND PEACE 

of inflammable material into the river, spikes the cannons, and the bridge 
is taken. No, but really the best part of the whole episode,' he went on, 
his excitement subsiding under the interest of his own story, 'is that the 
sergeant in charge of the cannon which was to give the signal for firing 
the mines and blowing up the bridge, this sergeant seeing the French 
troops running on to the bridge wanted to fire, but Lannes pulled his 
arm away. The sergeant, who seems to have been sharper than his general, 
goes up to Auersperg and says: "Prince, they're deceiving you, here are 
the French!" Murat sees the game is up if he lets the sergeant have his 
say. With an affectation of surprise (a true Gascon!) he addresses Auers- 
perg: "Is this the Austrian discipline so highly extolled all over the 
world," says he, "do you let a man of low rank speak to you like this?" 
It was a stroke of genius. The Prince of Auersperg is touched in his 
honour and has the sergeant put under arrest. No, but confess that all 
this story of the bridge of Tabor is charming. It is neither stupidity, 
nor cowardice . . .' 

'It is treason, perhaps,' said Prince Andrey, vividly picturing to himself 
grey overcoats, wounds, the smoke and sound of firing, and the glory 
awaiting him. 

'Not that either. This puts the court into a pretty pickle,' pursued 
Bilibin. 'It is not treason, nor cowardice, nor stupidity; it is just as it was 
at Ulm . . .' 

'I must start.' 

'Where to?' 

'To the army.' 

'Why are you going? You have received no orders to go back, and 
you are not dismissed from here, so that you can remain and go with 
us, where our ill-luck takes us. They say they are going to Olmutz. And 
Olmiitz is a very charming town. And we can travel there comfortably 
together in my carriage.' 

'That's enough joking, Bilibin,' said Bolkonsky. 

'I am speaking to you sincerely as a friend. Consider where are you 
going and with what object now, when you can stay here. You have two 
alternatives before you: you won't reach the army before peace will be 
concluded, or you will share the defeat and disgrace with Kutuzov's whole 
army.' 

'That I can't enter into,' said Prince Andrey coldly, but he thought: 'I 
am going to save the army.' 

'My dear fellow, you are a hero,' said Bilibin. 

The same night, after taking leave of the minister of war, Bolkonsky set 
off to join the army, not knowing where he should find it, at the risk of 
being caught by the French on the way to Krems. 

At Briinn all the court and every one connected with it was packing 
up, and the heavy baggage was already being despatched to Olmutz. Near 
Esselsdorf, Prince Andrey came out on the road along which the Russian 
army was moving in the utmost haste and in the greatest disorder. The 



WAR AND PEACE 87 

most sinister rumours reached him on the road, and the appearance of 
the army fleeing in disorder confirmed these rumours. 

'As for that Russian army which English gold has brought from the 
ends of the universe, we are going to inflict upon it the same fate (the 
fate of the army of Ulm)'; he remembered the words of Bonaparte's 
address to his army at the beginning of the campaign, and these words 
aroused in him simultaneously admiration for the genius of* his hero, a 
feeling of mortified pride, and the hope of glory. 'And if there's nothing 
left but to die?' he thought. 'Well, if it must be! 1 will do it no 'worse than 
others.' 

Prince Andrey looked disdainfully at the endless, confused mass of 
companies, of baggage-waggons, parks of artillery, and again store-wag- 
gons, carts, and waggons of every possible form, pursuing one another and 
obstructing the muddy road three and four abreast. On every side, behind 
and before, as far as the ear could reach in every direction there was the 
rumble of wheels, the rattle of carts, of waggons, and of gun-carriages, 
the tramp of horses, the crack of whips, the shouts of drivers, the swearing 
of soldiers, of orderlies, and officers. At the sides of the roads he saw fallen 
horses, and sometimes their skinned carcases, broken-down waggons, with 
solitary soldiers sitting on them, waiting for something, detached groups 
of soldiers strayed from their companies, starting off to neighbouring 
villages, or dragging back from them fowls, sheep, hay, or sacks' of stores 
of some sort. Where the road went uphill or downhill the crush became 
greater, and there was an uninterrupted roar of shouts. 

Prince Andrey galloped towards the village where he was told that 
the commander-in-chief was. On reaching the village, he got off his horse, 
and looked round. Out of a little window of the first house was thrust 
the handsome face of Nesvitsky. 

'Bolkonsky! Bolkonsky! Don't you hear, eh? Make haste,' he shouted. 

Going into the house, Prince Andrey found Nesvitsky and another 
adjutant having a meal. They hastily turned to Bolkonsky with the in- 
quiry, had he any news? On their familiar faces Prince Andrey read alarm 
and uneasiness. That expression was particularly noticeable in Nesvitsky's 
face, usually so full of laughter. 

'Where is the commander-in-chief?' asked Bolkonsky. 

'Here in this house,' answered the adjutant. 

'Well, is it true, about the peace and capitulation?' asked Nesvitsky. 

'I ask you. I know nothing except that I have had great difficulty in 
getting through to you.' 

Kutuzov himself was in the inner room of the hut with the Austrian 
general. 

Prince Andrey went towards the door from which the sound of voices 
came. But at the moment when he was going to open the door, the voices 
in the room paused, the door opened of itself, and Kutuzov with his eagle 
nose and podgy face appeared in the doorway. He looked straight into 
his adjutant's face and did not recognise him. 



88 WAR AND PEACE 

'I have the honour to report myself,' Prince Andrey said, rather loudly. 
'Ah, from Vienna? Very good!' Kutuzov went out towards his carriage. 
'Get in with me,' he said to Bolkonsky. 
'Your Most High Excellency, I should like to be of use — ' 
'Get in,' said Kutuzov, 'I have need of good officers.' 
Kutuzov had, on the ist of November, received from one of his spies 
information that showed the army he commanded to be in an almost 
hopeless position. The spy reported that the French, after crossing the 
bridge at Vienna, were moving in immense force on Kutuzov's line of 
communications with the reinforcements marching from Russia. If Kutuzov 
were to remain at Krems, Napoleon's army of a hundred and fifty thousand 
men would cut him off from all communications, and would surround his 
exhausted army of forty thousand. 

Before four o'clock in the afternoon Prince Andrey reached Grunte, and 
joined Bagration. In Bagration's detachment, they knew nothing of the 
progress of events. They talked about peace, but did not believe in its 
possibility. They talked of a battle, but did not believe in a battle's being 
close at hand either. 

Knowing Bolkonsky to be a favourite and trusted adjutant, Bagration 
received him with a commanding officer's special graciousness and con- 
descension. He informed him that there would probably be an engage- 
ment that day or the next day. 

'To-day, though, there will most likely be no action,' said Bagration, 
as though to reassure Prince Andrey. 

'If this is one of the common run of little staff dandies, sent here 
to win a cross, he can do that in the rear-guard, but if he wants to be 
with me, let him . . . he'll be of use, if he's a brave officer,' thought 
Bagration. 

Prince Andrey, without replying, asked the prince's permission to ride 
round the position and find out the disposition of the forces, so that, in 
case of a message, he might know where to take it. An officer on duty, a 
handsome and elegantly dressed man, with a ring on his forefinger, who 
spoke French badly but with assurance, was summoned to conduct Prince 
Andrey. 

On all sides they saw officers drenched through, with dejected faces, 
apparently looking for something, and soldiers dragging doors, benches, 
and fences from the village. 

'Here we can't put a stop to these people,' said the staff-officer. 'And look 
here,' he pointed to a canteen-keeper's booth, 'they gather here, and here 
they sit. I drove them all out this morning, and look, it's full again. I must 
go and scare them, prince. One moment.' 

'Let us go together, and I'll get some bread and cheese there,' said 
Prince Andrey, who had not yet had time for a meal. 

They got off their horses and went into the canteen-keeper's booth. 



WAR AND PEACE 89 

Several officers, with flushed and exhausted faces, were sitting at the tables, 
eating and drinking. 

'Now what does this mean, gentlemen?' said the staff-officer, in the 
reproachful tone of a man who has repeated the same thing several times. 
'You mustn't absent yourselves like this. The prince gave orders that 
no one was to leave his post. Come, really, captain,' he remonstrated with 
a muddy, thin little artillery officer, who in his stockings (he had given 
his boots to the canteen-keeper to dry) stood up at their entrance, smiling 
not quite naturally. 

'Now aren't you ashamed, Captain Tushin?' pursued the staff-officer. 
'I should have thought you as an artillery officer ought to set an example, 
and you have no boots on. They'll sound the alarm, and you'll be in a 
pretty position without your boots on.' 

'The soldiers say it's easier barefoot,' said Captain Tushin, smiling 
shyly, evidently anxious to carry off his awkward position in a jesting 
tone. But before he had uttered the words, he felt that his joke would 
not do and had not come off. He was in confusion. 

Prince Andrey glanced once more at the little figure of the artillery 
officer. There was something peculiar about it, utterly unsoldierly, rather 
comic, but very attractive. 

The staff-officer and Prince Andrey got on their horses and rode on. 

Riding out beyond the village, continually meeting or overtaking soldiers 
and officers of various ranks, they saw on the left earthworks being 
thrown up, still red with the freshly dug clay. Several battalions of soldiers, 
in their shirt-sleeves, in spite of the cold wind were toiling like white 
ants at these entrenchments; from the trench they saw spadefuls of red 
clay continually being thrown out by unseen hands. They rode up to the 
entrenchment, examined it, and were riding on further. Close behind the 
entrenchment they came upon dozens of soldiers continually running 
to and from the earthworks, and they had to hold their noses and put 
their horses to a gallop to get by the pestilential atmosphere of this im- 
provised sewer. 

They rode up the opposite hill. From that hill they had a view of the 
French. 

'You see here is where our battery stands,' said the staff-officer, pointing 
to the highest point, 'commanded by that queer fellow sitting without 
his boots; from there you can see everything.' 

The staff-officer left him, and Prince Andrey rode on alone. 

At Grunte a certain alarm and vague dread could be felt. But the 
nearer Prince Andrey got to the French line, the more self-confident was 
the appearance of our troops. The soldiers, in their greatcoats, stood 
ranged in lines with their sergeant, and the captain was calling over the 
men, poking the last soldier in the line in the ribs T and telling him to hold 
up his hand. Soldiers were dotted all over the plain, dragging logs and 
brushwood, and constructing shanties, chatting together, and laughing 



90 WAR AND PEACE 

good-humouredly. They were sitting round the fires, dressed and stripped, 
drying shirts and foot-gear. Or they thronged round the porridge-pots 
and cauldrons, brushing their boots and their coats. In one company 
dinner was ready, and the soldiers, with greedy faces, watched the steaming 
pots, and waited for the sample, which was being taken in a wooden bowl 
to the commissariat officer, sitting on a piece of wood facing his shanty. 

After making a circuit round the whole line of the army, from the right 
flank to the left, Prince Andrey rode up to that battery from which the 
staff-officer told him that the whole field could be seen. Here he dis- 
mounted and stood by the end one of the four cannons, which had been 
taken off their platforms. Behind the cannons stood their platforms, and 
still further behind, the picket-ropes and camp-fires of the artillerymen. 
To the left, not far from the end cannon, was a little newly rigged-up 
shanty, from which came the sounds of officers' voices in eager conversa- 
tion. Suddenly a voice from the shanty impressed him by a tone of such 
earnestness that he could not help listening. 

'No, my dear fellow/ said a pleasant voice that seemed somehow 
familiar, 'I say that if one could know what will happen after death, then 
not one of us would be afraid of death. That's so, my dear fellow.' 

Another younger voice interrupted: 'But afraid or not afraid, there's no 
escaping it.' 

'Why, you're always in fear! Fie on you learned fellows,' said a third, 
a manly voice, interrupting both. 'To be sure, you artillerymen are clever 
fellows, because you can carry everything with you to eat and to drink.' 

And the owner of the manly voice, apparently an infantry officer, 
laughed. 

'Still one is in fear,' pursued the first voice, the one Prince Andrey knew. 
'One's afraid of the unknown, that's what it is. It's all very well to say the 
soul goes to heaven . . . but this we do know, that there is no heaven, but 
only atmosphere.' 

Again the manly voice interrupted. 

'Come, give us a drop of your herb-brandy, Tushin,' it said. 

'Oh, it's the captain, who had his boots off in the booth,' thought Prince 
Andrey, recognising with pleasure the agreeable philosophising voice. 

'Herb-brandy by all means,' said Tushin; 'but still to conceive of a future 
life . . .' He did not finish his sentence. 

At that moment there was a whiz heard in the air: nearer, nearer, faster 
and more distinctly, and faster it came; and the cannon-ball, as though not 
uttering all it had to say, thudded into the earth not far from the shanty, 
tearing up the soil with superhuman force. The earth seemed to moan at 
the terrible blow. At the same instant there dashed out of the shanty, 
before any of the rest, little Tushin with his short pipe in his mouth; his 
shrewd, good-humoured face was rather pale. After him emerged the 
owner of the manly voice, a stalwart infantry officer, who ran off to his 
company, buttoning his coat as he ran. 

Prince Andrey mounted his horse but lingered at the battery, looking at 



WAR AND PEACE 91 

the smoke of the cannon from which the ball had flown. His eyes moved 
rapidly over the wide plain. He only saw that the previously inmobile 
masses of the French were heaving to and fro, and that it really was a 
battery on the left. The smoke still clung about it. Two Frenchmen on 
horseback, doubtless adjutants, were galloping on the hill. A small column 
of the enemy, distinctly visible, were moving downhill, probably to 
strengthen the line. The smoke of the first shot had not cleared away, when 
there was a fresh puff of smoke and another shot. 

'It has begun! Here it comes!' thought Prince Andrey, feeling the blood 
rush to his heart. 'But where? What form is my Toulon to take?' he 
wondered. 

Passing between the companies that had been eating porridge and drink- 
ing vodka a quarter of an hour before, he saw everywhere nothing but the 
same rapid movements of soldiers forming in ranks and getting their guns, 
and on every face he saw the same eagerness that he felt in his heart. 'It 
has begun! Here it comes! Terrible and delightful!' said the face of every 
private and officer. Before he reached the earthworks that were being 
thrown up, he saw in the evening light of the dull autumn day men on 
horseback crossing towards him. The foremost, wearing a cloak and an 
Astrachan cap, was riding on a white horse. It was Prince Bagration. 
Prince Andrey stopped and waited for him to come up. 

He asked in words: 'Whose company?' but what he was really asking 
was, 'You're not in a panic here?' And the artilleryman understood that. 

'Captain Tushin's, your excellency,' the red-haired, freckled artillery- 
man sang out in a cheerful voice, as he ducked forward. 

'To be sure, to be sure,' said Bagration, pondering something, and he 
rode by the platforms up to the end cannon. Just as he reached it, a shot 
boomed from the cannon, deafening him and his suite. A small man with 
stooping shoulders, the officer Tushin, dashed forward, not noticing the 
general, and shading his eyes with his little hand. 

'Another two points higher, and it will be just right,' he shouted in a 
shrill voice, to which he tried to give a swaggering note utterly out of 
keeping with his figure. 

Bagration called to the officer, and Tushin went up to the general, 
putting three fingers to the peak of his cap with a timid and awkward 
gesture, more like a priest blessing some one than a soldier saluting. 

No one had given Tushin instruction at what of with what to fire, and 
after consulting his sergeant, for whom he had a great respect, he had 
decided that it would be a good thing to set fire to the village. 'Very good!' 
Bagration said, on the officer's submitting that he had done 90. 

Just as he was leaving the battery, shots had been heard in the wood 
on the left too; and as the right flank would probably not long be able CO 
detain the enemy, Tushin, and the battalion that was to have defended hi* 
battery, was forgotten. 

Prince Andrey listened carefully to Prince Bagrations colloquies w uh the 
commanding officers, and noticed, to his astonishment, that no orders w ere 



92 WAR AND PEACE 

really given by him at all, but that Prince Bagration confined himself to 
trying to appear as though everything that was being done of necessity, by 
chance, or at the will of individual officers, was all done in accordance with 
his intentions. Prince Andrey observed, however, that, thanks to the tact 
shown by Prince Bagration, his presence was of the greatest value. Com- 
manding officers, who rode up to Bagration looking distraught, regained 
their composure; soldiers and officers greeted him cheerfully, recovered 
their spirits in his presence, and were unmistakably anxious to display 
their pluck before him. 

After riding up to the highest point of our right flank, Prince Bagration 
began to go downhill, where a continuous roll of musketry was heard 
and nothing could be seen for the smoke. The nearer they got to the hollow 
the less they could see, and the more distinctly could be felt the nearness 
of the actual battlefield. They began to meet wounded men. Two soldiers 
were dragging one along, supporting him on each side. His head was 
covered with blood; he had no cap, and was coughing and spitting. The 
bullet had apparently entered his mouth or throat. Another one came 
towards him, walking pluckily along without his gun, groaning aloud and 
wringing his hands from the pain of a wound from which the blood was 
flowing, as though from a bottle, over his greatcoat. His face looked more 
frightened than in pain. He had been wounded only a moment before. 
Crossing the road, they began going down a deep descent, and on the 
slope they saw several men lying on the ground. They were met by a 
crowd of soldiers, among them some who were not wounded. The soldiers 
were hurrying up the hill, gasping for breath, and in spite of the general's 
presence, they were talking loudly together and gesticulating with their 
arms. The whole air was reeking with smoke. The pleasant hum and whiz 
of the bullets was repeated pretty rapidly. 

A thin, weak-looking colonel, apparently an old man, with an amiable 
smile, and eyelids that half-covered his old-looking eyes and gave him 
a mild air, rode up to Prince Bagration and received him as though he 
were welcoming an honoured guest into his house. He announced to Prince 
Bagration that his regiment had had to face a cavalry attack of the French, 
that though the attack had been repulsed, the regiment had lost more than 
half of its men. The colonel said that the attack had been repulsed, sup- 
posing that to be the proper military term for what had happened; but 
he did not really know himself what had been taking place during that 
half hour in the troops under his command, and could not have said 
with any certainty whether the attack had been repelled or his regiment 
had been beaten by the attack. All he knew was that at the beginning of 
the action balls and grenades had begun flying all about his regiment, and 
killing men, that then some one had shouted 'cavalry,' and our men had 
begun firing. And they were firing still, though not now at the cavalry, 
who had disappeared, but at the French infantry. 

The colonel addressed a protest to Prince Bagration, urging him to go 
back, as there it was too dangerous for him. 'I beg of you, your excellency, 



WAR AND PEACE 93 

for God's sake!' he kept on saying. 'Only look, your excellency!' He called 
his attention to the bullets which were continually whizzing, singing, and 
hissing about them. He spoke in the tone of protest and entreaty with 
which a carpenter speaks to a gentleman who has picked up a hatchet. 
'We are used to it, but you may blister your fingers.' He talked as though 
these bullets could not kill him. Just as he was speaking the cloud of smoke 
covering the hollow was lifted as by an unseen hand and blown by the 
rising wind from right to left, and the opposite hill came into sight with 
the French moving across it. 

'How well they're marching,' said some one in Bagration's suite. 

The French were near. Already Prince Andrey, walking beside Bagra- 
tion, could distinguish clearly the sashes, the red epaulettes, even the faces 
of the French. (He saw distinctly one bandy-legged old French officer, 
wearing Hessian boots, who was getting up the hill with difficulty, taking 
hold of the bushes.) Suddenly there was the snap of a shot among the 
French, another and a third . . . and smoke rose and firing rang out in 
all the broken-up ranks of the enemy. 

The attack of the Sixth Chasseurs covered the retreat of the right flank. 
In the centre Tushin's forgotten battery had succeeded in setting fire to 
Schongraben and delaying the advance of the French. The French stayed 
to put out the fire, which was fanned by the wind, and this gave time for 
the Russians to retreat. 

The command of the left flank belonged by right of seniority to the 
general of the regiment in which Dolohov was serving— the regiment 
which Kutuzov had inspected before Braunau. But the command of the 
extreme left flank had been entrusted to the colonel of the Pavlograd 
hussars, in which Rostov was serving. Hence arose a misunderstanding. 
Both commanding officers were intensely exasperated with one another, 
and at a time when fighting had been going on a long while on the right 
flank, and the French had already begun their advance on the left, these 
two officers were engaged in negotiations, the sole aim of which was the 
mortification of one another. The regiments— cavalry and infantry alike 
— were by no means in readiness for the engagement. No one from the 
common soldier to the general expected a battle; and they were all calmly 
engaged in peaceful occupations— feeding their horses in the cavalry, 
gathering wood in the infantry. 

'He is my senior in rank, however,' said the German colonel of the hussars, 
growing very red and addressing the adjutant, who had ridden up. 'So let 
him do as he likes. I can't sacrifice my hussars. Bugler! Sound the retreat!' 

But things were becoming urgent. The fire of cannon and musketry 
thundered in unison on the right and in the centre. The infantry general 
walked up to his horse with his quivering strut, and mounting it and draw- 
ing himself up very erect and tall, he rode up to the Pavlograd colonel. 
The two officers met with affable bows and concealed fury in their hearts. 

'Again, colonel,' the general said, 'I cannot leave half mv men in the 



94 WAR AND PEACE 

wood. I beg you, I beg you,' he repeated, 'to occupy the position, and pre- 
pare for an attack.' 

'And I beg you not to meddle in what's not your business,' answered 
the colonel, getting hot. 'If you were a cavalry officer . . .' 

'I am not a cavalry officer, colonel, but I am a Russian general, and if 
you are unaware of the fact . . .' 

'I am fully aware of it, your excellency,' the colonel screamed suddenly, 
setting his horse in motion and becoming purple in the face. 'If you care 
to come to the front, you will see that this position cannot be held. I don't 
want to massacre my regiment for your satisfaction.' 

'You forget yourself, colonel. I am not considering my own satisfaction, 
and I do not allow such a thing to be said.' 

Taking the colonel's proposition as a challenge to his courage, the gen- 
eral squared his chest and rode scowling beside him to the front line, as 
though their whole difference would inevitably be settled there under the 
enemy's fire. The general and the colonel glared sternly and significantly 
at one another, like two cocks preparing for a fight, seeking in vain for a 
symptom of cowardice. Both stood the test without flinching. They might 
have remained a long while standing there, mutually testing each other's 
pluck, if there had not at that moment been heard in the copse, almost 
behind them, the snap of musketry and a confused shout of voices. The 
French were attacking the soldiers gathering wood in the copse. The 
hussars could not now retreat, nor could the infantry. They were cut off 
from falling back on the left by the French line. Now, unfavourable as 
the ground was, they must attack to fight a way through for themselves. 

The hussars of the squadron in which Rostov was an ensign had hardly 
time to mount their horses when they were confronted by the enemy. 

The colonel rode up to the front, made some angry reply to the questions 
of the officers, and, like a man desperately insisting on his rights, gave 
some command. No one said anything distinctly, but through the whole 
squadron there ran a vague rumour of attack. The command to form in 
order rang out, then there was the clank of sabres being drawn out of 
their sheaths. But still no one moved. The troops of the left flank, both the 
infantry and the hussars, felt that their commanders themselves did not 
know what to do, and the uncertainty of the commanders infected the 
soldiers. 

'Make haste, if only they'd make haste,' thought Rostov, feeling that 
at last the moment had come to taste the joys of the attack. 

'With God's help, forward, quick, gallop!' rang out the word of com- 
mand. Rostov felt the joy of the gallop coming, and was more and more 
lighthearted. 'Now, let him come on, whoever it may be,' thought Rostov, 
driving the spurs, and outstripping the rest. 

Suddenly something swept over the squadron like a broad broom. 
Rostov lifted his sabre, making ready to deal a blow, but felt as though 
he were in a dream being carried forward with supernatural swiftness and 
yet remaining at the same spot. 



WAR AND PEACE 95 

'What's the matter? I'm not moving? I've fallen, I'm killed . . .' Rostov 
asked and answered himself all in one instant. He was alone in the middle 
of the field. Instead of the moving horses and the hussars' backs, he saw 
around him the motionless earth and stubblefield. There was warm blood 
under him. 

'No, I'm wounded, and my horse is killed.' Rook tried to get up on his 
forelegs, but he sank again, crushing his rider's leg under his leg. Blood 
was flowing from the horse's head. The horse struggled, but could not 
get up. Rostov tried to get up, and fell down too. Where were our men, 
where were the French, he did not know. All around him there was no one. 

Getting his leg free, he stood up. 'Hasn't something gone wrong with 
me? Do such things happen, and what ought one to do in such cases?' he 
wondered. But at that instant he felt as though something superfluous were 
hanging on his benumbed left arm. The wrist seemed not to belong to it. 
He looked at his hand, carefully searching for blood on it. 'Come, here 
are some men,' he thought joyfully, seeing some men running towards him. 
'They will help me!' In front of these men ran a single figure in a strange 
shako and a blue coat, with a swarthy sunburnt face and a hooked nose. 
Then came two men, and many more were running up behind. One of 
them said some strange words, not Russian. Between some similar figures 
in similar shakoes behind stood a Russian hussar. He was being held by 
the arms; behind him they were holding his horse too. 

'It must be one of ours taken prisoner. . . . Yes. Surely they couldn't 
take me too? What sort of men are they?' Rostov was still wondering, 
unable to believe his own eyes. 'Can they be the French?' 

He gazed at the approaching French, and although only a few seconds 
before he had been longing to get at these Frenchmen and to cut them 
down, their being so near seemed to him now so awful that he could not 
believe his eyes. 'Who are they? What are they running for? Can it be to 
me? Can they be running to me? And what for? To kill me? Me, whom 
every one's so fond of?' He recalled his mother's love, the love of his 
family and his friends, and the enemy's intention of killing him seemed 
impossible. 'But they may even kill me.' 

For more than ten seconds he stood, not moving from the spot, nor 
grasping his position. The foremost Frenchman with the hook nose was 
getting so near that he could see the expression of his face. Rostov snatched 
up his pistol, and instead of firing with it, flung it at the Frenchman and 
ran to the bushes with all his might. Not with the feeling of doubt and 
conflict with which he had moved at the Enns bridge, did lie now run, 
but with the feeling of a hare fleeing from the dogs. One unmixed feeling 
of fear for his young, happy life took possession of his whole being. Leap- 
ing rapidly over the hedges with the same impetuosity with which he used 
to run when he played games, he flew over the field, now and then turning 
his pale, good-natured, youthful face, and a chill of horror ran down 
his spine. 'No, better not to look,' he thought, but as he got near to the 
bushes he looked round once more. The French had given it up. Rostov 



96 WAR AND PEACE 

stopped. 'There's some mistake/ he thought; 'it can't be that they meant 
to kill me.' And meanwhile his left arm was as heavy as if a hundred- 
pound weight were hanging on it. He could run no further. The French- 
man stopped too and took aim. Rostov frowned and ducked. One bullet 
and then another flew hissing by him; he took his left hand in his right, 
and with a last effort ran as far as the bushes. In the bushes there were 
Russian sharpshooters. 

The infantry, who had been caught unawares in the copse, had run away, 
and the different companies all confused together had retreated in dis- 
orderly crowds. One soldier in a panic had uttered those words— terrible 
in war and meaningless: 'Cut off!' and those words had infected the whole 
mass with panic. 

'Outflanked! Cut off! Lost!' they shouted as they ran. 

When their general heard the firing and the shouts in the rear he had 
grasped at the instant that something awful was happening to his regi- 
ment; and the thought that he, an exemplary officer, might be held re- 
sponsible so affected him that, instantly oblivious even of danger and of 
the instinct of self-preservation, he galloped off to the regiment under a 
perfect hail of bullets. He was possessed by the one desire to correct the 
mistake whatever it might be, so that after twenty-two years of exemplary 
service, without incurring a reprimand for anything, he might avoid being 
responsible for this blunder. 

Galloping successfully between the French forces, he reached the field 
behind the copse across which our men were running downhill. The moral 
balance which decides the fate of battle was unmistakably falling on the 
side of panic. All seemed lost; but at that moment the French, who had 
been advancing, suddenly, for no* apparent reason, ran back. Russian sharp- 
shooters appeared in the copse. 

Dolohov killed one French soldier at close quarters, and was the first to 
seize by the collar an officer who surrendered. The fleeing Russians came 
back; the battalions were brought together; and the French, who had 
been on the point of splitting the forces of the left flank into two parts, 
were for the moment held in check. The reserves had time to join the main 
forces, and the runaways were stopped. 

'Your excellency, here are two trophies,' said Dolohov, pointing to the 
French sword and cartridge case. 'An officer w r as taken prisoner by me. 
I stopped the companv.' Dolohov breathed hard from weariness; he 
spoke in jerks. 'The whole company can bear me witness. I beg you to re- 
member me, your excellency!' 

Tushin's battery had been forgotten, and the force which had been 
stationed near Tushin's cannons to protect them had by somebody's orders 
retreated in the middle of the battle. But the battery still kept up its fire, 
and was not taken by the French simply because the enemy could not 
conceive of the reckless daring of firing from four cannons that were quite 
unprotected. The four cannons were turned facing the ten of the enemy's 
battery. The other officer, Tushin's comrade, was killed at the beginning 



WAR AND PEACE 97 

of the action, and after an hour's time, of the forty gunners of the battery, 
seventeen were disabled, but they were still as merry and as eager as ever. 

The little man with his weak, clumsy movements kept running out in 
front and looking from under his little hand at the French. 

'Smash away, lads!' he was continually saying, and he clutched at the 
cannon wheels himself and unscrewed the screws. In the smoke, deafened 
by the incessant booming of the cannons that made him shudder every 
time one was fired, Tushin ran from one cannon to the other, his short 
pipe never out of his mouth. At one moment he was taking aim, then 
reckoning the charges, then arranging for the changing and unharnessing 
of the killed and wounded horses, and all the time shouting in his weak, 
shrill, hesitating voice. His face grew more and more eager. Only when 
men were killed and wounded he knitted his brows, and turning away 
from the dead man, shouted angrily to the men, slow, as they always are, 
to pick up a wounded man or a dead body. The soldiers, for the most part 
fine, handsome fellows a couple of heads taller than their officer and 
twice as broad in the chest, all looked to their commanding officer like 
children in a difficult position, and the expression they found on his face 
was invariably reflected at once on their own. 

Owing to the fearful uproar and noise and the necessity of attention 
and activity, Tushin experienced not the slightest unpleasant sensation 
of fear; and the idea that he might be killed or badly wounded never 
entered his head. On the contrary, he felt more and more lively. It seemed 
to him that the moment in which he had first seen the enemy and had 
fired the first shot was long, long ago, yesterday perhaps, and that the 
spot of earth on which he stood was a place long familiar to him, in which 
he was quite at home. Although he thought of everything, considered 
everything, did everything the very best officer could have done in his 
position, he was in a state of mind akin to the delirium of fever or the 
intoxication of a drunken man. 

The deafening sound of his own guns on all sides, the hiss and thud 
of the enemy's shells, the sight of the perspiring, flushed gunners hurrying 
about the cannons, the sight of the blood of men and horses, and or the 
puffs of smoke from the enemy on the opposite side (always followed 
by a cannon ball that flew across and hit the earth, a man, a horse, or a 
cannon)— all these images made up for him a fantastic world of his own, 
in which he found enjoyment at the moment. Tho enemy's cannons in Ins 
fancy were not cannons, but pipes from which an invisible smoker blew 
puffs of smoke at intervals. 

'There he's puffing away again,' Tushin murmured to himself as I 
cloud of smoke rolled downhill, and was moving back from the cannon, 
when a strange, unfamiliar voice called over his head. 'Captain 1 ushin! 
Captain!' 

Tushin looked round in dismay. It was the same staff-officer who had 
turned him out of the booth at Grunte. He was shouting to him in a 
breathless voice: 



98 WAR AND PEACE 

'I say, are you mad? You've been commanded twice to retreat, and 
you . . .' 

'Now, what are they pitching into me for?' . . . Tushin wondered, 
looking in alarm at the superior officer. 

'I . . . don't . . .' he began, putting two fingers to the peak of his 
cap. 'I . . .' 

But the staff-officer did not say all he had meant to. A cannon ball 
flying near him made him duck down on his horse. He paused, and was 
just going to say something more, when another ball stopped him. He 
turned his horse's head and galloped away. 

'Retreat! All to retreat!' he shouted from a distance. 

The soldiers laughed. A minute later an adjutant arrived with the same 
message. This was Prince Andrey. The first thing he saw, on reaching the 
place where Tushin's cannons were stationed, was an unharnessed horse 
with a broken leg, which was neighing beside the harnessed horses. The 
blood w T as flowing in a perfect stream from its leg. Among the platforms 
lay several dead men. One cannon ball after another flew over him as 
he rode up, and he felt a nervous shudder running down his spine. But 
the very idea that he was afraid was enough to rouse him again. 'I can't 
be frightened,' he thought, and he deliberately dismounted from his horse 
between the cannons. He gave his message, but he did not leave the 
battery. He decided to stay and assist in removing the cannons from 
the position and getting them away. Stepping over the corpses, under the 
fearful fire from the French, he helped Tushin in getting the cannons 
ready. 

'The officer that came just now ran off quicker than he came,' said a 
gunner to Prince Andrey, 'not like your honour.' 

Prince Andrey had no conversation with Tushin. They w T ere both so 
busy that they hardly seemed to see each other. 

Darkness had come, and the glow of conflagrations showed all the more 
distinctly in two places. As soon as Tushin with his cannons, continually 
driving round the wounded and coming upon them, had got out of fire and 
were descending the ravine, he was met by the staff, among whom was the 
staff-officer. They all vied with one another in giving him orders, telling 
him how and where to go, finding fault and making criticisms. Tushin 
gave no orders, afraid to speak because at every word he felt, he could not 
have said why, ready to burst into tears. 

Though orders were given to abandon the wounded, many of them 
dragged themselves after the troops and begged for a seat on the cannons. 
The jaunty infantry-officer— the one who had run out of Tushin's shanty 
just before the battle— was laid on with a bullet in his stomach. At the 
bottom of the hill a pale ensign of hussars, holding one arm in the other 
hand, came up to Tushin and begged for a seat. 

'Captain, for God's sake, I've hurt my arm,' he said timidly. 'For God's 
sake. I can't walk. For God's sake!' 

'Let him get on, let him get on,' said Tushin. 'Put a coat under him, 



WAR AND PEACE 99 

you, uncle.' He turned to his favourite soldier. 'But where's the wounded 
officer?' 

'We took him off; he was dead,' answered some one. 

The ensign was Rostov. He was holding one hand in the other. He was 
pale, and his lower jaw was trembling as though in a fever. They put him 
on the cannon from which they had just removed the dead officer. There 
was blood on the coat that was laid under him, and Rostov's ridine- 
breeches and arm were smeared with it. 

'What, are you wounded?' said Tushin. 

'No; it's a sprain.' 

'How is it there's blood on the frame?' 

'That was the officer, your honour, stained it,' answered an artillery- 
man, wiping the blood off with the sleeve of his coat, and as it were 
apologising for the dirty state of the cannon. 

With difficulty, aided by the infantry, they dragged the cannon uphill, 
All of a sudden there came the sound of firing and shouts again close by 
on the right side. The flash of the shots could be seen in the darkness. Thii 
was the last attack of the French. It was met by the soldiers in ambush in 
the houses of the village. All rushed out of the village again, but Tushin's 
cannons could not move, and the artillerymen, Tushin, and the ensign 
looked at one another in anticipation of their fate. The firing on both sides 
began to subside, and some soldiers in lively conversation streamed out of 
a side street. 

'Not hurt, Petrov?' inquired one. 

'We gave it them hot, lads. They won't meddle with us now,' another 
was saying. 

'One couldn't see a thing. Didn't they give it to their own men! No 
seeing for the darkness, mates. Isn't there something to drink?' 

The French had been repulsed for the last time. And again, in the 
complete darkness, Tushin's cannons moved forward, surrounded by the 
infantry, who kept up a hum of talk. 

In the darkness they flowed on like an unseen, gloomy river always in 
the same direction, with a buzz of whisper and talk and the thud of hoofs 
and rumble of wheels. Above all other sounds, in the confused uproar, 
rose the moans and cries of the wounded, more distinct than anything 
in the darkness of the night. Their moans seemed to fill all the darkness 
surrounding the troops. Their moans and the darkness seemed to melt 
into one. A little later a thrill of emotion passed over the moving crowd. 
Some one followed by a suite had ridden by on a white horse, and had 
said something as he passed. 

'What did he say? Where we are going now? To halt, eh? Thanked us, 
what?' eager questions were heard on all sides, and the whole moving 
mass began to press back on itself (the foremost, it seemed, had halted), 
and a rumour passed through that the order had been given to halt. All 
halted in the muddy road, just where they were. 

Fires were lighted and the talk became more audible. Captain Tushin, 



100 WAR AND PEACE 

after giving instructions to his battery, sent some of his soldiers to look 
for an ambulance or a doctor for the ensign, and sat down by the fire his 
soldiers had lighted by the roadside. 

Rostov too dragged himself to the fire. His whole body was trembling 
with fever from the pain, the cold, and the damp. He was dreadfully 
sleepy, but he could not go to sleep for the agonising pain in his arm, which 
ached and would not be easy in any position. He closed his eyes, then 
opened them to stare at the fire, which seemed to him dazzling red, and 
then at the stooping, feeble figure of Tushin, squatting in Turkish fashion 
near him. The big, kindly, and shrewd eyes of Tushin were fixed upon 
him with sympathy and commiseration. He saw that Tushin wished with 
all his soul to help him, but could do nothing for him. 

Next four soldiers passed by, carrying something heavy in an overcoat. 

'He's dead; why carry him?' said one of them. 

'Come on, you!' And they vanished into the darkness with their burden. 

'Does it ache, eh?' Tushin asked Rostov in a whisper. 

'Yes, it does ache.' 

'Your honour's sent for to the general. Here in a cottage he is,' said a 
gunner, coming up to Tushin. 

In a cottage not far from the artillerymen's fire, Prince Bagration was 
sitting at dinner, talking with several commanding officers. The little old 
colonel with the half -shut eyes was there, greedily gnawing on a mutton- 
bone, and the general of twenty-two years' irreproachable service, flushed 
with a glass of vodka and his dinner, and the staff-officer with the ring, and 
Prince Andrey. Id the corner of the cottage room stood a French flag, 
that had been captured. 

The general submitted to the prince that as soon as the engagement 
began, he had fallen back from the copse, mustered the men who were 
cutting wood, made a bayonet charge with two battalions and repulsed 
the French. 

'As soon as I saw, your excellency, that the first battalion was thrown 
into confusion, I stood in the road and thought, "I'll let them get through 
and then open fire on them"; and that's what I did.' 

The general had so longed to do this, he had so regretted not having 
succeeded in doing it, that it seemed to him now that this was just what 
had happened. Indeed might it not actually have been so? Who could 
make out in such confusion what did and what did not happen? 

'And by the way I ought to note, your excellency,' he continued, re- 
calling Dolohov's conversation with Kutuzov and his own late interview 
with the degraded officer, 'that the private Dolohov, degraded to the 
ranks, took a French officer prisoner before my eyes and particularly 
distinguished himself.' 

Prince Bagration turned to the old colonel. 

'I thank you all, gentlemen; all branches of the service behaved heroically 
—infantry, cavalry, and artillery. How did two cannons come to be 



WAR AND PEACE 101 

abandoned in the centre?' he inquired, looking about for some one. 'I 
think it was you I sent,' he added, addressing the staff-officer. 

'One had been disabled,' answered the staff-officer, 'but the other, I can't 
explain; I was there all the while myself, giving instructions, and I had 
scarcely left there. ... It was pretty hot, it's true,' he added modestly. 

Some one said that Captain Tushin was close by here in the village, 
and that he had already been sent for. 

'Oh, but you went there,' said Prince Bagration, addressing Prince 
Andrey. 

'To be sure, we rode there almost together,' said the staff-officer, smiling 
affably to Bolkonsky. 

'I had not the pleasure of seeing you,' said Prince Andrey, coldly and 
abruptly. Every one was silent. 

Tushin appeared in the doorway, timidly edging in behind the generals' 
backs. Making his way round the generals in the crowded hut, embar- 
rassed as he always was before his superior officers, Tushin did not see the 
flag-staff and tumbled over it. Several of the officers laughed. 

'How was it a cannon was abandoned?' asked Bagration, frowning, not 
so much at the captain as at the laughing officers. 

Only now in the presence of the angry-looking commander, Tushin con- 
ceived in all its awfulness the crime and disgrace of his being still alive 
when he had lost two cannons. He had been so excited that till that instant 
he had not had time to think of that. The officers' laughter had bewildered 
him still more. He stood before Bagration, his lower jaw quivering, and 
could scarcely articulate: 

'I don't know . . . your excellency ... I hadn't the men, your ex- 
cellency.' 

'You could have got them from the battalions that were covering your 
position!' 

That there were no battalions there was what Tushin did not say, though 
it was the fact. He was afraid of getting another officer into trouble by 
saying that, and without uttering a word he gazed straight into Bagra- 
tion's face, as a confused schoolboy gazes at the face of an examiner. 

The silence was rather a lengthy one. Prince Bagration, though he had 
no wish to be severe, apparently found nothing to say: the others did not 
venture to intervene. 

'Your excellency,' Prince Andrey broke the silence with his abrupt 
voice, 'you sent me to Captain Tushin's battery. I went there and found 
two-thirds of the men and horses killed, two cannons disabled and no 
forces near to defend them.' 

Prince Bagration and Tushin looked now with equal intensity at Bol- 
konsky, as he went on speaking with suppressed emotion. 

'And if your excellency will permit me to express my opinion,' he 
went on, 'we owe the success of the day more to the action of that battel) 
and the heroic steadiness of Captain Tushin and his men than to any- 
thing else,' said Prince Andrey. 



102 WAR AND PEACE 

Prince Bagration looked at Tushin and, apparently loath to express his 
disbelief in Bolkonsky's off-handed judgment, yet unable to put com- 
plete faith in it, he bent his head and said to Tushin that he could go. 
Prince Andrey walked out after him. 

'Thanks, my dear fellow, you got me out of a scrape,' Tushin said 
to him. 

Prince Andrey looked at Tushin, and walked away without uttering a 
word. Prince Andrey felt bitter and melancholy. It was all so strange, so 
unlike what he had been hoping for. 

'Who are they? Why are they here? What do they want? And when 
will it all end?' thought Rostov, looking at the shadowy figures that kept 
flitting before his eyes. The pain in his arm became even more agonising. 
He was heavy with sleep, crimson circles danced before his eyes, and the 
impression of these voices and these faces and the sense of his loneliness 
all blended with the misery of the pain. 

He dozed off for a minute, but in that brief interval he dreamed of 
innumerable things. He saw his mother and her large, white hand; he saw 
Natasha's eyes and her laugh, and Denisov with his voice and his whiskers, 
and all the affair with Telyanin. He was trying to get away from them, but 
they would not let go of his shoulder for a second. It would not ache, it 
would be all right if they wouldn't drag at it; but there was no getting rid 
of them. 

He opened his eyes and looked upwards. The black pall of darkness 
hung only a few feet above the light of the fire. In the light fluttered tiny 
flakes of falling snow. Tushin had not returned, the doctor had not come. 
He was alone, only a soldier was sitting now naked on the other side of 
the fire, warming his thin, yellow body. 

'Nobody cares for me!' thought Rostov. 'No one to help me, no one 
to feel sorry for me. And I too was once at home, and strong, and happy 
and loved,' he sighed, and with the sigh unconsciously he moaned. 

'In pain, eh?' asked the soldier, shaking his shirt out before the fire, 
and without waiting for an answer, he added huskily: 'Ah, what a lot of 
fellows done for to-day— awful!' 

Rostov did not hear the soldier. He gazed at the snowflakes whirling 
over the fire and thought of the Russian winter with his warm, brightly 
lighted home, his cosy fur cloak, his swift sledge, his good health, and all 
the love and tenderness of his family. 'And what did I come here for!' 
he wondered. 



PART III 



Prince vassily used not to think over his plans. Still less did he think of 
doing harm to others for the sake of his own interest. He was simply a 
man who had been successful in the world. He never said to himself, for 
instance: 'That man is now in power, I must secure his friendship and con- 
fidence, and through him obtain a grant from the Single- Assistance Fund'; 
nor, 'Now Pierre is a wealthy man, I must entice him to marry my daughter 
and borrow the forty thousand I need.' But the man in power met him, 
and at the instant his instinct told him that that man might be of use, and 
Prince Vassily made friends with him, and at the first opportunity 7 by 
instinct, without previous consideration, flattered him, became intimate 
with him, and told him of what he wanted. 

Pierre was ready at hand in Moscow, and Prince Vassily secured an 
appointment as gentleman of the bedchamber for him, a position at that 
time reckoned equal in status to that of a councillor of state, and insisted 
on the young man's travelling with him to Petersburg, and staying at his 
house. Without apparent design, but yet with unhesitating conviction that 
it was the right thing, Prince Vassily did everything to ensure Pierre's 
marrying his daughter. 

Pierre, on unexpectedly becoming rich and Count Bczuhov, after his 
lonely and careless manner of life, felt so surrounded, so occupied, that 
he never succeeded in being by himself except in his bed. He was con- 
tinually hearing phrases, such as, 'With your exceptionally kindly dispo- 
sition'; or, 'Considering your excellent heart'; or, 'You are so pure-minded 
yourself, count . . .' or, 'If he were as clever as you,' and so on, so that he 
was beginning genuinely to believe in his own exceptional goodness and 
his own exceptional intelligence, the more so, as at the bottom of his heart 
it had always seemed to him that he really was. very good-natured and 
very intelligent. 

Even people who had before been spiteful and openly hostile to him, 
became tender and affectionate. The hitherto ill-tempered, eldest princess, 
with the long waist and the hair plastered down like a doll, had gone into 
Pierre's room after the funeral. Dropping her eyes .\nd repeatedly turning 
crimson, she said that she very much regretted the misunderstanding that 
had arisen between them, and that now she felt she had no right to ask 
him for anything except permission, after the blow that had befallen her, 
to remain for a few weeks longer in the house which she was so fond of, 

103 



104 WAR AND PEACE 

and in which she had made such sacrifices. She wept at these words. 
Touched, Pierre took her by the hand and begged her pardon, though he 
could not have said what for. From that day the princess began knitting a 
striped scarf for Pierre, and was completely changed towards him. 

'Do this for my sake, my dear boy; she had to put up with a great deal 
from the deceased, any way,' Prince Vassily said to him, giving him some 
deed to sign for the princess's benefit. Prince Vassily reflected that this 
note of hand for thirty thousand was a sop worth throwing to the poor 
princess, that it might not occur to her to gossip about Prince Vassily's 
part in the action taken with the inlaid portfolio. 

'So that's all settled, my dear fellow. Ah, yes, I was almost forgetting," 
Prince Vassily added. 'You know, my dear boy, I had a little account to 
settle with your father, so as I have received something from the Ryazan 
estate, I'll keep that; you don't want it. We'll go into accounts later.' 

What Prince Vassily called 'something from the Ryazan estate' was 
several thousands of roubles paid in lieu of service by the peasants, and 
this sum he kept for himself. 

In Petersburg, Pierre was surrounded by the same atmosphere of affection 
and tenderness as in Moscow. He could not decline the post, or rather 
the title (for he did nothing) that Prince Vassily had obtained for him, 
and acquaintances, invitations, and social duties were so numerous that 
Pierre was even more than in Moscow conscious of the feeling of stupe- 
faction, hurry and continued expectation of some future good which was 
always coming and was never realised. 

Of his old circle of bachelor acquaintances there were not many left in 
Petersburg. The Guards were on active service, Dolohov had been degraded 
to the ranks; Anatole had gone into the army and was somewhere in the 
provinces; Prince Andrey was abroad; and so Pierre had not the opportunity 
of spending his nights in the way he had so loved spending them before, 
nor could he open his heart in intimate talk with the friend who was older 
than himself and a man he respected. All his time was spent at dinners and 
balls, or at Prince Vassily's in the society of the fat princess, his wife, and 
the beauty, his daughter Ellen. 

Like every one else, Anna Pavlovna Scherer showed Pierre the change 
that had taken place in the attitude of society towards him. 

In former days, Pierre had always felt in Anna Pavlovna's presence that 
what he was saying was unsuitable, tactless, not the right thing. Now 
everything he said was always 'delightful.' Even if Anna Pavlovna did 
not say so, he saw she was longing to say so, and only refraining from 
doing so from regard for his modesty. 

At the beginning of the winter, in the year 1805, Pierre received one of 
Anna Pavlovna's customary pink notes of invitation, in which the words 
occurred: 'You will find the fair Helene at my house, whom one never 
gets tired of seeing.' 

On reading that passage, Pierre felt for the first time that there was 
being formed between himself and Ellen some sort of tie, recognised by 



WAR AND PEACE 105 

other people, and this idea at once alarmed him, as though an obligation 
were being laid upon him which he could not fulfil, and pleased him as 
an amusing supposition. 

Anna Pavlovna's evening party was like her first one, only the novel 
attraction which she had provided for her guests was not on this occasion 
Mortemart, but a diplomat, who had just arrived from Berlin. Anna 
Pavlovna had arranged the groups in her drawing-room with her usual 
skill. The larger group, in which were Prince Vassily and some generals, 
had the benefit of the diplomat. Another group gathered about the tea- 
table. Pierre would have liked to join the first group, but Anna Pavlovna, 
who was in the nervous excitement of a general on the battlefield, that 
mental condition in which numbers of brilliant new ideas occur to one 
that one has hardly time to put into execution— Anna Pavlovna, on seeing 
Pierre, detained him with a finger on his coat sleeve: 'Wait, I have designs 
on you for this evening.' 

She looked round at Ellen and smiled at her. 

'My dear Helene, you must show charity to my poor aunt, who has an 
adoration for you. Go and keep her company for ten minutes. And that 
you may not find it too tiresome, here's our dear count, who certainly 
won't refuse to follow you.' 

The beauty moved away towards the old aunt; but Anna Pavlovna 
still detained Pierre at her side, with the air of having still some last and 
essential arrangement to make with him. 

'She is exquisite, isn't she?' she said to Pierre, indicating the majestic 
beauty swimming away from them. 'And how she carries herself! For 
such a young girl, what tact, what a finished perfection of manner. It 
comes from the heart. Happy will be the man who wins her. The most 
unworldly of men would take a brilliant place in society as her husband. 
That's true, isn't it? I only wanted to know your opinion,' and Anna 
Pavlovna let Pierre go. 

Pierre was perfectly sincere in giving an affirmative answer to her 
question about Ellen's perfection of manner. If ever he thought of Ellen, 
it was either of her beauty that he thought, or of her extraordinary 
capacity for serene, dignified silence in society. 

The old aunt coughed, swallowed the phlegm, and said in French that 
she was very glad to see Ellen; then she addressed Pierre with the same 
greeting and the same grimace. In the middle of a halting and tedious 
conversation, Ellen looked round at Pierre and smiled at him with the 
bright, beautiful smile with which she smiled at every one. Pierre was 
so used to this smile, it meant so little to him, that he did not even 
notice it. The aunt was speaking at that moment of a collection of snuff- 
boxes belonging to Pierre's father, Count Bezuhov, and she showed them 
her snuff-box. Princess Ellen asked to look at the portrait of the aunt's 
husband, which was on the snuff-box. 

'It's probably the work of Vines,' said Pierre, mentioning a celebrated 
miniature painter. He bent over the table to take the snuff-box, listening 



106 WAR AND PEACE 

all the while to the conversation going on in the larger group. He got up 
to move towards it, but the aunt handed him the snuff-box, passing it 
across Ellen, behind her back. Ellen bent forward to make room, and 
looked round smiling. She was, as always in the evening, wearing a dress 
cut in the fashion of the day, very low in the neck both in front and 
behind. Her bust, which had always to Pierre looked like marble, was so 
close that he need scarcely have stooped to kiss it. He felt the warmth 
of her body, the fragrance of scent, and heard the creaking of her corset 
as she moved. He saw not her marble beauty making up one whole with 
her gown; he saw and felt all the charm of her body, which was only 
veiled by her clothes. And having once seen this, he could not see it 
otherwise, just as we cannot return to an illusion that has been explained. 

'So you have never noticed till now that I am lovely?' Ellen seemed to 
be saying. 'You haven't noticed that I am a woman? Yes, I am a woman, 
who might belong to any one— to you, too,' her eyes said. And at that 
moment Pierre felt that Ellen not only could, but would become his wife, 
that it must be so. 

He knew it at that moment as surely as he would have known it, 
standing under the wedding crown beside her. How would it be? and 
when? He knew not, knew not even if it would be a good thing (he had a 
feeling, indeed, that for some reason it would not), but he knew it would 
be so. She was terribly close to him. Already she had power over him. 
And between him and her there existed no barriers of any kind, but the 
barrier of his own will. 

After Pierre had gone home, it was a long while before he could get to 
sleep; he kept pondering on what was happening to him. What was 
happening? Nothing. Simply he had grasped the fact that a woman, 
whom he had known as a child, of whom he had said, without giving her 
a thought, 'Yes, she's nice-looking,' when he had been told she was a 
beauty, he had grasped the fact that that woman might belong to him. 

'But she's stupid, I used to say myself that she was stupid,' he thought. 
'There is something nasty in the feeling she excites in me, something 
not legitimate. I have been told that her brother, Anatole, was in love 
with her, and she in love with him, that there was a regular scandal, and 
that's why Anatole was sent away. That's bad,' he mused; and at the very 
moment that he was reflecting thus he caught himself smiling, and 
dreaming of how she would be his wife, how she might love him, how 
she might become quite different, and how all he had thought and heard 
about her might be untrue. He remembered the words and looks of 
Anna Pavlovna, when she had spoken about his house, he recollected 
thousands of such hints from Prince Vassily and other people, and he 
was overwhelmed with terror that he might have bound himself in some 
way to do a thing obviously wrong, and not what he ought to do. But 
at the very time that he was expressing this to himself, in another part 
of his mind her image floated to the surface in all its womanly beauty. 

In November of 1805 Prince Vassily was obliged to go on a tour of 



WAR AND PEACE 107 

inspection through four provinces. He had secured this appointment for 
himself, in order to be able at the same time to visit his estates, which 
were in a neglected state. He intended to pick up his son, Anatole, on the 
way (where his regiment was stationed), and to pay a visit to Prince 
Nikolay Andreivitch Bolkonsky, with a view to marrying his son to the 
rich old man's daughter. But before going away and entering on these 
new affairs, Prince Vassily wanted to settle matters with Pierre, who 
had, it was true, of late spent whole days at home, that is, at Prince 
Vassily's, where he was staying, and was as absurd, as agitated, and as 
stupid in Ellen's presence, as a young man in love should be, but still 
made no offer. 

'This is all very fine, but the thing must come to a conclusion,' Prince 
Vassily said to himself one morning, with a melancholy sigh, recognising 
that Pierre, who was so greatly indebted to him (But there! God bless 
the fellow!), was not behaving quite nicely to him in the matter. 'Youth 
. . . frivolity . . . well, God be with him,' thought Prince Vassily, enjoy- 
ing the sense of his own goodness of heart, 'but the thing must come to a 
conclusion. The day after to-morrow is Ellen's name-day, I'll invite some 
people, and if he doesn't understand what he's to do, then it will be my 
affair to see to it. Yes, my affair. I'm her father.' 

Six weeks after Anna Pavlovna's party, and the sleepless and agitated 
night after it, in which Pierre had made up his mind that a marriage with 
Ellen would be a calamity, and that he must avoid her and go away; six 
weeks after that decision Pierre had still not left Prince Vassily's, and 
felt with horror that every day he was more and more connected with 
her in people's minds, that he could not go back to his former view of 
her, thdt he could not tear himself away from her even, that it would be 
an awful thing, but that he would have to unite his life to hers. Every day 
he said the same thing over and over to himself. 'I must really under- 
stand her and make up my mind what she is. Was I mistaken before, or 
am I mistaken now? No, she's not stupid; no, she's a good girl,' he said to 
himself sometimes. 'She never makes a mistake, nor has said anything 
stupid. She says very little, but what she does say is always simple and 
clear. So she's not stupid. She has never been abashed, and she is not 
abashed now. So she isn't a bad woman.' It often happened that he began 
to make reflections, to think aloud in her company, and every tune she 
had replied either by a brief, but appropriate emark, that showed she 
was not interested in the matter, or by a mute smile and glance, which 
more palpably than anything proved to Pierre her superiority. She was 
right in regarding all reflections as nonsense in comparison with that smile. 

Pierre knew that every one was only waiting for him to say ore word. 
to cross a certain line, and he knew that sooner or later he would cross it. 
But a kind of uncomprchended horror seized upon him at the mere thought 
of this fearful step. A thousand times in the course of those six weeks. 
during which he felt himself being drawn on further and further Coward 
the abyss that horrified him, Pierre had said to himself: 'But what dees n 



108 WAR AND PEACE 

mean? I must act with decision! Can it be that I haven't any?' Pierre 
belonged to that class of persons who are only strong when thev feel 
themselves perfectly pure. And ever since the day when he had been 
overcome by the sensation of desire, that he had felt stooping over the 
snuff-box at Anna Pavlovna's, an unconscious sense of the sinfulness of 
that impulse paralysed his will. 

On Ellen's name-day, Prince Vassily was giving a little supper party of 
just their own people, as his wife said, that is, of friends and relations. All 
these friends and relations were made to feel that the day was to be a 
momentous one in the young lady's life. 

The wax candles burned brightly, there was a glitter of silver and crystal 
on the table, of ladies' ornaments and the gold and silver of epaulettes. 
The servants threaded their wav in and out round the table in their red 
coats. There was a clatter of knives, glasses, and plates, and the sound of 
eager talk from several separate conversations round the table. 

Pierre felt that he w T as the centre of it all, and this position both pleased 
him and embarrassed him. 

'So it is all over!' he thought. 'And how has it all been done? So quickly! 
Now I know that not for her sake, nor for my sake alone, but for every 
one it must inevitably come to pass. They all expect it so, they are all so 
convinced that it will be, that I cannot, I cannot, disappoint them. And 
yet what have I done to bring it about? When did it begin? I came here 
from Moscow with Prince Vassily, then there was nothing. Afterwards 
what reason was there for not staying with him? Then I plaved cards 
with her and picked up her reticule, and went skating with her. When 
did it begin, when did it all come about?' All at once he heard a voice, a 
familiar voice, addressing him for the second time. 

'I'm asking you, when you heard last from Bolkonsky,' Prince Vassily 
repeated a third time. 'How absent-minded you are, my dear boy.' Prince 
Vassily smiled, and Pierre saw that every one, every one was smiling at 
him and at Ellen. 

'When did you get a letter? From Olmiitz?' repeated Prince Vassily. 

'How can people talk and think of such trifles?' thought Pierre. 

'Yes, from Olmiitz,' he answered with a sigh. 

While the guests were taking leave, Pierre was left a long while alone 
with Ellen in the little drawing-room, where they were sitting. Often 
before, during the last six weeks he had been left alone with Ellen, but he 
had never spoken of love to her. Now he felt that this was inevitable, but 
he could not make up his mind to this final step. He felt ashamed; it seemed 
to him that here at Ellen's side he was filling some other man's place. But 
he had to say something, and he began to speak. He asked her whether 
she had enjoyed the evening. With her habitual directness in replying, 
she answered that this name-day had been one of the pleasantest she had 
ever had. 

A few of the nearest relations were still lingering on. They were sitting 
in the big drawing-room. Prince Vassily walked with languid steps towards 



WAR AND PEACE 109 

Pierre. Pierre rose and observed that it was getting late. Prince Vassily 
levelled a look of stern inquiry upon him, as though what he had said was 
so strange that one could not believe one's ears. But the expression of 
severity immediately passed away, and Prince Vassily smiled affectionately. 

'Well, Ellen?' he said. Pierre smiled, but it seemed that Prince Vassily 
was positively disconcerted. The sight of the discomfiture of this elderly 
man of the world touched Pierre; he looked round at Ellen— and she, he 
fancied, was disconcerted too, and her glance seemed to say: 'Well, it's 
your own fault.' 

'I must inevitably cross the barrier, but I can't, I can't,' thought Pierre, 
and he began again speaking of extraneous subjects. 

When Prince Vassily went into the drawing-room, the princess was 
talking in subdued tones with an elderly lady about Pierre. 

'Of course it is a very brilliant match, but happiness, my dear . . .' 

'Marriages are made in heaven,' responded the elderly lady. 

Prince Vassily walked to the furthest corner and sat down on a sofa, 
as though he had not heard the ladies. He closed his eyes and seemed to 
doze. His head began to droop, and he roused himself. 

'Aline,' he said to his wife, 'go and see what they are doing.' 

The princess went up to the door, walked by it with a countenance full 
of meaning and affected nonchalance, and glanced into the little drawing- 
room. Pierre and Ellen were sitting and talking as before. 

'Just the same,' she said in answer to her husband. Prince Vassily frowned, 
twisting his mouth on one side. He shook himself, got up, flung his head 
back, and with resolute steps passed the ladies and crossed over to the 
little drawing-room. He walked quickly, joyfully up to Pierre. The 
prince's face was so extraordinarily solemn that Pierre got up in alarm on 
seeing him. 

Thank God!' he said. 'My wife has told me all about it.' He put one 
arm round Pierre, the other round his daughter. 'My dear boy! Ellen! I 
am very, very glad.' His voice quavered. 'I loved your father . . . and 
she will make you a good wife . . . God's blessing on you! . . .' lie 
embraced his daughter, then Pierre again, and kissed him with his elderly 
lips. Tears were actually moist on his cheeks. 'Aline, come here,' he called. 

The princess went in and wept too. The elderly lady also {Mir her 
handkerchief to her eye. They kissed Pierre, and he several times kissed 
the hand of the lovely Ellen. A little later they were again left alone. 

'All this had to be so and could not have been otherwise,' thought Pierre, 
'so that it's no use to inquire whether it was a good thing or not. It's a 
good thing because it's definite, and there's none of the agonising suspense 
there was before.' Pierre held his betrothed's hand in silence, and gazed 
at the heaving and falling of her lovely bosom. 

'Ellen!' he said aloud, and stopped. There's something special is said op 
these occasions,' he thought; but he could not recollect precisely what it 
was that was said on these occasions. lie glanced into her face. She bent 
forward closer to him. Her face flushed rosy red. 



110 WAR AND PEACE 

'Ah, take off those . . . those . . .' she pointed to his spectacles. 

Pierre took off his spectacles, and there was in his eyes besides the 
strange look people's eyes always have when they remove spectacles, a 
look of dismay and inquiry. He would have bent over her hand and have 
kissed it. But with an almost brutal movement of her head, she caught at 
his lips and pressed them to her own. Pierre was struck by the transformed, 
the unpleasantly confused expression of her face. 

'Now it's too late, it's all over, and besides I love her,' thought Pierre. 

'I love you!' he said, remembering what had to be said on these occasions. 
But the words sounded so poor that he felt ashamed of himself. 

Six weeks later he was married, and the lucky possessor of a lovely wife 
and millions of money, as people said; he took up his abode in the great, 
newly decorated Petersburg mansion of the Counts Bezuhov. 

In December of 1805, the old Prince Nikolay Andreivitch Bolkonsky 
received a letter from Prince Vassily, announcing that he intended to 
visit him with his son. 

'Well, there's no need to bring Marie out, it seems; suitors come to us 
of themselves,' the little princess said heedlessly on hearing of this. Prince 
Nikolay Andreivitch scowled and said nothing. 

Old Bolkonsky had always had a poor opinion of Prince Vassily's 
character, and this opinion had grown stronger of late since Prince Vassily 
had, under the new reigns of Paul and Alexander, advanced to high rank 
and honours. Now from the letter and the little princess's hints, he saw 
what the object of the visit was, and his poor opinion of Prince Vassily 
passed into a feeling of ill-will and contempt in the old prince's heart. 
He snorted indignantly whenever he spoke of him. On the day of Prince 
Vassily's arrival, the old prince was particularly discontented and out of 
humour. 

At nine o'clock, however, the old prince went out for a walk, as usual, 
wearing his short, velvet, fur-lined cloak with a sable collar and a sable 
cap. There had been a fall of snow on the previous evening. The path 
along which Prince Nikolay Andreivitch walked to the conservatory had 
been cleared; there were marks of a broom in the swept snow, and a spade 
had been left sticking in the crisp bank of snow that bordered the path 
on both sides. The prince walked through the conservatories, the servants' 
quarters, and the out-buildings, frowning and silent. 

'Could a sledge drive up?' he asked the respectful steward, who was 
escorting him to the house, with a countenance and manners like his own. 

'The snow is deep, your excellencv. I gave orders for the avenue to be 
swept too. It would have been hard to drive up, your excellency,' added 
the steward. 'So I hear, your excellency, there's a minister coming to visit 
your excellency?' 

The prince turned to the steward and stared with scowling eyes at him. 

'Eh? A minister? What minister? Who gave you orders?' he began in 



WAR AND PEACE 111 

his shrill, cruel voice. 'For the princess my daughter, you do not clear the 
way, but for the minister you do! For me there are no ministers!' 

'Your excellency, I supposed . . .' 

'You supposed,' shouted the prince, articulating with greater and greater 
haste and incoherence. 'You supposed . . . Brigands! blackguards! . . . 
I'll teach you to suppose,' and raising his stick he waved it at Alpatitch, 
and would have hit him, had not the steward instinctively shrunk back 
and escaped the blow. 'You supposed . . . Blackguards! . . .' he still cried 
hurriedly. But although Alpatitch, shocked at his own insolence in dodging 
the blow, went closer to the prince, with his bald head bent humbly before 
him, or perhaps just because of this, the prince did not lift the stick again, 
and still shouting, 'Blackguards! ... fill up the road . . .' he ran to his 
room. 

After dinner he went out into the waiting-room. Alpatitch was standing 
there with downcast head. 

'Filled up the road again?' 

'Yes, your excellency; for God's sake, forgive me, it was simply a 
blunder.' 

The prince cut him short with his unnatural laugh. 

In the evening Prince Vassily arrived. He was met on the way by the 
coachmen and footmen of the Bolkonskys, who with shouts dragged his 
-carriages and sledge to the lodge, over the road, which had been pur- 
posely obstructed with snow again. 

Prince Vassily and Anatole were conducted to apartments. 

Taking off his tunic, Anatole sat with his elbows on the table, on a 
corner of which he fixed his handsome, large eyes with a smiling, uncon- 
cerned stare. All his life he had looked upon as an uninterrupted entertain- 
ment, which some one or other was, he felt, somehow bound to provide 
for him. In just the same spirit he had looked at his visit to the cross old 
gentleman and his rich and hideous daughter. It might all, according to 
his anticipations, turn out very jolly and amusing. 

'Come, joking apart, father, is she so hideous? Eh?' he asked in French, 
as though reverting to a subject more than once discussed on the journey. 

'Nonsense! The great thing for you is to try and be respectful and 
sensible with the old prince.' 

'If he gets nasty, I'm off,' said Anatole. 'I can'r stand those old gentle- 
men. Eh?' 

'Remember that for you everything depends on it.' 

Meanwhile, in the feminine part of the household nor i nly the arrival 
of the minister and his son was already known, bur the appearance oi 
both had been minutely described. Princess Marya was sirring alone in her 
room doing her utmost to control her inner emotion. 

'Why did they write, why did Liza tell me about it? Why, it cannot be!' 
she thought, looking at herself in the glass. 'How am I to go Into die 
drawing-room? Even if I like him, I could never be myself with him 
now.' The mere thought of her father's eyes reduced her to tftcror. 



112 WAR AND PEACE 

'They are come, Marie, do you know?' said the little princess, waddling 
in and sinking heavily into an armchair. She was not wearing the gown in 
which she had been sitting in the morning, but had put on one of her best 
dresses. Her hair had been carefully arranged, and her face was full of an 
eager excitement, which did not, however, conceal its wasted and pallid 
look. In the smart clothes which she had been used to wear in Petersburg 
in society, the loss of her good looks was even more noticeable. Made- 
moiselle Bourienne, too, had put some hardly perceptible finishing touches 
to her costume, which made her fresh, pretty face even more attractive. 

'What, and you are staying just as you are, dear princess. They will 
come in a minute to tell us the gentlemen are in the drawing-room,' she 
began. 'We shall have to go down, and you are doing nothing at all to 
your dress.' 

The little princess rang for the maid, and hurriedly and eagerly began 
to arrange what Princess Marya w T as to wear. 

'No, really, ma, bo?me a?nie, that dress isn't pretty,' said Liza, 'tell her 
to put on you your maroon velvet there. Yes, really! Why, you know, it 
may be the turning-point in your whole life. That one's too light, it's not 
right, no, it's not!' 

It was not the dress that was wrong, but the face and the whole figure 
of the princess, but that was not felt by Mademoiselle Bourienne and the 
little princess. They still fancied that if they were to put a blue ribbon in 
her hair, and do it up high, and to put the blue sash lower on the maroon 
dress and so on, then all would be well. After two or three changes, to 
which Princess Marya submitted passively, when her hair had been done 
on the top of her head (which completely changed and utterly disfigured 
her), and the blue sash and best maroon velvet dress had been put on, the 
little princess w r alked twice round, and with her little hand stroked out a 
fold here and pulled down the sash there, and gazed at her with her head 
first on one side and then on the other. 

'No, it won't do,' she said resolutely, throwing up her hands. 'No, 
Marie, decidedly that does not suit you. I like you better in your little 
grey everyday frock. No, please bring the princess her grey dress.' 
Princess Marya was sitting motionless before the looking-glass, looking at 
her own face, and in the looking-glass she saw that there were tears in her 
eyes and her mouth was quivering, on the point of breaking into sobs. 

'Come, dear princess,' said Mademoiselle Bourienne, 'one more little 
effort.' 

The little princess, taking the dress from the hands of the maid, went 
up to Princess Marya. 'Now, we'll try something simple and charming,' 
she said. 

'No, leave me alone,' said the princess; and there was seriousness and 
suffering in her voice. 

'At least alter your hair,' said the little princess. 'You will alter it, won't 
you?' said Liza, and when Princess Marya made no reply, Liza went out 
of the room. 



WAR AND PEACE 113 

Princess Marya was left alone. She did not act upon Liza's wishes, she 
did not re-arrange her hair, she did not even glance into the looking- 
glass. Letting her eyes and her hands drop helplessly, she sat mentally 
dreaming. She pictured her husband, a man, a strong, masterful, and 
inconceivably attractive creature, who would bear her away all at once 
into an utterly different, happy world of his own. 'But no, it can never 
be, I am too ugly,' she thought. 

'Kindly come to tea. The prince will be going in immediately,' said the 
maid's voice at the door. She started and was horrified at what she had 
been thinking. And before going downstairs she went into the oratory, 
and fixing her eyes on the black outline of the great image of the Saviour, 
she stood for several minutes before it with clasped hands. Princess 
Marya's soul was full of an agonising doubt. Could the joy of love, of 
earthly love for a man, be for her? In her reveries of marriage, Princess 
Marya dreamed of happiness in a home and children of her own, but her 
chief, her strongest and most secret dream was of earthly love. The 
feeling became the stronger the more she tried to conceal it from others, 
and even from herself. 'My God,' she said, 'how am I to subdue in my 
heart these temptings of the devil? How am I to renounce for ever all 
evil thoughts, so as in peace to fulfil Thy will?' And scarcely had she put 
this question than God's answer came to her in her own heart. 'Desire 
nothing for thyself, be not covetous, anxious, envious. The future of men 
and thy destiny too must be unknown for thee; but live that thou mayest 
be ready for all. If it shall be God's will to prove thee in the duties of 
marriage, be ready to obey His will.' With this soothing thought (though 
still she hoped for the fulfilment of that forbidden earthly dream) Princess 
Marya crossed herself, sighing, and went downstairs, without thinking of 
her dress nor how her hair was done, of how she would go in nor what 
she would say. What could all that signify beside the guidance of Him, 
without Whose will not one hair falls from the head of man? 

When Princess Marya went into the room, Prince Vassily and his son 
were already in the drawing-room, talking to the little princess and 
Mademoiselle Bourienne. When she walked in with her heavy step, tread- 
ing on her heels, the gentlemen and Mademoiselle Bourienne rose, and the 
little princess, with a gesture indicating her to the genuemen, said: 'Here 
is Marie!' Princess Marya saw them all and saw t K cm in detail. She saw 
the face of Prince Vassily, growing serious for an instant at the sight of 
her, and then hastily smiling, and the face of the little princess, scanning 
the faces of the guests with curiosity to detect the impression Marie was 
making on them. 

She saw Mademoiselle Bourienne, too, with her ribbon and her pretty 
face, turned towards him with a look of more eagerness than she had 
ever seen on it. But him she could not see, she could only see something 
large, bright-coloured, and handsome moving towards her, as she entered 
the room. Prince Vassily approached her first, and bent over t<> kiss her 
hand. Then Anatole went up to her. She still could not see him. Site only 



114 WAR AND PEACE 

felt a soft hand taking her hand firmly. When she glanced at him, she 
was impressed by his beautiful fair hair, smelling of pomade. Moreover, 
in his manner to women, Anatole had that air, which does more than 
anything else to excite curiosity, awe, and even love in women, the air 
of supercilious consciousness of his own superiority. His manner seemed 
to say to them: 'I know you, I know, but why trouble my head about 
you? You'd be pleased enough, of course!' Princess Marya felt it, and as 
though to show him she did not even venture to think of inviting his 
attention, she turned to his father. 

The conversation was general and animated, thanks to the voice and 
the little downy lip that flew up and down over the white teeth of the 
little princess. She met Prince Vassily in that playful tone so often adopted 
by chatty and lively persons, the point of which consists in the assump- 
tion that there exists a sort of long-established series of jokes and amusing, 
partly private, humorous reminiscences between the persons so addressed 
and oneself, even when no such reminiscences are really shared. Prince 
Vassily readily fell in with this tone; the little princess embellished their 
supposed common reminiscences with all sorts of droll incidents that had 
never occurred, and drew Anatole too into them, though she had scarcely 
known him. Mademoiselle Bourienne too succeeded in taking a part in 
them, and even Princess Marya felt with pleasure that she was being made 
to share in their gaiety. 

Mademoiselle Bourienne did not let her chance slip for taking a share 
in the common stock of recollections. She ventured to inquire if it were 
long since Anatole was in Paris, and how he had liked that city. Anatole 
very readily answered the Frenchwoman, and smiling and staring at her, 
he talked to her about her native country. At first sight of the pretty 
Mademoiselle, Anatole had decided that even here at Bleak Hills he should 
not be dull. 'Not half bad-looking,' he thought, scrutinising her, 'she's 
not half bad-looking, that companion! I hope she'll bring her along when 
we're married,' he mused; 'she is a nice little thing.' 

The old prince was dressing deliberately in his room, scowling and 
ruminating on what he was to do. The arrival of these visitors angered 
him. 'What's Prince Vassily to me, he and his son? Prince Vassily is a 
braggart, an empty-headed fool, and a nice fellow the son is, I expect,' he 
growled to himself. What angered him was that this visit revived in his 
mind the unsettled question, continually thrust aside, the question in re- 
gard to which the old prince always deceived himself. That question was 
whether he would ever bring himself to part with his daughter and give 
her to a husband. Life without Princess Marya was unthinkable to the 
old prince, little as in appearance he prized her. 

'And what is she to be married for?' he thought; 'to be unhappy, 
beyond a doubt. Look at Liza with Andrey (and a better husband, I 
should fancy, it would be difficult to find nowadays), but she's not satis- 
fied with her lot. And who would marry her for love? She's plain and 
ungraceful. She'd be married for her connections, her wealth. And don't 



WAR AND PEACE 115 

old maids get on well enough? They are happier really!' So Prince Nikolay 
Andreivitch mused, as he dressed, yet the question constantly deferred 
demanded an immediate decision. Prince Vassily had brought his son 
obviously with the intention of making an offer, and probably that day 
or the next he would ask for a direct answer. The name, the position in 
the world, was suitable. 'Well, I'm not against it,' the prince kept saying 
to himself, 'only let him be worthy of her. That's what we shall see. That's 
what we shall see,' he said aloud, 'that's what we shall see,' and with his 
usual alert step he walked into the drawing-room, taking in the whole 
company in a rapid glance. He noticed the change in the dress of the 
little princess and Mademoiselle Bourienne's ribbon, and the hideous way 
in which Princess Marya's hair was done, and the smiles of the French- 
woman and Anatole, and the isolation of his daughter in the general talk. 
'She's decked herself out like a fool!' he thought, glancing vindictively at 
his daughter. 'No shame in her; while he doesn't care to speak to her!' 

He went up to Prince Vassily. 

'Well, how d'ye do, how d'ye do, glad to see you.' 

'For a friend that one loves seven versts is close by,' said Prince Vassily, 
quoting the Russian proverb, and speaking in his usual rapid, self-confident, 
and familiar tone. 'This is my second, I beg you to love him and welcome 
him, as they say.' 

Prince Nikolay Andreivitch scrutinised Anatole. 

'A fine fellow, a fine fellow!' he said. 

The old prince sat down in his customary place in the corner of the 
sofa, moved up an armchair for Prince Vassily, pointed to it, and began 
questioning him about political affairs and news. He seemed to be listen- 
ing with attention to what Prince Vassily was saying, but glanced con- 
tinually at Princess Marya. 

'So they're writing from Potsdam already?' He repeated Prince Vas- 
sily's last words, and suddenly getting up, he went up to his daughter. 

'So it was for visitors you dressed yourself up like this, eh?' he said. 
'Nice of you, very nice. You do your hair up in some new fashion before 
visitors, and before visitors, I tell you, never dare in future to change your 
dress without my leave.' 

'It was my fault . . .' stammered the little princess, flushing. 

'You are quite at liberty,' said the old prince, with a scrape before his 
daughter-in-law, 'but she has no need to disfigure herself— she's ugly 
enough without that.' And he sat down again in his place, taking no 
further notice of his daughter, whom he had reduced to tea "S. 

'On the contrary, that coiffure is extremely becoming to the princess, 
said Prince Vassily. 

'Well, my young prince, what's your name?' said the old prince, turn- 
ing to Anatole. 'Come here, let us talk to you a little and make your 
acquaintance.' 

'Now the fun's beginning,' thought Anatole, and with a smile he sat 

down by the old prince. 



116 WAR AND PEACE 

'That's it; they tell me, my dear boy, you have been educated abroad. 
Not taught to read and write by the deacon, like your father and me. Tell 
me, are you serving now in the Horse Guards?' asked the old man, look- 
ing closely and intently at Anatole. 

'No, I have transferred into the line,' answered Anatole, with difficulty 
restraining his laughter. 

'Ah! a good thing. So you want to serve your Tsar and your country, 
do you? These are times of war. Such a fine young fellow ought to be on 
service, he ought to be on service. Ordered to the front, eh?' 

'No, prince, our regiment has gone to the front. But I'm attached. 
What is it I'm attached to, papa?' Anatole turned to his father with 
a laugh. 

'He is a credit to the service, a credit. What is it I'm attached to! 
Ha-ha-ha!' laughed the old prince, and Anatole laughed still louder. Sud- 
denly the old prince frowned. 'Well, you can go,' he said to Anatole. 
With a smile Anatole returned to the ladies. 

'So you had him educated abroad, Prince Vassily? Eh?' said the old 
prince to Prince Vassily. 

'I did what I could, and I assure you the education there is far better 
than ours.' 

'Yes, nowadays everything's different, everything's new-fashioned. A 
fine fellow! a fine fellow! Well, come to my room.' He took Prince Vas- 
sily's arm and led him away to his study. 

Left alone with the old prince, Prince Vassily promptly made known 
to him his wishes and his hopes. 

'Why, do you imagine,' said the old prince wrathfully, 'that I keep her, 
that I can't part with her? What an idea!' he protested angrily. 'I am 
ready for it to-morrow! Only, I tell you, I want to know my future son- 
in-law better. You know my principles: everything open! To-morrow I 
will ask her in your presence; if she wishes it, let him stay on. Let him 
stay on, and I'll see.' The prince snorted. 'Let her marry, it's nothing to 
me,' he screamed in the piercing voice in which he had screamed at saying 
good-bye to his son. 

'I will be frank with you,' said Prince Vassily in the tone of a crafty 
man, who is convinced of the uselessness of being crafty with so pene- 
trating a companion. 'You see right through people, I know. Anatole is 
not a genius, but a straightforward, good-hearted lad, good as a son or a 
kinsman.' 

'Well, well, very good, we shall see.' 

Princess Marya did not remember her face and her coiffure. The hand- 
some, open face of the man who might, perhaps, become her husband, 
absorbed her whole attention. She thought him kind, brave, resolute, 
manly, and magnanimous. She was convinced of all that. 

'But am I not too cold with him?' thought Princess Marya. 'I try to 
check myself, because at the bottom of my heart I feel myself too close 



WAR AND PEACE 117 

to him. But of course he doesn't know all I think of him, and may imagine 
I don't like him.' 

And she tried and knew not how to be cordial to him. 

'The poor girl is devilish ugly,' Anatole was thinking about her. 

Mademoiselle Bourienne, who had also been thrown by Anatole's 
arrival into a high state of excitement, was absorbed in reflections of a 
different order. Naturally, a beautiful young girl with no defined position 
in society, without friends or relations, without even a country of her 
own, did not look forward to devoting her life to waiting on Prince 
Nikolay Andreivitch, to reading him books and being a friend to Princess 
Marya. Mademoiselle Bourienne had long been looking forward to the 
Russian prince who would have the discrimination to discern her su- 
periority to the ugly, badly dressed, ungainly Russian princesses— who 
would fall in love with her and bear her away. And now this Russian 
prince at last had come. 

Although in feminine society Anatole habitually took up the attitude of 
a man weary of the attentions of women, his vanity was agreeably flattered 
by the spectacle of the effect he produced. Moreover, he was beginning 
to feel towards the pretty and provocative Mademoiselle Bourienne that 
violent, animal feeling, which was apt to come upon him with extreme 
rapidity, and to impel him to the coarsest and most reckless actions. 

After tea the party moved into the divan-room, and Princess Marya 
was asked to play on the clavichord. Anatole leaned on his elbow facing 
her, and near Mademoiselle Bourienne. Princess Marya felt his eyes upon 
her with troubled and joyful agitation. Her favourite sonata bore her 
away to a world of soul-felt poetry, and the feeling of his eyes upon her 
added still more poetry to that world. The look in Anatole's eyes, though 
they were indeed fixed upon her, had reference not to her, but to the 
movements of Mademoiselle's little foot, which he was at that very time 
touching with his own under the piano. 

When the party broke up after supper, Anatole kissed Princess Marya's 
hand. After the princess, he bent over the hand of Mademoiselle Bourienne 
(it was a breach of etiquette, but he did everything with the same ease 
and simplicity) and Mademoiselle Bourienne crimsoned and glanced in 
dismay at the princess. 

'Quelle delicatessen thought Princess Marya. 'Can Amelic' (Mademoi- 
selle's name) 'suppose I could be jealous of her, and fail to appreciate her 
tenderness and devotion to me?' She went up to Madcmois-llc Bourienne 
and kissed her warmly. 

Although nothing had been said between Anatole and Mademoiselle 
Bourienne, they understood each other perfectly so far as the first part of 
the romance was concerned. They felt that they had a great deal to say 
to each other in private, and so from early morning they sought an 
opportunity of meeting alone. While the princess was away, spending her 
hour as usual with her father, Mademoiselle Bourienne was meeting 
Anatole in the winter garden. 



118 WAR AND PEACE 

That day it was with even more than her usual trepidation that Princess 
Marya went to the door of the study. The old prince's manner to his 
daughter that morning was extremely affectionate, though strained. He 
came to the point at once: "A proposal has been made to me on your 
behalf/ he said, with an unnatural smile. 'I dare say, you have guessed,' 
he went on, 'that Prince Vassily has not come here and brought his 
protege' (for some unknown reason the old prince elected to refer to 
Anatole in this way) 'for the sake of my charms. Yesterday, they made 
me a proposal on your behalf. And as you know my principles, I refer 
the matter to you.' 

'How am I to understand you, ?non pere? y said the princess, turning 
pale and red. 

'How understand me!' cried her father angrily. 'Prince Vassily finds 
you to his taste as a daughter-in-law, and makes you a proposal for his 
protege. That's how to understand it. How understand it! ... Why, I 
ask you.' 

'I don't know how you, mon pere . . .' the princess articulated in a 
whisper. 

'I? I? what have I to do with it? leave me out of the question. I am not 
going to be married. What do you say? that's what it's desirable to learn.' 

The princess saw that her father looked with ill-will on the project, but 
at that instant the thought had occurred to her that now or never the 
fate of her life would be decided. She dropped her eyes so as to avoid the 
gaze under which she felt incapable of thought, and capable of nothing 
but her habitual obedience: 'My only desire is to carry out your wishes,' 
she said, 'if I had to express my own desire . . .' 

She had not time to finish. The prince cut her short. 'Very good, then!' 
he shouted. 'He shall take you with your dowry, and hook on Made- 
moiselle Bourienne into the bargain. She'll be his wife, while vou . . .' 
The prince stopped. He noticed the effect of these words on his daugh- 
ter. She had bowed her head and w T as beginning to cry. 

'Come, come, I was joking, I was joking,' he said. 'Remember one thing, 
princess; I stick to my principles, that a girl has a full right to choose. And 
I give you complete freedom. Remember one thing; the happiness of 
your life depends on your decision. No need to talk about me.' 

'But I don't know . . . father.' 

'No need for talking! He's told to, and he's ready to marry any one, 
but you are free to choose. . . . Go to your own room, think it over, and 
come to me in an hour's time and tell me in his presence: yes or no. I 
know you will pray over it. Well, pray if you like. Only you'd do better 
to think. You can go.' 

Her fate was decided, and decided for happiness. But what her father 
had said about Mademoiselle Bourienne, that hint was horrible. It was not 
true, of course, but still it was horrible; she could not help thinking of it. 
She walked straight forward through the winter garden, seeing and hear- 



WAR AND PEACE U9 

ing nothing, when all of a sudden she was roused by the familiar voice of 
Mademoiselle Bourienne. She lifted her eyes, and only two paces before 
her she saw Anatole with his arms round the Frenchwoman, whispering 
something to her. With a terrible expression on his handsome face, 
Anatole looked round at Princess Marya, and did not for the first second 
let go the waist of Mademoiselle Bourienne, who had not seen her. 

Princess Marya gazed blankly at them. She could not believe her eyes. 
At last Mademoiselle Bourienne shrieked and ran away. With a gay 
smile Anatole bowed to Princess Marya, as though inviting her to share 
his amusement at this strange incident, and with a shrug of his shoulders 
he went to the door that led to his apartment. 

An hour later Tihon came to summon Princess Marya to the old prince, 
and added that Prince Vassily was with him. When Tihon came to her, 
Princess Marya was sitting on the sofa in her own room holding in her 
arms the weeping Mademoiselle Bourienne. Princess Marya was softly 
stroking her head. Her beautiful eyes had regained all their luminous 
peace, and were gazing with tender love and commiseration at the pretty 
little face of Mademoiselle Bourienne. 

'Oh, princess, I am ruined for ever in your heart,' Mademoiselle 
Bourienne was saying. 

'Why? I love you more than ever,' said Princess Marya, 'and I will try 
to do everything in my power for your happiness.' 

'But you despise me, you who are so pure, you will never understand — ' 

'I understand everything,' said Princess Marya, smiling mournfully. 
'Calm yourself, my dear. I am going to my father,' she said, and she 
went out. 

When the princess went in, Prince Vassily was sitting with one leg 
crossed high over the other, and a snuff-box in his hand. There was a 
smile of emotion on his face, and he looked as though moved to such an 
extreme point that he could but regret and smile at his own sensibility*. 
He took a hasty pinch of snuff. 

'Ah, my dear, my dear!' he said, getting up and taking her by both 
hands. He heaved a sigh, and went on: 'My son's fate is in your hands. 
Decide, my good dear, sweet Marie, whom I have always loved like a 
daughter.' He drew back. There was a real tear in his eye. 

'Fr . . . ffr . . .' snorted the old prince. 'The prince in his protege's 
. . . his son's name makes you a proposal. Are you willing or nor to be 
the wife of Prince Anatole Kuragin? You say: yes or no,' he shouted 

'My wish, mon pere, is never to leave you; never to divide my life 
from yours.' I do not wish to marry,' she 'said resolutely, glancing with 
her beautiful eyes at Prince Vassily and at her father. 

♦MnncPncP firMl MttVks! NoilSCnSC. noHSCUSc!' sllOlltcd tllC old pniKV, 

lid 



'Nonsense, fiddlesticks! Nonsense, nonsense 
frowning. He took his daughter's hand, drew her tow aids him and <. 



not kiss her, but wrung the hand he held so violently that she winced. 
Prince Vassily got up. 



120 WAR AND PEACE 

"Well, then it's all over, my dear fellow. Very glad to have seen you,' 
said the old prince. 'Very, very glad to have seen you,' he repeated, 
embracing Prince Vassily. 

It was a long while since the Rostovs had had news of their Nikolushka. 
But in the middle of the winter a letter was handed to Count Rostov, on 
the envelope of which he recognised his son's handwriting. On receiving 
the letter the count, in alarm and in haste, ran on tiptoe to his room, 
trying to escape notice, shut himself in and read the letter. Anna Mihalovna 
had learned (as she always did learn all that passed in the house) that he 
had received a letter, and treading softly, she went in to the count and 
found him with the letter in his hand, sobbing and laughing at once. 

'Nikolushka . . . letter . . . wounded ... he would . . . my dear 
. . . wounded . . . my darling boy . . . the little countess . . . promoted 
. . . thank God . . . how are we to tell the little countess?' 

Anna Mihalovna gave Natasha a brief account of what was in the letter, 
on condition that she would not tell a soul. 

'On my word of honour,' said Natasha, crossing herself, 'I won't tell 
any one,' and she ran at once to Sonya. 'Nikolinka ... a letter ... a 
little wounded, but promoted to be an officer; he's all right now, he 
writes himself.' 

'You haven't read the letter?' asked Sonya. 

'No; but she told me it was all over, and that he's an officer now . . .' 

'Thank God,' said Sonya, crossing herself. 'But perhaps she was deceiv- 
ing you. Let us go to mamma.' 

Petya had been strutting up and down in silence. 

'If I were in Nikolinka's place, I'd have killed a lot more of those 
Frenchmen,' he said, 'they're such beasts! I'd have killed them till there 
was a regular heap of them,' Petya went on. 

'Petya, you're a stupid,' said Natasha. 

'No stupider than you, ma'am,' said nine-year-old Petya, exactly as 
though he had been an elderly brigadier. 

The countess had been prepared by Anna Mihalovna's hints. Anna 
Mihalovna, with the letter, approached the countess's room on tiptoe, and 
stood still at the door. 

'Don't come in,' she said to the old count, who was following her; 
'later,' and she closed the door after her. The count put his ear to the 
keyhole, and listened. 

At first he heard the sound of indifferent talk, then Anna Mihalovna's 
voice alone, uttering a long speech, then a shriek, then silence, then both 
voices talking at once with joyful intonations, then there were steps, and 
Anna Mihalovna opened the door. Her face wore the look of pride of an 
operator who has performed a difficult amputation, and invites the public 
in to appreciate his skill. 

'It is done,' she said to the count triumphantly. 

Nikolushka's letter was read over hundreds of times, and those who 



WAR AND PEACE 12 x 

were considered worthy of hearing it had to come in to the countess, who 
read the letter every time with fresh enjoyment and every time she dis- 
covered from it new virtues in her Nikolushka. How strange, extraor- 
dinary, and joyful it was to her to think that her son-the little son, whose 
tiny limbs had faintly stirred within her twenty years ago, for whose 
sake she had so often quarrelled with the count, who would spoil him, 
the little son, who had first learnt to say grusha, and then had learnt to 
say baba-that that son was now in a foreign land, in strange surround- 
ings, a manly warrior, alone without help or guidance, doing there his 
proper manly work. All the world-wide experience of ages, proving that 
children do imperceptibly from the cradle grow up into men, did not 
exist for the countess. 

'What style, how charmingly he describes everything!' she said, read- 
ing over the descriptions in the letter. 'And what soul! Of himself not a 
word . . ; not a word! A great deal about a man called Denisov, though 
he was himself, I dare say, braver than any one. He doesn't write a word 
about his sufferings. What a heart! How like him it is! I always, always 
said, when he was no more than that high, I always used to say . . .' 

For over a week they were hard at work preparing a letter to Niko- 
lushka from all the household, writing out rough copies, copying out fair 
copies. With the watchful care of the countess, and the fussy solicitude 
of the count, all sorts of necessary things were got together, and money, 
too, for the equipment and the uniform of the young officer. Anna 
Mihalovna, practical woman, had succeeded in obtaining special patron- 
age for herself and her son in the army, that even extended to their corre- 
spondence. She had opportunities of sending her letters to the Grand 
Duke Konstantin Pavlovitch, who was in command of the Guards. The 
Rostovs assumed that 'The Russian Guards Abroad,' was quite a suffi- 
ciently definite address, and that if a letter reached the grand duke in 
command of the Guards, there was no reason why it should not reach 
the Pavlograd regiment, who were presumably somewhere in the same 
vicinity. And so it was decided to send off their letters, and money by 
the special messenger of the grand duke to Boris, and Boris would have 
to forward them to Nikolushka. There were letters from the count, the 
countess, Petya, Natasha, and Sonya, a sum of six thousand roubles for 
his equipment, and various other things which the count was sending to 
his son. 

On the 12th of November, Kutuzov's army, encamped near Olmiitz, was 
preparing to be reviewed on the following day by the two Emperors— 
the Russian and the Austrian. The Guards, who had only just arrived 
from Russia, spent a night fifteen versts from Olmiitz, and at ten o'clock 
the next morning went straight to be reviewed in the Olmutz plain. 

That day Nikolay Rostov had received a note from Boris informing 
him that the Ismailovsky regiment was quartered for the night fifteen 
versts from Olmutz, and that he wanted to see him to give him a letter 



122 WAR AND PEACE 

and some money. The money Rostov particularly needed just now, when 
the troops after active service were stationed near Olmiitz, and the camp 
swarmed with canteen keepers offering all kinds of attractions. On getting 
the note from Boris, Rostov rode into Olmiitz and on to the Guards' camp 
to find the companion of his childhood. He was wearing a shabby 
ensign's jacket with a private soldier's cross, equally shabby riding- 
trousers lined with worn leather, and an officer's sabre with a sword-knot. 
The horse he was riding was of the Don breed, bought of a Cossack on 
the march. As he rode up to the camp of the Ismailovsky regiment, he 
was thinking of how he would impress Boris and all his comrades in the 
Guards by looking so thoroughly a hussar who has been under fire and 
roughed it at the front. 

The guards had made their march as though it were a pleasure excursion, 
priding themselves on their smartness and discipline. They moved by short 
stages, their knapsacks were carried in the transport waggons, and at every 
halt the Austrian government provided the officers with excellent dinners. 
The regiments made their entry into towns and their exit from them with 
bands playing. Boris had made the acquaintance of many persons likely to 
be of use to him, and, by means of a letter of recommendation brought from 
Pierre, of Prince Audrey Bolkonsky, through whom he had hopes of obtain- 
ing a post on the staff of the commander-in-chief. 

It was almost six months since Boris and Rostov had seen each other. Both 
had changed greatly since they were last together, and both wanted to show 
as soon as possible what a change had taken place. 

'Ah, you damned floor polishers! Smart and clean, as if you'd been 
enjoying yourselves; not like us poor devils at the front,' said Rostov, with 
martial swagger, and with baritone notes in his voice that were new to 
Boris. He pointed to his mud-stained riding-breeches. The German woman 
of the house popped her head out of a door at Rostov's loud voice. 

'A pretty woman, eh? ' said he, winking. 

'Why do you shout so?' said Boris. 'I didn't expect you to-day,' he added. 
'I only sent the note off to you yesterday— through an adjutant of Kutuzov's, 
who's a friend of mine-Bolkonsky. I didn't expect he would send it to you 
so quickly. Well, how are you? Been under fire already?' asked Boris. 

Without answering, Rostov, in soldierly fashion, shook the cross of St. 
George that hung on the cording of his uniform, and pointing to his arm in 
a sling, he glanced smiling at Berg. 

'As you see,' he said. 

'To be sure, yes, yes,' said Boris, smiling, 'and we have had a capital march 
here too. You know his Highness kept all the while with our regiment, so 
that we had every convenience and advantage. In Poland, the receptions, 
the dinners, the balls! -I can't tell you. And the Tsarevitch was very gracious 
to all our officers.' And both the friends began describing; one, the gay 
revels of the hussars and life at the front; the other, the amenities and 
advantages of service under the command of royalty. 

'Oh, you guards,' said Rostov. 'But, I say, send for some wine.' 



WAR AND PEACE 123 

Boris frowned. 

'If you really want some,' he said. And he went to the bedstead, took a 
purse from under the clean pillows, and ordered some wine. 'Oh, and I have 
a letter and money to give you,' he added. 

With the letters from his family there had been inserted a letter of recom- 
mendation to Prince Bagration, by Anna Mihalovna's advice, which Countess 
Rostov had obtained through acquaintances, and had sent to her son. 
begging him to take it to its address, and to make use of it. 

'What nonsense! Much use to me,' said Rostov, throwing the letter under 
the table. 

'What did you throw that away for? ' asked Boris. 

'It's a letter of recommendation of some sort; what the devil do I want 
with a letter like that!' 

'What the devil do you want with it?' said Boris, picking it up and 
reading the address; 'that letter would be of great use to you.' 

'I'm not in want of anything, and I'm not going to be an adjutant to 
anybody.' 

'Why not?' asked Boris. 

'A lackey's duty.' 

'You are just as much of an idealist as ever, I see,' said Boris, shaking 
his head. 

'And you're just as much of a diplomat. But that's not the point. . . , 
Come, how are you?' asked Rostov. 

Boris begged Rostov to tell how and where he had been wounded. He 
described his battle at Schongraben exactly as men who have taken part 
in battles always do describe them, that is, as they would have liked them to 
be, and as sounds well, but not in the least as it really had been. Rostov 
was a truthful young man; he began with the intention of telling everything 
precisely as it had happened, but imperceptibly, unconsciously, and in- 
evitably he passed into falsehood. He could not tell them simply that they 
had all been charging full gallop, that he had fallen off his horse, sprained 
his arm, and run with all his might away from the French into the copse. 
To tell the truth is a very difficult thing; and young people are rarely cap- 
able of it. 

In the middle of his tale, just as he was saying: 'You can't fancy what a 
strange frenzy takes possession of one at the moment of the charge,' there 
walked into the room Prince Andrey Bolkonsky, whom Boris was expecting. 
Prince Andrey liked to encourage and assist younger men, he was flattered 
at being applied to for his influence, and well disposed to Boris, who h 1 
succeeded in making a favourable impression on him the previous day; he 
was eager to do for the young man what he desired. Having been sent with 
papers from Kutuzov to the Tsarevitch, he called upon Boris, hoping to 
find him alone. When he came into the room and saw the hussar with his 
soldierly swagger describing his warlike exploits (Prince Andrey could nor 
endure the kind of men who are fond of doing so), he smiled cordially to 
Boris, but frowned and dropped his eyelids as he turned to Rostov with a 



124 WAR AND PEACE 

slight bow. Wearily and languidly he sat down on the sofa, regretting that 
he had dropped into such undesirable society. Rostov, perceiving it, felt 
abashed, reddened, and subsided into silence. 

'As to your business,' Prince Andrey turned again to Boris, 'we will talk 
of it later,' and he glanced at Rostov. 'You come to me after the review, and 
we'll do what we can.' And looking round the room he addressed Rostov, 
whose childish embarrassment, passing now into anger, he did not think fit 
to notice: 'You were talking, I think, about the Schongraben action? Were 
you there?' 

'I was there,' Rostov said in a tone of exasperation, which he seemed to 
intend as an insult to the adjutant. Bolkonsky noticed the hussar's state of 
mind, and it seemed to amuse him. 

'Ah! there are a great many stories now about that engagement.' 

'Yes, stories!' said Rostov loudly, looking from Boris to Bolkonsky with 
eyes full of sudden fury, 'a great many stories, I dare say, but our stories are 
the stories of men who have been under the enemy's fire, our stories have 
some weight, they're not the tales of little staff upstarts, who draw pay for 
doing nothing.' 

'The class to which you assume me to belong,' said Prince Andrey, with 
a calm and particularly amiable smile. 

A strange feeling of exasperation was mingled in Rostov's heart with 
respect for the self-possession of this person. 

'I'm not talking about you,' he said; 'I don't know you, and, I'll own, I 
don't want to. I'm speaking of staff-officers in general.' 

'Let me tell you this,' Prince Andrey cut him short in a tone of quiet 
authority, 'you are trying to insult me, and I'm ready to agree with you 
that it is very easy to do so, if you haven't sufficient respect for yourself. 
But you will agree that the time and place is ill-chosen for this squabble. 
In a day or two we have to take part in a great and more serious duel. How- 
ever,' he said, getting up, 'you know my name, and know where to find me; 
but don't forget that I don't consider either myself or you insulted, and 
my advice, as a man older than you, is to let the matter drop. So on Friday, 
after the review, I shall expect you, Drubetskoy; good-bye till then.' 

Prince Audrey was always particularly keen over guiding a young man 
and helping him to attain worldly success. Under cover of this help for 
another, which he would never have accepted for himself, he was brought 
into the circle which bestowed success, and which attracted him. He very 
readily took up Boris's cause, and went with him to the palace at Olmiitz 
occupied by the Emperors and their retinues. 

There had been on that same day a council of war. At the council it had 
been decided, contrary to the advice of the elder generals, to advance at 
once and to fight a general engagement with Bonaparte. Dolgorukov, one of 
the warmest advocates of attack, had come back from the council, weary, 
exhausted, but eager and proud of the victory he had gained. Prince Andrey 
presented the officer for whom he was asking his influence, but Prince 
Dolgorukov, though he shook hands politely and warmly, said nothing to 



WAR AND PEACE 125 

Boris. Obviously unable to restrain himself from uttering the thoughts 
which were engrossing him at that moment, he addressed Prince Andrev 
in French. J 

'Well, my dear fellow, what a battle we have won! God only grant that 
the one which will be the result of it may be as victorious.' 
'So an attack has been finally decided upon?' said Bolkonsky. 
'And do you know, I fancy, Bonaparte really has lost his head. You know 
that a letter came from him to-day to the Emperor.' Dolgorukov smiled 
significantly. 

'You don't say so! What does he write?' asked Bolkonsky. 
'What can he write? Tradi-ri-di-ra-all simply to gain time. I tell you 
he's in our hands; that's the fact! But the most amusing part of it all,' he 
said, breaking all at once into a good-natured laugh, 'is that they couldn't 
think how to address an answer to him. If not "consul," and of course not 
"emperor," it should be "general" Bonaparte, it seemed to me.' 

'But between not recognising him as emperor and calling him General 
Bonaparte, there's a difference,' said Bolkonsky. 

'That's just the point,' Dolgorukov interrupted quickly, laughing. 'You 
know Bilibin, he's a very clever fellow; he suggested addressing it, "To the 
Usurper and Enemy of the Human Race," ' Dolgorukov chuckled merrily. 
'And nothing more?' observed Bolkonsky. 

'But still it was Bilibin who found the suitable form of address in earnest. 
He's both shrewd and witty . . .' 
'How was it?' 

'To the Chief of the French Government: au chef du gouvernement 
francais,' Dolgorukov said seriously and with satisfaction. 'That was the 
right thing, wasn't it? ' 

'It was all right, but he will dislike it extremely,' observed Bolkonsky. 
'Oh, extremely! My brother knows him; he's dined more than once with 
him— nowadays the Emperor— in Paris, and used to tell me that he'd never 
seen a subtler and more crafty diplomat; you know, a combination of 
French adroitness and the Italian actor-faculty! You know the anecdote 
about Bonaparte and Count Markov? Count Markov was the only person 
who knew how to treat him. You know the story of the handkerchief? 
It's a gem!' And the talkative Dolgorukov turning from Boris to Prince 
Andrey told the story of how Bonaparte, to test Markov, our ambassador, 
had purposely dropped his handkerchief before him, and had stood looking 
at him, probably expecting Markov to pick it up for him, and how Markov 
promptly dropped his own beside it, and had picked up his own without 
touching Bonaparte's. 

'Capital,' said Bolkonsky. 'But, prince, I have come to you as a petitioner 
in behalf of this young friend. You see . . .' But before Prince Andrei 
could finish, an adjutant came into the room to summon Prince Dolgorukov 
to the Emperor. 

'Ah, how annoying!' said Dolgorukov, getting up hurriedly and shaking 
hands with Prince Andrev and Boris. 'You know I shall be very glad to da 



126 WAR AND PEACE 

all that depends on me both for you and for this charming young man,/ 
Once more he shook hands with Boris with an expression of good-natured, 
genuine, heedless gaiety. 'But you see . . . another time!' 

Next day the troops set off on the march, and up to the time of the 
battle of Austerlitz, Boris did not succeed in seeing Bolkonsky or Dolgoru- 
kov again, and remained for a while in the Ismailovsky regiment. 

At dawn on the 16th, Denisov's squadron, in which Nikolay Rostov was 
serving, and which formed part of Prince Bagration's detachment, moved 
on from its halting place for the night— to advance into action, as was said. 
After about a mile's march, in the rear of other columns, it was brought to 
a standstill on the high-road. Rostov saw the Cossacks, the first and second 
squadrons of hussars, and the infantry battalions with the artillery pass him 
and march on ahead; he also saw the Generals Bagration and Dolgorukov 
ride by with their adjutants. All the panic he had felt, as before, at the 
prospect of battle, all the inner conflict by means of which he had overcome 
that panic, all his dreams of distinguishing himself in true hussar style 
in this battle— all were for nothing. His squadron was held back in reserve. 

On the 1 8th and 19th the troops moved forward two days' march, and 
the enemy's outposts, after a brief interchange of shots, retired. In the 
higher departments of the army an intense, bustling excitement and activity 
prevailed from midday of the 19th till the morning of the following day, 
the 20th of November, on which was fought the memorable battle of Aus- 
terlitz. 

Up to midday of the 19th the activity, the eager talk, the bustle, and the 
despatching of adjutants was confined to the headquarters of the Emperors; 
after midday the activity had reached the headquarters of Kutuzov and the 
staff of the commanding officers of the columns. By evening this activity 
had been carried by the adjutants in all directions into every part of the 
army, and in the night of the 19th the multitude of the eighty thousands of 
the allied army rose from its halting-place, and with a hum of talk moved 
on, a heaving mass nine versts long. 

Prince Andrey was in close attendance on the commander-in-chief. At 
six o'clock in the evening Kutuzov visited the headquarters of the Emperors, 
and Bolkonsky took advantage of this interval to go in to Dolgorukov to try 
and learn details about the coming action. Prince Andrey felt that Kutuzov 
was disturbed and displeased about something, and that they were displeased 
with him at headquarters, and for that reason he wanted to have some talk 
with Dolgorukov. 

'Oh, good evening, my dear boy,' said Dolgorukov, who was sitting at 
tea with Bilibin. 'The fete's for to-morrow. How's your old fellow? out of 
humour?' 

'I won't say he's out of humour, but I fancy he would like to get a hear- 
ing.' 

'But he did get a hearing at the council of war, and he will get a hearing 
when he begins to talk sense. But to delay and wait about now when Bona- 



WAR AND PEACE 127 

parte fears a general engagement more than anything— is out of the question.' 

'Oh yes, you have seen him,' said Prince Andrey. 'Well, what did you 
think of Bonaparte? What impression did he make on you?' 

'Yes, I saw him, and I'm persuaded he fears a general engagement more 
than anything in the world,' repeated Dolgorukov, who evidently attached 
great value to this general deduction he had made from his interview with 
Napoleon. 'If he weren't afraid of an engagement what reason has he to 
open negotiations, and, above all, to retreat, when retreat is contrary to his 
whole method of conducting warfare? Believe me, he's afraid, afraid of a 
general engagement; his hour has come, mark my words.' 

'But tell me what was he like, how did he behave?' Prince Andrey still 
insisted. 

'He's a man in a grey overcoat, very anxious to be called "your majesty," 
but disappointed at not getting a title of any kind out of me. That's the 
sort of man he is, that's all,' answered Dolgorukov, looking round with a 
smile at Bilibin. 

At ten o'clock in the evening, all the commanders of columns were sum- 
moned to the commander-in-chief's, and with the exception of Prince 
Bagration, who declined to come, all of them arrived at the hour fixed. 

Kutuzov was staying in a small nobleman's castle near Austerlitz. In the 
drawing-room, which had been made the commander-in-chief's study, were 
gathered together: Kutuzov himself, Weierother, and the members of the 
council of war. They were drinking tea. 

Kutuzov, his uniform unbuttoned, and his fat neck bulging over the collar, 
was sitting in a low chair with his podgy old hands laid symmetrically on 
the arms; he was almost asleep. 

At the sound of Weierother's voice, he made an effort and opened his 
solitary eye. 

'Yes, yes, please, it's late as it is,' he assented, and nodding his head, he 
let it droop and closed his eyes again. 

If the members of the council had at first believed Kutuzov to be sham- 
ming sleep, the nasal sounds to which he gave vent during the reading that 
followed, proved that the commander-in-chief was concerned with some- 
thing of far greater consequence than the desire to show his contempt for 
their disposition of the troops or anything else whatever; he was really 
asleep. Weierother, with the gesture of a man too busy to lose even a 
minute of his time, glanced at Kutuzov and satisfying himself that lie was 
asleep, he took up a paper and in a loud, monotonous tone began reading 
the disposition of the troops in the approaching battle. The disposition was 
very complicated and intricate. 

The generals seemed to listen reluctantly to the intricate account. The 
tall, fair-haired general, Buxhevden, stood leaning his back against the wall, 
and fixing his eyes on a burning candle, he seemed not to be listening, not 
even to wish to be thought to be listening. Exactly opposite to Weierother, 
with his bright, wide-open eyes fixed upon him was Miloradovitch, a ruddy 
man, with whiskers and shoulders turned upwards, sitting in :i military 



128 WAR AND PEACE 

pose with his hands on his knees and his elbows bent outwards. He sat in 
obstinate silence, staring into Weierother's face, and only taking his eyes 
off him when the Austrian staff-commander ceased speaking. Then Milor- 
adovitch looked round significantly at the other generals. But from that 
significant glance it was impossible to tell whether he agreed or disagreed, 
was pleased or displeased. 

When the reading, which lasted more than an hour, was over, Langeron, 
stopping his twisting snuff-box, began to speak without looking at Weier- 
other or any one in particular. He pointed out how difficult it was to carry 
out such a disposition, in which the enemy's position was assumed to be 
known, when it might well be uncertain seeing that the enemy was in 
movement. Langeron's objections were well founded, yet it was evident 
that their principal object was to make Weierother, who had read his 
plans so conceitedly, as though to a lot of schoolboys, feel that he had to 
deal not with fools, but with men who could teach him something in mili- 
tary matters. 

When the monotonous sound of Weierother's voice ceased, Kutuzov 
opened his eyes, as the miller wakes up at any interruption in the droning 
of the mill-wheels, listened to what Langeron was saying, and as though 
saying to himself: 'Oh, you're still at the same nonsense!' made haste to 
close his eyes again, and let his head sink still lower. 

Langeron, trying to deal the most malignant thrusts possible at Weier- 
other's military vanity as author of the plan, showed that Bonaparte might 
easily become the attacking party instead of waiting to be attacked, and 
so render all this plan of the disposition of the troops utterly futile. Weier- 
other met all objections with a confident and contemptuous smile. 
'If he could have attacked us, he would have done so to-day,' he said. 
'You suppose him, then, to be powerless?' said Langeron. 
'I doubt if he has as much as forty thousand troops,' answered Weier- 
other with the smile of a doctor to whom the sick-nurse is trying to ex- 
pound her own method of treatment. 'The enemy have extinguished their 
fires and a continual noise has been heard in their camp,' he said. 'What 
does that mean? Either they are retreating— the only thing we have to 
fear, or changing their position' (he smiled ironically). 'But even if they 
were to take up their position at Turas, it would only be saving us a great 
deal of trouble, and all our arrangements will remain unchanged in the 
smallest detail.' 

'How can that be? . . .' said Prince Andrey, who had a long while been 
looking out for an opportunity of expressing his doubts. Kutuzov waked 
up, cleared his throat huskily, and looked round at the generals. 

'Gentlemen, the disposition for to-morrow, for to-day indeed (for it's 
going on for one o'clock), can't be altered now,' he said. 'You have heard 
it, and we will all do our duty. And before a battle nothing is of so much 
importance as a good night's rest.' 

He made a show of rising from his chair. The generals bowed them- 
selves out. It was past midnight. Prince Andrey went out. 



WAR AND PEACE 129 

The council of war left on Prince Andrey an impression of uncertainty 
smd uneasiness. Which was right— Dolgorukov and Weierother, or Kutuzov 
and Langeron and the others, who did not approve of the plan of attack- 
he did not know. But on account of personal and court considerations 
were tens of thousands of lives to be risked— 'and my life, mine?' he 
thought. 

'Yes, it may well be that I shall be killed to-morrow,' he thought. 

Rostov had been sent that night with a platoon on picket duty to the 
line of outposts in the foremost part of Bagration's detachment. His 
hussars were scattered in couples about the outposts; he himself rode about 
the line of the outposts trying to struggle against the sleepiness which 
kept overcoming him. Behind him could be seen the immense expanse of 
the dimly burning fires of our army; before him was the misty darkness. 
His eyes kept closing, and there floated before his mind the image of the 
Emperor, then of Denisov, and Moscow memories, and again he opened 
his eyes and saw close before him the head and ears of the horse he was 
riding, and sometimes black figures of hussars. 'Why? it may well happen,' 
mused Rostov, 'that the Emperor will meet me and give me some com- 
mission, as he might to any officer; he'll say, "Go and find out what's 
there." ' All at once a shout in the distance roused Rostov. He started and 
opened his eyes. 'Where am I? Yes, in the picket line; the pass and 
watchword— shaft, Olmutz. How annoying that our squadron will be in 
reserve . . .' he thought. 'I'll ask to go to the front. It may be my only 
chance of seeing the Emperor. And now it's not long before I'm off duty. 
I'll ride round once more, and as I come back, I'll go to the general and 
ask him.' He sat up straight in the saddle and set off to ride once more 
round his hussars. It seemed to him that it was lighter. 

'Keep to the right, your honour, there are bushes here,' said the voice of 
an hussar, by whom Rostov was riding as he fell asleep. Rostov lifted his 
head, which had dropped on to his horse's mane, and pulled up beside 
the hussar. He could not shake off the youthful, childish drowsiness that 
overcame him. 'But, I say, what was I thinking? I mustn't forget. How I 
am going to speak to the Emperor? No, not that— that's to-morrow. That's 
right.' And again he dropped with his head on his horse's neck. All at once 
it seemed to him that he was being fired at. 'What? what? . . . Cut them 
down! What?' Rostov was saying, as he wakened i 

At the instant that he opened his eyes, Rostov heard in front, over where 
the enemy were, the prolonged shouting of thousands of voices. 1 lis horse 
and the horse of the hussar near him pricked up their ears at these shouts. 
Over where the shouts came from, a light was lighted and pur our, then 
another, and all along the line of the French troops on the hillside fires 
were lighted and the shouts grew louder and louder. Rostov heard the 
sound of French words though he could not distinguish them. 

'What is it? What do you think?' Rostov said to the hussar near him. 
'That's in the enemy's camp surely?' 



130 WAR AND PEACE 

'May be 'tis, and may be not,' said the hussar; 'it's dark. Now! steady,' 
he shouted to his horse, who fidgeted. 

The shouting grew louder and passed into a mingled roar that could 
only be produced by an army of several thousands. The lights stretched 
further and further probably along the line of the French camp. Rostov 
was not sleepy now. The gay, triumphant shouts in the enemy's army had 
a rousing effect on him. 'Vive PEmpereurf VEmpereurP Rostov could hear 
distinctly now. 

'Your honour, the generals!' said the sergeant, riding up. Rostov, still 
looking away towards the lights and shouts, rode with the sergeant to 
meet several men galloping along the line. Prince Bagration with Prince 
Dolgorukov and his adjutant had ridden out to look at the strange demon- 
stration of lights and shouts in the enemy's army. 

'Take my word for it,' Prince Dolgorukov was saying to Bagration, 
'it's nothing but a trick; they have retreated and ordered the rear-guard to 
light fires and make a noise to deceive us.' 

'I doubt it,' said Bagration; 'since evening I have seen them on that 
knoll; if they had retreated, they would have withdrawn from there too. 
Monsieur Vofficier] Prince Bagration turned to Rostov, 'are the enemy's 
pickets still there?' 

'They were there this evening, but now I can't be sure, your excellency. 
Shall I go with some hussars and see?' said Rostov. 

Rostov put spurs to his horse, called up the sergeant and two other 
hussars, told them to ride after him, and trotted off downhill in the direc- 
tion of the shouting, which still continued. Rostov felt both dread and 
joy in riding alone with three hussars into that mysterious and dangerous, 
misty distance, where no one had been before him. Bagration shouted to 
him from the hill not to go beyond the stream, but Rostov made as though 
he had not heard his words, and rode on without stopping, further and 
further, continually mistaking bushes for trees and ravines for men, and 
continually discovering his mistakes. As he galloped downhill he lost sight 
both of our men and the enemy, but more loudly and distinctly he heard 
the shouts of the French. In the valley he saw ahead of him something 
that looked like a river, but when he had ridden up to it, he found out 
it was a road. As he got out on the road he pulled up his horse, hesitating 
whether to go along it or to cut across it, and ride over the black field up 
the hillside. To follow the road, which showed lighter in the mist, was 
more dangerous, because figures could be more easily descried upon it. 
'Follow me,' he said; 'cut across the road,' and began galloping up the hill 
towards the point where the French picket had been in the evening. 

'Your honour, here he is!' said one of the hussars behind; and before 
Rostov had time to make out something that rose up suddenly black in 
the mist, there was a flash of light, the crack of a shot and a bullet, that 
seemed whining a complaint, whizzed high in the air and flew away out 
of hearing. Another shot missed fire, but Rostov turned his horse's head. 
He heard four more shots at varying intervals, and four more bullets 



WAR AND PEACE 131 

whistled in varying tones somewhere in the mist. Rostov rode back at a 
walking-pace; only as he approached Bagration, Rostov put his horse into 
a gallop again, and with his hand to his cap, rode up to him. 

Dolgorukov was still insisting on his opinion that the French were 
retreating, and had only lighted fires to mislead them. 'What does it 
prove?' he was saying, as Rostov rode up to them. 'They might have re- 
treated and left pickets.' 

'It's clear they have not all retired, prince,' said Bagration. 'We must 
wait till morning; to-morrow we shall know all about it.' 

'The picket's on the hill, your excellency, still where it was in the 
evening,' Rostov announced. 

'Very good, very good,' said Bagration, 'I thank you, monsieur Vofficier? 

'To-morrow, very likely, they will send me with some message to the 
Emperor,' he thought. 'Thank God!' 

The shouts and lights in the enemy's army had been due to the fact 
that while Napoleon's proclamation had been read to the troops, the 
Emperor had himself ridden among the bivouacs. The soldiers on seeing 
the Emperor had lighted wisps of straw and run after him, shouting, ^Vive 
VEmpereurP Napoleon's proclamation was as follows:— 

'Soldiers! The Russian army is coming to meet you, to avenge the 
Austrian army, the army of Ulm. They are the forces you have defeated 
at Hollabrunn, and have been pursuing ever since up to this place. The 
position we occupy is a powerful one, and while they w r ill march to out- 
flank me on the right, they will expose their flank to me! Soldiers! I will 
myself lead your battalions. I will keep out of fire, if you, with youi 
habitual bravery, carry defeat and disorder into the ranks of the enemy. 
But if victory is for one moment doubtful, you will see your Emperor 
exposed to the enemy's hottest attack, for there can be no uncertainty of 
victory, especially on this day, when it is a question of the honour of 
the French infantry, on which rests the honour of our nation. Do not, 
on the pretext of removing the wounded, break the order of the ranks! 
Let every man be fully penetrated by the idea that we must subdue these 
minions of England, who are inspired by such hatred of our country. 
This victory will conclude our campaign, and we can return to winter 
quarters, where we shall be reinforced by fresh forces now being formed 
in France; and then the peace I shall conclude will be one worthy of 
my people, of you and me. Napoleon. 

At five o'clock in the morning it was still quite dark. The troops of the 
centre, of the reserves, and of Bagration's right flank, were still at rest. 
But on the left flank the columns of the infantry, cavalry, and artillery, 
were already up and astir. The smoke from the camp-fires, into which 
they were throwing everything superfluous, made the eves smart. '1 he 
officers were hurriedly drinking tea and eating breakfast; the soldiers were 
munching biscuits, stamping their feet rhythmically, while they gathered 
about the fires warming themselves, and throwing into the blaze remains 



132 WAR AND PEACE 

of shanties, chairs, tables, wheels, tubs, everything superfluous that they 
could not take away with them. 

At eight o'clock Kutuzov rode out to Pratzen, Prince Andrey among the 
immense number of persons who made up the commander-in-chief's suite. 

On the left, below in the fog, could be heard firing between unseen 
forces. There, it seemed to Prince Andrey, the battle would be concen- 
trated, there 'the difficulty would arise, and there I shall be sent,' he 
thought, 'with a brigade or a division, and there, flag in hand, I shall march 
forward and shatter all before me.' 

Kutuzov seemed exhausted and irritable that morning. The infantry 
marching by him halted without any command being given, apparently 
because something in front blocked up the way. 

'Do tell the men to form in battalion columns and go round the village,' 
said Kutuzov angrily to a general who rode up. 'How is it you don't 
understand, my dear sir, that it's out of the question to let them file 
through the defile of the village street, when we are advancing to meet 
the enemy?' 

'I had proposed forming beyond the village, your most high excellency,' 
replied the general. 

Kutuzov laughed bitterly. 

*A nice position you'll be in, deploying your front in sight of the enemy 
—very nice.' 

'The enemy is a long way off yet, your most high excellency. Accord- 
ing to the disposition. . . .' 

'The disposition!' Kutuzov cried with bitter spleen; 'but who told you 
so? . . . Kindly do as you are commanded.' 

'Yes, sir.' 

The fog was beginning to part, and a mile and a half away the enemy's 
troops could be indistinctly seen on the opposite heights. On the left below, 
the firing became more distinct. Kutuzov stood still in conversation with 
an Austrian general. Prince Andrey standing a little behind watched them 
intently, and turned to an adjutant, meaning to ask him for a field-glass. 

'Look, look!' this adjutant said, looking not at the troops in the distance, 
but down the hill before him. 'It's the French!' 

The two generals and the adjutant began snatching at the field-glass, 
pulling it from one another. All their faces suddenly changed, and horror 
was apparent in them all. They had supposed the French to be over a mile 
and a half away, and here they were all of a sudden confronting us. 

'Is it the enemy? . . . No. . . . But, look, it is . . . for certain. . . . 
What does it mean?' voices were heard saying. 

With the naked eye Prince Andrey saw to the right, below them, a 
dense column of French soldiers coming up towards the Apsheron regi- 
ment, not over five hundred paces from where Kutuzov was standing. 

'Here it is, it is coming, the decisive moment! My moment has come,' 
thought Prince Andrey, and slashing his horse, he rode up to Kutuzov. 
But at that instant everything was lost in a cloud of smoke, there was 



WAR AND PEACE 133 

a sound of firing close by, and a voice in naive terror cried not two paces 
from Prince Andrey: 'Hey, mates, it's all up!' And this voice was like a 
command. It was not simply difficult to check this rushing crowd, it was 
impossible not to be carried back with the stream oneself. Kutuzov, with 
his suite diminished to a half, rode towards the sounds of cannon close by. 
Prince Andrey, trying not to be left behind by Kutuzov, saw, as he got 
out of the racing multitude, a Russian battery still firing in the smoke on the 
hillside and the French running towards it. A little higher up stood 
Russion infantry, neither moving forward to the support of the battery, 
nor back in the same direction as the runaways. A general on horseback 
detached himself from the infantry and rode towards Kutuzov. Of 
Kutuzov's suite only four men were left. They were all pale and looking 
at one another dumbly. 

'Stop those wretches!' Kutuzov gasped to the officer in command of the 
regiment, pointing to the flying soldiers. But at the same instant, as 
though in revenge for the words, the bullets came whizzing over the 
regiment and Kutuzov's suite like a flock of birds. The French were attack- 
ing the battery, and catching sight of Kutuzov, they were shooting at him. 
With this volley the general clutched at his leg; several soldiers fell, and 
the second lieutenant standing with the flag let it drop out of his hands. 
The flag tottered and was caught on the guns of the nearest soldiers. The 
soldiers had begun firing without orders. 

'Ooogh!' Kutuzov growled with an expression of despair, and he looked 
round him. 'Bolkonsky,' he whispered in a voice shaking with the con- 
sciousness of his old age and helplessness. 'Bolkonsky,' he whispered, point- 
ing to the routed battalion and the enemy, 'what's this?' 

But before he had uttered the words, Prince Andrey, feeling the tears of 
shame and mortification rising in his throat, was jumping off his horse and 
running to the flag. 

'Lads, forward!' he shrieked in a voice of childish shrillness. 'Here, it is 
come!' Prince Andrey thought, seizing the staff of the flag, and hearing 
with relief the whiz of bullets, unmistakably aimed at him. Several soldiers 

dropped. 

'Hurrah!' shouted Prince Andrey, and hardly able to hold up the heavy 
flag in both his hands, he ran forward in the unhesitating conviction that 
the whole battalion would run after him. And in fact it was only tor a few 
steps that he ran alone. One soldier started, then another, and then the w hole 
battalion with a shout of 'hurrah!' was running forward and overtaking 
him. An under-officer of the battalion ran up and took the flag winch 
tottered from its weight in Prince Andrcy's hands, but he was at once 
killed. Prince Andrey snatched up the flag again, and waving it by the 
staff, ran on with the battalion. In front of him he saw our artillery men, 
of whom some were fighting, while others had abandoned their cannons 
and were running towards him. He saw French Infantry soldiers, too, 
seizing the artillery horses and turning the cannons round. Prince \ndrey 
and the battalion were within twenty paces of the cannons I le heard the 



134 WAR AND PEACE 

bullets whizzing over him incessantly, and continually the soldiers moaned 
and fell to the right and left of him. But he did not look at them; his eyes 
were fixed on what was going on in front of him— at the battery. He could 
now see distinctly the figure of the artilleryman, with a shako crushed on 
one side, pulling a mop one way, while a French soldier was tugging it the 
other way. Prince Andrey could see distinctly now the distraught, and at 
the same time exasperated expression of the faces of the two men, who 
were obviously quite unconscious of what they were doing. 

'What are they about?' wondered Prince Andrey, watching them; 
'why doesn't the red-haired artilleryman run, since he has no weapon? 
Why doesn't the Frenchman stab him? He won't have time to run away 
before the Frenchman will think of his gun, and knock him on the head.' 
Another Frenchman did, indeed, run up to the combatants with his gun 
almost overbalancing him, and the fate of the red-haired artilleryman, 
who still had no conception of what was awaiting him, and was pulling 
the mop away in triumph, was probably sealed. But Prince Andrey did 
not see how it ended. It seemed to him as though a hard stick were swung 
full at him by some soldier near, dealing him a violent blow on the head. 
It hurt a little, but the worst of it was that the pain distracted his attention, 
and prevented him from seeing what he was looking at. 

'What's this? am I falling? my legs are giving way under me,' he thought, 
and fell on his back. He opened his eyes, hoping to see how the struggle 
of the French soldiers with the artilleryman was ending, and easrer to 
know whether the red-haired artilleryman was killed or not, whether the 
cannons had been taken or saved. But he saw nothing of all that. Above 
him there was nothing but the sky— the lofty sky, not clear, but still im- 
measurably lofty, with grey clouds creeping quietly over it. 'How quietlv, 
peacefully, and triumphantly, and not like us running, shouting, and fight- 
ing, not like the Frenchman and artilleryman dragging the mop from one 
another with frightened and frantic faces, how differently are those clouds 
creeping over that lofty, limitless sky. How was it I did not see that lofty 
sky before? And how happy I am to have found it at last. Yes! all is 
vanity, all is a cheat, except that infinite sky. There is nothing, nothing but 
that. But even that is not, there is nothing but peace and stillness. And thank 
God! . . .' 

On the right flank in Bagration's detachment, at nine o'clock the battle 
had not yet begun. Not caring to assent to Dolgorukov's request that he 
should advance into action, and anxious to be rid of all responsibility, Prince 
Bagration proposed to Dolgorukov to send to inquire of the commander- 
in-chief. Bagration was aware that as the distance between one flank and 
the other was almost eight miles, if the messenger sent were not killed 
(which was highly probable), and if he were to succeed in finding the 
commander-in-chief (which would be very difficult), he would hardly 
succeed in making his way back before the evening. 

Bagration looked up and down his suite with his large, expressionless, 
sleepy eyes, and the childish face of Rostov, unconsciously all a-quivei 



WAR AND PEACE 135 

with excitement and hope, was the first that caught his eye. And he sent 
him. 

'And if I meet his majesty before the commander-in-chief, your ex- 
cellency?' said Rostov, with his hand to the peak of his cap. 

'You can give the message to his majesty,' said Dolgorukov. 

On being relieved from picket duty, Rostov had managed to get a few 
hours' sleep, and felt cheerful, bold, and resolute. 

The sound that reached him in the fresh morning air was not now, as 
before, the report of two or three shots at irregular intervals, and then 
one or two cannons booming. Down the slopes of the hillsides before 
Pratzen, he could hear volleys of musketry, interspersed with such fre- 
quent shots of cannon that sometimes several booming shots could not be 
distinguished from one another, but melted into one mingled roar of sound. 

He could see the puffs of musket smoke flying down the hillsides, as 
though racing one another, while the cannon smoke hung in clouds, that 
floated along and melted into one another. He could see, from the gleam 
of bayonets in the smoke, that masses of infantry were moving down, and 
narrow lines of artillery with green caissons. 

On a hillock Rostov stopped his horse to try and make out what was 
going on. But however much he strained his attention, he could not make 
out and understand what he saw; there were men of some sort moving 
about there in the smoke, lines of troops were moving both backwards and 
forwards; but what for? Who? where were they going? it was impossible 
to make out. 

After passing Austrian troops of some sort, Rostov noticed that the 
next part of the forces (they were the Guards) had already advanced into 
action. 

'So much the better! I shall see it close,' he thought. 

He was riding almost along the front line. A body of horsemen came 
galloping towards him. They were a troup of our Uhlans returning in 
disorder from the attack. Rostov, as he passed them, could not help notic- 
ing one of them covered with blood, but he galloped on. 

'That's no affair of mine!' he thought. 

He had not ridden on many hundred paces further when there came 
into sight, on his left, across the whole extent of the field, an immense 
mass of cavalry on black horses, in dazzling white uniforms, trotting straight 
towards him, cutting off his advance. Rostov put his horse to his utmost 
speed to get out of the way of these cavalrymen, and he would hue 
cleared them had they been advancing at the same rate, but they kept in- 
creasing their pace, so that several horses broke into a gallop. More and 
more loudly Rostov could hear the thud of their horses' hoofs, and the 
jingle of their weapons, and more and more distinctly he could see their 
horses, their figures, and even their faces. These were our horse-guards, 
charging to attack the French cavalry; this was the brilliant charge of the 
Horse-Guards of which the French themselves expressed their admiration. 
Rostov was appalled to hear afterwards that of all that mass of huge, fine 



136 WAR AND PEACE 

men, of all those brilliant, rich young- officers and ensigns who had galloped 
by him on horses worth thousands of roubles, only eighteen were left 
after the charge. 

'I have no need to envy them, my share won't be taken from me, and 
may be I shall see the Emperor in a minute!' thought Rostov, and he 
galloped on. 

As he rode behind one of the lines of the regiments of footguards, he 
heard a voice calling him by name: 'Rostov!' 

'Eh?' he called back, not recognising Boris. 

'I say, we've been in the front line! Our regiment marched to the at- 
tack!' said Boris, smiling that happy smile that is seen in young men who 
have been for the first time under fire. Rostov stopped. 

'Really!' he said. 'Well, how was it?' 

'We beat them!' said Boris, growing talkative in his eagerness. 'You 
can fancy . . .' Rostov set his horse moving without waiting to hear Boris 
to the end. 

'Where are you off to?' asked Boris. 

'To his majesty with a commission.' 

After riding by the Guards, Rostov rode along the line of the reserves 
for fear of getting in the way of the front line, as he had done in the 
charge of the Horse-Guards, and made a wide circuit round the place 
where he heard the hottest musket-fire and cannonade. All of a sudden, in 
front of him and behind our troops, in a place where he could never have 
expected the enemy to be, he heard the sound of musket-fire quite close. 

'What can it be?' thought Rostov. 'The enemy in the rear of our troops? 
It can't be,' thought Rostov, but a panic of fear for himself and for the 
issue of the whole battle came over him all at once. 'Whatever happens, 
though,' he reflected, 'it's useless to try and escape now. It's my duty to 
seek the commander-in-chief here, and if everything's lost, it's my duty 
to perish with all the rest.' 

The foreboding of evil that had suddenly come upon Rostov grew 
stronger and stronger the further he advanced into the region behind the 
village of Pratzen, which was full of crowds of troops of all sorts. 

'What does it mean? What is it? Whom are they firing at? Who is 
firing?' Rostov kept asking, as he met Austrian and Russian soldiers run- 
ning in confused crowds across his path. 

'Devil knows! Killed them all! Damn it all,' he was answered in Rus- 
sian, in German, and in Czech by the hurrying rabble, who knew no more 
than he what was being done. 

Several wounded were among the crowds on the road. Shouts, oaths, 
moans were mingled in the general hubbub. The firing began to subside, 
and, as Rostov found out later, the Russian and Austrian soldiers had 
been firing at one another. 

'My God! how can this be?' thought Rostov. 'And here, where any 
minute the Emperor may see them. . . .' 

The idea of defeat and flight could not force its way into Rostov's head 



WAR AND PEACE 137 

'Where's the Emperor? Where's Kutuzov?' Rostov kept asking of every 
one he could stop, and from no one could he get an answer. 

At last clutching a soldier by the collar, he forced him to answer him. 

'Aye! brother! they've all bolted long ago!' the soldier said to Rostov, 
laughing for some reason as he pulled himself away. Letting go that soldier, 
who must, he thought, be drunk, Rostov stopped the horse of a groom 
or postillion of some personage of consequence, and began to cross-question 
him. The groom informed Rostov that an hour before the Tsar had been 
driven at full speed in a carriage along this very road, and that the Tsar 
was dangerously wounded. 

'It can't be,' said Rostov; 'probably some one else.' 

'I saw him myself,' said the groom with a self-satisfied smirk; 'it's high 
time I should know the Emperor, I should think, after the many times 
I've seen him in Petersburg; I saw him as it might be here. Pale, deadly 
pale, sitting in the carriage. The way they drove the four raven horses! 
my goodness, didn't they dash by us! It would be strange, I should think, 
if I didn't know the Tsar's horses.' 

Rostov let go of the horse and would have gone on. A wounded officer 
passing by addressed him. 'Why, who is it you want?' asked the officer, 
'the commander-in-chief? Oh, he was killed by a cannon ball, struck in 
the breast before our regiment.' 

'Not killed— wounded,' another officer corrected him. 

'Who? Kutuzov?' asked Rostov. 

'Not Kutuzov, but what's his name— well, it's all the same, there are 
not many left alive. Go that way, over there to that village, all the com- 
manding officers are there,' said the officer, pointing to the village of 
Gostieradeck, and he walked on. 

Rostov rode on at a walking pace, not knowing to whom and with what 
object he was going now. The Tsar was wounded, the battle was lost. 
There was no refusing to believe in it now. 

'Go along this road, your honour, that way you will be killed in a trice!' 
a soldier shouted to him. 'You'll be killed that way!' 

'Oh! what nonsense!' said another. 'Where is he to go? That way's 
nearest.' Rostov pondered, and rode off precisely in the direction in which 
he had been told he would be killed. 

All over the field, like ridges of dung on well-kept plough-land, lay 
the heaps of dead and wounded, a dozen or fifteen bodies to every three 
acres. The wounded were crawling two or three together, and their shrieks 
and groans had a painful and sometimes affected sound, it seined to Rostov. 
Rostov put his horse to a trot to avoid the sight of all those suffering 
people. He was afraid of losing not his life, but his pluck, \\ hieh he needed 
so much. He thought of his mother's last letter. 'What would she be feeling 
now,' he thought, 'if she could see me here now on this held w ith cannofM 
aimed at me?' 

In the village of Gostieradeck there were Russian troops, in some eon- 
fusion indeed, but in far better discipline, who had eoine from the field oi 



138 WAR AND PEACE 

battle. Here every one saw clearly that the battle was lost, and all were 
talking of it. No one to whom Rostov applied could tell him where was the 
Tsar, or where was Kutuzov. Some said that the rumour of the Tsar's 
wound was correct, others said not. One officer told Rostov that, behind 
the village to the left, he had seen some one from headquarters, and Rostov 
rode off in that direction, with no hope now of finding any one, but 
simply to satisfy his conscience. 

After going about two miles and passing the last of the Russian troops, 
Rostov saw, near a kitchen-garden enclosed by a ditch, two horsemen 
facing the ditch. One with a white plume in his hat seemed somehow 
a familiar figure to Rostov, the other, a stranger on a splendid chest- 
nut horse (the horse Rostov fancied he had seen before) rode up to the 
ditch, put spurs to his horse, and lightly leaped over the ditch into the 
garden. A little earth from the bank crumbled off under his horse's hind 
hoofs. Turning the horse sharply, he leaped the ditch again and deferen- 
tially addressed the horseman in the white plume, apparently urging him 
to do the same. The rider, whose figure seemed familiar to Rostov and 
somehow riveted his attention, made a gesture of refusal with his head 
and his hand, and in that gesture Rostov instantly recognised his lamented, 
his idolised sovereign. 

'But it can't be he, alone, in the middle of this empty field,' thought 
Rostov. At that moment Alexander turned his head and Rostov saw the 
beloved features so vividly imprinted on his memory. The Tsar was pale, 
his cheeks looked sunken, and his eyes hollow, but the charm, the mild- 
ness of his face was only the more striking. Rostov felt happy in the 
certainty that the report of the Emperor's wound was false. He knew 
that he might, that he ought, indeed, to go straight to him and to give him 
the message he had been commanded to give by Dolgorukov. 

But not one of the innumerable speeches he had addressed to the Tsar 
in his imagination recurred to his mind now. These speeches for the most 
part were appropriate to quite other circumstances; they had been uttered 
at moments of victory and triumph, and principally on his deathbed when, 
as he lay dying of his wounds, the Emperor thanked him for his heroic 
exploits, and he gave expression as he died to the love he had proved in 
deeds. 'And then, how am I to ask the Emperor for his instructions to the 
right flank when it's four o'clock in the afternoon and the battle is lost? 
No, certainly I ought not to ride up to him, I ought not to break in on his 
sorrow,' Rostov decided, and with grief and despair in his heart he rode 
away. 

By five o'clock in the evening the battle had been lost at every point. 
At six o'clock the only firing still to be heard was a heavy cannonade 
on the French side from numerous batteries ranged on the slope of the 
table-land of Pratzen, and directed at our retreating troops. On the 
narrow dam of Augest, where the Moravians, in their shaggy caps and 
blue jackets, had for so many years peacefully driven their horses and 
waggons, loaded with wheat, to the mill and driven back over the same 



WAR AND PEACE 139 

dam, dusty with flour that whitened their waggons— on that narrow dam 
men, made hideous by the terror of death, now crowded together, amid 
army waggons and cannons, under horses' feet and between carriage- 
wheels, crushing each other, dying, stepping over the dying, and killing 
each other, only to be killed in the same way a few steps further on. 

Prince andrey bolkonsky was lying on the hill of Pratzen, on the spot 
where he had fallen with the flagstaff in his hands. He was losing blood, 
and kept moaning a soft, plaintive, childish moan, of which he himself 
knew nothing. Towards evening he ceased moaning and became perfectly 
still. He did not know how long his unconsciousness lasted. Suddenly he 
felt again that he was alive and suffering from a burning, lacerating pain 
in his head. 

'Where is it, that lofty sky that I knew not till now and saw to-day?' 
was his first thought. 'And this agony I did not know either,' he thought. 
'Yes, I knew nothing, nothing till now. But where am I?' 

He fell to listening, and caught the sound of approaching hoofs and 
voices speaking French. Pie opened his eyes. Above him was again the 
same lofty sky, with clouds higher than ever floating over it, and between 
them stretches of blue infinity. He did not turn his head and did not see 
the men who, judging from the voices and the thud of hoofs, had ridden 
up to him and stopped. 

They were Napoleon and two adjutants escorting him. Bonaparte, mak- 
ing a tour of the field of battle, had been giving his last instructions for 
the strengthening of the battery firing at the Augest dam, and was in- 
specting the dead and wounded on the field of battle. 

'Fine men!' said Napoleon, looking at a dead Russian grenadier, who 
with his face thrust into the earth and blackened neck lay on his stomach, 
one stiff arm flung wide. 

'The field-guns have exhausted their ammunition,' said an adjutant, 
arriving that moment from the battery that was firing at Augest. 

'Bring up more from the reserve,' said Napoleon, and riding a few 
steps away stood still, looking at Prince Andrey, who lay on his back 
with the abandoned flagstaff beside him. 

'That's a fine death!' said Napoleon, looking at Bolkonsky. 

Prince Andrey knew that it was said of him, and that it was Napoleon 
saying it. He heard the speaker of those words addressed as 'your majest) .' 
But he heard the words as he heard the buzzing of flics. It was not merely 
that he took no interest in them, but he did not attend to them and at once 
forgot them. He was only glad that people were standing over him, and 
made a supreme effort to stir and utter some sound. I le moved his Leg 
faintly, and uttered a weak, sickly moan that touched himself. 'Ah, he's 
alive,' said Napoleon. 'Pick up this young man and cany him to an ambu- 
lance!' Saying this, Napoleon rode on to meet Marshal I. amies, who rode 
up to meet the conqueror, smiling, taking oif his hat and congratulating 
him on his victory. 



140 WAR AND PEACE 

Prince Andrey remembered nothing more; he lost consciousness from 
the excruciating pain caused by being laid on the stretcher, the jolting 
while he was being moved, and the sounding of his wound at the am- 
bulance. He only regained consciousness towards the end of the day when 
with other Russian officers, wounded and prisoners, he was being taken 
to the hospital. On this journey he felt a little stronger, and could look 
about him and even speak. 

The first words he heard on coming to himself were from a French 
convoy officer who was saying hurriedly: 'They must stop here; the Em- 
peror will be here directly; it will be a pleasure for him to see these 
prisoners.' 

'There are such a lot of prisoners to-day, almost the whole of the 
Russian army, that he is probably weary of seeing them,' said another 
officer. 

Bonaparte rode up at a gallop. 

Prince Andrey, who had been thrust forward under the Emperor's 
eyes to complete the show of prisoners, could not fail to attract his notice. 
Napoleon apparently remembered seeing him on the field, and addressing 
him he used the same epithet, 'young man,' with which his first sight of 
Bolkonsky was associated in his memory. 

'And you, young man,' he said to him, 'how are you feeling, mon brave?' 

Although five minutes previously Prince Andrey had been able to say 
a few words to the soldiers who were carrying him, he was silent now, 
with his eyes fastened directly upon Napoleon. So trivial seemed to him 
at that moment all the interests that were engrossing Napoleon, so petty 
seemed to him his hero, with his paltry vanity and glee of victory, in 
comparison with that lofty, righteous, and kindly sky which he had seen 
and comprehended, that he could not answer him. And all indeed seemed 
to him so trifling and unprofitable beside the stern and solemn train of 
thought aroused in him by weakness from loss of blood, by suffering 
and the nearness of death. Gazing into Napoleon's eyes, Prince Andrey 
mused on the nothingness of greatness, on the nothingness of life, of 
which no one could comprehend the significance, and on the nothingness 
—still more— of death, the meaning of which could be understood and ex- 
plained by none of the living. 

The Emperor, after vainly pausing for a reply, turned away and said 
to one of the officers in command— 

'See that they look after these gentlemen and take them to my bivouac; 
let my doctor Larrey attend to their wounds. Au revoir, Prince Repnin,' 
and he galloped away. 

His face was radiant with happiness and self-satisfaction. 

The soldiers, who had been carrying Prince Andrey, had come across 
the golden relic Princess Marya had hung upon her brother's neck, and 
taken it off him, but seeing the graciousness the Emperor had shown to the 
prisoners, they made haste to restore the holy image. 

Prince Andrey did not see who put it on him again, nor how it was 



WAR AND PEACE 141 

replaced, but all at once he found the locket on its delicate gold chain on 
his chest outside his uniform. 

'How good it would be,' thought Prince Andrey, as he glanced at the 
image which his sister had hung round his neck with such emotion and 
reverence, 'how good it would be if all were as clear and simple as it seems 
to Marie. How good to know where to seek aid in this life and what to 
expect after it, there, beyond the grave! 

'How happy and at peace I should be, if I could say now, "Lord, have 
mercy on me! . . ." But to whom am I to say that? Either a Power 
infinite, inconceivable, to which I cannot appeal, which I cannot even 
put into words, the great whole, or nothing,' he said to himself, 'or that 
God, who has been sewn up here in this locket by Marie? There is nothing, 
nothing certain but the nothingness of all that is comprehensible to us, 
and the grandeur of something incomprehensible, but more important!' 

The stretchers began to be moved. At every jolt he felt intolerable 
pain again. The fever became higher, and he fell into delirium. Visions 
of his father, his wife, his sister, and his future son, and the tenderness 
he had felt for them on the night before the battle, the figure of that little, 
petty Napoleon, and over all these the lofty sky, formed the chief sub- 
stance of his delirious dreams. The quiet home life and peaceful happi- 
ness of Bleak Hills passed before his imagination. He was enjoying that 
happiness when suddenly there appeared that little Napoleon with his 
callous, narrow look of happiness in the misery of others, and there came 
doubts and torments, and only the sky promised peace. Towards morning 
all his dreams mingled and melted away in the chaos and darkness of un- 
consciousness and oblivion, far more likely, in the opinion of Napoleon's 
doctor, Larrey, to be ended by death than by recovery. 

'He is a nervous, bilious subject,' said Larrey; 'he won't recover.' 



PART IV 



At the beginning of the year 1806, Nikolay Rostov was coming home on 
leave. Denisov, too, was going home to Voronezh, and Rostov persuaded 
him to go with him to Moscow and to pay him a visit there. Denisov 
met his comrade at the last posting station but one, drank three bottles of 
wine with him, and, in spite of the jolting of the road on the journey to 
Moscow, slept soundly lying at the bottom of the posting sledge beside 
Rostov, who grew more and more impatient, as they got nearer to Moscow. 

'Will it come soon? Soon? Oh, these insufferable streets, bunshops, street 
lamps, and sledge drivers!' thought Rostov, when they had presented their 
papers at the town gates and were driving into Moscow. 

'Denisov, we're here! Asleep!' he kept saying, flinging his whole person 
forward as though by that position he hoped to hasten the progress of 
the sledge. Denisov made no response. 

'Here's the corner of the cross-roads, where Zahar the sledge-driver 
used to stand; and here is Zahar, too, and still the same horse. And here'* 
the little shop where we used to buy cakes. Make haste! Now!' 

'Which house is it?' asked the driver. 

'Over there, at the end, the big one; how is it you don't see it? That's 
our house,' Rostov kept saying; 'that's our house, of course. Denisov! Deni- 
sov! we shall be there in a minute.' 

Denisov raised his head, cleared his throat, and said nothing. 

'Dmitry,' said Rostov to his valet on the box, 'surely that light is home?' 

'To be sure it is; it's the light in your papa's study, too.' 

'They've not gone to bed yet? Eh? What do you think?' 

'Mind now, don't forget to get me out my new tunic,' added Rostov, 
fingering his new moustaches. 

'Come, get on,' he shouted to the driver. 'And do wake up, Vasya,' he 
said to Denisov, who had begun nodding again. 

'Come, get on, three silver roubles for vodka— get on!' shouted Rostov, 
when they were only three houses from the entrance. It seemed to him 
that the horses were not moving. At last the sledge turned to the right 
into the approach, Rostov saw the familiar cornice with the broken plaster 
overhead, the steps, the lamp-post. He jumped out of the sledge while it 
was moving and ran into the porch. The house stood so inhospitably, as 
though it were no concern of its who had come into it. There was no one 
in the porch. 'My God! is everything all right?' wondered Rostov, stop- 

142 



WAR AND PEACE 143 

ping for a moment with a sinking heart, and then running on again along 
the porch and up the familiar, crooked steps. Still the same door handle, 
the dirtiness of which so often angered the countess, turned in the same 
halting fashion. In the hall there was a single tallow candle burning. 

Old Mihailo was asleep on his perch. 

Prokofy, the footman, a man so strong that he had lifted up a carriage, 
was sitting there in his list shoes. He glanced towards the opening door 
and his expression of sleepy indifference was suddenly transformed into 
one of frightened ecstasy. 

'Merciful Heavens! The young count!' he cried, recognising his young 
master. 'Can it be? my darling?' And Prokofy, shaking v/ith emotion, 
made a dash towards the drawing-room door, probably with the view of 
announcing him; but apparently he changed his mind, for he came back 
and fell on his young master's shoulder. 

'All well?' asked Rostov, pulling his hand away from him. 

'Thank God, yes! All, thank God! Only just finished supper! Let me 
have a look at you, your excellency!' 

'Everything perfectly all right?' 

'Thank God, yes, thank God!' 

Rostov, completely forgetting Denisov, flung off his fur coat and, anxious 
that no one should prepare the way for him, he ran on tip-toe into the 
big, dark reception-hall. Everything was the same, the same card-tables, 
the same candelabra with a cover over it, but some one had already 
seen the young master, and he had not reached the drawing-room when 
from a side door something swooped headlong, like a storm upon him, and 
began hugging and kissing him. A second and a third figure dashed in at a 
second door and at a third; more huggings, more kisses, more outcries 
and tears of delight. He could not distinguish where and which was papa, 
which was Natasha, and which was Petya. All were screaming and talking 
and kissing him at the same moment. Only his mother was not among 
them, that he remembered. 

'And I never knew . . . Nikolenka . . . my darling!' 

'Here he is . . . our boy . . . my darling Kolya . . . Isn't he changed! 
Where are the candles? Tea!' 

Sonya, Natasha, Petya, Anna Mihalovna, and the old count were all 
hugging him; and the servants and the maids flocked into the room with 
talk and outcries. 

Petya hung on his legs. 

'Me too!' he kept shouting. 

Still he was expectant and looking for some one, and the old countess had 
not come in yet. And now steps were heard at the door. The steps were 
so rapid that they could hardly be his mother's footsteps. 

But she it was in a new dress that he did not know, made during his 
absence. All of them let him go, and he ran to her. When they came 
together, she sank on his bosom, sobbing. She could not lift up her face, 
and only pressed it to the cold braiding of his hussar's iacket. Denisov, 



144 WAR AND PEACE 

who had come into the room unnoticed by any one, stood still looking at 
them and rubbing his eyes. 

'Vassily Denisov, your son's friend/ he said, introducing himself to the 
count, who looked inquiringly at him. 

'Very welcome. I know you, I know you,' said the count, kissing and 
embracing Denisov. 'Nikolenka wrote to us . . . Natasha, here he is, 
Denisov.' 

The same happy, ecstatic faces turned to the towzled figure of Denisov 
and he was conducted to the room assigned him, while the Rostovs all 
gathered about Nikolenka. 

The old countess sat beside him, keeping tight hold of his hand. His 
brother and sisters quarrelled and snatched from one another the place 
nearest him and disputed over which was to bring him tea, a handkerchief, 
a pipe. 

Rostov was very happy in the love they showed him. But the first 
minute of meeting them had been so blissful that his happiness now 
seemed a little thing, and he kept expecting something more and more 
and more. 

Next morning after his journey he slept on till ten o'clock. 

Nikolay Rostov was received by his family as a hero, as the best of sons, 
their idolised Nikolenka; by his relations as a charming, agreeable, and 
polite young man; by his acquaintances as a handsome lieutenant of 
hussars, a good dancer, and one of the best matches in Moscow. 

All Moscow was acquainted with the Rostovs; the old count had 
plenty of money that year, because all his estates had been mortgaged, 
and so Nikolenka, who kept his own racehorse, and wore the most fash- 
ionable riding-breeches of a special cut, unlike any yet seen in Moscow, 
and the most fashionable boots, with extremely pointed toes, and little 
silver spurs, was able to pass his time very agreeably. After the first 
brief interval of adapting himself to the old conditions of life, Rostov felt 
very happy at being home again. He felt that he had grown up and be- 
come a man. His despair at failing in a Scripture examination, his borrow- 
ing money from Gavrilo for his sledge-drivers, his stolen kisses with Sonya 
—all that he looked back upon as childishness from which he was now 
immeasurably remote. Now he was a lieutenant of hussars with a silver- 
braided jacket, and a soldier's cross of St. George, he had a horse in 
training for a race, and kept company with well-known racing men, 
elderly and respected persons. He had struck up an acquaintance, too, 
with a lady living in a boulevard, whom he used to visit in the evening, 
He led the mazurka at the Arharovs' balls, talked to Field-Marshal 
Kamensky about the war, and used familiar forms of address to a colonel 
of forty, to whom he had been introduced by Denisov. 

During this brief stay in Moscow, before his return to the army, Rostov 
did not come nearer to Sonya, but on the contrary drifted further away 
from her. She was very pretty and charming, and it was obvious that she 
was passionately in love with him. But he was at that stage of youth when 



WAR AND PEACE 145 

there seems so much to do, that one has not time to pay attention to love, 
and a young man dreads being bound, and prizes his liberty, which 
he wants for so much else. When he thought about Sonya during this stay 
at Moscow, he said to himself: 'Ah! there are many, many more like her 
to come, and there are many of them somewhere now, though I don't 
know them yet. There's plenty of time before me to think about love 
when I want to, but I have not the time now.' Moreover, it seemed to 
him that feminine society was somehow beneath his manly dignity. He 
went to balls, and into ladies' society with an affectation of doing so against 
his will. Races, the English club, carousals with Denisov, and the nocturnal 
visits that followed— all that was different, all that was the correct thing 
for a dashing young hussar. 

At the beginning of March the old count, Ilya Andreivitch Rostov, was 
very busily engaged in arranging a dinner at the English Club, to be given 
in honour of Prince Bagration. 

The count, in his dressing-gown, was continually walking up and down 
in the big hall, seeing the club manager, the celebrated Feoktista, and the 
head cook, and giving them instructions relative to asparagus, fresh cucum- 
bers, strawberries, veal, and fish, for Prince Bagration's dinner. The cook 
and the club manager listened to the count's orders with good-humoured 
faces, because they knew that with no one better than with him could 
one make a handsome profit out of a dinner costing several thousands. 

'Well, then, mind there are scallops, scallops in pie-crust, you know.' 

'Cold entrees, I suppose— three? . . .' questioned the cook. 

The count pondered. 

'Couldn't do with less, three . . . mayonnaise, one,' he said, crooking 
his finger. 

'Then it's your excellency's order to take the big sturgeons?' asked the 
manager. 

'Yes; it can't be helped, we must take them, if they won't knock the 
price down. Ah, mercy on us, I was forgetting. Of course we must have 
another entree on the table. Ah, good heavens!' he clutched at his head. 
'And who's going to get me the flowers? Mitenka! Hey, Mitenka! You 
gallop, Mitenka,' he said to the steward who came in at his call, 'you 
gallop off to the Podmoskovny estate' (the count's property in the en- 
virons of Moscow), 'and tell Maksimka the gardener to set the serfs to 
work to get decorations from the greenhouses. T Jl him everything from 
his conservatories is to be brought here, and is to be packed in felt. And 
that I'm to have two hundred pots here by Friday.' 

'Ah, my boy! my head's in a whirl,' said the old gentleman, with a 
somewhat shamefaced smile at his son. 'You might come to my aid! We 
have still the singers to get, you see. The music is all settled, but shouldn't 
we order some gypsy singers? You military gentlemen arc fond of that 
sort of thing.' 

'Upon my word, papa, I do believe that Prince Bagration made less 



146 WAR AND PEACE 

fuss over getting ready for the battle of Schongraben than you are making 
now,' said his son, smiling. 

The old count pretended to be angry, and gaily seizing his son by both 
hands, he cried: 'Do you know now I've got hold of you! Take a sledge and 
pair this minute and drive off to Bezuhov, and say that Count Ilya Andrei- 
vitch has sent, say, to ask him for strawberries and fresh pineapples. There's 
no getting them from any one else. If he's not at home himself, you go 
in and give the message to the princesses; and, I say, from there you drive 
off to the Gaiety— Ipatka the coachman knows the place— and look up 
Ilyushka there, the gypsy who danced at Count Orlov's, do you remem- 
ber, in a white Cossack dress, and bring him here to me.' 

'And bring his gypsy girls here with him?' asked Nikolay, laughing. 

At this moment Anna Mihalovna stepped noiselessly into the room with 
that air of Christian meekness, mingled with practical and anxious pre- 
occupation that never left her face. 

'I am just going to see Bezuhov,' she said. 'Young Bezuhov has arrived, 
and now we shall get all we want, count, from his greenhouses. I was 
wanting to see him on my own account, too. He has forwarded me a 
letter from Boris. Thank God, Boris is now on the staff.' 

The count was overjoyed at Anna Mihalovna's undertaking one part of 
his commissions. 

'Tell Bezuhov to come. I'll put his name down. Brought his wife with 
him?' he asked. 

Anna Mihalovna turned up her eyes, and an expression of profound 
sadness came into her face. 

'Ah, my dear, he's very unhappy,' she said. 'If it's true what we have 
been hearing, it's awful. How little did we think of this when we were 
rejoicing in his happiness! and such a lofty, angelic nature, that young 
Bezuhov! Yes, I pity him from my soul, and will do my utmost to give 
him any consolation in my power.' 

'Why, what is the matter?' inquired both the Rostovs, young and old 
together. 

Anna Mihalovna heaved a deep sigh. 

'Dolohov, Marya Ivanovna's son,' she said in a mysterious whisper, 
'has, they say, utterly compromised her. He brought him forward, invited 
him to his house in Petersburg, and now this! . . . She has come here, 
and that scapegrace has come after her,' said Anna Mihalovna. She 
wished to express nothing but sympathy with Pierre, but in her involuntary 
intonations and half-smile, she betrayed her sympathy with the scapegrace, 
as she called Dolohov. 'Pierre himself, they say, is utterly crushed by his 
trouble.' 

'Well, any way, tell him to come to the club— it will divert his mind. 
It will be a banquet on a grand scale.' 

On receiving the news of the defeat of Austerlitz, all Moscow had at 
first been thrown into bewilderment. At that period the Russians were so 
used to victories, that on receiving news of a defeat, some people were 



WAR AND PEACE 147 

simply incredulous, while others sought an explanation of so strange an 
event in exceptional circumstances of some kind. At the English Club, 
where every one of note, every one who had authentic information and 
weight gathered together, during December, when the news began to 
arrive, not a word was said about the war and about the last defeat; it was 
as though all were in a conspiracy of silence. 

People felt in Moscow that something was wrong, and that it was dif- 
ficult to know what to think of the bad news, and so better to be silent. 
But a little later, like jurymen coming out of their consultation room, 
the leaders reappeared to give their opinion in the club, and a clear and 
definite formula was found. Causes had been discovered to account for the 
fact— so incredible, unheard-of, and impossible— that the Russians had been 
beaten, and all became clear. These causes were: the treachery of the 
Austrians; the defective commissariat; the treachery of the Pole Przheby- 
shevsky and the Frenchman Langeron; the incapacity of Kutuzov; and 
(this was murmured in subdued tones) the youth and inexperience of the 
Emperor, who had put faith in men of no character and ability. But the 
army, the Russian army, said every one, had been extraordinary, and had 
performed miracles of valour. The soldiers, the officers, the generals— all 
were heroes. But the hero among heroes was Prince Bagration, who had 
distinguished himself in the retreat from Austerlitz, where he alone had 
withdrawn his column in good order, and had succeeded in repelling dur- 
ing the whole day an enemy twice as numerous. What contributed to 
Bagration's being chosen for the popular hero at Moscow was the fact 
that he was an outsider, that he had no connections in Moscow. In his 
person they could do honour to the simple fighting Russian soldier, un- 
supported by connections and intrigues. Nothing was said about Bolkonsky, 
and only those who had known him intimately regretted that he had died 
so young, leaving a wife with child, and his queer old father. 

On the 3rd of March all the rooms of the English Club were full of the 
hum of voices, and the members and guests of the club, in uniforms and 
frock-coats, some even in powder and Russian kaftans, were standing, 
meeting, parting, and running to and fro like bees swarming in spring. 
Powdered footmen in livery, wearing slippers and stockings, stood at every 
door, anxiously trying to follow every movement of the guests and club 
members, so as to proffer their services. The majority of those present 
were elderly and respected persons, with broad, self-confident faces, fat 
fingers, and resolute gestures and voices. Guests and members of this 
class sat in certain habitual places, and met together in certain habitual 
circles. A small proportion of those present were casual guests— chiefly 
young men, among them Denisov, Rostov, and Dolohov, who was now 
an officer in the Semyonovsky regiment again. The faces of the younger 
men, especially the officers, wore that expression of condescending defer- 
ence to their elders which seems to say to the older generation, 'Respect 
and deference we are prepared to give you, but remember all the s;unc the 
future is for us.' Nesvitsky, an old member of the club, was there too. 



148 WAR AND PEACE 

Pierre, who at his wife's command had let his hair grow and left off 
spectacles, was walking about the rooms dressed in the height of the 
fashion, but looking melancholy and depressed. Here, as everywhere, he 
was surrounded by the atmosphere of people paying homage to his wealth, 
and he behaved to them with the careless, contemptuous air of sovereignty 
that had become habitual with him. 

In years, he belonged to the younger generation, but by his wealth and 
connections he was a member of the older circles, and so he passed from 
one set to the other. 

Count Ilva Andreivitch Rostov kept anxiously hurrying in his soft boots 
to and fro from the dining-room to the drawing-room, giving hasty greet- 
ings to important and unimportant persons, all of whom he knew, and all 
of whom he treated alike, on an equal footing. Now and then his eyes 
sought out the graceful, dashing figure of his young son, rested gleefully 
on him, and winked to him. Young Rostov was standing at the window 
w T ith Dolohov, whose acquaintance he had lately made, and greatly prized. 
The old count went up to them, and shook hands with Dolohov. 

'I beg you will come and see us; so you're a friend of my youngster's 
. . . been together, playing the hero together out there. . . .' 

Just before dinner, Count Ilya Andreivitch presented his son to the 
prince. Bagration recognised him, and uttered a few words, awkward and 
incoherent, as were indeed all he spoke that day. Count Ilya Andreivitch 
looked about at every one in gleeful pride while Bagration was speaking 
to his son. 

Nikolay Rostov, with Denisov and his new acquaintance Dolohov, sat 
together almost in the middle of the table. Facing them sat Pierre with 
Prince Nesvitsky. Count Ilya Andreivitch was sitting with the other stew- 
ards facing Bagration, and, the very impersonation of Moscow hospitality, 
did his utmost to regale the prince. 

Pierre ate greedily and drank heavily, as he always did. But those who 
knew him slightly could see that some great change was taking place in 
him that day. He was silent all through dinner, depressed and gloomy. 
He seemed not to be seeing or hearing what was passing about him and to 
be thinking of some one thing, something painful and unsettled. 

This unsettled question that worried him was due to the hints dropped 
by the princess, his cousin, at Moscow in regard to Dolohov's close 
intimacy with his wife, and to an anonymous letter he had received that 
morning, which, with the vile jocoseness peculiar to all anonymous letters, 
had said that he didn't seem to see clearly through his spectacles, and 
that his wife's connection with Dolohov was a secret from no one but 
himself. Pierre did not absolutely believe either the princess's hints, or 
the anonymous letter, but he was afraid now to look at Dolohov, who sat 
opposite him. Every time his glance casually met Dolohov's handsome, 
insolent eyes, Pierre felt as though something awful, hideous was rising 
up in his soul, and he made haste to turn away. 

Involuntarily recalling all his wife's past and her attitude to Dolohov, 



WAR AND PEACE 149 

Pierre saw clearly that what was said in the letter might well be true, 
might at least appear to be truth, if only it had not related to his 
wife. Pierre could not help recalling how Dolohov, completely rein- 
stated, had come straight to his house, and Pierre had established him in it 
and lent him money. Pierre recalled how Ellen, smiling, had expressed her 
dissatisfaction at Dolohov's staying in their house, and how cynically 
Dolohov had praised his wife's beauty to him, and how he had never since 
left them up to the time of their coming to Moscow. 

'Yes, he is very handsome,' thought Pierre, 'and I know him. There 
would be a particular charm for him in disgracing my name and turning 
me into ridicule, just because I have exerted myself in his behalf, have 
befriended him and helped him. He must think I am afraid of him. And, 
in fact, I really am afraid of him,' Pierre mused; and again at these thoughts 
he felt as though something terrible and hideous were rising up in his soul. 

Dolohov, Denisov, and Rostov seemed to be greatly enjoying themselves. 
Rostov talked away merrily to his two friends, of whom one was a 
dashing hussar, the other a notorious duellist and scapegrace, and now 
and then cast ironical glances at Pierre, whose appearance at the dinner 
was a striking one, with his preoccupied, absent-minded, massive figure. 
Rostov looked with disfavour upon Pierre. In the first place, because 
Pierre, in the eyes of the smart hussar, was a rich civilian, and husband 
of a beauty, was altogether, in fact, an old woman; and secondly, be- 
cause Pierre in his preoccupation and absent-mindedness had not recognised 
Rostov and had failed to respond to his bow. When they got up to drink 
the health of the Tsar, Pierre, plunged in thought, did not rise nor take 
up his glass. 

'What are you about?' Rostov shouted to him, looking at him with 
enthusiastic and exasperated eyes. 'Don't you hear: the health of our 
sovereign the Emperor!' 

Pierre with a sigh obeyed, got up, emptied his glass, and waiting till all 
were seated again, he turned with his kindly smile to Rostov. 'Why, I 
didn't recognise you,' he said. But Rostov had no thoughts for him, he 
was shouting 'Hurrah!' 

'Why don't you renew the acquaintance?' said Dolohov to Rostov. 

'Oh, bother him, he's a fool,' said Rostov. 

'One has to be sweet to the husbands of pretty women,' said Denisov. 
Pierre did not hear what they were saying, but he knew they were talking 
of him. He flushed and turned away. 'Well, now to the health of pretty 
women,' said Dolohov, and with a serious expression, though a smile 
lurked in the corners of his mouth, he turned to Pierre. 

'To the health of pretty women, Petrusha, and their lovers too,' he said. 

Pierre, with downcast eyes, sipped his glass, without looking at Dolohov 
or answering him. The footman, distributing copies of Kutuzov's cantata, 
laid a copy by Pierre, as one of the more honoured guests. He would 
have taken it, but Dolohov bent forward, snatched the paper out of his 
hands and began reading it. Pierre glanced at Dolohov, and his eyes 



150 WAR AND PEACE 

dropped; something terrible and hideous, that had been torturing him all 
through the dinner, rose up and took possession of him. He bent the 
whole of his ungainly person across the table. 'Don't you dare to take 
it!' he shouted. 

Hearing that shout and seeing to whom it was addressed, Nesvitsky 
and his neighbour on the right side turned in haste and alarm to Bezuhov. 

'Hush, hush, w r hat are you about?' whispered panic-stricken voices. 
Dolohov looked at Pierre with his clear, mirthful, cruel eyes, still with 
the same smile, as though he were saying: 'Come now, this is what I like.' 

'I won't give it up,' he said distinctly. 

Pale and with quivering lips, Pierre snatched the copy. 

'You . . . you . . . blackguard! ... I challenge you,' he said, and mov- 
ing back his chair, he got up from the table. At the second Pierre did 
this and uttered these words he felt that the question of his wife's guilt, 
that had been torturing him for the last four and twenty hours, was finally 
and incontestably answered in the affirmative. He hated her and was 
severed from her for ever. 

In spite of Denisov's entreaties that Rostov would have nothing to do 
with the affair, Rostov agreed to be Dolohov's second, and after dinner he 
discussed with Nesvitsky, Bezuhov's second, the arrangements for the duel. 
Pierre had gone home, but Rostov with Dolohov and Denisov stayed on 
at the club listening to the gypsies and the singers till late in the evening. 

'So good-bye till to-morrow, at Sokolniky,' said Dolohov, as he parted 
from Rostov at the club steps. 

'And do you feel quite calm?' asked Rostov. 

Dolohov stopped. 

'Well, do you see, in a couple of words I'll let you into the whole secret 
of duelling. If, when you go to a duel, you make your will and write long 
letters to your parents, if you think that you may be killed, you're a fool 
and certain to be done for. But go with the firm intention of killing your 
man, as quickly and as surely as may be, then everything will be all right. 
A demai?i> mon cherj 

Next day at eight o'clock in the morning, Pierre and Nesvitsky reached 
the Sokolniky copse, and found Dolohov, Denisov, and Rostov alreadv 
there. Pierre had the air of a man absorbed in reflections in no way con- 
nected with the matter in hand. His face looked hollow and yellow. He 
had not slept all night. He looked about him absent-mindedly, and screwed 
up his eyes, as though in glaring sunshine. He was exclusively absorbed 
by two considerations: the guilt of his wife, of which after a sleepless 
night he had not a vestige of doubt, and the guiltlessness of Dolohov, who 
was in no way bound to guard the honour of a man, who was nothing to 
him. 'Maybe I should have done the same in his place,' thought Pierre. 
'For certain, indeed, I should have done the same; then why this duel, 
this murder? Either I shall kill him, or he will shoot me in the head, in the 
elbow, or the knee. To get away from here, to run, to bury myself some- 



WAR AND PEACE 151 

where,' was the longing that came into his mind. But precisely at the 
moments when such ideas were in his mind, he would turn with a 
peculiarly calm and unconcerned face, which inspired respect in the 
seconds looking at him, and ask: 'Will it be soon?' or 'Aren't we ready?' 

When everything was ready, the swords stuck in the snow to mark 
the barrier, and the pistols loaded, Nesvitsky went up to Pierre. 

'I should not be doing my duty, count,' he said in a timid voice, 'nor 
justifying the confidence and the honour you have done me in choosing 
me for your second, if at this grave moment, this very grave moment, I 
did not speak the whole truth to you. I consider that the quarrel has not 
sufficient grounds and is not worth shedding blood over. . . . You were 
not right, not quite in the right; you lost your temper. . . .' 

'Oh, yes, it was awfully stupid,' said Pierre. 

'Then allow me to express your regret, and I am convinced that our 
opponents will agree to accept your apology,' said Nesvitsky. 

'No, what are you talking about?' said Pierre; 'it doesn't matter. . . . 
Ready then?' he added. 'Only tell me how and where I am to go, and 
what to shoot at?' he said with a smile unnaturally gentle. He took up a 
pistol, and began inquiring how to let it off, as he had never had a pistol 
in his hand before, a fact he did not care to confess. 'Oh, yes, of course, 
I know, I had only forgotten,' he said. 

'No apologies, absolutely nothing,' Dolohov was saying to Denisov, who 
for his part was also making an attempt at reconciliation, and he too went 
up to the appointed spot. 

The place chosen for the duel was some eighty paces from the road, 
on which their sledges had been left, in a small clearing in the pine wood, 
covered with snow that had thawed in the warmer weather of the last 
few days. The antagonists stood forty paces from each other at the fur- 
ther edge of the clearing. The seconds, in measuring the paces, left tracks 
in the deep, wet snow from the spot where they had been standing to the 
swords of Nesvitsky and Denisov, which had been thrust in the ground 
ten paces from one another to mark the barrier. The thaw and mist 
persisted; forty paces away nothing could be seen. In three minutes 
everything was ready, but still they delayed beginning. Every one was 
silent. 

'Well, let us begin,' said Dolohov. 

'To be sure,' said Pierre, still with the same smi 

A feeling of dread was in the air. It was obvious that the affair chat 
had begun so lightly could not now be in any way turned back, that it 
was going forward of itself, independently of men's will, and must run 
its course. Denisov was the first to come forward to the barrier and pro- 
nounce the words: 

'Since the antagonists refuse all reconciliation, would it not be as well 
to begin? Take your pistols, and at the word "three" begin to advance 
together. O . . . one! Two! Three! . . .' Denisov shouted angrily, and 
he walked away from the barrier. Both walked along the trodden track? 



152 WAR AND PEACE 

closer and closer together, beginning to recognise one another in the mist. 
The combatants had the right to fire when they chose as they approached 
the barrier. Dolohov walked slowly, not lifting his pistol, and looking 
intently with his clear, shining blue eyes into the face of his antagonist. 
His mouth wore, as always, the semblance of a smile. 

'So when I like, I can fire,' said Pierre, and at the word three, he walked 
with rapid steps forward, straying off the beaten track and stepping 
over the untrodden snow. Pierre held his pistol at full length in his right 
hand, obviously afraid of killing himself with that pistol. His left arm 
he studiously held behind him, because he felt inclined to use it to sup- 
port his right arm, and he knew that was not allowed. After advancing 
six paces, and getting off the track into the snow, Pierre looked about 
under his feet, glanced rapidly again at Dolohov, and stretching out his 
finger, as he had been shown, fired. 

Not at all expecting so loud a report, Pierre started at his own shot, 
then smiled at his own sensation and stood still. The smoke, which was 
made thicker by the fog, hindered him from seeing for the first moment; 
but the other shot that he was expecting did not follow. All that could 
be heard were Dolohov's rapid footsteps, and his figure came into view 
through the smoke. With one hand he was clutching at his left side, the 
other was clenched on the lower pistol. His face was pale. Rostov was 
running up and saying something to him. 

'N . . . no,' Dolohov muttered through his teeth, 'no, it's not over'; 
and struggling on a few sinking, staggering steps up to the sword, he sank 
on to the snow beside it. His left hand was covered with blood; he rubbed 
it on his coat and leaned upon it. His face was pale, frowning and trem- 
bling. 

'Co . . .' Dolohov began, but he could not at once articulate the words: 
'come up,' he said, with an effort. Pierre, hardly able to restrain his sobs, 
ran towards Dolohov, and would have crossed the space that separated 
the barriers, when Dolohov cried: 'To the barrier!' and Pierre, grasping 
what was wanted, stood still just at the sword. Only ten paces divided 
them. Dolohov putting his head down, greedily bit at the snow, lifted his 
head again, sat up, tried to get on his legs and sat down, trying to find 
a secure centre of gravity. He took a mouthful of the cold snow, and 
sucked it; his lips quivered, but still he smiled; his eyes glittered with 
the strain and the exasperation of the struggle with his failing forces. He 
raised the pistol and began taking aim. 

'Sideways, don't expose yourself to the pistol,' said Nesvitsky. 

'Don't face it!' Denisov could not help shouting, though it was to an 
antagonist. 

With his gentle smile of sympathy and remorse, Pierre stood with his 
legs and arms straddling helplessly, and his broad chest directly facing 
Dolohov, and looked at him mournfully. Denisov, Rostov, and Nesvitsky 
screwed up their eyes. At the same instant they heard a shot and Dolohov's 
wrathful cry. 



WAR AND PEACE 153 

'Missed!' shouted Dolohov, and he dropped helplessly, face downwards, 
in the snow. Pierre clutched at his head, and turning back, walked into 
the wood, off the path in the snow, muttering aloud incoherent words. 

'Stupid . . . stupid! Death . . . lies . . .' he kept repeating, scowling. 
Nesvitsky stopped him and took him home. 

Rostov and Denisov got the wounded Dolohov away. 

Dolohov lay in the sledge with closed eyes, in silence, and uttered 
not a word in reply to questions addressed to him. But as they were 
driving into Moscow, he suddenly came to himself, and lifting his head 
with an effort, he took the hand of Rostov, who was sitting near him. 
Rostov was struck by the utterly transformed and unexpectedly passion- 
ately tender expression on Dolohov's face. 

'Well? How do you feel?' asked Rostov. 

'Bad! but that's not the point. My friend,' said Dolohov, in a breaking 
voice, 'where are we? We are in Moscow, I know. I don't matter, but 
I have killed her, killed her. . . . She won't get over this. She can't 
bear . . .' 

'Who?' asked Rostov. 

'My mother. My mother, my angel, my adored angel, my mother,' 
and squeezing Rostov's hand, Dolohov burst into tears. When he was a 
little calmer, he explained to Rostov that he was living with his mother, 
that if his mother were to see him dying, she would not get over the 
shock. He besought Rostov to go to her and prepare her. 

Rostov drove on ahead to carry out his wish, and to his immense astonish- 
ment he learned that Dolohov, this bully, this noted duellist Dolohov, lived 
at Moscow with his old mother and a hunchback sister, and was the 
tenderest son and brother. 

Pierre had of late rarely seen his wife alone. Both at Petersburg and at 
Moscow their house had been constantly full of guests. On the night fol- 
lowing the duel he did not go to his bedroom, but spent the night, as he 
often did, in his huge study, formerly his father's room, the very room 
indeed in which Count Bezuhov had died. 

Far from going to sleep, he could not even sit still in one place, and was 
forced to leap up and pace with rapid steps about the room. At one mo- 
ment he had a vision of his wife, as she was in the first days after their 
marriage, with her bare shoulders, and languid, p tsionate eyes; and then 
immediately by her side he saw the handsome, impudent, hard, and 
ironical face of Dolohov, as he had seen it at the banquet, and again the 
same face of Dolohov, pale, quivering, in agony, as it had been when 
he turned and sank in the snow. 

'What has happened?' he asked himself; 'I have killed her lover; yes, 
killed the lover of my wife. Yes, that has happened. Why was it? How 
have I come to this?' 'Because you married her,' answered an inner voice. 

'But how am I to blame?' he asked. 'For marrying without loving her, 
for deceiving yourself and her.' And vividly he recalled that minute after 



154 WAR AND PEACE 

supper at Prince Vassily's when he had said those words he found so 
difficult to utter: 'I love you.' 'It has all come from that. Even then I felt 
it,' he thought; 'I felt at the time that it wasn't the right thing, that I had 
no right to do it. And so it has turned out.' 

Then he thought of the coarseness, the bluntness of her ideas, and the 
vulgarity of the expressions that were characteristic of her, although she 
had been brought up in the highest aristocratic circles. 'Not quite such a 
fool . . . you just try it on . . . you clear out of this,' she would say. 
But at the moment when he believed himself soothed by reflections of 
that sort, he suddenly had a vision of her, and of her at those moments 
when he had most violently expressed his most insincere love to her, and he 
felt a rush of blood to his heart, and had to jump up again, and move 
about and break and tear to pieces anything that his hands came across. 
'Why did I say to her "I love you"?' he kept repeating to himself. And as 
he repeated the question for the tenth time the saying of Moliere came 
into his head: 'But what the devil was he doing in that galley?' and he 
laughed at himself. 

In the night he called for his valet and bade him pack up to go to 
Petersburg. He could not conceive how he was going to speak to her now. 
He resolved that next day he would go away, leaving her a letter, in 
which he would announce his intention of parting from her for ever. 

In the morning when the valet came into the study with his coffee, 
Pierre was lying on an ottoman asleep w T ith an open book in his hand. 

'The countess sent to inquire if your excellency were at home,' said the 
valet. 

But before Pierre had time to make up his mind what answer he 
would send, the countess herself walked calmly and majestically into the 
room. She was wearing a white satin dressing-gown embroidered with 
silver, and had her hair in two immense coils wound like a coronet round 
her exquisite head. In spite of her calm, there was a wrathful line on 
her rather prominent, marble brow. She did not sit down, but stood look- 
ing at him with a disdainful smile, waiting for the valet to be gone. 

'What's this about now? What have you been up to? I'm asking you,' 
she said sternly. 

'I? I? what?' said Pierre. 

'You going in for deeds of valour! Now, answer me, what does this 
duel mean? What did you want to prove by it? Eh! I ask you the ques- 
tion.' Pierre turned heavily on the sofa, opened his mouth but could not 
answer. 

'If you won't answer, I'll tell you . . .' Ellen went on. 'You believe 
everything you're told. You were told . . .' Ellen laughed, 'that Dolohov 
was my lover,' she said in French, with her coarse plainness of speech, 
uttering the word l a?nan? like any other word, 'and you believed it! But 
what have you proved by this? What have you proved by this duel? That 
you're a fool; but every one knew that as it was. What does it lead to? 
Why, that I'm made a laughing-stock to all Moscow: that every one's 



WAR AND PEACE 155 

saying that when you were drunk and didn't know what you were doing, 
you challenged a man of whom you were jealous without grounds,' Ellen 
raised her voice and grew more and more passionate; 'who's a better man 
than you in every respect. . . .' 

'Hem . . . hem . . .' Pierre growled, wrinkling up his face, and neither 
looking at her nor stirring a muscle. 

'And how came you to believe that he's my lover? . . . Eh? Because I 
like his society? If you were cleverer and more agreeable., I should prefer 
yours.' 

'Don't speak to me ... I beseech you,' Pierre muttered huskily. 

'Why shouldn't I speak? I can speak as I like, and I tell you boldly that 
it's not many a wife who with a husband like you wouldn't have taken a 
lover, but I haven't done it,' she said. Pierre tried to say something, glanced 
at her with strange eyes, whose meaning she did not comprehend, and lay 
down again. He was in physical agony at that moment; he felt a weight on 
his chest so that he could not breathe. He knew that he must do something 
to put an end to this agony but what he wanted to do was too horrible. 

'We had better part,' he articulated huskily. 

'Part, by all means, only if you give me a fortune,' said Ellen. . . . 

Pierre leaped up from the couch and rushed staggering towards her. 

'I'll kill you!' he shouted, and snatching up a marble slab from a table 
with a strength he had not known in himself till then, he made a step 
towards her and waved it at her. 

Ellen's face was terrible to see; she shrieked and darted away from him. 
His father's nature showed itself in him. Pierre felt the abandonment and 
the fascination of frenzy. He flung down the slab, shivering it into frag- 
ments, and with open arms swooping down upon Ellen, screamed 'Go!' in 
a voice so terrible that they heard it all over the house with horror. God 
knows what Pierre would have done at that moment if Ellen had not run 
out of the room. 

A week later Pierre had made over to his wife the revenue from all his 
estates in Great Russia, which made up the larger half of his property, and 
had gone away alone to Petersburg. 

Two months had passed since the news of the defeat of Austerlitz and 
the loss of Prince Andrey had reached Bleak Hills. In spite of all researches 
and letters through the Russian embassy, his body nad not been found, nor 
was he among the prisoners. What made it worst of all for his father and 
sister was the fact that there was still hope that he might have been picked 
up on the battlefield by the people of the country, and might perhaps be 
lying, recovering, or dying somewhere alone, among strangers. 

A week after the newspaper that had brought news of the defeat of 
Austerlitz, came a letter from Kutuzov, who described to the old prince the 
part taken in it by his son. 

'Before my eyes,' wrote Kutuzov, 'your son with the flag in his hands, 
at the head of a regiment, fell like a hero, worthy of his father and his 



156 WAR AND PEACE 

fatherland. To my regret and the general regret of the whole army it has 
not been ascertained up to now whether he is alive or dead. I comfort 
myself and you with the hope that your son is living, as, otherwise, he would 
have been mentioned among the officers found on the field of battle, a list 
of whom has been given me under flag of truce.' 

After receiving this letter, late in the evening when he was alone in his 
study, the old prince went for his morning walk as usual next day. But he 
was silent with the bailiff, the gardener, and the architect, and though he 
looked wrathful, said nothing to them. When Princess Marya went in to 
him at the usual hour, he was standing at the lathe and went on turning as 
usual, without looking round at her. 'Ah? Princess Marya!' he said suddenly 
in an unnatural voice, and he let the lathe go. 

'Father! Andrey? . . .' said the ungainly, awkward princess with such 
unutterable beauty of sorrow and self-forgetfulness that her father could 
not bear to meet her eyes and turned away sobbing. 

'I have had news. Not among the prisoners, not among the killed, Kutu- 
zov writes,' he screamed shrilly, as though he would drive his daughter 
away with that shriek. 'Killed!' 

The princess did not swoon, she did not fall into a faint. She was pale, 
but when she heard those words her face was transformed, and there was 
a radiance of something in her beautiful, luminous eyes. Something Uke 
joy, an exalted joy, apart from the sorrows and joys of this world, flooded 
the bitter grief she felt within her. She forgot all her terror of her father, 
went up to him, took him by the hand, drew him to her, and put her arm 
about his withered, sinewy neck. 

'Father,' she said, 'do not turn away from me, let us weep for him to- 
gether.' 

'Blackguards, scoundrels!' screamed the old man, turning his face away 
from her. 'Destroying the army, destroying men! What for? Go, go and 
tell Liza.' 

Princess Marya sank helplessly into an armchair beside her father and 
burst into tears. She could see her brother now at the moment when iron- 
ically he had put the image on. 'Did he believe now? Had he repented of 
his unbelief? Was he there now? There in the realm of eternal peace and 
blessedness? ' she wondered. 'Father, tell me how it was,' she asked through 
her tears. 

'Go away, go —killed in a defeat into which they led the best men of 
Russia and the glory of Russia to ruin. Go away, Princess Marya. Go and 
tell Liza. \ will come.' 

When Princess Marya went back from her father, the little princess was 
sitting at her work, and she looked up with that special inward look of 
happy calm that is peculiar to women with child. It was clear that her eyes 
were not seeing Princess Marya, but looking deep within herself. 

'What's the matter with you, Marie?' 

'Nothing . . . only I felt sad . . . sad about Andrey,' she said, brushing 
away the tears. These tears, which the little princess could not account for, 



WAR AND PEACE 157 

agitated her, little as she was observant in general. She said nothing, but 
looked about her uneasily, as though seeking for something. Before dinner 
the old prince, of whom she was always afraid, came into her room, with a 
particularly restless and malignant expression, and went out without uttering 
a word. She looked at Princess Marya. 

'Have you heard news from Andrey?' she said. 

'No; you know news could not come yet; but father is uneasy, and I feel 
frightened.' 

'Then you have heard nothing?' 

'Nothing,' said Princess Marya, looking resolutely at her with her lumi- 
nous eyes. She had made up her mind not to tell her, and had persuaded 
her father to conceal the dreadful news from her till her confinement, 
expected before many days. 

'What is the matter with you, my darling? You look pale. Oh, you are 
very pale,' said Princess Marya in alarm, after breakfast, on the morning of 
the 19th of March. 

'Shouldn't we send for Marya Bogdanovna, your excellency? ' said one of 
the maids who was present. Marya Bogdanovna was a midwife from a 
district town, who had been for the last fortnight at Bleak Hills. 

'Oh, no, no!' And besides her pallor, the face of the little princess ex- 
pressed a childish terror at the inevitable physical suffering before her. 

L Mon Dieuf mon Dien! Oh!' she heard behind her. The midwife was 
already on her way to meet her, rubbing her plump, small, white hands. 

'Marya Bogdanovna! I think it has begun,' said Princess Marya, looking 
with wide-open, frightened eyes at the midwife. 

'Well, I thank God for it,' said Marya Bogdanovna, not hastening her 
step. 'You young ladies have no need to know anything about it.' 

'But how is it the doctor has not come from Moscow yet?' said the 
princess. 

'It's no matter, princess, don't be uneasy,' said Marya Bogdanovna; 'we 
shall do very well without the doctor.' 

Evening passed, night came on. No one slept. A relay of horses had been 
sent to the high-road for the German doctor who was expected every 
minute, and men were despatched on horseback with lanterns to the turning 
at the cross-roads to guide him over the holes and treacherous places i:i 
the ice. 

Princess Marya sat in silence, her luminous eyes fixed on the wrinkled 
face of her old nurse (so familiar to her in the minutest detail), on the lock 
of grey hair that had escaped from the kerchief, on the baggy looseness of 
the skin under her chin. 

'Princess, my dearie, there's some one driving up the avenue!' she said, 
holding the window-frame. 'With lanterns; it must be the doctor. . . .' 

'Ah, my God! Thank God!' said the Princess Marya. 'I must go and 
meet him; he does not know Russian.' 

Princess Marya flung on a shawl and ran to meet the stranger. As she 
passed through the ante-room, she saw through the window a carriage and 



158 WAR AND PEACE 

lanterns standing at the entrance. And a voice— familiar it seemed to Princess 
Marya— was saying something. 

'Thank God!' said the voice. 'And father?' 

'It is Andrey!' thought Princess Marya. 'No, it cannot be, it would be too 
extraordinary,' she thought; and at the very instant she was thinking so, on 
the landing where the footman stood with a candle, there came into sight 
the face and figure of Prince Andrey, in a fur coat, with a deep collar 
covered with snow. Yes, it was he, but pale and thin, and with a trans- 
formed, strangely softened, agitated expression on his face. 

'You did not get my letter, then?' he asked; and not waiting for an answer, 
he ran again rapidly upstairs. 

The little princess was lying on the pillows in her white nightcap (the 
agony had only a moment left her). Her black hair lay in curls about her 
swollen and perspiring cheeks; her rosy, charming little mouth, with the 
downy lip, was open, and she was smiling joyfully. Prince Andrey went 
into the room, and stood facing her at the foot of the bed. The glittering 
eyes, staring in childish terror and excitement, rested on him with no change 
in their expression. 'I love you all, I have done no one any harm; why am 
I suffering? help me,' her face seemed to say. Prince Andrey went round 
the bed and kissed her on the forehead. 

'My precious,' he said, a word he had never used speaking to her before. 
'God is merciful. . . .' She stared at him with a face of inquiry, of childish 
reproach. 

'I hoped for help from you, and nothing, nothing, you too!' her eyes said. 
His coming had nothing to do with her agony and its alleviation. The pains 
began again, and Marya Bogdanovna advised Prince Andrey to go out of 
the room. 

Prince Andrey came out, and, meeting Princess Marya, went to her 
again. They talked in whispers, waiting and listening. 

Piteous, helpless, animal groans came from the next room. Prince Andrey 
got up, went to the door, and would have opened it. Some one was holding 
the door. 

'Can't come in, can't!' a frightened voice said from within. He began 
walking about the room. The screams ceased; several seconds passed. Sud- 
denly a fearful scream— not her scream, could she scream like that?— came 
from the room. Prince Andrey ran to the door; the scream ceased; he heard 
the cry of a baby. 

'What have they taken a baby in there for? ' Prince Andrey wondered for 
the first second. 'A baby? What baby? . . . Why a baby there? Or is the 
baby born?' 

The door opened. A woman ran out, and, seeing Prince Andrey, stopped 
hesitating in the door. He went into his wife's room. She was lying dead 
in the same position in which he had seen her five minutes before, and in 
spite of the fixed gaze and white cheeks, there was the same expression still 
on the charming childish face with the little lip covered with fine dark hair. 
'I love you all, and have done no harm to any one, and what have you c'one 



WAR AND PEACE 159 

to me?' said her charming, piteous, dead face. In a corner of the room 
was something red and tiny, squealing and grunting in the trembling white 
hands of Marya Bogdanovna. 

Two hours later Prince Andrey went with soft steps into his father's 
room. The old man knew everything already. He was standing near the 
door, and, as soon as it opened, his rough old arms closed like a vice round 
his son's neck, and without a word he burst into sobs like a child. 

Three days afterwards the little princess was buried. Even in the coffin the 
face was the same, though the eyes were closed. 'Ah, what have you done 
to me?' it still seemed to say; and Prince Andrey felt that he was guilty of 
a crime that he could never set right nor forget. 

In another five days there followed the christening of the young prince, 
Nikolay Andreivitch. The nurse held the swaddling clothes up to her chin, 
while the priest with a goose feather anointed the baby's red, wrinkled 
hands and feet. His grandfather, who was his godfather, trembling and 
afraid of dropping the baby, carried him round the battered tin font. 

Rostov's share in the duel between Dolohov and Bezuhov had been 
hushed up by the efforts of the old count, and instead of being degraded 
to the ranks, as Nikolay had expected, he had been appointed an adjutant 
to the governor of Moscow. Dolohov recovered, and Rostov became par- 
ticularly friendly with him during his convalescence in the house of his 
mother. Marya Ivanovna, who had taken a fancy to Rostov, often talked 
to him about her son. 

'Yes, count, he is too noble, too pure-hearted,' she would say, 'for the 
corrupt society of our day. Virtue is in favour with no one; it is apt to be a 
reproach to everybody. Come, tell me, count, was it right, was it honourable 
on Bezuhov's part? Fedya in his noble-hearted way loved him, and even 
now he never says a word against him. In Petersburg those pranks with the 
police constables, those practical jokes they played there, didn't they do 
everything together? And Bezuhov got nothing for it, while Fedya took all 
the blame on his shoulders. What he has had to go through!' 

The early part of the winter of 1806, spent by Nikolay Rostov in Mos- 
cow, was one of the happiest and liveliest periods for him and all the family. 
Nikolay brought a lot of young men about him into his parents' house. One 
of the foremost was Dolohov, who was liked by every one in the house 
except Natasha. She almost had a quarrel with ha brother over Dolohov. 
She persisted that he was a spiteful man; that in the duel with Bezuhov, 
Pierre had been in the right and Dolohov in the wrong, and that he was 
horrid and not natural. 

'I know nothing about it, indeed,' Natasha would cry with self-willed 
obstinacy; 'he's spiteful and heartless. Your Denisov now, you sec, I like; 
he's a rake, and all that, but still I like him, so I do understand. I don't know 
how to tell you; with him everything is done on a plan, and I don't like 
that. Denisov, now . . .' 

'Oh, Denisov's another matter,' answered Nikolay, in a tone that implied 



160 WAR AND PEACE 

that in comparison with Dolohov even Denisov was not of much account. 

In the autumn of 1806 every one was beginning to talk again of war with 
Napoleon, and with even greater fervour than in the previous year. A levy 
was decreed, not only of ten recruits for active service, but of nine militia- 
men for the reserve as well, from every thousand of the population. 
Everywhere Bonaparte was anathematised, and the onlv thing talked of in 
Moscow was the impending war. To the Rostov family the interest of these 
preparations for war was entirely centred in the fact that Nikolushka 
refused to remain longer in Moscow. His approaching departure, far from 
hindering him from enjoying himself, gave an added zest to his pleasures. 
The greater part of his time he spent away from home, at dinners, parties, 
and balls. 

After Christmas Nikolay received a note from Dolohov: 

'As I am going to rejoin the regiment, I am giving a farewell supper to 
my friends— come to the English Hotel.' On the day fixed Rostov went at 
about ten o'clock. 

Some twenty men were gathered about a table before which Dolohov 
was sitting between two candles. On the table lay money and notes, and 
Dolohov was keeping the bank. 

Rostov recalled at that instant a strange conversation he once had with 
Dolohov. 'None but fools trust to luck in play,' Dolohov had said then. 
Now, as though divining Rostov's thought, Dolohov said to him slowly and 
deliberately so that all could hear: 'Do you remember, I was talking to you 
about play . . . he's a fool who trusts to luck in play; one must play a sure 
game. 

'Indeed, and you'd better not play,' he added; and throwing down a pack 
he had just torn open, he said, 'Bank, gentlemen!' 

Moving the money forward, Dolohov began dealing. 

Rostov sat near him, and at first he did not play. Dolohov glanced at him. 
And strange to say, Nikolay felt that he could not help taking up a card, 
staking a trifling sum on it, and beginning to play. 

'I have no money with me,' said Rostov. 

'I'll trust you!' 

Rostov staked five roubles on a card and lost it, staked again and again 
lost. Dolohov beat ten cards in succession from Rostov. 

'Gentlemen,' he said, after dealing again for a little while, 'I beg you to 
put the money on the cards or else I shall get muddled over the reckoning.' 

One of the players said that he hoped he could trust him. 

'I can trust you, but I'm afraid of making mistakes; I beg you to lay the 
money on the cards,' answered Dolohov. 'You needn't worry, we'll settle 
our accounts,' he added to Rostov. 

The play went on; a footman never ceased carrying round champagne. 

All Rostov's cards were beaten, and the sum of eight hundred roubles was 
scored against him. He wrote on a card eight hundred roubles, but while 
champagne was being poured out for him, he changed his mind and again 
wrote down the usual stake, twenty roubles. 



WAR AND PEACE 161 

'Leave it,' said Dolohov, though he did not seem to be looking at Rostov., 
'you'll win it back all the sooner. I lose to the rest, while I win from you. 
Or perhaps you are afraid of me,' he repeated. 

Rostov excused himself, left the stake of eight hundred and laid down 
the seven of hearts, a card with a corner torn, which he had picked up 
from the ground. Well he remembered that card afterwards. He laid down 
the seven of hearts, wrote on it with a broken piece of chalk 800 in bold 
round figures; he drank the glass of warmed champagne that had been 
given him, smiled at Dolohov's words, and with a sinking at his heart, 
waiting for the seven of hearts, he watched Dolohov's hands that held the 
pack. The loss or gain of that card meant a great deal for Rostov. On the 
previous Sunday Count Ilya Andreivitch had given his son two thousand 
roubles, and though he never liked speaking of money difficulties, he told 
him that this money was the last they would get till May, and so he begged 
him to be a little more careful. Nikolay said that that was too much really 
for him, and that he would give him his word of honour not to come for 
more before May. Now there was only twelve hundred out of that two 
thousand left. So that on the seven of hearts there hung not merely the 
loss of sixteen hundred roubles, but the consequent inevitable betrayal of 
his word. With a sinking heart he watched Dolohov's hands and thought: 
'Well, make haste and deal me that card, and I'll take my cap and drive 
home to supper, and I'm sure I'll never take a card in my hand again.' He 
could not conceive that a stupid chance, leading the seven to the right 
rather than to the left, could hurl him into the abyss of unknown and 
undefined misery. It could not be; but yet it was with a thrill of dread that 
he waited for the movement of Dolohov's hands. Those broad-boned, 
reddish hands, with hairs visible under the shirt-cuffs, laid down the pack 
of cards and took up the glass and pipe that had been handed him. 

'So you're not afraid to play with me?' repeated Dolohov; and as though 
he were about to tell a good story, he laid down the cards, leaned back in 
his chair, and began deliberately with a smile: 

'Yes, gentlemen, I have been told there's a story going about Moscow that 
I'm too sharp with cards, so I advise you to be a little on your guard with 
me.' 

'Come, deal away!' said Rostov. 

'Ugh, these Moscow gossips!' said Dolohov, and he took up the cards 
with a smile. 

'Aaah!' Rostov almost screamed, putting both his hands up to his hair. 
The seven he needed was lying uppermost, the first card in the pack. I Ie 
had lost more than he could pay. 

'Don't swim beyond your depth, though,' said Dolohov, with a passing 
glance at Rostov, and he went on. 

Within an hour and a half the greater number of the players were no 
longer seriously interested in their own play. 

The whole interest of the game was concentrated on Rostov. Instead of 
a mere loss of sixteen hundred roubles he had by now scored against him 



162 WAR AND PEACE 

a long column of figures, which he had added up to the tenth thousand, 
though he vaguely supposed that by now it had risen to fifteen thousand. 
In reality the score already exceeded twenty thousand roubles. 

Rostov sat with his head propped in both hands, before the wine-stained 
table scrawled over with scorings and littered with cards. One torturing 
sensation never left him; those broad-boned, reddish hands, with the hairs 
visible under the shirt-cuffs, those hands which he loved and hated, held 
him in their power. 

'Six hundred roubles, ace, corner, nine; winning it back's out of the 
question! . . . And how happy I should be at home. . . . The knave, double 
or quits, it can't be! ... And why is he doing this to me? . . .' Rostov 
pondered and thought. Sometimes he put a higher stake on a card; but 
Dolohov refused it and fixed the stake himself. Nikolay submitted to him, 
and at one moment he was praying to God, as he had prayed under fire; at 
the next he tried his fortune on the chance that the card that he would first 
pick up among the heap of crumpled ones under the table would save him; 
then he reckoned up the rows of braidings on his coat, and tried staking 
the whole amount of his losses on a card of that number, then he looked 
round for help to the others playing, or stared in Dolohov's face, which 
looked quite cold now, and tried to penetrate into what was passing within 
him. 

'He knows, of course, what this loss means to me. Surely he can't want 
me to be ruined? Why, he was my friend. I loved him. . . . But, indeed, 
it's not his fault; what's he to do, if he has all the luck? And it's not my 
fault,' he kept saying to himself. 'I have done nothing wrong. I haven't 
murdered or hurt any one, or wished any one harm, have I? W T hat is this 
awful calamity for? And when did it begin? Such a little while ago I came 
to this table with the idea of winning a hundred roubles, and buying 
mamma that little casket for her name-day, and going home. I was so 
happy, so free, so light-hearted. And I didn't even know then how happy 
I was. When did all that end, and when did this new awful state of things 
begin? What was the outward token of that change? I still went on sitting 
in the same place at this table, and in the same way picking out cards and 
putting them forward, and watching those deft, broad-boned hands. When 
did it come to pass, and what has come to pass? I am strong and well, and 
still the same, and still in the same place. No; it cannot be. It will all be 
sure to end in nothing.' 

He was all red and in a sweat though the room was not hot. And his face 
was painful and piteous to see, particularly from its helpless efforts to seem 
calm. 

The score reached the fateful number of forty-three thousand roubles. 
Rostov already had the card ready which he meant to stake for double or 
quits on the three thousand, that had just been put down to his score, when 
Dolohov slapped the pack of cards down on the table, pushed it away, and 
taking the chalk began rapidly in his clear, strong hand, writing down the 
total of Rostov's losses, breaking the chalk as he did so. 



WAR AND PEACE 163 

'Supper, supper-time. And here are the gypsies.' And some swarthy men 
and women did in fact come in from the cold outside, saying something 
with their gypsy accent. Nikolay grasped that it was all over; but he said in 
an indifferent voice: 

'What, won't you go on? And I have such a nice little card all ready.' 
As though what chiefly interested him was the game itself. 

'It's all over, I'm done for,' he thought. 'Now a bullet through the head's 
the only thing left for me,' and at the same time he was saying in a cheerful 
voice: 

'Come, just one more card.' 

'Very good,' answered Dolohov, finishing his addition. 'Very good. 
Twenty-one roubles . . . done,' he said, pointing to the figure 21, over and 
above the round sum of forty-three thousand, and taking a pack, he made 
ready to deal, Rostov submissively turned down the corner, and instead of 
the 8000 he had meant to write, noted down 21. 

'It's all the same to me,' he said; 'only it's interesting to me to know 
whether you will win on that ten or let me have it.' 

Dolohov began seriously dealing. Oh, how Rostov hated at that moment 
those reddish hands, with their short fingers and the hairs visible under 
the shirt sleeves, those hands that held him in their clutches. . . . The ten 
was not beaten. 'Forty-three thousand to your score, count,' said Dolohov, 
and he got up from the table stretching. 'One does get tired sitting so long,' 
he said. 

'Yes, I'm tired too,' said Rostov. 

Dolohov cut him short, as though to warn him it was not for him to take 
a light tone. 

'When am I to receive the money, count? ' 

Rostov flushing hotly drew Dolohov away into the other room. 

'I can't pay it all at once, you must take an I.O.U.,' said he. 

'Then, when am I to receive it?' asked Dolohov. 

'To-morrow,' said Rostov, and went out of the room. 

To say 'to-morrow,' and maintain the right tone was not difficult; but to 
arrive home alone, to see his sisters and brother, his mother and father, to 
confess and beg for money to which he had no right after giving his word 
of honour, was terrible. 

At home they had not yet gone to bed. Sonya and Natasha, wearing the 
light blue dresses they had put on for the theatre, tood at the clavichord, 
pretty, happy and smiling. The old countess, waiting for her son and her 
husband to come in, was playing patience with an old gentlewoman, who 
was one of their household. 

'Everything's just the same with them,' thought Nikolay, peeping into 
the drawing-room. 'Is papa at home?' he asked. 

'How glad I am that you have come,' said Natasha, not answering his 
question, 'we are having such fun.' 

'No, papa has not come in yet,' answered Sonya. 

'Kolya, you there? Come to me, darling,' said the voice of the countess 



164 WAR AND PEACE 

from the drawing-room. Nikolay went up to his mother, kissed her hand, 
and sitting down by her table, began silently watching her hands as they 
dealt the cards. From the hall he kept hearing the sound of laughter and 
merry voices. 

'What's the matter?' his mother asked Nikolay. 

'Oh, nothing,' he said, as though sick of being continually asked th< 
same question: 'Will papa soon be in?' 

'I expect so.' 

A quarter of an hour later, the old prince came in, good-humoured anc. 
satisfied from his club. Nikolay heard him come in, and went in to him. 

'Well, had a good time?' said Ilya Andreivitch, smiling proudly and 
joyfully to his son. Nikolay tried to say 'Yes,' but could not; he was on the 
point of sobbing. The count was lighting his pipe, and did not notice his 
son's condition. 

'Ugh, it's inevitable!' thought Nikolay, for the first and last time. And all 
at once, as though he were asking for the carriage to drive into town, he 
said to his father in the most casual tone, that made him feel vile to himself: 

'Papa, I have come to you on a matter of business I was almost forgetting. 
I want some money.' 

'You don't say so?' said his father, who happened to be in particularly 
good spirits. 'I told you that we shouldn't be having any. Do you want a 
large sum?' 

'Very large,' said Nikolay, flushing and smiling a stupid, careless smile, 
for which long after he could not forgive himself. 'I have lost a little at 
cards, that is, a good deal, really, a great deal, forty-three thousand.' 

'What! To whom? . . . You're joking!' cried the count, flushing, as old 
people flush, an apoplectic red over his neck and the back of his head. 

'I have promised to pay it to-morrow,' said Nikolay. 

'Oh!' . . . said the count, flinging up his arms; and he dropped helplessly 
on the sofa. 

'It can't be helped! It happens to every one,' said his son in a free and 
easy tone, while in his heart he was feeling himself a low scoundrel, whose 
whole life could not atone for his crime. He would have liked to kiss his 
father's hands, to beg his forgiveness on his knees, while carelessly, rudely 
even, he was telling him that it happened to every one. 

Count Ilya Andreivitch dropped his eyes when he heard those words 
from his son, and began moving hurriedly, as though looking for something. 

'Yes, yes,' he brought out, 'it will be difficult, I fear, difficult to raise 
. . . happens to every one! yes, it happens to everyone . . .' And the count 
cast a fleeting glance at his son's face and walked out of the room. . . . 
Nikolay had been prepared to face resistance, but he had not expected this, 

'Papa! pa . . . pa!' he cried after him, sobbing; 'forgive me!' 



PART V 



After his interview with his wife, Pierre had set off for Petersburg. At the 
station of Torzhok Pierre had to wait. Without removing his outdoor 
things, he lay down on a leather sofa, in front of a round table, put up his 
big feet in their thick overboots on this table and sank into thought. 

'Shall I bring in the trunks? Make up a bed? Will you take tea? ' the valet 
kept asking. 

Pierre made no reply, for he heard nothing and said nothing. He had been 
deep in thought since he left the last station, and still went on thinking of 
the same thing— of something so important that he did not notice what was 
passing around him. 

'I shot Dolohov because I considered myself injured. Louis xvi was 
executed because they considered him to be a criminal, and a year later his 
judges were killed too for something. What is wrong? What is right? 
What must one love, what must one hate? What is life for, and what am I? 
What is life? What is death? What force controls it all?' he asked himself. 
And there was no answer to one of these questions, except one illogical 
reply that was in no way an answer to any of them. That reply was: 'One 
dies and it's all over. One dies and finds it all out or ceases asking.' But 
dying too was terrible. 

'I make bold to beg your excellency to make room the least bit for this 
gentleman here,' said the overseer, coming into the room and ushering in 
after him another traveller brought to a standstill from lack of horses. The 
traveller was a thickset, square-shouldered, yellow, wrinkled old man, with 
grey eyelashes overhanging gleaming eyes of an indefinite grey colour. 

Pierre took his feet off the table, glancing now and then at the newcomer, 
who, without looking at Pierre, with an air of surly fatigue was wearily 
taking off his outer wraps with the aid of his servant. The traveller, now 
clothed in a shabby nankin-covered sheepskin coat with felt highboots on 
his thin bony legs, sat down on the sofa, and leaning on its back his close- 
cropped head, which was very large and broad across the temples, he 
glanced at Bezuhov. The stern, shrewd, and penetrating expression in that 
glance impressed Pierre. He felt disposed to spenk to the traveller, but by 
the time he had ready a question about the road with which to address him, 
the traveller had closed his eyes, and folded his wrinkled old hands, Oil one 
finger of which there was a large iron ring with a seal representing the head 
of Adam. He sat without stirring, cither resting or sunk, as it seemed to 



166 WAR AND PEACE 

Pierre, in profound and calm meditation. Pierre stared at him, and had not 
time to look away when the old man opened his eyes and bent his resolute 
and stern glance upon Pierre. Pierre felt confused and tried to turn away 
from that glance, but the gleaming old eyes drew him irresistibly to them. 

'I have the pleasure of speaking to Count Bezuhov, if I am not mistaken,' 
said the stranger, in a loud deliberate voice. Pierre looked in silence and 
inquiringly over his spectacles at the speaker. 'I have heard of you,' con- 
tinued the stranger, 'and I have heard, sir, of what has happened to you, of 
your misfortune.' He underlined, as it were, the last word, as though to 
say: 'Yes, misfortune, whatever you call it, I know that what happened to 
you in Moscow was a misfortune.' 

'I am very sorry for it, sir.' Pierre reddened. 

'I have not mentioned this to you, sir, from curiosity, but from graver 
reasons.' He paused, not letting Pierre escape from his gaze, and moved 
aside on the sofa, inviting him by this movement to sit beside him. 

'You are unhappy, sir,' he went on, 'you are young, and I am old. I should 
like, as far as it is in my power, to help you.' 

'Oh, yes,' said Pierre, with an unnatural smile. 'Very much obliged to you 
. . . where have you been travelling from?' The stranger's face was not 
cordial, it was even cold and severe, but in spite of that, both the speech 
and the face of his new acquaintance were irresistibly attractive to Pierre. 

'But if for any reason you dislike conversing with me,' said the old man, 
then you say so, sir.' And suddenly he smiled a quite unexpected smile of 
fatherly kindliness. 

'Oh, no, not at all; on the contrary, I am very glad to make your acquaint- 
ance,' said Pierre, and glancing once more at the stranger's hands, he 
examined the ring more closely. He saw the head of Adam, the token of 
masonry. 

'Allow me to inquire,' he said, 'are you a mason?' 

'Yes, I belong to the brotherhood of the freemasons,' said the stranger, 
looking now more searchingly into Pierre's eyes. 'And from myself and in 
their name I hold out to you a brotherly hand.' 

'I am afraid,' said Pierre, smiling and hesitating between the confidence 
inspired in him by the personality of the freemason and the habit of ridi- 
culing the articles of the masons' creed; 'I am afraid that I am very far 
from a comprehension— how shall I say— I am afraid that my way of thinking 
in regard to the whole theory of the universe is so opposed to yours that we 
shall not understand one another.' 

'I am aware of your way of thinking,' said the freemason, 'and that way 
of thinking of which you speak, which seems to you the result of your own 
thought, is the way of thinking of the majority of men, and is the invariable 
fruit of pride, indolence, and ignorance. Excuse my saying, sir, that if I had 
not been aware of it, I should not have addressed you. Your way of thinking 
is a melancholy error.' 

'Just as 1 may take for granted that you are in error,' said Pierre, faintly 
smiling. 



WAR AND PEACE 167 

'I would never be so bold as to say I know the truth,' said the mason. 
'No one alone can attain truth; only stone upon stone, with the co-operation 
of all, by the millions of generations from our first father Adam down to 
our day is that temple being reared that should be a fitting dwelling-place of 
the Great God.' 

'I ought to tell you that I don't believe, don't . . . believe in God,' said 
Pierre regretfully and with effort. 

The freemason looked intently at Pierre and smiled as a rich man, holding 
millions in his hands, might smile to a poor wretch, who should say to him 
that he, the poor man, has not five roubles that would secure his happiness. 

'Yes, you do not know Him, sir,' said the freemason. 'You cannot know 
Him. You know not Him, that is why you are unhappy.' 

'Yes, yes, I am unhappy,' Pierre assented; 'but what am I to do?' 

'You know not Him, sir, and that's why you are very unhappy. You know 
not Him, but He is here, He is within me, He is in my words, He is in 
thee, and even in these scoffing words that thou hast just uttered,' said the 
mason in a stern, vibrating voice. 

He paused and sighed, evidently trying to be calm. 

'If He were not,' he said softly, 'we should not be speaking of Him, sir. 
Of what, of whom were we speaking? Whom dost thou deny?' he said all 
at once, with enthusiastic austerity and authority in his voice. 'Who in- 
vented Him, if He be not? How came there within thee the conception that 
there is such an incomprehensible Being? How comes it that thou and all 
the world have assumed the existence of such an inconceivable Being, a 
Being all powerful, eternal and infinite in all His qualities? . . .' He stopped 
and made a long pause. 

Pierre could not and would not interrupt this silence. 

'He exists, but to comprehend Him is hard,' the mason began again, not 
looking into Pierre's face, but straight before him, while his old hands, 
which could not keep still for inward emotion, turned the leaves of the 
book. 'If it had been a man of whose existence thou hadst doubts, I could 
have brought thee the man, taken him by the hand, and shown him thee. 
But how am I, an insignificant mortal, to show all the power, all the 
eternity, all the blessedness of Him to one who is blind, or to one who shuts 
his eyes that he may not see, may not understand Him, and may not see, 
and not understand all his own vileness and viciousness.' He paused. 'Who 
art thou? What art thou? Thou dreamest that thou art wise because thou 
couldst utter those scoffing words,' he said, with a gloomy and scornful 
irony, 'while thou art more foolish and artless than a little babe, who 
playing with the parts of a cunningly fashioned watch, should rashly sa\ 
that because he understands not the use of that watch, he docs not believe 
in the maker who fashioned it. To know Him is a hard matter. For ages, 
from our first father Adam to our day, have we been striving for this 
knowledge, and are infinitely far from the attainment of our aim; but in 
our lack of understanding we see only our own weakness and His great- 
ness . . .' 



168 WAR AND PEACE 

Pierre gazed with shining eyes into the freemason's face, listening with 
a thrill at his heart to his words; he did not interrupt him, nor ask questions, 
but with all his soul he believed what this strange man was telling him. 
Whether he believed on the rational grounds put before him by the free- 
mason, or believed, as children do, through the intonations, the conviction, 
and the earnestness, of the mason's words, the gleaming old eyes that had 
grown old in that conviction, or the calm, the resolution, and the certainty 
of his destination, w T hich were conspicuous in the whole personality of the 
old man, and struck Pierre with particular force, beside his own abjectness 
and hopelessness,— any way, with his whole soul he longed to believe, and 
believed and felt a joyful sense of soothing, of renewal, and of return to life. 

The freemason smiled his mild, fatherly smile. 

'The highest wisdom is founded not on reason only, not on those worldly 
sciences, of physics, history, chemistry, etc., into which knowledge of the 
intellect is divided. The highest wisdom is one. The highest wisdom knows 
but one science— the science of the whole, the science that explains the 
whole creation and the place of man in it. To instil this science into one's 
soul, it is needful to purify and renew one's inner man, and so, before one 
can know, one must believe and be made perfect. And for the attainment 
of these aims there has been put into our souls the light of God, called the 
conscience.' 

'Yes, yes,' Pierre assented. 

'Look with the spiritual eye into thy inner man, and ask of thyself 
whether thou art content with thyself. What hast thou attained with the 
guidance of the intellect alone? Are you satisfied with yourself and vour 
life?' 

'No, I hate my life,' said Pierre, frowning. 

'Thou hatest it; then change it, purify thyself, and as thou art purified, 
thou wilt come to know wisdom. Look at your life, sir. How have you been 
spending it? In riotous orgies and debauchery, taking everything from 
society and giving nothing in return. You have received wealth. How have 
you used it? What have you done for your neighbour? Have you given a 
thought to the tens of thousands of your slaves, have you -succoured them 
physically and morally? No. You have profited by their toil to lead a 
dissipated life. That's what you have done. Have you chosen a post in the 
service where you might be of use to your neighbor? No. You have spent 
your life in idleness. Then you married, sir, took upon yourself the 
responsibility of guiding a young woman in life, and what have you done? 
You have not helped her, sir, to find the path of truth, but have cast her 
into an abyss of deception and misery. A man injured you, and you have 
killed him, and you say you do not know God, and that you hate your life. 
There is no wisdom in all that, sir.' 

After these words the freemason leaned his elbow again on the back of 
the sofa and closed his eyes, as though weary of prolonged talking. Pierre 
gazed at that stern, immovable, old, almost death-like face, and moved his 
lips without uttering a sound. He wanted to say, 'Yes, a vile, idle, vicious 



WAR AND PEACE 169 

life,* and he dared not break the silence. The freemason cleared his throat 
huskily, as old men do, and called his servant. 

'How about horses?' he asked, without looking at Pierre. 

'They have brought round some that were given up,' answered the old 
man. 'You won't rest?' 

'No, tell them to harness them.' 

'Can he really be going away and leaving me all alone, without telling 
me everything and promising me help?' thought Pierre, getting up with 
downcast head, beginning to walk up and down the room, casting a glance 
from time to time at the freemason. 'Yes, I had not thought of it, but I 
have led a contemptible, dissolute life, but I did not like it, and I didn't 
want to,' thought Pierre, 'and this man knows the truth, and if he liked he 
could reveal it to me.' 

After packing his things with his practised old hands, the traveller but- 
toned up his sheepskin. On finishing these preparations, he turned to Bezu- 
hov, and in a polite, indifferent tone, said to him: 

'Where are you going now, sir?' 

'I? ... I'm going to Petersburg,' answered Pierre in a tone of childish 
indecision. 'I thank you. I agree with you in everything. But do not suppose 
that I have been so bad. With all my soul I have desired to be what you 
would wish me to be; but I have never met with help from any one. . . . 
Though I was myself most to blame for everything. Help me, instruct me, 
and perhaps I shall be able . . .' 

Pierre could not say more; his voice broke and he turned away. 

The freemason was silent, obviously pondering something. 

'Help comes only from God,' he said, 'but such measure of aid as it is 
in the power of our order to give you, it will give you, sir. You go to 
Petersburg, and give this to Count Villarsky' (he took out his notebook and 
wrote a few words on a large sheet of paper folded into four). 'Therewith 
I wish you a good journey, sir,' he added. 

The stranger was Osip Alexyevitch Bazdyev, as Pierre found out from 
the overseer's book. For a long while after he had gone, Pierre walked 
about the station room, neither lying down to sleep nor asking for horses. 
He reviewed his vicious past, and with an ecstatic sense of beginning anew, 
pictured to himself a blissful, irreproachably virtuous future, which seemed 
to him easy of attainment. He firmly believed in the possibility of the 
brotherhood of man, and freemasonry he pictured to himself as such a 
brotherhood. 

On reaching Petersburg, Pierre let no one know of his arrival, went out 
to see nobody, and spent whole days in reading. A week after his arrival, 
the young Polish count, Villarsky, whom Pierre knew very slightly in 
Petersburg society, came one evening into his room with the same official 
and ceremonious air with which Dolohov's second had called on him. 

'I have come to you with a message and a suggestion, count,' he said. 
'A personage of very high standing in our brotherhood has been interceding 



170 WAR AND PEACE 

for you to be admitted into our brotherhood before the usual term, and 
has asked me to be your sponsor. I regard it as a sacred duty to carry out 
that person's wishes. Do you wish under my sponsorship to enter the 
brotherhood of freemasons?' 

'Yes, I do wish it,' said Pierre. 

Villarsky bent his head. 

'One more question, count,' he said, 'to which I beg you, not as a future 
mason, but as an honest man to answer me in all sincerity: have you 
renounced your former convictions? do you believe in God?' 

Pierre thought a moment. 

'Yes . . . yes, I do believe in God,' he said. 

'In that case, we can go,' said Villarsky. 'iMy carriage is at your dis- 
posal.' 

Throughout the drive Villarsky was silent. In answer to Pierre's in- 
quiries, what he would have to do, and how he would have to answer, 
Villarsky simply said that brothers more worthy than he would prove 
him, and that Pierre need do nothing but tell the truth. 

They drove in at the gates of a large house, where the lodge had its 
quarters, and, passing up a dark staircase, entered a small, lighted ante- 
room, where they took off their overcoats without the assistance of serv- 
ants. From the ante-room they w r alked into another room. A man in strange 
attire appeared at the door. Y r illarsky, going in to meet him, said something 
to him in French in a low voice, and went up to a small cupboard, where 
Pierre noticed garments unlike any he had seen before. Taking a handker- 
chief from the cupboard, Villarsky put it over Pierre's eyes and tied it in 
a knot behind, catching his hair painfully in the knot. 'When vou hear 
a knock at the door, you may uncover your eyes,' Villarsky said, and 
went away. 

Pierre shrugged his shoulders and raised his hand to the handkerchief, 
as though he would have liked to take it off, but he let it drop again. 
The five minutes he had spent with his eyes bandaged seemed to him an 
hour. 

There came loud knocks at the door. Pierre took off the bandage and 
looked about him. It was black darkness in the room; only in one spot 
there was a little lamp burning before something white. Pierre went nearer 
and saw that the little lamp stood on a black table, on which there lay 
an open book. The book was the gospel: the white thing in which the lamp 
was burning was a human skull with its eyeholes and teeth. After reading 
the first words of the gospel, 'In the beginning was the Word and the 
Word was with God,' Pierre went round the table and caught sight of 
a large open box filled with something. It was a coffin full of bones. He 
was not in the least surprised by what he saw. Hoping to enter upon a 
completely new life, utterly unlike the old life, he was ready for anything 
extraordinary, more extraordinary indeed than what he was seeing. The 
skull, the coffin, the gospel— it seemed to him that he had been expecting 
all that; had been expecting more, indeed. He tried to stir up a devotional 



WAR AND PEACE 171 

feeling in himself; he looked about him. 'God, death, love, the brother- 
hood of man,' he kept saying to himself, associating with those words vague 
but joyful conceptions of some sort. 

The door opened and some one came in. In the faint light, in which 
Pierre could, however, see a little by this time, a short man approached. 
Apparently dazed by coming out of the light into the darkness, the man 
stopped, then with cautious steps moved again towards the table, and 
laid on it both his small hands covered with leather gloves. 

This short man was wearing a white leather apron, that covered his 
chest and part of his legs; upon his neck could be seen something like 
a necklace, and a high white ruffle stood up from under the necklace, 
framing his long face, on which the light fell from below. 

Tor what are you come hither?' asked the newcomer, turning towards 
Pierre at a faint rustle made by the latter. 'For what are you, an un- 
believer in the truth of the light, who have not seen the light, for what 
are you come here? What do you seek from us? Wisdom, virtue, en- 
lightenment? ' 

At the moment when the door opened and the unknown person came 
in, Pierre had a sensation of awe and reverence, such as he had felt in 
childhood at confession. Going closer, Pierre recognised a man he knew, 
Smolyaninov, but it was mortifying to him to think that the newcomer 
was a familiar figure. 

'Yes; I . . . I . . . wish to begin anew,' Pierre articulated with dif- 
ficulty. 

'Very good,' said Smolyaninov, and went on at once. 

'Have you any idea of the means by which our holy order will assist 
you in attaining your aim? . . .' 

'I . . . hope for . . . guidance . . . for help ... in renewing . . .' said 
Pierre. 

'What idea have you of freemasonry?' 

'I assume that freemasonry is the fraternite and equality of men with 
virtuous aims,' said Pierre, feeling ashamed as he spoke of the incongruity 
of his words with the solemnity of the moment. 'I assume . . .' 

'Have you sought the means of attaining your aim in religion?' 

'No; I regarded it as untrue and have not followed it,' said Pierre. 

'You seek the truth in order to follow its laws in life; consequently, 
you seek wisdom and virtue, do you not?' 

'Yes, yes,' assented Pierre. 

'I must inform you further that our order promulgates its doctrine 
not by word only, but by certain means which have perhaps on the 
true seeker after wisdom and virtue a more potent effect than merely 
verbal explanations. Our order follows the usage of ancient societies which 
revealed their doctrine in hieroglyphs. A hieroglyph,' said Smolyaninov, 'is 
the name given to a symbol of some object, imperceptible to the senses and 
possessing qualities similar to those of the symbol.' 

Pierre knew very well what a hieroglyph was, but he did not venture 



172 WAR AND PEACE 

to say so. He listened in silence, feeling from everything he said that 
his ordeal was soon to begin. 

'If you are resolved, I must proceed to your initiation. In token of 
liberality I beg you to give me everything precious you have.' 

'But I have nothing with me,' said Pierre, supposing he was being 
asked to give up all his possessions. 

'What you have with you: watch, money, rings . . .' 

Pierre made haste to get out his purse and his watch, and was a long 
time trying to get his betrothal ring off his fat finger. When this had 
been done, the freemason said: 

'In token of obedience I beg you to undress.' Pierre took off his coat 
and waistcoat and left boot. The mason opened his shirt over the left side 
of his chest and pulled up his breeches on the left leg above the knee. Pierre 
would hurriedly have taken off the right boot and tucked up the trouser- 
leg, to save this stranger the trouble of doing so, but the mason told him 
this was not necessary and gave him a slipper to put on his left foot. With 
a childish smile of embarrassment, of doubt, and of self-mockery, which 
would come into his face in spite of himself, Pierre stood with his legs 
wide apart and his hands hanging at his side, awaiting his next commands. 

'And finally, in token of candour, I beg you to disclose to me your 
chief temptation,' he said. 

'My temptation! I had so many,' said Pierre. 

'The temptation which does more than all the rest to make you stumble 
on the path of virtue,' said the freemason. 

Pierre paused, seeking a reply. 

'Wine? gluttony? frivolity? laziness? hasty temper? anger? women?' he 
went through his vices, mentally balancing them, and not knowing to 
which to give the pre-eminence. 

'Women,' said Pierre in a low, hardly audible voice. The freemason 
did not speak nor stir for a long while after that reply. At last he moved 
up to Pierre, took the handkerchief that lay on the table, and again tied 
it over his eyes. 

'For the last time I say to you: turn all your attention upon yourself, 
put a bridle on your feelings, and seek blessedness not in your passions, 
but in your own heart. The secret of blessing is not without but within 
us ' 

Shortly after this, there walked into the dark temple to fetch Pierre 
his sponsor Villarsky, whom he recognised by his voice. In reply to fresh 
inquiries as to the firmness of his resolve, Pierre answered: 

'Yes, yes, I agree,' and with a beaming, childlike smile he walked forward, 
stepping timidly and unevenly with one booted and one slippered foot, 
while Villarsky held a sword pointed at his fat, uncovered chest. He was 
led out of the room along corridors, turning backwards and forwards, 
till at last he was brought to the doors of the lodge. Villarsky coughed; 
he was answered by masonic taps with hammers; the door opened before 
them. A bass voice (Pierre's eyes were again bandaged) put questions to 



WAR AND PEACE 173 

him, who he was, where and when he was born, and so on. Then he was 
again led away somewhere with his eyes still bandaged, and as he walked 
they spoke to him in allegories of the toils of his pilgrimage, and of holy 
love, of the Eternal Creator of the world, of the courage with which he 
was to endure toils and dangers. 

During this time Pierre noticed that he was called sometimes the seeker, 
sometimes the sufferer, and sometimes the postulant, and that they made 
various tapping sounds with hammers and with swords. While he was 
being led up to some object, he noticed that there was hesitation and 
uncertainty among his conductors. He heard a whispered dispute among 
the people round him, and one of them insisting that he should be made 
to cross a certain carpet. After this they took his right hand, laid it on 
something, while they bade him with the left hold a compass to his left 
breast, while they made him repeat after some one who read the words 
aloud, the oath of fidelity to the laws of the order. Then the candles were 
extinguished and spirit was lighted, as Pierre knew from the smell of it, 
and he was told that he would see the lesser light. The bandage was 
taken off his eyes, and in the faint light of the burning spirit Pierre saw, 
as though it were in a dream, several persons who stood facing him in 
aprons, and held swords pointed at his breast. Among them stood a man 
in a white shirt stained with blood. On seeing this, Pierre moved with his 
chest forward towards the swords, meaning them to stab him. But the 
swords were drawn back, and the bandage was at once replaced on his 
eyes. 

'Now you have seen the lesser light,' said a voice. Then again they 
lighted the candles, told him that he had now to see the full light, and 
again removed the bandage, and more than ten voices said all at once: 
l Sic transit gloria mundi? 

Pierre gradually began to regain his self-possession, and to look about 
at the room and the people in it. Round a long table covered with black 
were sitting some dozen men, all in the same strange garment that he had 
seen before. Several of them Pierre knew in Petersburg society. In the 
president's chair sat a young man, with a peculiar cross on his neck, 
whom he did not know. On his right hand sat the Italian abbe whom 
Pierre had seen two years before at Anna Pavlovna's. There were among 
them, a dignitary of very high standing and a Swiss tutor, who had once 
been in the Kuragin family. All preserved a solemn silence, listening to 
the president, who held a hammer in his hand. In the wall was carved 
a blazing star; on one side of the table was a small rag with various 
figures worked upon it; on the other was something like an altar with 
the gospel and a skull on it. Round the table stood seven big ecclesiastical- 
looking candlesticks. Two of the brothers led Pierre up to the altar, set 
his feet at right angles and bade him lie down, saying that he would be 
casting himself down at the gates of the temple. 

'He ought first to receive the spade,' said one of the brothers in a 
whisper. 



174 WAR AND PEACE 

'Oh! hush, please,' said another. 

Pierre did not obey, but with uneasy short-sighted eyes looked about 
him, and suddenly doubt came over him. 'Where am I? What am I doing? 
Aren't they laughing at me? Shan't I be ashamed to remember this?' 
But this doubt only lasted a moment. Pierre looked round at the serious 
faces of the people round him, thought of all he had just been through, 
and felt that there was no stopping half-way. He was terrified at his own 
hesitation, and trying to arouse in himself his former devotional feeling, 
he cast himself down at the gates of the temple. 

When he had lain there some time, he was told to get up, and a white 
leather apron such as the others wore was put round him, and a spade and 
three pairs of gloves were put in his hands; then the grand master ad- 
dressed him. He told him that he must try never to stain the whiteness 
of that apron, which symbolised strength and purity. Then of the un- 
explained spade he told him to toil with it at clearing his heart from 
vice, and with forbearing patience smoothing the way in the heart of his 
neighbour. Then of the first pair of gloves he said that he could not know 
yet their significance, but must treasure them; of the second pair he 
said that he must put them on at meetings; and finally of the third pair 
—they were women's gloves— he said: 

'Dear brother, and these woman's gloves are destined for you too. 
Give them to the woman whom you shall honour beyond all others. That 
gift will be a pledge of your purity of heart to her whom you select as a 
worthy helpmeet in masonry.' After a brief pause, he added: 'But beware, 
dear brother, that these gloves never deck hands that are impure.' 

While the grand master uttered the last words it seemed to Pierre that 
he was embarrassed. Pierre was even more embarrassed; he blushed to 
the point of tears, as children blush, looking about him uneasily, and an 
awkward silence followed. 

This silence was broken by one of the brothers who, leading Pierre to 
the rug, began reading out of a manuscript book the interpretation of all 
the figures delineated upon it: the sun, the moon, the hammer, the 
balance, the spade, the rough stone and the shaped stone, the post, the 
three windows. Then Pierre was shown his appointed place, he w T as shown 
the signs of the lodge, told the password, and at last permitted to sit down. 

The grand master proposed that the last duty be performed, and the 
great dignitary whose duty it was to collect the alms began making the 
round of all the brothers. Pierre would have liked to give to the list of 
alms all the money he had in the world, but he feared thereby to sin bv 
pride, and only wrote down the same sum as the others. 

The sitting was over, and it seemed to Pierre on returning home that 
he had come back from a long journey on which he had spent dozens of 
years, and had become utterly changed, and had renounced his old habits 
and manner of life. 

Pierre had been told at the lodge that the rumour of the duel had reached 



WAR AND PEACE 175 

the Emperor's ears, and that it would be more judicious for him to with- 
draw from Petersburg. Pierre proposed going to his estates in the south, 
and there occupying himself with the care of his peasants. He was joyfully- 
dreaming of this new life when Prince Vassily suddenly walked into his 
room. 

'My dear fellow, what have you been about in Moscow? What have 
you been quarrelling over with Ellen, my dear boy? You have been 
making a mistake,' said Prince Vassily, as he came into the room. 'I have 
heard all about it; I can tell you for a fact that Ellen is innocent.' 

Pierre would have answered, but he interrupted him. 

'And why didn't you come simply and frankly to me as to a friend? 
I know all about it; I understand it all,' said he. 'You have behaved as 
was proper for a man who valued his honour, too hastily, perhaps, but 
we won't go into that. One thing you must think of, the position you are 
placing her and me in, in the eyes of society and even of the court,' he 
added, dropping his voice. 'I have learned from excellent sources that the 
Dowager Empress is taking a keen interest in the whole affair. You know 
she is very graciously disposed to Ellen.' 

Several times Pierre had prepared himself to speak, but on one hand 
Prince Vassily would not let him, and on the other hand Pierre himself 
was loath to begin to speak in the tone of resolute refusal and denial, in 
which he was firmly resolved to answer his father-in-law. Moreover the 
words of the masonic precept: 'Be thou friendly and courteous,' recurred 
to his mind. He blinked and blushed, got up and sank back again, trying 
to force himself to do what was for him the hardest thing in life— to say 
an unpleasant thing to a man's face, to say what was not expected by 
that man, whoever he might be. He was so much in the habit of submitting 
to that tone of careless authority in which Prince Vassily spoke, that 
even now he felt incapable of resisting it. But he felt, too, that on what 
he said now all his future fate would depend. 

'Come, my dear boy,' said Prince Vassily playfully, 'simply say "yes," 
and I'll write on my own account to her, and we'll kill the fatted calf.' 
But before Prince Vassily had finished uttering his playful words, Pierre, 
not looking at him, but with a fury in his face that made him like his 
father, whispered, 'Prince, I did not invite you here: go, please, go!' 
He leaped up and opened the door to him. 'Go!' he repeated, amazed at 
himself and enjoying the expression of confusion and terror in the coun- 
tenance of Prince Vassily. 

'What's the matter with you? are you ill? ' 

'Go!' the quivering voice repeated once more. And Prince Vassily had 
to go, without receiving a word of explanation. 

A week later Pierre went away to his estates, after taking leave of his 
new friends, the freemasons, and leaving large sums in their hands for 
alms. His new brethren gave him letters for Kiev and Odessa, to masons 
living there. 



176 WAR AND PEACE 

Pierre's duel with Dolohov was smoothed over, and in spite of the Tsar's 
severity in regard to duels at that time, neither the principals nor the 
seconds suffered for it. But the scandal of the duel, confirmed by Pierre's 
rupture with his wife, made a great noise in society. Pierre had been looked 
upon with patronising condescension when he was an illegitimate son; 
he had been made much of and extolled for his virtues while he was the 
wealthiest match in the Russian empire; but after his marriage, when young 
ladies and their mothers had nothing to hope from him, he had fallen 
greatly in the opinion of society, especially as he had neither the wit nor 
the wish to ingratiate himself in public favour. Now the blame of the 
whole affair was thrown on him; it was said that he was insanely jealous, 
and subject to the same fits of bloodthirsty fury as his father had been. 
And when, after Pierre's departure, Ellen returned to Petersburg, she 
was received by all her acquaintances not only cordially, but with a 
shade of deference that was a tribute to her distress. 

On reaching Kiev, Pierre sent for all his stewards to his head counting- 
house, and explained to them his intentions and his desires. He told 
them that steps would very shortly be taken for the complete liberation 
of his peasants from serfdom, that till that time his peasants were not 
to be overburdened with labour, that the women with children were not 
to be sent out to work, that assistance was to be given to the peasants, 
that wrong-doing was to be met with admonishment, and not with cor- 
poral punishment; and that on every estate there must be founded hos- 
pitals, almshouses, and schools. Several of the stewards (among them 
were some bailiffs barely able to read and write) listened in dismay, sup- 
posing the upshot of the young count's remarks to be that he was dissatisfied 
with their management and embezzlement of his money. Others, after the 
first shock of alarm, derived amusement from Pierre's lisp and the new 
words he used that they had not heard before. Others again found a 
simple satisfaction in hearing the sound of their master's voice. But some, 
among them the head steward, divined from this speech how to deal with 
their master for the attainment of their own ends. 

The head steward expressed great sympathy with Pierre's projects; but 
observed that, apart from these innovations, matters were in a bad way 
and needed thoroughly going into. 

In spite of Count Bezuhov's enormous wealth, Pierre ever since he 
had inherited it, and had been, as people said, in receipt of an annual in- 
come of five hundred thousand, had felt much less rich than when he had 
been receiving an allowance of ten thousand from his father. In general 
outlines he was vaguely aware of the following budget. About eighty 
thousand was being paid into the Land Bank as interest on mortgages 
on his estates. About thirty thousand went to the maintenance of his 
estate in the suburbs of Moscow, his Moscow house, and his cousins, the 
princesses. About fifteen thousand were given in pensions, and as much 
more to benevolent institutions. One hundred and fifty thousand were 
sent to his countess for her maintenance. Some seventy thousand were 



WAR AND PEACE 177 

paid away as interest on debts. The building of a new church had for the 
last two years been costing about ten thousand. The remainder— some 
one hundred thousand— was spent— he hardly knew how— and almost 
every year he was forced to borrow. Moreover every year the head 
steward wrote to him of conflagrations, or failures of crops, or of the 
necessity of rebuilding factories or workshops. And so the first duty with 
which Pierre was confronted was the one for which he had the least 
capacity and inclination— attention to practical business. 

Every day Pierre went into things with the head steward. But he felt 
that what he was doing did not advance matters one inch. He felt that 
all he did was quite apart from reality, that his efforts had no grip on 
the business, and would not set it in progress. On one side the head 
steward put matters in their worst light, proving to Pierre the necessity 
of paying his debts, and entering upon new undertakings with the labour 
of his serf peasants, to which Pierre would not agree. On the other side, 
Pierre urged their entering upon the work of liberation, to which the head 
steward objected the necessity of first paying off the loans from the Land 
Bank, and the consequent impossibility of haste in the matter. 

Pierre had none of that practical tenacity, which would have made 
it possible for him to undertake the business himself, and so he did not 
like it, and only tried to keep up a pretence of going into business before 
the head steward. The steward too kept up a pretence before the count of 
regarding his participation in it as of great use to his master, and a great 
inconvenience to himself. 

In Kiev he had acquaintances: persons not acquaintances made haste 
to become so, and gave a warm welcome to the young man of fortune, 
the largest landowner of the province, who had come into their midst. 
The temptations on the side of Pierre's besetting weakness, the one to 
which he had given the first place at his initiation into the lodge, were so 
strong that he could not resist them. Again whole days, weeks, and months 
of his life were busily filled up with parties, dinners, breakfasts, and balls, 
giving him as little time to think as at Petersburg. Instead of the new life 
Pierre had hoped to lead, he was living just the same old life only in 
different surroundings. 

In the spring of 1807, Pierre made up his mind to go back again to 
Petersburg. On the way back he intended to make the tour of all his 
estates, to ascertain what had been done of what had been prescribed by 
him, and in what position the people now were whom he had been 
striving to benefit. 

The head steward, who regarded all the young count's freaks as almost 
insanity— disastrous to him, to himself, and to his peasants— made con- 
cessions to his weaknesses. While continuing to represent the liberation 
of his serfs as impracticable, he made arrangements on all his estates for 
the building of schools, hospitals, and asylums on a large scale to be begun 
ready for the master's visit, prepared everywhere for him to be met, not 
with ceremonious processions, which he knew would not be to Pierre's 



178 WAR AND PEACE 

taste, but with just the devotionally grateful welcomes, with holy images 
and bread and salt, such as would, according to his understanding of the 
count, impress him and delude him. 

The southern spring, the easy, rapid journey in his Vienna carriage, 
and the solitude of the road, had a gladdening influence on Pierre. The 
estates, which he had not before visited, were one more picturesque than 
the other; the peasantry seemed everywhere thriving, and touchingly 
grateful for the benefits conferred on them. Everywhere he was met by 
welcomes, which though they embarrassed Pierre, yet at the bottom of his 
heart rejoiced him. At one place the peasants had brought him bread 
and salt and the images of Peter and Paul, and begged permission in 
honour of his patron saints, and in token of love and gratitude for the 
benefits conferred on them, to erect at their own expense a new chapel 
in the church. At another place he was welcomed by women with babies 
in their arms who came to thank him for being released from the obligation 
of heavy labour. In a third place he was met by a priest with a cross, sur- 
rounded by children, whom by the favour of the count he was instructing 
in reading and writing and religion. On all his estates Pierre saw with his 
own eyes stone buildings erected, or in course of erection, all on one 
plan, hospitals, schools, and almshouses, which were in short time to 
be opened. Everywhere Pierre saw the steward's reckoning of service due 
to him diminished in comparison with the past, and heard touching thanks 
for what was remitted from deputations of peasants in blue, full-skirted 
coats. 

But Pierre did not know that where they brought him bread and salt 
and were building a chapel of Peter and Paul, nine -tenths of the peasants of 
that village were in the utmost destitution. He did not know that since 
by his orders nursing mothers were not sent to work on their master's 
land, those same mothers did even harder work on their own bit of land. 
He did not know that the priest who met him with the cross oppressed 
the peasants with his exactions, and that the pupils gathered around him 
were yielded up to him with tears and redeemed for large sums by their 
parents. He did not know that the stone buildings were being raised by 
his labourers, and increased the forced labour of his peasants, which was 
only less upon paper. He did not know that where the steward pointed 
out to him in the account book the reduction of rent to one-third in 
accordance with his will, the labour exacted had been raised by one half. 
And so Pierre was enchanted by his journey over his estates, and came 
back completely to the philanthropic frame of mind in which he had left 
Petersburg, and wrote enthusiastic letters to his preceptor and brother, as 
he called the grand master. 

'How easy it is, how little effort is needed to do so much good,' thought 
Pierre, 'and how little we trouble ourselves to do it!' 

He was happy at the gratitude shown him, but abashed at receiving it. 
That gratitude reminded him how much more he could do for those simple, 
good-hearted people. 



WAR AND PEACE 179 

The head steward, a very stupid and crafty man, who thoroughly 
understood the clever and naive count, and played with him like a toy, 
seeing the effect produced on Pierre by these carefully arranged receptions, 
was bolder in advancing arguments to prove the impossibility, and even 
more, the uselessness of liberating the peasants, who were so perfectly 
happy without that. 

In the recesses of his own heart, Pierre agreed with the steward that it 
was difficult to imagine people happier, and that there was no knowing 
what their future would be in freedom. But though reluctantly, he stuck 
to what he thought the right thing. The steward promised to use every 
effort to carry out the count's wishes, perceiving clearly that the count 
would never verify whether every measure had been taken, would never 
probably even inquire, and would certainly never find out that the peasants 
were giving in labour and money just what they gave with other masters, 
that is, all that could be got out of them. 

Returning from his southern tour in the happiest frame of mind, Pierre 
carried out an intention he had long had, of visiting his friend Bolkonsky, 
whom he had not seen for two years. 

'Well, I didn't expect you; I am glad,' said Prince Andrey. 

Pierre said nothing; he was looking in wonder at his friend, and could 
not take his eyes off him. He was struck by the change in Prince Andrey. 
His words were warm, there was a smile on the lips and the face, but there 
wa^ a lustreless, dead look in his eyes, into which, in spite of his evident 
desire to seem glad, Prince Andrey could not throw a gleam of happiness. 
It was not only that his friend was thinner, paler, more manly looking, 
but the look in his eyes and the line on his brow, that expressed prolonged 
concentration on some one subject, struck Pierre and repelled him till he 
got used to it. 

On meeting after a long separation, the conversation, as is always the 
case, did not for a long while rest on one subject. They asked questions 
and gave brief replies about things of which they knew themselves they 
must talk at length. At last the conversation began gradually to revolve 
more slowly about the questions previously touched only in passing, 
their life in the past, their plans for the future, Pierre's journeys, and 
what he had been doing, the war, and so on. The concentrated and crushed 
look which Pierre had noticed in Prince Andrey's eyes was still more 
striking now in the smile with which he listened to him, especially when 
he was telling him with earnestness and delight of his past or his future. 
It was as though Prince Andrey would have liked to take interest in 
what he was telling him, but could not. Pierre began to feel that to express 
enthusiasm, ideals, and hopes of happiness and goodness was unseemly 
before Prince Andrey. He felt ashamed of giving expression to all the 
new ideas he had gained from the masons, which had been revived and 
strengthened in him by his last tour. He restrained himself, afraid of 
seeming naive. At the same time he felt an irresistible desire to show his 



180 WAR AND PEACE 

friend at once that he was now a quite different Pierre, better than the 
one he had known in Petersburg. 

'I can't tell you how much I have passed through during this time. I 
shouldn't know my old self.' 

'Yes, you are very, very much changed since those days,' said Prince 
Andrey. 

'Well, and what of you?' asked Pierre. 'What are your plans?' 

'Plans?' repeated Prince Andrey ironically. 'My plans?' he repeated'. 
'But why talk about me . . . talk to me, and tell me about your journey, 
about everything you have been doing.' 

Pierre began describing what he had been doing on his estates, trying 
as far as he could to disguise his share in the improvements made on them. 
Prince Andrey several times put in a few words before Pierre could 
utter them, as though all Pierre's doings were an old, familiar story, and 
he were hearing it not only without interest, but even as it were a little 
ashamed of what was told him. 

Pierre began to feel awkward and positively wretched in his friend's 
company. He relapsed into silence. 

At dinner the conversation fell on Pierre's marriage. 

'I was very much surprised when I heard of it,' said Prince Andrey. 

Pierre blushed as he always did at any reference to his marriage, and 
said hurriedly: Til tell you one day how it all happened. But you know 
that it's all over and for ever.' 

'For ever?' said Prince Andrey; 'nothing's for ever.' 

'But do you know how it all ended? Did you hear of the duel?' 

'Yes, you had to go through that too!' 

'The one thing for which I thank God is that I didn't kill that man,' 
said Pierre. 

'Why so?' said Prince Andrey. 'To kill a vicious dog is a very good 
thing to do, really.' 

'No, to kill a man is bad, wrong . . .' 

'Why is it wrong?' repeated Prince Andrey; 'what's right and wrong 
is a question it has not been given to men to decide. Men are for ever 
in error, and always will be in error, and in nothing more than in what 
they regard as right and wrong.' 

'What does harm to another man is w T rong,' said Pierre, feeling with 
pleasure that for the first time since his arrival Prince Andrey was roused 
and was beginning to speak and eager to give expression to what had 
made him what he now was. 

'And who has told you what is harm to another man?' he asked. 

'Harm? harm?' said Pierre; 'we all know what harms ourselves.' 

'Yes, we know that, but it's not the same harm we know abour for 
ourselves that we do to another man,' said Prince Andrey, growing more 
and more eager, and evidently anxious to express to Pierre his new view 
of things. He spoke in French. 'I only know two very real ills in life, re- 
morse and sickness. There is no good except the absence of those ills. To 



WAR AND PEACE 181 

live for myself so as to avoid these two evils: that's the sum of my wisdom 
now.' 

'And love for your neighbour, and self-sacrifice?' began Pierre. 'No, I 
can't agree with you! To live with the sole object of avoiding doing evil, 
so as not to be remorseful, that's very little. I used to live so, I used to 
live for myself, and I spoilt my life. And only now, when I'm living, at 
least trying to live' (modesty impelled Pierre to correct himself) 'for 
others, only now I have learnt to know all the happiness of life. No, I 
don't agree with you, and indeed, you don't believe what you're saying 
yourself.' 

Prince Andrey looked at Pierre without speaking, and smiled ironically. 
*Well, you'll see my sister Marie. You will get on with her,' said he. 
'Perhaps you are right for yourself,' he added, after a brief pause, 'but 
every one lives in his own way; you used to live for yourself, and you say 
that by doing so you almost spoiled your life, and have only known 
happiness since you began to live for others. And my experience has been 
the reverse. I used to live for glory. In that way I lived for others, and 
not almost, but quite spoilt my life. And I have become more peaceful 
since I live only for myself.' 

'But how are you living only for yourself?' Pierre asked, getting hot. 
'What of your son, your sister, your father?' 

'Yes, but that's all the same as myself, they are not others,' said Prince 
Andrey; 'but others, one's neighbours, as you and Marie call them, they 
are the great source of error and evil. One's neighbours are those— your 
Kiev peasants— whom one wants to do good to.' 

And he looked at Pierre with a glance of ironical challenge. He un- 
mistakably meant to draw him on. 

'You are joking,' said Pierre, getting more and more earnest. 'What 
error and evil can there be in my wishing (I have done very little and 
done it very badly), but still wishing to do good, and doing indeed some- 
thing any way? Where can be the harm if unhappy people, our peasants, 
people just like ourselves, growing up and dying with no other idea of 
God and the truth, but a senseless prayer and ceremony, if they are 
instructed in the consoling doctrines of a future life, of retribution, and 
recompense and consolation? What harm and error can there be in my 
giving them doctors, and a hospital, and a refuge for the aged, when 
men are dying of disease without help, and it is so easy to give them 
material aid? And isn't there palpable, incontestable good, when the 
peasants and the women with young children have no rest day or night, 
and I give them leisure and rest? . . .' said Pierre, talking hurriedly 
and lisping. 'And I have done that; badly it's true, and too little of it, 
but I have done something towards it, and you'll not only fail to shake 
my conviction that I have done well, you'll not even shake my conviction 
that you don't believe that yourself. And the great thing,' Pierre con- 
tinued, 'is that I know this— and know it for a certainty— that the enjoy- 
ment of doing this good is the only real happiness in life.' 



182 WAR AND PEACE 

'Oh, if you put the question like that, it's a different matter,' said 
Prince Andrey. Tm building a house and laying out a garden, while you 
are building hospitals. Either occupation may serve to pass the time. 
But as to what's right and what's good— come, let us argue the matter,' 
said Prince Andrey. 'You talk of schools,' he went on, crooking one finger, 
'instruction, and so forth, that is, you want to draw a peasant out of his 
animal condition and to give him spiritual needs, but it seems to me that 
the only possible happiness is animal happiness, and you want to deprive 
him of it. I envy him, while you are trying to make him into me, without 
giving him my circumstances. Another thing you speak of is lightening 
his toil. But to my notions, physical labour is as much a necessity for him, 
as much a condition of his existence, as intellectual work is for me and 
for you. You can't help thinking. I go to bed at three o'clock, thoughts 
come into my mind, and I can't go to sleep; I turn over, and can't sleep 
till morning, because I'm thinking, and I can't help thinking, just as he 
can't help ploughing and mowing. If he didn't, he would go to the tavern, 
or become ill. Just as I could not stand his terrible physical labour, but 
should die of it in a week, so he could not stand my physical inactivity, 
he would grow fat and die. The third thing— what was it you talked about?' 

Prince Andrey crooked his third finger. 

'Oh, yes, hospitals, medicine. He has a fit and dies, but you have him 
bled and cure him. He will drag about an invalid for ten years, a burden 
to every one. It would be ever so much simpler and more comfortable 
for him to die. Others are born, and there are always plenty. If you 
grudge losing a labourer— that's how I look at him— but you want to 
cure him from love for him. But he has no need of that. And besides, 
what a notion that medicine has ever cured any one! Killed them— yes!' 
he said, scowling and turning away from Pierre. 

Prince Andrey gave such clear and precise utterance to his ideas that 
it was evident he had thought more than once of this already, and he 
talked rapidly and eagerly, as a man does who has long been silent. 

'Oh, this is awful, awful!' said Pierre. 'I don't understand how one 
can live with such ideas. I have had moments of thinking like that; it 
was not long ago at Moscow and on a journey, but then I become so 
abject that I don't live at all, everything's hateful to me . . . myself, 
most of all. Then I don't eat, I don't wash . . . how can you go on? . . .' 

'Why not wash, that's not clean,' said Prince Andrey; 'on the contrary, 
one has to try and make one's life more agreeable as far as one can. I'm 
alive, and it's not my fault that I am, and so I have to try without hurting 
others to get on as well as I can till death.' 

'But what impulse have you to live with such ideas? You would sit 
still without stirring, taking no part in anything. . . .' 

'Life won't leave you in peace even so. I should be glad to do nothing, 
but here you see on one side, the local nobility have done me the honour 
of electing me a marshal; it was all I could do to get out of it. Now there's 
the militia.' 



WAR AND PEACE 183 

'Why aren't you serving in the army?' 

'After Austerlitz!' said Prince Andrey gloomily. 'No, thank you; 1 
swore to myself that I would never serve in the Russian army again. 
And I will not, if Bonaparte were stationed here at Smolensk, threatening 
Bleak Hills! even then I wouldn't serve in the Russian army. Well, so I 
was saying,' Prince Andrey went on, regaining his composure. 'Now, 
there's the militia; my father's commander-in-chief of the third circuit, and 
the only means for me to escape from active service is to serve under him.' 

'So you are in the service, then?' 

'Yes.' 

'Then why do you serve?' 

'I'll tell you why. My father is one of the most remarkable men of 
his time. But he's grown old, and he's not cruel exactly, but he's of too 
energetic a character. He's terrible from his habit of unlimited power, 
and now with this authority given him by the Emperor as a commander- 
in-chief in the militia. If I had been two hours later a fortnight ago, he 
would have hanged the register-clerk at Yuhnovo,' said Prince Andrey 
with a smile. 'So I serve under him now because no one except me has 
any influence over my father, and I sometimes save him from an act which 
would be a source of misery to him afterwards.' 

'Ah, there you see!' 

'Yes, it is not as you think,' Prince Andrey continued. 'I didn't, and 
I don't wish well in the slightest to that scoundrelly register-clerk who 
had stolen boots or something from the militiamen; indeed, I would have 
been very glad to see him hanged, but I feel for my father, that is again 
myself.' 

Prince Andrey's eyes glittered feverishly, as he tried to prove to Pierre 
that there was never the slightest desire to do good to his neighbour in 
his actions. Pierre could not help thinking those ideas were suggested to 
him by his father. 

'No, no, a thousand times no! I shall never agree with you,' said Pierre. 

Towards ten o'clock the footmen rushed to the steps, hearing the bells 
of the old prince's carriage approaching. Prince Andrey and Pierre, too, 
went out on to the steps. 

'Who's that?' asked the old prince, as he got out of the carriage and 
saw Pierre. 

'Ah! very glad! kiss me!' he said, on learning who the young stranger 
was. 

The old prince was in a good humour and very cordial to Pierre. 

Before supper, Prince Andrey, on coming back into his father's study, 
found the old prince in hot dispute with Pierre. The latter was maintain- 
ing that a time would come when there would be no more war. The old 
prince was making fun of him, but with good humour. 

'Let off blood from men's veins and fill them up with water, then 
there'll be no more war. Old women's nonsense, old women's nonsense,' 
he was saying, but still he slapped Pierre affectionately on the shoulder 



184 WAR AND PEACE 

and went up to the table where Prince Andrey, evidently not caring to 
take part in the conversation, was looking through the papers the old 
prince had brought from the town. The old prince went up to him and 
began to talk of business. 

'The marshal, a Count Rostov, hasn't sent half his contingent. Came 
to the town and thought fit to invite me to dinner— a pretty dinner I gave 
him! . . . And here, look at this. . . . Well, my boy,' said the old prince 
to his son, clapping Pierre on the shoulder, 'your friend is a capital fellow; 
I like him! He warms me up. Other people will talk sense and one 
doesn't care to listen, and he talks nonsense, but it does an old man like 
me good. There, run along,' he said; 'maybe I'll come and sit with you 
at your supper. We'll have another dispute. Make friends with my dunce, 
Princess Marya,' he shouted to Pierre from the door. 

Though he had hardly known them, Pierre felt at once like an old friend 
both with the harsh old prince and the gentle, timid Princess Marya. They 
all liked him. Not only Princess Marya, who looked at him with her 
most radiant expression; little Prince Nikolay, as the old prince called the 
year-old baby, smiled at Pierre and went to him. Mihail Ivanitch and 
Mademoiselle Bourienne looked at him with smiles when he talked to 
the old prince. 

On returning this time from his leave, Rostov for the first time felt and 
recognised how strong was the tie that bound him to Denisov and all his 
regiment. 

When Rostov reached the regiment, he experienced a sensation akin to 
what he had felt on reaching his home at Moscow. When he caught sight 
of the first hussar in the unbuttoned uniform of his regiment, when he 
recognised red-haired Dementyev, and saw the picket ropes of the chestnut 
horses, when Lavrushka gleefully shouted to his master, 'The count has 
come!' and Denisov, who had been asleep on his bed, ran all dishevelled 
out of the mud hut, and embraced him, and the officers gathered around 
to welcome the newcomer— Rostov felt the same sensation as when his 
mother had embraced him, and his father and sisters. The regiment was 
a home, too, and a home as unchangeably dear and precious as the parental 
home. 

After reporting himself to his colonel, being assigned to his own squadron, 
and serving on orderly duty and going for forage, after entering into all the 
little interests of the regiment, Rostov had the same feeling of peace and of 
moral support and the same sense of being at home here, and in his proper 
place, as he had once felt under his father's roof. Here was none of all that 
confusion of the free world, where he did not know his proper place, and 
made mistakes in exercising free choice. There were none of those vague 
and undefined money relations with his father; no memories of his awful 
loss to Dolohov. Here in the regiment everything was clear and simple. 
There was no need of thought or of choice; one had only to do nothing 
that was considered low in the Pavlograd regiment, and when occasion 



WAR AND PEACE 185 

came, to do what was clear and distinct, defined and commanded; and all 
would be well. 

On becoming subject again to the definite regulations of regimental 
life, Rostov had a sense of pleasure and relief, such as a weary man feels 
in lying down to rest. The regimental life was the greater relief to Rostov 
on this campaign, because after his loss to Dolohov (for which, in spite 
of his family's efforts to console him, he could not forgive himself), he had 
resolved not to serve as before, but to atone for his fault by good conduct, 
and by being a thoroughly good soldier and officer, that is a good man, a 
task so difficult in the world, but so possible in the regiment. 

Rostov had determined to repay his gambling debt to his parents in the 
course of five years. He had been sent ten thousand a year; now he had 
made up his mind to take only two thousand, and to leave the remainder to 
repay the debt to his parents. 

It was thawing, muddy, and cold, the ice had broken upon the river, the 
roads had become impassable; for several days there had been neither 
provender for the horses nor provisions for the men. Seeing that the trans- 
port of provisions was impossible, the soldiers dispersed about the aban- 
doned and desert villages to try and find potatoes, but very few were to 
be found even of these. 

Everything had been eaten up, and all the inhabitants of the district had 
fled; those that remained were worse than beggars, and there was nothing 
to be taken from them; indeed, the soldiers, although little given to com- 
passion, often gave their last ration to them. 

The Pavlograd regiment had only lost two men wounded in action, but 
had lost almost half its men from hunger and disease. In the hospitals they 
died so invariably, that soldiers sick with fever or the swelling that came 
from bad food, preferred to remain on duty, to drag their feeble limbs in 
the ranks, rather than to go to the hospitals. As spring came on, the soldiers 
found a plant growing out of the ground, like asparagus, which for some 
reason they called Mary's sweet-root, and they wandered about the fields 
and meadows seeking this Mary's sweet-root (which was very bitter). They 
dug it up with their swords and ate it, in spite of all prohibition of this 
noxious root being eaten. In the spring a new disease broke out among the 
soldiers, with swelling of the hands, legs, and face, which the doctors 
attributed to eating this root. But in spite of the prohibition, the soldiers of 
Denisov's squadron in particular ate a great deal of the Mary's sweet-root, 
because they had been for a fortnight eking out the last biscuits, giving out 
only half a pound a man, and the potatoes in the last lot of stores were 
sprouting and rotten. 

The horses, too, had for the last fortnight been fed on the thatched roofs 
of the houses; they were hideously thin, and still covered with their shaggy, 
winter coats, which were coming off in tufts. 

In spite of their destitute condition, the soldiers and officers went on 
living exactly as they always did. Just as always, though now with pale and 
swollen faces and torn uniforms, the hussars were drawn up for calling 



186 WAR AND PEACE 

over, went out to collect forage, cleaned down their horses, and rubbed up 
their arms, dragged in straw from the thatched roofs in place of fodder, 
and assembled for dinner round the cauldrons, from which they rose up 
hungry, making jokes over their vile food and their hunger. Just as ever, 
in their spare time off duty the soldiers lighted camp-fires, and warmed 
themselves naked before them, smoked, picked out, and baked the sprouting, 
rotten potatoes, and told and heard either stories of Potyomkin's and 
Suvorov's campaigns or popular legends of cunning Alyoshka, and of the 
priests' workman, Mikolka. 

The officers lived as usual in twos and threes in the roofless, broken- 
down houses. The senior officers were busily engaged in trying to get hold 
of straw and potatoes, and the means of sustenance for the soldiers gen- 
erallv, while the younger ones spent their time as they always did, some 
over cards (money was plentiful, though there was nothing to eat), others 
over more innocent games, a sort of quoits and skittles. Of the general 
cause of the campaign little was said, partly because nothing certain was 
known, partly because there was a vague feeling that the war was not 
going well. It was closer to the borders of Russia. On all sides could be heard 
curses upon the enemy of the human race, Bonaparte; in the villages there 
were levies of recruits and reserve men, and from the theatre of war came 
news of the most conflicting kind, false as usual, and hence variously in- 
terpreted. 

In April the army was excited by the news of the arrival of the Tsar. 
Rostov did not succeed in being present at the review; the Pavlograd hus- 
sars were at the advance posts, a long way in front. 

They were bivouacking. Denisov and Rostov were living in a mud hut 
dug out by the soldiers for them, and roofed with branches and turf. The 
hut was made after a pattern that had just come into fashion among the 
soldiers. A trench was dug out an ell and a half in breadth, two ells in 
depth, and three and a half in length. At one end of the trench steps were 
scooped out, and these formed the entrance and the approach. The trench 
itself was the room, and in it the lucky officers, such as the captain, had a 
plank lying on piles at the further end away from the steps— this was the 
table. On both sides of the trench the earth had been thrown up, and these 
mounds made the two beds and the sofa. The roof was so constructed that 
one could stand upright in the middle, and on the beds it was possible to sit, 
if one moved up close to the table. Denisov, who always fared luxuriously, 
because the soldiers of his squadron were fond of him, had a board nailed 
up in the front part of the roof, and in the board a broken but cemented 
window pane. When it was very cold, they used to bring red-hot embers 
from the soldiers' camp-fires in a bent sheet of iron and set them near the 
steps (in the drawing-room, as Denisov called that part of the hut), and 
this made it so warm that the officers, of whom there were always a number 
with Denisov and Rostov, used to sit with nothing but their shirts on. 

In April Rostov had been on duty. At eight o'clock in the morning, on 
coming home after a sleepless night, he sent for hot embers, changed his 



WAR AND PEACE 187 

rain-soaked underclothes, said his prayers, drank some tea, warmed himself, 
put things tidy in his corner and on the table, and with a wind-beaten, 
heated face, and with only his shirt on, lay down on his back, folding his 
hands behind his head. He was engaged in agreeable meditations, reflecting 
that he would be sure to be promoted for the last reconnoitring expedition, 
and was expecting Denisov to come in. He wanted to talk to him. 

Behind the hut he heard the resounding roar of Denisov, unmistakably 
irritated. Rostov moved to the window to see to whom he was speaking, 
and saw the quartermaster, Toptcheenko. 

'I told you not to let them stuff themselves with that root— Mary's what 
do you call it!' Denisov was roaring. 'Why, I saw it myself, Lazartchuk was 
pulling it up in the field.' 

'I did give the order, your honour; they won't heed it,' answered the 
quartermaster. 

Rostov lay down again on his bed, and thought contentedly: 'Let him 
see to things now; he's fussing about while I have done my work, and I am 
lying here— it's splendid!' Through the wall he could hear now some one 
besides the quartermaster speaking. Lavrushka, Denisov's smart rogue oi 
a valet, was telling him something about some transports, biscuits and oxen, 
he had seen, while on the look-out for provisions. 

Again he heard Denisov's shout from further away, and the words'. 
'Saddle! second platoon!' 

'Where are they off to?' thought Rostov. 

Five minutes later Denisov came into the hut, clambered with muddy feet 
on the bed, angrily lighted his pipe, scattered about all his belongings, put 
on his riding-whip and sword, and was going out of the hut. In reply to 
Rostov's question, where was he going? he answered angrily and vaguely 
that he had business to see after. 

'God be my judge, then, and our gracious Emperor!' said Denisov, as he 
went out. Outside the hut Rostov heard the hoofs of several horses splashing 
through the mud. Rostov did not even trouble himself to find out where 
Denisov was going. Getting warmed through in his corner, he fell asleep, 
and it was only towards evening that he came out of the hut. Denisov had 
not yet come back. The weather had cleared; near the next hut two officers 
were playing quoits, with a laugh sticking big radishes for pegs in the 
soft muddy earth. Rostov joined them. In the middle of a game the officers 
saw transport waggons driving up to them; some fifteen hussars on lean 
horses rode behind them. The transport waggons, escorted by the hussars, 
drove up to the picket ropes, and a crowd of hussars surrounded them. 

'There, look! Denisov was always fretting about it,' said Rostov; 'here arc 
provisions come at last.' 

'High time, too!' said the officers. 'Won't vhe soldiers be pleased!' 

A. little behind the hussars rode Denisov, accompanied by two infantry 
officers, with whom he was in conversation. Rostov went to meet them. 

'I warn you, captain,' one of the officers was saying, a thin, little man. 
visibly wrathful. 



188 WAR AND PEACE 

'Well, I have told you, I won't give them up,' answered Denisov. 

'You will have to answer for it, captain. It's mutiny— carrying off trans- 
ports from your own army! Our men have had no food for two days.' 

'Mine have had nothing for a fortnight,' answered Denisov. 

'It's brigandage; you will answer for it, sir!' repeated the infantry officer, 
raising his voice. 

'But why do you keep pestering me? Eh?' roared Denisov, suddenly get- 
ting furious. 'It's I will have to answer for it, and not you; and you'd better 
not cry out till you're hurt. Be off!' he shouted at the officers. 

'All right!' the little officer responded, not the least intimidated, and not 
moving away. 'It's robbery, so I tell you. . . .' 

The stores carried off by the hussars had been intended for an infantry 
regiment, but learning from Lavrushka that the transport was unescorted, 
Denisov and his hussars had carried off the stores by force. Biscuits were 
dealt out freely to the soldiers; they even shared them with the other 
squadrons. 

Next day the colonel sent for Denisov, and putting his fingers held apart 
before his eyes, he said to him: 'I look at the matter like this; see, I know 
nothing, and will take no steps; but I advise you to ride over to the staff, 
and there, in the commissariat department, to smooth the thing over, and 
if possible give a receipt for so much stores. If not, and a claim is entered 
for the infantry regiments, there will be a fuss, and it may end unpleas- 
antly.' 

Denisov went straight from the colonel to the staff with a sincere desire 
to follow his advice. 

In the evening he came back to his hut in a condition such as Rostov had 
never seen his friend in before. Denisov could not speak, and was gasping 
for breath. When Rostov asked him what was wrong with him, he could 
only in a faint and husky voice utter incoherent oaths and threats. 

Alarmed at Denisov's condition, Rostov suggested he should undress, 
drink some water, and sent for the doctor. 

'Me to be court-martialled for brigandage— oh! some more water!— Let 
them court-martial me; I will, I always will, beat blackguards, and I'll tell 
the Emperor.— Ice,' he kept saying. 

The regimental doctor said it was necessary to bleed him. A deep saucer 
of black blood was drawn from Denisov's hairy arm, and only then did 
he recover himself sufficiently to relate what had happened. 

'I got there,' Denisov said. '"Well, where are your chief's quarters?" I 
asked. They showed me. "Will you please to wait?" "I have come on 
business, and I have come over thirty versts, I haven't time to wait; an- 
nounce me." Very good; but the over-thief appears; he, too, thought fit to 
lecture me. "This is robbery!" says he. "The robber," said I, "is not the 
man who takes the stores to feed his soldiers, but the man who takes them to 
fill his pockets." "Will you please to be silent?" Very good. "Give a re- 
ceipt," says he, "to the commissioner, but the affair will be reported at 



WAR AND PEACE 189 

headquarters." I go before the commissioner. I go in. Sitting at the table 
. . . Who? No, think of it! . . . Who is it that's starving us to death?' 
roared Denisov, bringing the fist of his lanced arm down so violently that 
the table almost fell over, and the glasses jumped on it. 'Telyanin! . . . 
"What, it's you that's starving us to death?" said I, and I gave him one on 
the snout, and well it went home, and then another, so . . . "Ah! . . . you 
so-and-so . . ." and I gave him a thrashing. But I did have a bit of fun, 
though, I can say that,' cried Denisov, his white teeth showing in a smile 
of malignant glee under his black moustaches. 'I should have killed him, if 
they hadn't pulled me off.' 

'But why are you shouting; keep quiet,' said Rostov; 'it's bleeding again. 
Stay, it must be bound up.' 

Denisov was bandaged up and put to bed. Next day he waked up calm 
and in good spirits. 

But at midday the adjutant of the regiment came with a grave and 
gloomy face to the hut shared by Denisov and Rostov, and regretfully 
showed them a formal communication to Major Denisov from the colonel, 
in which inquiries were made about the incidents cf the previous day. The 
adjutant informed them that the affair seemed likely to take a very disas- 
trous turn; that a court-martial was to be held; and that, with the strictness 
now prevailing as regards pillaging and breach of discipline, it would be a 
lucky chance if it ended in being degraded to the ranks. 

The case, as presented by the offended parties, was that Major Denisov, 
after carrying off the transports, had without any provocation come in a 
drunken condition to the chief commissioner of the commissariat, had 
called him a thief, threatened to beat him; and, when he was led out, had 
rushed into the office, attacked two officials, and sprained the arm of one 
of them. 

In response to further inquiries from Rostov, Denisov said, laughing, that 
it did seem certainly as though some other fellow had been mixed up in it, 
but that it was all stuff and nonsense; that he would never dream of being 
afraid of courts of any sort, and that if the scoundrels dared to pick a 
quarrel with him, he would give them an answer they wouldn't soon forget. 

Denisov spoke in this careless way of the whole affair. But Rostov knew 
him too well not to detect that in his heart (though he hid it from others) 
he was afraid of a court-martial, and was worrying over the matter, which 
was obviously certain to have disastrous consequences. Documents began 
to come every day, and notices from the court, and Denisov received a 
summons to put his squadron under the command of the officer next in 
seniority, and on the first of May to appear before the staff of the division 
for an investigation into the row in the commissariat office. On the previous 
day Platov undertook a reconnaissance of the enemy with two regiments of 
Cossacks and two squadrons of hussars. Denisov, with his usual swaggering 
gallantry, rode in the front of the line. One of the bullets fired by the 
French sharpshooters struck him in the fleshy upper 'put of the leg. Pos- 
sibly at any other time Denisov would not have left the regiment for so 



190 WAR AND PEACE 

slight a wound, but now he took advantage of it to excuse himself from 
appearing before the staff, and went into the hospital. 

In the month of June Rostov took leave to visit Denisov at the hospital. 

The hospital was in a little Prussian town, which had twice been sacked 
by Russian and French troops. In the summer weather, when the country 
looked so pleasant, this little town presented a strikingly melancholy 
contrast, with its broken roofs and fences, its foul streets and ragged 
inhabitants, and the sick and drunken soldiers wandering about it. 

The hospital was a stone house with remnants of fence torn up in the 
yard, and window frames and panes partly broken. Several soldiers 'band- 
aged up, and with pale and swollen faces, were walking or sitting in the 
sunshine in the yard. 

As soon as Rostov went in at the door, he was conscious of the stench 
of hospital and putrefying flesh all about him. On the stairs he met a Rus- 
sian army doctor with a cigar in his mouth. He was followed by a Russian 
trained assistant. 

'I can't be everywhere at once,' the doctor was saying. The assistant asked 
some further question. 'Oh! do as you think best! What difference will 
it make?' 

The doctor caught sight of Rostov mounting the stairs. 

'What are you here for, your honour?' said the doctor. 'What are you 
here for? Couldn't you meet with a bullet that you want to pick up typhus? 
This is a pest-house, my good sir.' 

'How so?' asked Rostov. 

'Typhus, sir. It's death to any one to go in. It's only we two, Makeev and 
F (he pointed to the assistant) 'who are still afoot here. Five of us, doctors, 
have died here already. As soon as a new one comes, he's done for in a 
week,' said the doctor with evident satisfaction. 

Rostov explained that he wanted to see Major Denisov of the hussars, 
who was lying wounded here. 

'I don't know, can't tell you, my good sir. Only think, I have three hos- 
pitals to look after alone— over four hundred patients. It's a good thing the 
Prussian charitable ladies send us coffee and lint— two pounds a month— or 
we should be lost.' He laughed. 'Four hundred, sir; and they keep sending 
me in fresh cases. It is four hundred, isn't it? Eh? ' He turned to the assistant. 

The assistant looked worried. He was unmistakably in a hurry for the 
talkative doctor to be gone, and was waiting with vexation. 

'Major Denisov,' repeated Rostov; 'he was wounded at Moliten.' 

'I believe he's dead. Eh, Makeev?' the doctor queried of the assistant 
carelessly. 

The assistant did not, however, confirm the doctor's words. 

'Is he a long, red-haired man?' asked the doctor. 

Rostov described Denisov's appearance. 

'He was here, he was,' the doctor declared, with a sort of glee. 'He 
must be dead, but stil] I'll see. I have lists.' 



WAR AND PEACE 191 

Rostov and the assistant went into the corridor. The hospital stench was 
so strong in that dark corridor that Rostov held his nose, and was obliged 
to pause to recover his energy to go on. A door was opened on the right, 
and there limped out on crutches a thin yellow man with bare feet, and 
nothing on but his under linen. Leaning against the doorpost, he gazed with 
glittering, anxious eyes at the persons approaching. Rostov glanced in at 
the door and saw that the sick and wounded were lying there on the floor, 
on straw and on overcoats. 

'Can one go in and look?' asked Rostov. 

'What is there to look at?' said the assistant. But just because the assistant 
was obviously disinclined to let him go in, Rostov went into the soldiers' 
ward. The stench, to which he had grown used a little in the corridor, was 
stronger here. In the long room, brightly lighted by the sun in the big 
window, lay the sick and wounded in two rows with their heads to the 
wall, leaving a passage down the middle. The greater number of them were 
unconscious, and took no notice of the entrance of outsiders. Those who 
were conscious got up or raised their thin, yellow faces, and all gazed 
intently at Rostov, with the same expression of hope of help, of reproach, 
and envy of another man's health. Rostov went into the middle of the room, 
glanced in at the open doors of adjoining rooms, and on both sides saw the 
same thing. He stood still, looking round him speechless. He had never 
expected to see anything like this. Just before him lay right across the empty 
space down the middle, on the bare floor, a sick man, probably a Cossack 
for his hair was cut round in basin shape. This Cossack lay on his back, hit 
huge arms and legs outstretched. His face was of a purple red, his eyes were 
quite sunk in his head so that only the whites could be seen, and on his 
legs and on his hands, which were still red, the veins stood out like cords. 
He was knocking his head against the floor, and he uttered some word and 
kept repeating it. Rostov listened to what he was saying, and distinguished 
the word he kept repeating. That word was 'drink— drink— drink!' Rostov 
looked about for some one who could lay the sick man in his place and give 
him water. 

'Who looks after the patients here?' he asked the assistant. At that 
moment a commissariat soldier, a hospital orderly, came in from the 
adjoining room, and, marching in drill step, drew himself up before him. 

'Good day, your honour!' bawled this soldier, rolling his eyes at Rostov, 
and obviously mistaking him for some one in authority. 

'Take him away, give him water,' said Rostov, indicating the Cossack. 

'Certainly, your honour,' the soldier replied complacently, rolling his 
eyes more strenuously than ever, and drawing himself up, but not budging 
to do so. 

'No, there's no doing anything here,' thought Rostov, dropping his eves; 
and he wanted to get away, but he was aware of a significant look bent upon 
him from the right side, and he looked round at it. Almost in the corner 
there was, sitting on a military overcoat, an old soldier with a stern yellow 
face, thin as a skeleton's, and an unshaved grey beard. He was looking per- 



192 WAR AND PEACE 

sistently at Rostov. The man next the old soldier was whispering something 
to him, pointing to Rostov. Rostov saw the old man wanted to ask him 
something. He went closer and saw that the old man had only one leg 
bent under him, the other had been cut off above the knee. On the other 
side of the old man, at some distance from him, there lay with head thrown 
back the motionless figure of a young soldier with a waxen pallor on his 
snub-nose and still freckled face, and eyes sunken under the lids. Rostov 
looked at the snub-nosed soldier and a shiver ran down his back. 

"Why, that one seems to be . . .' he said to the assistant. 

'We've begged and begged, your honour,' said the old soldier with a 
quiver in his lower jaw. 'He died early in the morning. We're men, too, 
not dogs. . . .' 

Til see to it directly; they shall take him, they shall take him away,' said 
the assistant hurriedly. 'Come, your honour.' 

'Let us go, let us go,' said Rostov hastily; and dropping his eyes and 
shrinking together, trying to pass unnoticed through the lines of those 
reproachful and envious eyes fastened upon him, he went out of the room. 

The assistant walked along the corridor and led Rostov to the officers' 
wards, three rooms with doors opening between them. In these rooms there 
were bedsteads; the officers were sitting and lying upon them. Some were 
walking about the room in hospital dressing-gowns. The first person who 
met Rostov in the officers' ward was a thin little man who had lost one arm. 
He was walking about the first room in a nightcap and hospital dressing- 
gown, with a short pipe between his teeth. Rostov, looking intently at him, 
tried to recall where he had seen him. 

'See where it was God's will for us to meet again,' said the little man. 
'Tushin, Tushin, do you remember I brought you along after Schongraben? 
They have sliced a bit off me, see, . . .' said he smiling, and showing the 
empty sleeve of his dressing-gown. 'Is it Vassily Dmitryevitch Denisov you 
are looking for— a fellow-lodger here?' he said, hearing who it was Rostov 
wanted. 'Here, here,' and he led him into the next room, from which there 
came the sound of several men laughing. 

'How can they live in this place even, much less laugh?' thought Rostov, 
still aware of that corpse-like smell that had been so overpowering in the 
soldiers' ward, and still seeing around him those envious eyes following him 
on both sides, and the face of that young soldier with the sunken eyes. 

Denisov, covered up to his head with the quilt, was still in bed, though 
it was twelve o'clock in the day. 

'Ah, Rostov! How are you, how are you?' he shouted, still in the same 
voice as in the regiment. But Rostov noticed with grief, behind this habitual 
briskness and swagger, some new, sinister, smothered feeling that peeped 
out in the words and intonations and the expression of the face of Denisov. 

His wound, trifling as it was, had still not healed, though six weeks had 
passed since he was wounded. His face had the same swollen pallor as all 
the faces in the hospital. But that was not what struck Rostov: what struck 
him was that Denisov did not seem pleased to see him, and his smile was 



WAR AND PEACE 193 

forced. Denisov asked him nothing either of the regiment or of the general 
progress of the war. When Rostov talked of it, Denisov did not listen. 

Rostov even noticed that Denisov disliked all reference to the regiment, 
and to that other free life going on outside the hospital walls. He seemed 
to be trying to forget that old life, and to be interested only in his quarrel 
with the commissariat officials. In reply to Rostov's inquiry as to how this 
matter was going, he promptly drew from under his pillow a communica- 
tion he had received from the commissioner, and a rough copy of his 
answer. He grew more eager as he began to read his answer, and specially 
called Rostov's attention to the biting sarcasm with which he addressed his 
foes. Denisov's companions in the hospital, who had gathered round Rostov, 
as a person newly come from the world of freedom outside, gradually 
began to move away as soon as Denisov began reading his answer. From 
their faces Rostov surmised that all these gentlemen had more than once 
heard the w T hole story, and had had time to be bored with it. Only his 
nearest neighbour, a stout Uhlan, sat on his pallet-bed, scowling gloomily 
and smoking a pipe, and little one-armed Tushin still listened, shaking his 
head disapprovingly. In the middle of the reading the Uhlan interrupted 
Denisov. 

'What I say is,' he said, turning to Rostov, 'he ought simply to petition 
the Emperor for pardon. Just now, they say, there will be great rewards 
given and they will surely pardon.' 

'Me petition the Emperor!' said Denisov in a voice into which he tried 
to throw his old energy and fire, but which sounded like the expression of 
impotent irritability. 'What for? If I had been a robber, I'd beg for mercy; 
why, I'm being called up for trying to show up robbers. Let them try me, 
I'm not afraid of any one; I have served my Tsar and my country honestly, 
and I'm not a thief! And degrade me to the ranks and . . . Listen, I tell 
them straight out, see, I write to them, "If I had been a thief of government 
property . . ." ' 

'It's neatly put, no question about it,' said Tushin. 'But that's not the 
point, Vassily Dmitritch,' he too turned to Rostov, 'one must submit, and 
Vassily Dmitritch here won't do it. The auditor told you, you know, that 
it looks serious for you.' 

'Well, let it be serious,' said Denisov. 

'The auditor wrote a petition for you,' Tushin went on, 'and you ought 
to sign it and despatch it by this gentleman. No doubt he' (he indicated 
Rostov) 'has influence on the star! too. You won't find a better opportunity.' 

'But I have said I won't go cringing and fawning,' Denisov interrupted, 
and he went on reading his answer. 

Rostov did not dare to try and persuade Denisov, though he felt instinc- 
tively that the course proposed by Tushin and the other officers was the 
safest. 

When the reading of Denisov's biting replies, which lasted over an hour, 
was over, Rostov said nothing, and in the most dejected frame of mind 
spent the rest of the day in the society of Denisov's companions, who had 



194 WAR AND PEACE 

again gathered about him. He told them what he knew, and listened to the 
stories told by others. Denisov maintained a gloomy silence the whole 
evening. 

Late in the evening, when Rostov was about to leave, he asked Denisov if 
he had no commission for him. 

'Yes, wait a bit,' said Denisov. He looked round at the officers, and taking 
his papers from under his pillow, he went to the window where there was 
an inkstand, and sat down to w T rite. 

'It seems it's no good knocking one's head against a stone wall,' said he, 
coming from the window and giving Rostov a large envelope. It was the 
petition addressed to the Emperor that had been drawn up by the auditor. 
In it Denisov, making no reference to the shortcoming of the commissariat 
department, simply begged for mercy. 'Give it, it seems . . .' He did not 
finish, and smiled a forced and sickly smile. 

After going back to the regiment and reporting to the colonel the position 
of Denisov's affairs, Rostov rode to Tilsit with the letter to the Emperor. 

On the 13 th of June the French and Russian Emperors met at Tilsit. Boris 
Drubetskoy had asked the personage of high rank on whom he was in 
attendance to include him in the suite destined to be staying at Tilsit. 

'I should like to see the great man,' he said, meaning Napoleon, whom 
ae had hitherto, like every one else, always spoken of as Bonaparte. 

'You are speaking of Buonaparte?' the general said to him, smiling. 

Boris looked inquiringly at his general, and immediately saw that this 
was a playful test. 

'I am speaking, prince, of the Emperor Napoleon,' he replied. With a 
smile the general clapped him on the shoulder. 

'You will get on,' said he, and he took him with him. Boris was among 
the few present at Niemen on the day of the meeting of the Emperors. He 
saw the raft with the royal monograms, saw Napoleon's progress through 
the French guards along the further bank, saw the pensive face of the 
Emperor Alexander as he sat silent in the inn on the bank of the Niemen 
waiting for Napoleon's arrival. He saw both the Emperors get into boats, 
and Napoleon reaching the raft first, walk rapidly forward, and meeting 
Alexander, give him his hand; then both the Emperors disappeared into a 
pavilion. Ever since he had entered these higher spheres, Boris had made it 
his habit to keep an attentive watch on what was passing round him, and 
to note it all down. During the meeting of the Emperors at Tilsit, he asked 
the names of the persons accompanying Napoleon, inquired about the 
uniforms they were wearing, and listened carefully to the utterances of 
persons of consequence. 

Rostov, like the whole army indeed, was far from having passed through 
that revolution of feeling in regard to Napoleon and the French— transform- 
ing them from foes into friends— that had taken place at headquarters and 
in Boris. In the army every one was still feeling the same mingled hatred, 
fear, and contempt for Bonaparte and the French. Only recently Rostov had 



WAR AND PEACE 195 

argued with an officer of Platov's Cossacks the question whether if Napo- 
leon were taken prisoner he was to be treated as an emperor or as a 
criminal. Only a little while previously Rostov had met a wounded French 
colonel on the road, and had maintained to him with heat that there could 
be no peace concluded between a legitimate emperor and the criminal 
Bonaparte. 

Consequently it struck Rostov as strange to see French officers in Boris's 
quarters wearing the uniforms at which he was used to looking with very 
different eyes from the line of pickets. As soon as he caught sight of a 
French officer, that feeling of war, of hostility, which he always experienced 
at the sight of the enemy, came upon him at once. He stood still on the 
threshold and asked in Russian whether Drubetskoy lived there. Boris, 
hearing a strange voice in the passage, went out to meet him. For the first 
moment when he recognised Rostov, his face betrayed his annoyance. 

'Ah, that's you, very glad, very glad to see you,' he said, however, smiling 
and moving towards him. But Rostov had detected his first impulse. 

'I have come at a bad time, it seems,' said he; 'I shouldn't have come, but 
it's on a matter of importance,' he said coldly. . . . 

'No, I was only surprised at your getting away from the regiment. I will 
be with you in a moment,' he said in reply to a voice calling him. 

'I see I have come at a bad time,' repeated Rostov. 

The expression of annoyance had by now vanished from Boris's face; 
evidently having reflected and made up his mind how to act, he took him 
by both hands with marked composure and led him into the next room. 
Boris's eyes, gazing serenely and unflinchingly at Rostov, seemed as it were 
veiled by something, as though a sort of screen— the blue spectacles of con- 
ventional life— had been put over them. So it seemed to Rostov. 

'Oh, please, don't talk nonsense, as if you could come at a wrong time,' 
said Boris. Boris led him into a room where supper was laid, introduced him 
to his guests, mentioning his name, and explaining that he was not a civilian, 
but an officer in the hussars, and his old friend. 

With characteristic French courtesy one of the French officers turned to 
Rostov, as he sat in stubborn silence, and said to him that he had probably 
come to Tilsit to see the Emperor. 

'No, I came on business,' was Rostov's short reply. He got up and went 
up to Boris. 

'I'm in your way, though,' he said to him in an undertone; 'let us have a 
talk about my business, and I'll go away.' 

'Oh, no, not in the least,' said Boris. 'But if you are tired, come to my 
room and lie down and rest.' 

'Well, really . . .' 

They went into the little room where Boris slept. Rostov, without sitting 
down, began speaking at once with irritation— as though Boris were in some 
way to blame in the matter. He told him of Denisov's scrape, asking 
whether he would and could through his general intercede with the Em- 



196 WAR AND PEACE 

peror in Denisov's favour, and through him present the letter. When they 
were alone together, Rostov was for the first time distinctly aware that he 
felt an awkwardness in looking Boris in the face. Boris crossing one leg 
over the other, and stroking the slender fingers of his right hand with his 
left, listened to Rostov, as a general listens to a report presented by a 
subordinate, at one time looking away, at the next looking Rostov straight 
in the face with the same veiled look in his eyes. Every time he did so, 
Rostov felt ill at ease, and dropped his eyes. 

'I have heard of affairs of the sort, and I know that the Emperor is very 
severe in such cases. I think it had better not be taken before his majesty. 
To my mind, it would be better to apply directly to the commander of the 
corps. . . . But generally speaking, I believe . . .' 

'Then you don't care to do anything, so say so!' Rostov almost shouted, 
not looking Boris in the face. 
Boris smiled. 

'On the contrary, I will do what I can, only I imagine . . .' 
Rostov had arrived at Tilsit on the day least suitable for interceding in 
Denisov's behalf. It was out of the question for him to go himself to the 
general in attendance, since he was wearing civilian dress, and had come to 
Tilsit without permission to do so, and Boris, even had^ he been willing, 
could not have done so on the day following Rostov's arrival. On that day, 
the 27th of June, the preliminaries of peace were signed. 

In a frock coat and round hat, Nikolay strolled about the town, staring 
at the French and their uniforms, examining the streets and the houses 
where the Russian and the French Emperors were staying. In the market- 
place he saw tables set out and preparations for the banquet; in the streets 
he saw draperies hung across with flags of the Russian and French colours, 
and huge monograms of A and N. In the windows of the houses, too, there 
were flags and monograms. 

'Boris doesn't care to help me, and I don't care to apply to him. That 
question's closed,' thought Nikolay; 'everything's over between us, but I'm 
not going away from here without having done all I can for Denisov, and, 
above all, getting the letter given to the Emperor. To the Emperor? . . . 
He is here!' thought Rostov, who had unconsciously gone back to the house 
occupied by Alexander. 

Saddle horses were standing at the entrance, and the suite were riding up, 
evidently getting ready for the Emperor to come out. 

'Any minute I may see him,' thought Rostov. 'If only I could give him 
the letter directly, and tell him all . . . could they really arrest me for my 
frock coat? Impossible. He would understand on which side the truth lay. 
He understands everything, he knows everything. Who can be juster and 
more magnanimous than he? Besides, even if they were to arrest me for 
being here, what would it matter?' he thought, looking at an officer who was 
going into the house. 'Why, people go in, I see. Oh! it's all nonsense. I'll go 
and give the letter to the Emperor myself; so much the worse for Dru- 
betskoy who has driven me to it.' And all at once, with a decision he would 



WAR AND PEACE 197 

never have expected of himself, Rostov, fingering the letter in his pocket, 
went straight into the house where the Emperor was staying. 

'No, this time I won't miss my opportunity as I did after Austerlitz,' he 
thought, expecting every minute to meet the Emperor, and feeling a rush of 
blood to the heart at the idea. 'I will fall at his feet and will beseech him. He 
will lift me up, hear me out, and thank me too. "I am happy when I can do 
good, but to cancel injustice is the greatest happiness," ' Rostov fancied the 
Emperor would say to him. And he passed up the stairs regardless of the 
inquisitive eyes that were turned upon him. 

'Whom are you looking for?' some one asked him. 

'To give a letter, a petition, to his majesty,' said Nikolay, with a quiver 
in his voice. 

'A petition— to the officer on duty, this way; please' (he was motioned to 
the door below ) . 'Only it won't receive attention.' 

Hearing this indifferent voice, Rostov felt panic-stricken at what he was 
doing; the idea that he might meet the Emperor at any minute was so 
fascinating and consequently so terrible, that he was ready to fly; but an 
attendant meeting him opened the door to the officer's room for him, and 
Rostov went in. 

A short, stout man of about thirty in white breeches, high boots, and in 
a batiste shirt, apparently only just put on, was standing in this room. A 
valet was buttoning behind him some fine-looking, new, silk-embroidered 
braces, which for some reason attracted Rostov's notice. The stout man was 
conversing with some one in the adjoining room. 

'A good figure and in her first bloom,' he was saying, but seeing Rostov 
he broke off and frowned. 

'What do you want? A petition? . . .' 

'What is it?' asked some one in the next room. 

'Another petition,' answered the man in the braces. 

'Tell him to come later. He'll be coming out directly; we must go.' 

'Later, later, to-morrow. It's too late. . . .' 

Rostov turned away and would have gone out, but the man in the braces 
stopped him. 

'From whom is it? Who are you?' 

'From Major Denisov,' answered Rostov. 

'Who are you— an officer? ' 

'A lieutenant, Count Rostov.' 

'What audacity! Send it through the proper channel. And go along with 
you, go. . . .' And he began putting on the uniform the valet handed him. 

Rostov went out into the hall again, and noticed that by this time there 
were a great many officers and generals in full dress, and he had to pass 
through their midst. 

Cursing his temerity, ready to faint at the thought that he might any 
minute meet the Emperor and be put to shame before him and placed under 
arrest, fully aware by now of all the indecorum of his action, and regretting 
it, Rostov was making his way out of the house with downcast eves, through 



198 WAR AND PEACE 

the crowd of the gorgeously dressed suite, when a familiar voice called to 
him, and a hand detained him. 

'Well, sir, what are you doing here in a frock coat? asked the bass voice. 

It was a cavalry general who had won the Emperor's special favour 
during this campaign, and had formerly been in command of the division 
in whLh Rostov was serving. 

Rostov began in dismay to try and excuse himself, but seeing the good- 
naturedly jocose face of the general, he moved on one side, and in an excited 
voice told him of the whole affair, begging him to intercede for Denisov, 
whom the general knew. 

The general on hearing Rostov's story shook his head gravely. 'I'm sorry, 
very sorry for the gallant fellow; give me the letter.' 

Rostov had scarcely time to give him the letter and tell him all about 
Denisov's scrape, when the clank of rapid footsteps with spurs was heard 
on the stairs, and the general left his side and moved up to the steps. For- 
getting the danger of being recognised, Rostov moved right up to the 
steps together with some curious persons from the town; and again after 
two years he saw the features he adored: the same face, the same glance, 
the same walk, the same combination of majesty and mildness. . . . 

All the suite stood back, and Rostov saw the general talking at some 
length to the Emperor. 

The Emperor said a few words to him, and took a step towards his 
horse. Again the crowd of the suite and the street gazers, among whom 
was Rostov, moved up closer to the Emperor. Standing still with his hand 
on the saddle, the Emperor turned to the cavalry general and said aloud 
with the obvious intention of being heard by all: 'I cannot, general, and I 
cannot because the law is mightier than I am,' and he put his foot in the 
stirrup. The general bent his head respectfully; the Emperor took his seat 
and galloped up the street. 

In the public square towards which the Tsar rode there stood, facing 
each other, the battalion of the Preobrazhensky regiment on the right, and 
the battalion of the French guards in bearskin caps on the left. 

While the Emperor was riding up to one flank of the battalions, who 
presented arms, another crowd of horsemen was galloping up to the oppo- 
site flank, and at the head of them Rostov recognised Napoleon. That figure 
could be no one else. He galloped up, wearing a little hat, the ribbon of 
St. Andrey across his shoulder, and a blue uniform open over a white vest. 
He was riding a grey Arab horse of extremely fine breed, with a crimson, 
gold-embroidered saddle-cloth. Riding up to Alexander, he raised his hat, 
and at that movement Rostov, with his cavalryman's eye, could not help 
noticing that Napoleon had a bad and uncertain seat on horseback. The 
battalions shouted hurrah, and vive VEmpereur! Napoleon said something 
to Alexander. Both Emperors dismounted from their horses and took each 
other by the hands. Napoleon's face wore an unpleasantly hypocritical 
smile. Alexander was saying something to him with a cordial expression. 

In spite of the kicking of the horses of the French gendarmes, who were 



WAR AND PEACE 199 

keeping back the crowd, Rostov watched every movement of the Emperor 
Alexander and of Bonaparte, and never took his eyes off them. What struck 
him as something unexpected and strange was that Alexander behaved as 
though Bonaparte were his equal, and that Bonaparte in his manner to the 
Russian Tsar seemed perfectly at ease, as though this equal and intimate 
relation with a monarch were something natural and customary with him. 

Alexander and Napoleon, with a long tail of suite, moved towards the 
right flank of the Preobrazhensky battalion, close up to the crowd which 
was standing there. The crowd found itself unexpectedly so close to the 
Emperors, that Rostov, who stood in the front part of it, began to be afraid 
he might be recognised. 

'Sire, I ask your permission to give the Legion of Honour to the bravest 
of your soldiers,' said a harsh, precise voice. It was little Bonaparte speaking. 

'Lazarev!' the colonel called with a scowling face; and Lazarev, the sol- 
dier who was the best shot in firing at the range, stepped smartly forward. 

'I say, what luck for Lazarev! Twelve hundred francs pension for life.' 

'Have you heard the watchword?' said an officer of the guards to another. 
'The day before yesterday it was "Napoleon, France, bravoure"; to-day 
it's "Alexandre, Russie, grandeur." One day our Emperor gives it, and next 
day Napoleon. To-morrow the Emperor is to send the St. George to the 
bravest of the French guards.' 

Rostov stood a long while in the corner, looking at the fete from a 
distance. His brain was seething in an agonising confusion, which he could 
not work out to any conclusion. Horrible doubts were stirring in his soul. 
He thought of Denisov with his changed expression, his submission, and 
all the hospital with torn-off legs and arms, with the filth and disease. So 
vividly he recalled that hospital smell of corpse that he looked round to 
ascertain where the stench came from. Then he thought of that self-satisfied 
Bonaparte, with his white hands— treated now with cordiality and respect by 
the Emperor Alexander. For what, then, had those legs and arms been torn 
off, those men been killed? Then he thought of Lazarev rewarded, and 
Denisov punished and unpardoned. He caught himself in such strange re- 
flections that he was terrified at them. 



PART VI 



In 1809 the amity between the two sovereigns of the world, as Napoleon 
and Alexander used to be called, had become so close that in the highest 
society there was talk of a possible marriage between Napoleon and one of 
the sisters of the Emperor Alexander. But, apart from foreign policy, the 
attention of Russian society was at that time drawn with special interest to 
the internal changes taking place in all departments of the government. 

Life, meanwhile, the actual life of men with their real interests of health 
and sickness, labour and rest, with their interests of thought, science, poetry, 
music, love, affection, hatred, passion, went its way, as always, independ- 
ently, apart from the political amity or enmity of Napoleon Bonaparte, and 
apart from all possible reforms. 

Prince Andrey had spent two years without a break in the country. All 
those projects which Pierre had attempted on his estates, and, changing 
continually from one enterprise to another, had never carried out to any 
real result— all those projects had been carried out by Prince Andrey with- 
out display to any one and without any perceptible exertion. He possessed 
in the highest degree the quality Pierre lacked, that practical tenacity which, 
without fuss or any great effort on his part, set things in working order. 

On one estate of his, three hundred serfs were transformed into free 
cultivators (it was one of the first examples in Russia), in others forced 
labour was replaced by payment of rent. A trained midwife had been en- 
gaged at his expense to assist the peasant-women in child-birth, and a 
priest, at a fixed salary, was teaching the children of the peasants and house 
servants to read and write. 

Prince Andrey's duties as trustee of his son's Ryazan estates necessitated 
an interview with the marshal of the district. This marshal was Count Ilya 
Andreivitch Rostov, and in the middle of May Prince Andrey went to see 
him. 

Prince Andrey drove along the avenue leading to the Rostovs' house at 
Otradnoe, depressed and absorbed in considering what questions he must 
ask the marshal about his business. Behind some trees on the right he heard 
merry girlish cries, and caught sight of a party of girls running across the 
avenue along which his coach was driving. In front of all the rest there ran 
towards the coach a black-haired, very slender, strangely slender, black- 
eyed girl in a yellow cotton gown. On her head was a white pocket- 

200 



WAR AND PEACE 201 

handkerchief, from under which strayed locks of her loose hair. The girl 
was shouting something, but perceiving a stranger, she ran back laughing, 
without glancing at him. 

Prince Andrey for some reason felt a sudden pang. The day was so lovely, 
the sun so bright, everything around him so gay, and that slim and pretty 
girl knew nothing of his existence, and cared to know nothing, and was 
content and happy in her own life. 'What is she thinking about, and why is 
she so happy?' Prince Andrey could not help wondering with interest. 

Count Ilya Andreivitch was living in the year 1809 at Otradnoe, exactly 
as he had always done in previous years; that is to say, entertaining almost 
the whole province with hunts, theatricals, dinner parties and concerts. He 
was delighted to see Prince Andrey, as he always was to see any new guest, 
and almost forced him to stay the night. 

Prince' Andrey spent a tedious day, entertained by his elderly host and 
hostess and the more honoured among the guests, of whom the count's 
house was full in honour of an approaching name-day. Several times in the 
course of it, Bolkonsky glanced at Natasha, continually laughing and full 
of gaiety among the younger members of the company, and asked himself 
each time, 'What is she thinking of? What is she so glad about? ' 

In the evening, alone in a new place, he was for a long while unable to 
sleep. 

Prince Andrey got up and went to the window to open it. As soon as he 
opened the shutter, the moonlight broke into the room as though it had 
been waiting a long while outside on the watch for this chance. The night 
was fresh and bright and still. Just in front of the window stood a row of 
pollard-trees, black on one side, silvery bright on the other. Under the 
trees were rank, moist, bushy, growing plants of some kind, with leaves 
and stems touched here and there with silver. Further away, beyond the 
black trees, was the roof of something glistening with dew; to the right was 
a great, leafy tree, with its trunk and branches brilliantly white, and above 
it the moon, almost full, in a clear, almost starless, spring sky. Prince Andrey 
leaned his elbow on the window, and his eyes rested on that sky. 

His room was on the second story; there were people in the room over 
his head, and awake too. He heard a girlish voice, which Prince Andrey 
recognised at once. 

'But when are you coming to bed?' answered another voice. 

'You go to sleep, but I can't,' responded the first voice, coming nearer 
to the window. She was evidently leaning right out of the window, for he 
could hear the rustle of her garments and even her breathing. All was 
hushed and stonily still, like the moon and its lights and shadows. 

'Sonya! Sonya!' he heard the first voice again. 'Oh, how can you sleep! 
Do look what a moon! . . . Oh, how lovely it is! Do come here.' 

He heard Sonya's voice in a tone of vexation: 'Why, it's past one o'clock.' 

'And nothing to do with my existence!' thought Prince Audrey while 
he had been listening to her talk, for some reason hoping and dreading she 
might say something about him. All at once there stirred within his soul a 



202 WAR AND PEACE 

wholly unexpected medley of youthful hopes and ideas, running counter 
to the whole tenor of his life. 

On getting home after his journey, Prince Andrey made up his mind to 
go to Petersburg in the autumn, and began inventing all sorts of reasons 
for this decision. A whole chain of sensible, logical reasons, making it 
essential for him to visit Petersburg, and even to re-enter the service, was 
at every moment ready at his disposal. He could not indeed comprehend 
now how he could ever have doubted of the necessity of taking an active 
share in life, just as a month before he could not have understood how the 
idea of leaving the country could ever occur to him. 

Prince Andrey happened to be most favourably placed for obtaining a 
good reception in the highest and most various circles of the Petersburg 
society of that day. The reforming party welcomed him warmly, and 
sought him out, in the first place, because he had the reputation of being 
clever and very well read, and secondly because he had already gained the 
reputation of being a liberal by the emancipation of his serfs. The party 
of the dissatisfied older generation welcomed him simply as the son of his 
father, and reckoned upon his sympathy in their disapproval of the reforms. 
The feminine world, society, received him cordially because he was a 
wealthy match of high rank, and a person almost new, encircled by a 
halo of romance from his narrow escape from death and the tragic loss of 
his young wife. People talked of him, were interested in him, and eager 
to see him. 

'Yes, so it was you, prince, who freed your serfs?' said an old gentle- 
man of Catherine's court, turning disdainfully to Bolkonsky. 

'The little estate brought me no income as it was,' answered Bolkonsky, 
trying to minimise what he had done to the old gentleman, to avoid irri- 
tating him needlessly. 

'There's one thing I don't understand,' pursued the old gentleman. 'Who 
is to till the land if they are set free? It's easy to pass laws, but hard work 
to govern. I ask you, count, who will preside over the courts when all have 
to pass examinations?' 

Prince Andrey observed that some education in jurisprudence was neces- 
sary for such work. But within a week Prince Andrey was a member of 
the committee for the reconstruction of the army regulations, and— a thing 
he would never have expected— he was also chairman of a section of the 
commission for the revision of the legal code. With the help of the 
Napoleonic Code and the Code of Justinian he worked at the revision of 
the section Personal Rights. 

Two years before, at the beginning of 1 808, Pierre had returned to Peters- 
burg from his visits to his estates, and by no design of his own had taken 
a leading position among the freemasons in Petersburg. He spent his money 
on the construction of temples, and, to the best of his powers, made up the 
arrears of alms, a matter in which the majority of members were niggardly 



WAR AND PEACE 203 

and irregular. At his own expense, almost unaided, he maintained the poor- 
house built by the order in Petersburg. 

Meanwhile his life ran on in the old way, yielding to the same temptations 
and the same laxity. He liked a good dinner and he liked strong drink; 
and, though he thought it immoral and degrading to yield to them, he was 
unable to resist the temptations of the bachelor society in which he moved. 

Yet even in the whirl of his active work and his dissipations, Pierre 
began, after the lapse of a year, to feel more and more as though the ground 
of freemasonry on which he had taken his stand was slipping away under 
his feet. All the brothers who were members of the lodge were people 
Pierre knew in daily life, and it was difficult for him to see in them simply 
brothers in freemasonry, and not Prince B., nor Ivan Vasilyevitch D., whom 
he knew in private life mostly as persons of weak and worthless character. 
Under their masonic aprons and emblems he could not help seeing the 
uniforms and the decorations they were striving after in mundane life. 
Often after collecting the alms and reckoning up twenty to thirty roubles 
promised— and for the most part left owing— from some ten members, of 
whom half were as well-off as Pierre himself, he thought of the masonic 
vow by which every brother promised to give up all his belongings for his 
neighbour; and doubts stirred in his soul. 

Pierre began to feel dissatisfied with what he was doing. Freemasonry, 
at least as he knew it here, seemed to him sometimes to rest simply upon 
formal observances. He never dreamed of doubting of freemasonry itself, 
but began to suspect that Russian freemasonry had got on to a false track, 
and was deviating from its original course. And so towards the end of 
the year Pierre went abroad to devote himself to the higher mysteries 
of the order. 

It was in the summer of 1809 that Pierre returned to Petersburg. 

A solemn assembly of the lodge of the second order was arranged, at 
which Pierre promised to communicate the message he had to give the 
Petersburg brothers from the highest leaders of the order abroad. After 
the usual ceremonies Pierre got up and began to speak: 

'Dear brothers,' he began, blushing and hesitating, with a written speech 
in his hand, 'it is not enough to guard our secrets in the seclusion of the 
lodge,— what is needed is to act . . . to act. . . . We are falling into 
slumber, and we need to act.' 

Pierre opened his manuscript and began to read. 

'For the propagation of the pure truth and the attainment of virtue,' 
he read, 'we must purify men from prejudice, diffuse principles in harmony 
with the spirit of the times, undertake the education of the younger genera- 
tion, ally ourselves by indissoluble tics with the most enlightened men, 
boldly, and at the same time prudently, overcome superstition, infidelity, 
and folly, and form of those devoted to us men linked together by a 
common aim and possessed of power and authority. 

'But in those great projects we arc very gravely hindered bv existing 
political institutions. What is to be done in the existing state of affairs? Arc 



204 WAR AND PEACE 

we to welcome revolutions, to overthrow everything, to repel violence by 
violence? . . . No, we are very far from that. Every reform by violence is 
to be deprecated, because it does little to correct the evil while men remain 
as they are, and because wisdom has no need of violence. 

'The whole plan of our order should be founded on the training of men 
of character and virtue, bound together by unity of conviction and aim. 
In a word, we want to found a form of government holding universal sway, 
which should be diffused over the whole world without encroaching on 
civil obligations; under which all other governments could continue in their 
ordinary course and do all, except what hinders the great aim of our order, 
that is, the triumph of virtue over vice. This aim is that of Christianity 
itself. 

'In times when all was plunged in darkness, exhortation alone was of 
course enough; the novelty of truth gave it peculiar force, but nowadays 
far more powerful means are necessary for us. As soon as we have a certain 
number of capable men in every state, each of them training again two 
others, and all keeping in close co-operation, then everything will be possible 
for our order, which has already done much in secret for the good of 
humanity.' 

This speech did not merely make a great impression, it produced a thrill 
of excitement in the lodge. The majority of the brothers, seeing in this 
speech dangerous projects of 'illuminism,' to Pierre's surprise received it 
coldly. The grand master began to raise objections to it; Pierre began to 
expound his own views with greater and greater heat. It was long since 
there had been so stormy a meeting. The lodge split up into parties; one 
party opposed Pierre, accusing him of 'illuminism'; the other supported 
him. Pierre was for the first time at this meeting impressed by the endless 
multiplicity of men's minds, which leads to no truth being ever seen by two 
persons alike. 

Again Pierre was overtaken by that despondency he so dreaded. For 
three days after the delivery of his speech at the lodge he lay on a sofa 
at home, seeing no one, and going nowhere. 

At this time he received a letter from his wife who besought him to 
see her, wrote of her unhappiness on his account, and her desire to devote 
her whole life to him. At the end of die letter she informed him that in a 
day or two she would arrive in Petersburg from abroad. 

The letter was followed up by one of the freemasons whom Pierre 
respected least bursting in upon his solitude. Turning the conversation 
upon Pierre's matrimonial affairs, he gave him, by way of brotherly counsel, 
his opinion that his severity to his wife was wrong, and that Pierre was 
departing from the first principles of freemasonry in not forgiving the 
penitent. At the same time his mother-in-law, Prince Vassily's wife, sent 
to him, beseeching him to visit her, if only for a few minutes, to discuss 
a matter of great importance. Pierre saw there was a conspiracy against him, 
that they meant to reconcile him with his wife, and he did not even dislike 
this in the mood in which he then was. Nothing mattered to him. 



WAR AND PEACE 205 

'No one is right, no one is to blame, and so she, too, is not to blame,' he 
thought. 

Without answering either his wife or his mother-in-law, Pierre at once 
set off late in the evening, and drove to Moscow to see Osip Alexyevitch. 

This is what Pierre wrote in his diary: 

1 Moscow, November 17.— I have only just come from seeing my bene- 
factor, and I hasten to note down all I have been feeling. Osip Alexyevitch 
lives in poverty, and has been for three years past suffering from a painful 
disease of the bladder. No one has ever heard from him a groan or a 
word of complaint. From morning till late at night, except at the times 
when he partakes of the very plainest food, he is working at science. He 
received me graciously, and made me sit down on the bed on which he 
was lying. I made him the sign of the Knights of the East and of Jerusalem; 
he responded with the same, and asked me with a gentle smile what I had 
learned and gained in the Prussian and Scottish lodges. I told him every- 
thing as best I could, repeating to him the principles of action I had pro- 
posed in our Petersburg lodge, and telling him of the unfavourable reception 
given me, and the rupture between me and the brothers. 

'Osip Alexyevitch, after some silent thought, laid all his own views of 
the subject before me, which immediately threw light on all the past and 
all the course that lies before me. He surprised me by asking whether I 
remembered the threefold aim of the order— (1) the preservation and study 
of the holy mystery; (2) the purification and reformation of self for its 
reception; and (3) the improvement of the human race through striving 
for such purification. Which, he asked, was the first and greatest of those 
three aims? Undoubtedly self-reformation and self-purification. It is only 
towards that aim that we can always strive independently of all circum- 
stances. But at the same time it is just that aim which requires of us the 
greatest effort, and therefore, led astray by pride, we let that aim drop, and 
either strive to penetrate to the mystery which we are unworthy in our 
impurity to receive, or seek after the reformation of the human race, while 
we are ourselves setting an example of vice and abomination. "Illuminism" 
is not a pure doctrine precisely because it is seduced by worldly activity 
and puffed up with pride. On this ground Osip Alexyevitch censured my 
speech and all I am doing. 

'At the bottom of my heart I agreed with him. Talking of my domestic 
affairs, he said to me: "The first duty of a mason, as I have told you, is 
the perfection of himself. But often we imagine that by removing all the 
difficulties of our life, we may better attain this aim. It is quite the con- 
trary, sir," he said to me: "it is only in the midst of the cares of the world 
that we can reach the three great aims— (1) self-knowledge, for a man can 
know himself only by comparison; (2) greater perfection, which can only 
be obtained by conflict; and (3) the attainment of the chief virtue— love of 
death. Only the corruptions of life can show us all its vanity, and strengthen 
our innate love for death, or rather regeneration into new life." These 



206 WAR AND PEACE 

words were the more remarkable as Osip Alexyevitch, in spite of his griev- 
ous physical sufferings, is never weary of life, though he loves death, for 
which he does not, in spite of all the purity and loftiness of his inner man, 
yet feel himself prepared. Then my benefactor explained to me fully the 
significance of the great square of creation, and pointed out that the third 
and the seventh number are the basis of everything. He counselled me not 
to withdraw from co-operation with the Petersburg brothers, while under- 
taking duties only of the second order in the lodge.' 

'Petersburg, November 23.— I am reconciled with my wife. My mother- 
in-law came to me in tears, and said that Ellen was here, and that she 
besought me to hear her; that she was innocent, that she was miserable 
at my desertion of her, and a great deal more. I knew that if I once let 
myself see her, I should not be able to refuse to accede to her wishes. In 
my uncertainty, I did not know to whose help and advice to have recourse. 
If my benefactor had been here, he would have told me what to do. I 
retired to my own room, read over the letters of Osip Alexyevitch, recalled 
my conversations with him, and from all that I reached the conclusion 
that I ought not to refuse a suppliant, and ought to hold out a helping 
hand to every one, and, above all, to a person so closely connected with 
me, and that I must bear my cross. But if I forgive her for the sake of 
doing right, at least let my reunion with her have a spiritual end only. 
So I decided, and so I wrote to Osip Alexyevitch. 

'I said to my wife that I begged her to forget all the past, that I begged 
her to forgive whatever wrong I might have done her, and that I had 
nothing to forgive her. It was a joy to me to tell her that. May she never 
know how painful it was to me to see her again! I have installed myself 
in the upper rooms in this great house, and I am conscious of a happy feel- 
ing of beginning anew.' 

At that time, as always indeed, the exalted society that met at court and 
the great balls was split up into several circles, each of which had its special 
tone. The largest among them was the French circle— supporting the 
Napoleonic alliance. In this circle Ellen took a leading position, as soon 
as she had established herself in her husband's house in Petersburg. She 
received the members of the French embassy, and a great number of 
people, noted for their wit and their politeness, and belonging to that 
political section. 

Ellen had been at Erfurt at the time of the famous meeting of the 
Emperors; and Napoleon himself, seeing her at the theatre, had asked 
who she was, and admired her beauty. Her triumphs in the character of a 
beautiful and elegant woman did not surprise Pierre, for with years she 
had become even more beautiful than before. But what did surprise him 
was that during the last two years his wife had succeeded in gaining a 
reputation as 'a charming woman, as witty as she is beautiful,' as was said 
of her. To be received in Countess Bezuhov's salon was looked upon as a 



WAR AND PEACE 207 

certificate of intellect. Young men read up subjects before one of Ellen's 
soirees, so as to be able to talk of something in her salon, and secretaries 
of the embassy, and even ambassadors, confided diplomatic secrets to her, 
so that Ellen was in a way a power. It was with a strange feeling of per- 
plexity and alarm that Pierre, who knew she was very stupid, sometimes at 
her dinners and soirees, listened to conversation about politics, poetry, and 
philosophy. 

Pierre was exactly the husband needed by this brilliant society woman, 
that absent-minded, eccentric, grand seigneur who got in nobody's way 
and formed by his contrast with his wife's elegance and tact an ad- 
vantageous foil. Pierre's continual concentration on immaterial interests 
during the last two years, and his genuine contempt for everything else, 
gave him in his wife's circle, which did not interest him, that tone of 
unconcern, indifference, and benevolence towards all alike, which cannot 
be acquired artificially, and for that reason commands involuntary respect. 

Among the numerous young men daily to be seen in Ellen's house, Boris 
Drubetskoy, who had by now achieved marked success in the service, was, 
after Ellen's return from Erfurt, the most intimate friend of the Bezuhov 
household. Ellen used to call him i mon page,'' and treated him like a child. 
Her smile for him was the same smile she bestowed on all, but it was some- 
times distasteful to Pierre to see that smile. Boris behaved to Pierre with a 
marked, dignified, and mournful respectfulness. This shade of respectful- 
ness too disturbed Pierre. He had suffered so much three years before from 
the mortification caused him by his wife, that now he secured himself 
from all possibility of similar mortification; in the first place, by being 
his wife's husband only in name, and secondly, by not allowing himself 
to suspect anything. 'No, now she has become a blue-stocking, she has 
renounced for ever her former errors,' he said to himself. 'There has never 
been an instance of a blue-stocking giving way to tender passions,' he 
repeated to himself; a maxim he had picked up somewhere and implicitly 
believed. 

He kept up his diary and this was what he was writing in it at that time: 

'November 27.— I got up late and lay a long while in bed after I was 
awake, giving way to sloth. My God, help me and strengthen me that I 
may walk in Thy ways. Read the Scriptures, but without proper feeling. 
Brother Urusov came: talked of the cares of this world. He told me of 
the Tsar's new projects. I was beginning to criticise them, but remem- 
bered my principles and the words of my benefactor, that a true mason 
ought to be zealous in working for the state, when his aid is required, but 
should look on quietly at what he is not called upon to assist in. My tongue 
is my enemy.' 

'December 7.— I dreamed that Osip Alexyevitch was sitting in my house, 
and I was very glad to see him and eager to entertain him. But in my dream 



208 WAR AND PEACE 

I kept chattering away incessantly with other people, and all at once I 
bethought myself that this could not be to his liking. Then we all seemed 
to go out of the room, and something strange happened. We were sitting 
or lying on the floor. He was telling me something. But in my dream I 
longed to show him my devotional feeling, and, not listening to his words, 
I began picturing to myself the state of my own inner man, and the grace 
of God sanctifying me. And tears came into my eyes, and I was glad that 
he noticed it. But all of a sudden we found ourselves in my bedroom, 
where stood a big double bed. And in my dream he asked me, "Tell me the 
truth, what is your chief temptation? Do you know it? I believe that you 
do know it." Abashed at this question, I answered that sloth was my be- 
setting temptation. He shook his head incredulously. And even more 
abashed, I told him that though I was living here with my wife, I was 
not living with her as a husband. To this he replied that I had no right to 
deprive my wife of my embraces, and gave me to understand that this 
was my duty. But I answered that I should be ashamed of it, and suddenly 
everything vanished. And I waked up, and in my mind there was the text 
of scripture: "And the life was the light of man, and the light shineth in 
the darkness, and the darkness comprehendeth it not." ' 

The rostovs' pecuniary position had not improved during the two years 
they had spent in the country. Although Nikolay Rostov had kept firmly 
to his resolution, and was still living in a modest way in an obscure regi- 
ment, debts went on unchecked, growing bigger every year. The sole 
resource that presented itself to the old count as the obvious thing to do 
was to enter the government service, and he had come to Petersburg to 
seek a post. 

The Rostovs kept open house in Petersburg, just as they used to do in 
Moscow; and at their suppers people of the most diverse sorts could be 
seen together— country neighbours, old and not well-to-do country gentle- 
men with their daughters, Pierre Bezuhov, and the son of their district 
postmaster, who was in an office in Petersburg. 

Anna Mihalovna had taken in these latter days to seeing less of the 
Rostovs. There was a marked dignity, too, in her manner with them, and 
she spoke on every occasion with thankfulness and enthusiasm of her son's 
great abilities and brilliant career. When the Rostovs arrived in Petersburg 
Boris came to call on them. 

It was not without emotion that he came to see them. His reminiscences 
of Natasha were Boris's most poetic memories. But he had a brilliant posi- 
tion in society, thanks to his intimacy with Countess Bezuhov; a brilliant 
position in the service, thanks to the protection of a great person whose 
confidence he had completely won; and he was beginning to make plans 
for marrying one of the richest heiresses in Petersburg, plans which might 
very easily be realised. 

Boris had thought of Natasha as the little girl he had known four years 
before in a short frock, with black eyes glancing under her curls, and a 



WAR AND PEACE 209 

desperate, childish giggle; and so, when a quite different Natasha came in, 
he was taken aback and his face expressed surprise and admiration. His 
expression delighted Natasha. 

'Well, would you know your mischievous little playmate?' said the 
countess. Boris kissed Natasha's hand, and said he was surprised at the 
cl lge in her. 

'How pretty you have grown!' 

'I should hope so!' was the answer in Natasha's laughing eyes. 

'And does papa look older?' she asked. 

Natasha sat still, taking no part in the talk between Boris and her mother. 
Silently and minutely she scrutinised the young man who had been her 
suitor in her childhood. He felt oppressed by that persistent, friendly gaze, 
and glanced once or twice at her. 

The uniform, the spurs, the tie, the way Boris had brushed his hair,— it 
was all fashionable and cornme il faut. That Natasha noticed at once. He 
sat a little sideways on a low chair beside the countess, with his right hand 
smacking the exquisitely clean and perfectly fitting glove on his left. He 
talked v/ith a peculiar, refined compression of the lips about the divisions 
of the best society in Petersburg; with faint irony referred to old days in 
Moscow and old Moscow acquaintances. Not unintentionally, as Natasha 
felt, he alluded to the ambassador's ball, at which he had been present. 
After his first visit, Boris said to himself that Natasha was as attractive to 
him as she had been in the past, but that he must not give way to his 
feelings, because to marry her— a girl almost without fortune— would be 
the ruin of his career, and to renew their old relations without any inten- 
tion of marriage would be dishonourable. Boris resolved to avoid meeting 
Natasha; but in spite of this resolution he came a few days later, and be- 
gan to come often, and to spend whole days at the Rostovs'. He gave up 
visiting Ellen, received reproachful notes every day from her, and still 
spent whole days together at the Rostovs'. 

One evening the old countess in her bed-jacket, without her false curls, 
and with only one poor wisp of hair peeping out from under her white 
cotton nightcap, was bowing down on the carpet, sighing and moaning 
as she repeated her evening prayers. Her door creaked, and Natasha, also 
in a bed-jacket, ran in, bare-legged, with her feet in slippers, and her hair 
in curl papers. The countess looked round and frowned. She was repeating 
her last prayer. 'Can it be this couch will be my bier?' 

That couch was a high feather-bed, with five pillows, each smaller than 
the one below. Natasha skipped in, sank into the feather-bed, rolled over 
towards the side, and began snuggling up under the quilt. 

'Well, what is it to-night?' said her mother, settling herself in the pillows. 

'And I want to talk to you . . .' 

'About Boris ... I know,' Natasha said seriously. 

'Natasha, you are sixteen! At your age I was married. You say Boris is 
nice. He is very nice, and I love him like a son! But what do you want? 



210 WAR AND PEACE 

. . . What are you thinking about? You have quite turned his head, 1 cail 
see that . . .' 

Natasha was listening and considering. 

'Well, so what then?' she said. 

'You have completely turned his head, and what for? What do you want 
of him? You know you can't marry him.' 

'Why not?' said Natasha. 

'Because he's so young, because he's poor, because he's a relation . . . 
because you don't care for him yourself.' 

'How do you know that?' 

'I know. It's not right, my darling. I tell you what, Natasha, I'll speak to 
Boris. He mustn't come so often . . .' 

'Why mustn't he, if he wants to?' 

'Because I know it can't come to anything.' 

'How do you know? No, mamma, don't speak to him. What nonsense!' 
said Natasha, in the tone of a man being robbed of his property. 'Mamma, 
is he very much in love? What do you think? Were men as much in love 
with you? And he's very nice, very, very nice! Only not quite to my liking 
—he's so narrow, somehow, like a clock on the wall. . . . Don't you under- 
stand? . . . Narrow, you know, grey, light-coloured . . .' 

'What nonsense you talk!' said the countess. 

Natasha went on: 

'Don't you really understand? Nikolenka would understand . . . BezuhoV^ 
now— he's blue, dark blue and red, and he's quadrangular.' 

'You're flirting with him, too,' said the countess, laughing. 

'No, he's a freemason, I have heard. He's jolly, dark blue and red; how 
am I to explain to you . . .' 

'Little countess,' they heard the count's voice through the door, 'you're 
not asleep?' Natasha skipped up, snatched up her slippers, and ran barefoot 
to her own room. For a long while she could not go to sleep. She kept 
musing on no one's being able to understand all she understood and all 
that was in her. 

'Sonya?' she wondered, looking at her friend asleep, curled up like a 
kitten with her great mass of hair. 'No, how could she! She's virtuous. She's 
in love with Nikolenka and doesn't care to know anything more. Mamma, 
even she doesn't understand. It's wonderful how clever I am and how . . . 
she is charming,' she went on, speaking of herself in the third person, and 
fancying that it was some very clever, the very cleverest and finest of men, 
who was saying it of her . . . 'There is everything, everything in her,' this 
man continued, 'extraordinarily clever, charming and then pretty, extraor- 
dinarily pretty, graceful. She swims, rides capitally, and a voice!— a mar- 
vellous voice, one may say!' She hummed her favourite musical phrase from 
an opera, flung herself into bed, passed into another still happier world of 
dreams. 

Next day the countess sent for Boris, and talked to him, and from that 
day he gave up visiting at the Rostovs'. 



WAR AND PEACE 211 

On the 31st of December, on the eve of the new year 1810, a ball was 
given by a grand personage who had been a star of the court of Catherine. 
The Tsar and the diplomatic corps were to be present at this ball. 

The well-known mansion of this grandee in the English Embankment 
was illuminated by innumerable lights. The police were standing at the 
lighted entry, laid with red baize; and not merely policemen, but a police 
commander was at the entrance, and dozens of officers of the police. 
Carriages kept driving away, and fresh ones kept driving up, with grooms 
in red livery and grooms in plumed hats. From the carriages emerged men 
wearing uniforms, stars, and ribbons; while ladies in satin and ermine 
stepped carefully out on the carriage steps, that were let down with a bang, 
and then walked hurriedly and noiselessly over the baize of the entry. 

Natasha was going to her first great ball. She had got up at eight o'clock 
that morning, and had spent the whole day in feverish agitation and 
activity. All her energies had since morning been directed to the one aim 
of getting herself, her mother, and Sonya as well dressed as possible. Sonya 
and her mother put themselves entirely in her hands. The countess was to 
wear a dark red velvet dress; the two girls white tulle dresses over pink 
silk slips, and roses on their bodices. They were to wear their hair a la 
grecque. 

All the essentials were ready. Feet, arms, necks, and ears had been 
washed, scented, and powdered with peculiar care in readiness for the ball. 
Openworksilk stockings and white satin shoes with ribbons had been put 
on. The hairdressing was almost accomplished. Sonya was finishing dressing, 
so was the countess; but Natasha, who had been busily looking after every 
one, was behindhand. She was still sitting before the looking-glass with a 
peignoir thrown over her thin shoulders. Sonya, already dressed, stood in 
the middle of the room, and was trying to fasten in a last ribbon, hurting 
her little finger as she pressed the pin with a scrooping sound into the silk. 

'Not like that, Sonya, not like that!' said Natasha, turning her head, and 
clutching her hair in both hands, as the maid arranging it was not quick 
enough in letting it go. 'The ribbon mustn't go like that; come here.' Sonva 
squatted down. Natasha pinned the ribbon in her own way. 

'Will you soon be ready?' they heard the countess's voice. 'It will be ten 
in a minute.' 

^'Immediately, immediately. . . . And are you ready, mamma?' 

'Only my cap to fasten on.' 

'Don't do it without me,' shouted Natasha; 'you don't know how to!' 

All attention was now centred on Natasha's skirt, which was too long. 
Two maids were running it up round the edge, hurriedly biting of! trie- 
threads. A third one, with pins in her teeth and lips, was running from the 
countess to Sonya; a fourth was holding up the whole tulle dress in 
her arms. 

'Give me that thimble, miss.' ' 

'Will you be quick?' snid the count from outside the door. 

'Readv. miss,' said the maid, lifting up the shortened tulle skirt on two 



212 WAR AND PEACE 

fingers, blowing something off it, and giving it a shake to show her appre- 
ciation of the transparency. 

Natasha began putting on the dress. 

'In a minute, in a minute, don't come in, papa,' she shouted to her father 
at the door, from under the tulle of the dress that concealed all her face. A 
minute later the count was admitted. He was wearing a blue frock coat, 
stockings, and dancing-shoes, and was perfumed and pomaded. 

'Ah, papa, how nice you look, lovely!' said Natasha, standing in the 
middle of the room, stroking out the folds of her tulle. 

'If you please, miss, if you please . . .' said a maid, pulling up the skirt 
and turning the pins from one corner of her mouth to the other with 
her tongue. 

'Say what you like!' cried Sonya, with despair in her voice, as she gazed 
at Natasha's skirt, 'say what you like!— it's too long still!' 

Natasha walked a little further off to look at herself in the pierglass. The 
skirt was too long. 

At that moment the countess in her cap and velvet gown walked into 
the room. 

'Oo-oo! my beauty!' cried the count. 'She looks nicer than any of you!' 

'Mamma, the cap should be more on one side,' said Natasha. 'I'll pin it 
fresh,' and she darted forward. The maids turning up her skirt, not pre- 
pared for her hasty movement, tore off a piece of the tulle. 

'Oh, mercy! What was that? Really it's not my fault . . .' 

'It's all right, I'll run it up, it won't show,' said Dunyasha. 

Careful of their coiffures and their dresses, at eleven o'clock they settled 
themselves in the carriages and drove off. 

In the damp, chill air, in the closeness and half dark of the swaying 
carriage, Natasha pictured to herself for the first time what was in store 
for her there, at the ball, in the brightly lighted halls— music, flowers, 
dancing, the Tsar, all the brilliant young people of Petersburg. She could 
only grasp all that awaited her when, walking over the red cloth, she went 
into the vestibule, took off her cloak, and walked beside Sonya in front of 
her mother between the flowers, up the lighted staircase. In front and 
behind them walked guests dressed in similar ball-dresses and conversing in 
similarly subdued tones. The looking-glasses on the staircases reflected 
ladies in white, blue, and pink dresses, with diamonds and pearls on their 
bare arms and necks. 

Natasha looked into the looking-glasses and could not distinguish herself 
from the rest. The host and hostess who had been already standing at the 
door for half an hour, saying exactly the same words to every guest on 
arrival, Charme de voiis voir, gave the same greeting to the Rostovs. The 
two young girls in their white dresses, with roses alike in their black hair, 
made curtsies just alike, but unconsciously the hostess's eyes rested longer 
on the slender figure of Natasha. The host too followed Natasha with his 
eyes, and asked the count which of the girls was his daughter. 

'Charming!' he said, kissing his own finger-tips. 



WAR AND PEACE 213 

In the ballroom, guests stood crowding about the entry in expectation of 
the Tsar. The countess took up her position in the front row of this crowd. 
Natasha heard and felt that several voices were asking who she was, that 
many pairs of eyes were fixed on her. She knew that she was making a 
good impression on those who noticed her, and this observation calmed 
her somewhat. 

'There are some like ourselves, and some not as good,' she thought. 

Madame Peronsky, a maid-of-honour at the old court, was pointing out to 
the countess the most distinguished persons at the ball. 

'That is the Dutch ambassador, do you see, the grey-haired man. And 
here she comes, the queen of Petersburg society, Countess Bezuhov,' she 
said, pointing to Ellen. 'She's both lovely and clever. . . . They say Prince 
So-and-So is wild about her.' 

She pointed out a lady who was crossing the room accompanied by a 
very ugly daughter. 

'That's the heiress of a million,' said Madame Peronsky. 'And, look, here 
come her suitors. . . . That's Countess Bezuhov's brother, Anatole 
Kuragin,' she said, pointing to a handsome officer in the Horse Guards, 
who passed by them looking from the height of his lifted head over the 
ladies to something beyond them. 'He is handsome, isn't he? They say he 
is to be married to that heiress. And your cousin, Drubetskoy, is very 
attentive to her too. They say she has millions. 

'And that stout fellow in spectacles is a universal freemason,' said Ma- 
dame Peronsky, indicating Bezuhov. 'Set him beside his wife: he's a motley 
fool!' 

Swinging his stout frame, Pierre slouched through the crowd, nodding 
to right and to left, as casually and good-naturedly as though he were 
walking through a crowd in a market, unmistakably looking for some one. 

Natasha looked with joy at the familiar face of Pierre, the motley fool, 
as Madame Peronsky called him, and knew that it was they, and she in 
particular, of whom Pierre was in search in the crowd. Pierre had promised 
her to be at the ball and to find her partners. But before reaching them, 
Pierre came to a standstill beside a very handsome, dark man of medium 
height in a white uniform, who was standing in a window talking to a tall 
man wearing stars and a ribbon. 

Natasha at once recognised the handsome youncf man in the white uni- 
form; it was Bolkonsky, who seemed to her to have grown much younger, 
happier, and better looking. 

'There's some one else we know, Bolkonsky, do you sec, mamma?' said 
Natasha, pointing out Prince Andrey. 'Do you remember he stayed a night 
at home, at Otradnoe?' 

'Oh, do you know him?' said Madame Peronsky. 'I can't bear him. Every 
one is crazy over him. And his conceit! it's beyond all bounds! He takes 
after his worthy papa!' 

There was a sudden stir, and down the space left open the Tsar walked 
to the strains of the band. The Tsar walked in rapidly, bowing to right 



214 WAR AND PEACE 

and to left, as though trying to hurry over the first moments of greeting. 

There was a general movement of retreat, and the Tsar, smiling, came 
out at the drawing-room door, leading out the lady of the house, and 
not keeping time to the music. He was followed by the host with Marya 
Antonovna Narishkin; then came ambassadors, ministers, and various 
generals, whose names Madame Peronsky never tired of reciting. More 
than half the ladies had partners, and were taking part, or preparing to 
take part, in the polonaise. 

Natasha felt that she would be left with her mother and Sonya in that 
minority of the ladies who were crowded back against the wall, and not 
invited to dance the polonaise. She held her breath, and gazed before her 
with shining, frightened eyes, with an expression of equal readiness for 
the utmost bliss or the utmost misery. She took no interest in the Tsar, 
nor in all the great people Madame Peronsky was pointing out; her mind 
was filled by one thought: 'Is it possible no one will come up to me? Is it 
possible that I shall not dance?' 

She stood in that crowd of strangers as lonely as in a forest, of no interest^ 
of no use to any one. Prince Andrey with a lady passed close by them, 
obviously not recognising them. The handsome Anatole said something 
smiling to the lady on his arm, and he glanced at Natasha's face as one 
looks at a wall. Boris passed by them twice, and each time turned away. 
Berg and his wife, who were not dancing, came towards them. 

At last the music ceased. An anxious-looking adjutant ran up to the 
Rostovs, begging them to move a little further back, though they were 
already close to the wall, and from the orchestra came the circumspect, 
precise, seductively stately rhythm of the waltz. 

Prince Andrey, in his white uniform of a cavalry colonel, stood looking 
eager and lively, not far from the Rostovs. Baron Firhoff was talking to 
him of the proposed first sitting of the State Council to be held next day, 
From the part he was taking in the labours of the legislative commission. 
Prince Andrey was in a position to give authoritative information in re- 
gard to that sitting, about Napoleon's doings in Spain, of which all were 
united in approving, while Prince Andrey attacked them. But he did not 
hear what Firhoff was saying to him, and looked from the Tsar to the 
gentlemen preparing to dance. 

Pierre went up to Prince Andrey and took him by the arm. 'You always 
dance. Here is my protegee, the younger Rostov girl, ask her,' he said. 

'Where?' asked Bolkonsky. He went forward in the direction indicated 
by Pierre. He recognised Natasha's despairing, tremulous face, saw that 
it was her debut, remembered what she had said at the window, and with 
an expression of pleasure on his face he approached Countess Rostov. 

'Permit me to introduce you to my daughter,' said the countess. 

'I have the pleasure of her acquaintance already, if the countess re- 
members me,' said Prince Andrey, with a low and courteous bow, which 
seemed a direct contradiction to Madame Peronsky's remarks about his 
rudeness. He went up to Natasha, and raised his hand to put it round 



™AR AND PEACE 215 

her waist before he had fully uttered the invitation to dance. The tremulous 
expression of Natasha's face, ready for despair or for ecstasy, brightened 
at once into a happy, grateful, childlike smile. 

'I have been a long while waiting for you,' that alarmed and happy 
young girl seemed to say to him in the smile that peeped out through the 
starting tears as she raised her hand to Prince Andrey's shoulder. They 
were the second couple that walked forward into the ring. 

Prince Andrey was one of the best dancers of his day. Natasha danced 
exquisitely. Her little feet in their satin dancing-shoes performed their 
task lightly and independently of her, and her face beamed with a rapture 
of happiness. 

Prince Andrey loved dancing. He was anxious to escape as quickly as 
he could from the political and intellectual conversations into which 
every one tried to draw him, and anxious too to break through that bur- 
densome barrier of constraint arising from the presence of the Tsar; so he 
made haste to dance, and chose Natasha for a partner because Pierre 
pointed her out to him, and because she was the first pretty girl who 
caught his eyes. But he had no sooner put his arm round that slender, 
supple waist, and felt her stirring so close to him, and smiling so close to 
him, than the intoxication of her beauty flew to his head. He felt full of 
life and youth again. 

After Prince Andrey, Boris came up to ask Natasha to dance, and he 
was followed by the dancing adjutant who had opened the ball, and 
many other young men. Natasha, flushed and happy, passed on her 
superfluous partners to Sonya, and never ceased dancing all the evening. 
She noticed nothing and saw nothing of what was absorbing every one 
else at that ball. She did not notice that the Tsar talked a long time with 
the French ambassador, that his manner was particularly gracious to a 
certain lady, that Prince So-and-So and Mr. So-and-So had said and done 
this and that, that Ellen's success had been brilliant, and that So-and-So 
had paid her marked attention. She did not even see the Tsar. 

In one of the most enjoyable cotillions before supper, Prince Andrey 
danced again with Natasha. He reminded her of how he had first seen 
her in the avenue at Otradnoe, and how she could not sleep on that moon- 
light night, and told her how he had unwittingly listened to her. Natasha 
blushed at these recollections. 

Like all men who have grown up in society, Prince Andrey liked meet- 
ing anything not of the conventional stamp. And such was Natasha with 
her wonder, her delight, her shyness, and even her mistakes in talking 
French. His manner was particularly tender and circumspect as he talked 
to her of the simplest and most trifling subjects. 

In the middle of the cotillion, Natasha flew across the room to choose 
two ladies for the figure. 

'If she goes first to her cousin and then to another lady, she will be my 
wife,' Prince Andrey— greatly to his own surprise— caught himself saying 
\nentally, as he watched her. She did go first to her cousin. 



216 WAR AND PEACE 

'What nonsense does sometimes come into one's mind!' thought Prince 
Andrey, 'but one thing's certain, that girl is so charming, so original, 
that she won't be dancing here a month before she will be married. . . , 
She's a rare thing here,' he thought. 

At the end of the cotillion, the old count in his blue frock coat went up 
to the young people who had been dancing. He invited Prince Andrey to 
come and see them, and asked his daughter whether she were enjoying 
herself. Natasha did not at once answer, she only smiled a smile that said 
reproachfully: 'How can you ask such a question?' 

At that ball Pierre for the first time felt humiliated by the position his 
wife took in the highest court circles. He was sullen and absent-minded. 
As he stood in a window, staring over his spectacles and seeing no one, 
Natasha passed close by him on her way in to supper. Pierre's gloomy, 
unhappy face struck her. She stopped, facing him. She longed to come to 
his aid, to bestow on him some of her own overflowing happiness. 'How 
delightful it is,' she said; 'isn't it?' 

Pierre smiled an absent-minded smile, obviously not grasping what was 
said to him. 'Yes, I'm very glad,' he said. 

'How can people be discontented at anything!' thought Natasha. 'Es- 
pecially any one as nice as Bezuhov.' 

In Natasha's eyes all the people at the ball were particularly kind, 
sweet, good people, loving one another; none were capable of wronging 
one another, and so all must be happy. 

Next day when Prince Andrey thought of the ball it did not occupy his 
mind for long. 'Yes, it w T as a very successful ball. And besides . . . yes, 
the younger Rostov is very charming. There's something fresh in her, 
original, unlike Petersburg.' That was all he thought about the previous 
day's ball, and after his morning tea he set to work. 

But from fatigue and want of sleep he was not very well disposed for 
work, and could get nothing done. He began looking at his life in Peters- 
burg during the last four months, as though it were something new. He 
thought of the efforts he had made, and the people he had tried to see, 
and the history of his project of army reform, which had been accepted 
for consideration, and had been shelved because another scheme, a very 
poor one, had already been worked out and presented to the Tsar. He 
thought of the sittings of the committee, of the conscientious and pro- 
longed deliberations that took place at those sittings on evcrv point re- 
lating to the formalities of the sittings themselves, and the studious brevity 
with which anything relating to the reality of their duties was touched on. 
He thought of his work on the legislative reforms, of his careful transla- 
tion of the Roman and French codes into Russian, and he felt ashamed 
of himself. Then he vividly imagined his pursuits in the country, his 
expedition to Ryazan; he thought of his peasants, and applying the section 
on Personal Rights, which he had divided into paragraphs, to them, he 
marvelled how he could have so long busied himself on work so idle. 



WAR AND PEACE 217 

The next day Prince Andrey paid calls on various people whom he had 
not visited before, and among them on the Rostovs. Apart from considera- 
tions of politeness, which necessitated a call, Prince Andrey wanted to 
see at home that original, eager girl who had left such a pleasant recollec- 
tion with him. 

Natasha was one of the first to meet him. She was in a blue everyday 
dress, in which she struck Prince Andrey as looking prettier than in her 
ball-dress. She and all the family received Prince Andrey like an old 
friend, simply and cordially. All the family, which Prince Andrey had 
once criticised so severely, now seemed to him to consist of excellent, 
simple, kindly people. The hospitality and good-nature of the old count, 
particularly striking and attractive in Petersburg, was such that Prince 
Andrey could not refuse to stay to dinner. 'Yes, these are good-natured, 
capital people,' thought Bolkonsky. 'Of course they have no conception 
what a treasure they possess in Natasha; but they are good people, who 
make the best possible background for the strikingly poetical figure of 
that charming girl, so full of life!' 

Prince Andrey was conscious in Natasha of a special world, utterly 
remote from him, brimful of joys unknown to him, that strange world, 
which even in the avenue at Otradnoe, and on that moonlight night at 
the window, had tantalised him. Now it seemed no longer an alien world; 
he himself was stepping into it, and finding new pleasures in it. 

After dinner Natasha went to the clavichord, at Prince Andrey's re- 
quest, and began singing. Prince Andrey stood at the window talking to 
the ladies, and listened to her. In the middle of a phrase, Prince Andrey 
ceased speaking, and felt suddenly a lump in his throat from tears, the 
possibility of which he had not dreamed of in himself. He looked at 
Natasha singing, and something new and blissful stirred in his soul. He 
was happy, and at the same time he was sad. He certainly had nothing to 
weep about, but he was ready to weep. For what? For his past love? For 
the little princess? For his lost illusions? . . . For his hopes for the future? 
. . . Yes, and no. The chief thing which made him ready to weep was 
a sudden, vivid sense of the fearful contrast between something infinitely 
great and illimitable existing in him, and something limited and material, 
which he himself was, and even she was. This contrast made his heart 
ache, and rejoiced him while she was singing. 

Next day Prince Andrey went to dine at the Rostovs', and spent the 
whole day with them. 

Every one in the house perceived on whose account Prince Andrey came, 
and he openly tried to be all day long with Natasha. 

Not only in the soul of Natasha— scared, but happy and enthusiastic— 
in the whole household, too, there was a feeling of something of great 
gravity being bound to happen. With sorrowful and stcrnlv serious eyes 
the countess looked at Prince Andrey as he talked to Natasha, and shyly 
and self-consciously tried to begin some insignificant talk with him as soon 



218 WAR AND PEACE 

as he looked round at her. Natasha turned pale in a panic of expectation 
every time she was left for a moment alone with him. 

When Prince Andrey had gone away in the evening, the countess went 
up to Natasha and whispered: 

'Well?' 

'Mamma, for God's sake, don't ask me anything just now. I'm afraid 
with him, I'm always afraid with him. What does that mean? Does that 
mean that it's the real thing?' 

'No, my darling. I'm afraid of him myself,' answered her mother. 'Go 
to bed.' 

It seemed to Natasha that she had fallen in love with Prince Andrey 
the first time she saw him at Otradnoe. She was as it were terrified at 
this strange, unexpected happiness that the man she had chosen even 
then (she was firmly convinced that she had done so)— that very man 
should meet them again now and be apparently not indifferent to her. 

'And it seems as though it all happened on purpose— his coming to 
Petersburg just while we are here. And our meeting at that ball. It was 
all fate. Mamma, does it matter his being a widower?' 

'Hush, Natasha. Pray to God. Marriages are made in heaven.' 

At that very time Prince Andrey was telling Pierre of his love for 
Natasha and of his fixed determination to marry her. 

That evening the Countess Elena Vassilyevna gave a reception; the 
French ambassador was there, and a royal prince who had become a 
verv frequent visitor at the countess's of late, and many brilliant ladies 
and gentlemen. Pierre came down to it, wandered through the rooms and 
impressed all the guests by his look of concentrated preoccupation and 
gloom. 

Prince Andrey stood before Pierre with a radiant, ecstatic face, full 
of new life, and with the egoism of happiness smiled at him. 

'Well, my dear boy,' he said, 'I wanted to tell you yesterday, and I 
have come to do so to-day. I have never felt anything like it. I am in love.' 

Pierre suddenly heaved a heavy sigh, and dumped down his heavy 
person on the sofa beside Prince Andrey. 

'With Natasha Rostov, yes?' he said. 

'Yes, yes, who else could it be? But can she love me? . . . I'm too old 
for her. . . . Why don't you speak? . . .' 

'I? I? What did I tell you?' said Pierre, suddenly getting up and walking 
about the room. 'I always thought so. . . . That girl is a treasure. . . . She's 
a very rare sort of girl. And I am sure no man was ever happier than 
you will be.' 

'But she?' 

'She loves you.' 

'Don't talk nonsense . . .' said Prince Andrey, smiling and looking into 
Pierre's face. 

'She loves you, I know it,' Pierre cried angrily. 

'No; do listen,' said Prince Andrey, taking hold of him by the arm 



WAR AND PEACE 219 

and stopping him. 'Do you know the state I am in? I must talk about it 
to some one.' 

'Well, well, talk away, I'm very glad,' said Pierre, and his face did 
really change, the line of care in his brow was smoothed away, and he 
listened gladly to Prince Andrey. His friend seemed, and was indeed, an 
utterly different, new man. What had become of his ennui, his contempt 
of life, his disillusionment? 

'I should never have believed it, if any one had told me I could love 
like this,' said Prince Andrey. 'It is utterly different from the feeling I 
once had. Do you understand me? I know you are glad for me.' 

'Yes, yes,' Pierre assented, looking at his friend with eyes full of tender- 
ness and sadness. The brighter the picture of Prince Andrey's fate before 
his mind, the darker seemed his own. 

To get married his father's consent was wanted, and to obtain this Prince 
Andrey set off to see his father. 

The father received his son's communication with external composure, 
but with inward wrath. He could not comprehend how any one could 
want to alter his life, to introduce any new element into it, when life 
was for him so near its end. 'If they would only let me live my life out 
as I want to, and then do as they like,' the old man said to himself. With 
his son, however, he made use of that diplomacy to which he always had 
resorted in case of gravity. Assuming a calm tone, he went into the whole 
question judicially. 

In the first place, the marriage was not a brilliant one from the point of 
view of birth, fortune, or distinction. Secondly, Prince Andrey was not in 
his first youth, and was delicate in health (the old man laid special stress 
on this), and the girl was very young. Thirdly, there was his son, whom 
it would be a pity to entrust to a mere girl. 'Fourthly, and finally,' said the 
father, looking ironically at his son, 'I beg you to defer the matter for a 
year; go abroad, and get well; find a German, as you want to do so, for 
Prince Nikolay, and then, if your love, your passion, your obstinacy— 
what you choose— are so great, then get married. Anc* that's my last word 
on the subject; you know, the last . . .' the old prince concluded, in jv 
tone that showed that nothing would compel him to alter his decision. 

Prince Andrey saw clearly that the old man hoped that either his feeling 
or that of his betrothed would not stand the test of a year, or that he, 
the old prince, would die himself in the course of it, and he decided to act 
in accordance with his father's wish; to make an offer and to defer the 
marriage for a year. 

Three weeks after his last visit to the Rostovs, Prince Andrey returned 
to Petersburg. 

The day after her conversation with her mother, Natasha spent the whole 
day expecting Bolkonsky, but he did not come. The next day, and the 
third, it was just the same. Pierre *:oo stayed away, and Natasha, not 
knowing Prince Andrey had gone away to see his father, did not know 
how to interpret his absence. 



220 WAR AND PEACE 

So passed the three weeks. Natasha would not go out anywhere, and 
wandered like a shadow about the house, idle and listless, and very ir- 
ritable. It seemed to her that every one knew of her disappointment, was 
laughing at her, and the wound to her vanity aggravated her misery. 

She came in to the countess one day, tried to say something, and all 
at once burst into tears. Her tears were the tears of an offended child, 
who does not know why it is being punished. The countess tried to com- 
fort Natasha. At first she listened to her mother's words, but suddenly she 
interrupted her: 

'Stop, mamma, I don't think of him or want to think of him! Why, 
he kept coming, and he has left off, and he has left off . . .' Her voice 
quivered, she almost began to cry, but recovered herself, and went on 
calmly: 

'And I don't want to be married at all. And I'm afraid of him; I have 
quite, quite got over it now . . .' 

The day after this conversation, Natasha put on the old dress she 
specially associated with the fun she had often had when wearing it in 
the mornings, and began from early morning to take up her old manner 
of life, which she had given up ever since the ball. After morning tea, 
she went into the big hall, which she particularly liked on account of the 
loud resonance in it, and began singing her sol-fa exercises. When she 
had finished the first exercise she stood still in the middle of the room 
and repeated a single musical phrase which particularly pleased her. 
She listened with delight, as though it were new to her, to the charm of 
these notes ringing out, filling the empty space of the great room and dying 
slowly away, and she felt all at once cheerful. 'Why think so much about 
it; things are nice even as it is,' she said to herself; and she began walking 
up and down the room, not putting her feet simply down on the resound- 
ing parquet, but at each step bending her foot from the heel to the toe 
(she had on some new shoes she particularly liked), and listening to the 
regular tap of the heel and creak of the toe with the same pleasure with 
which she had listened to the sound of her own voice. Passing by the 
looking-glass, she glanced into it. 'Yes, that's me!' the expression of her 
face seemed to say at the sight of herself. 'Well, and very nice too. And 
I need nobody.' 

In the vestibule the hall-door opened; some one was asking, 'At home?' 
and steps were audible. Natasha was looking at herself in the glass, but 
she did not see herself. She heard sounds in the vestibule. When she saw 
herself, her face was pale. It was he. 

Natasha, pale and panic-stricken, flew into the drawing-room. 

'Mamma, Bolkonsky has come,' she said. 'Mamma, this is awful, un- 
bearable! ... I don't want ... to be tortured! What am I to do?' 

The countess had not time to answer her before Prince Andrey with a 
troubled and serious face walked into the drawing-room. As soon as he 
saw Natasha his face beamed with delight. He kissed the countess's hand 
and Natasha's, and sat down beside the sofa. 



WAR AND PEACE 221 

'It's a long while since we have had the pleasure . . .' the countess 
was beginning, but Prince Andrey cut her short, answering her implied 
question, and obviously in haste to say what he had to say. 

'I have not been to see you all this time because I have been to see my 
father; I had to talk over a very important matter with him. I only re- 
turned last night,' he said, glancing at Natasha. 'I want to have a talk with 
you, countess,' he added after a moment's silence. 

The countess dropped her eyes, sighing heavily. 

'Run away, Natasha; I will call you,' the countess whispered. 

With frightened and imploring eyes Natasha glanced at Prince Andrey 
and at her mother, and went out. 

'I have come, countess, to ask for your daughter's hand,' said Prince 
Andrey. 'I will speak to her, when I have received your consent. . . . Do 
you give it me?' said Prince Andrey. 

'Yes,' said the countess, and she held out her hand to him with mingled 
feelings of aversion and tenderness. Her wish was to love him as a son; 
but she felt that he was a man alien to her, and that she was afraid of him. 

'I am sure my husband will consent,' said the countess; 'but your 
father . . .' 

'My father, whom I have informed of my plans, has made it an ex- 
press condition that the marriage should not take place for a year. That, 
too \ meant to speak of to you,' said Prince Andrey. 

'It is true that Natasha is very young, but— so long as that?' 

'It could not be helped,' said Prince Andrey with a sigh. 

'I will send her to you,' said the countess, and she went out of the room. 

'Lord, have mercy upon us!' she kept repeating as she looked for her 
daughter. 

Sonya told her that Natasha was in her bedroom. She was sitting on 
her bed, with a pale face and dry eyes; she was gazing at the holy picture, 
and murmuring something to herself, as she rapidly crossed herself. Seeing 
her mother, she leaped up and flew towards her. 

'Well, mamma, . . . well?' 

'Go, go to him. He asks your hand,' said the countess, coldly it seemed 
to Natasha. . . . 'Yes . . • go . . -•' the mother murmured mournfully and 
reproachfully with a deep sigh as her daughter ran off. 

Natasha could not have said how she reached the drawing-room. As 
she entered the door and caught sight of him, she stopped short: 'Is it 
possible that this stranger has now become everything to me?' she asked 
herself. Prince Andrey approached her w T ith downcast eyes. 'I have loved 
you from the first minute I saw you. Can I hope?' 

She came nearer to him and stopped. He took her hand and kissed it. 

'Do you love me?' 

'Yes, yes,' said Natasha, almost angrily it seemed. She drew a deep 
sigh, and another, and burst into sobs. 

'What is it? What's the matter?' 

'Oh, I am so happy,' she answered, smiling through her tears. She bent 



222 WAR AND PEACE 

over closer to him, thought a second, as though wondering whether it were 
possible, and then kissed him. 

Prince Andrey held her hands, looked into her eyes and could find 
no trace of his former love for her in his heart. Some sudden reaction 
seemed to have taken place in his soul; there was none of the poetic and 
mysterious charm of desire left in it; instead of that there was pity for her 
feminine and childish weakness, terror at her devotion and trustfulness, 
an irksome, yet sweet, sense of duty, binding him to her for ever. The 
actual feeling, though not so joyous and poetical as the former feeling, 
was more serious and deeper. 

'Did your mamma tell you that it cannot be for a year?' said Prince 
Andrey, still gazing into her eyes. 

'No,' she answered, but she had not understood his question. 

'Forgive me,' said Prince Andrey, 'but you are so young, and I have 
had so much experience of life. I am afraid for you. You don't know 
yourself. 

'Hard as that year will be to me, delaying my happiness,' continued 
Prince Andrey, 'in that time you will be sure of yourself. I beg you to 
make me happy in a year, but you are free; our engagement shall be kept 
a secret, and if you should find out that you do not love me, or if you 
should come to love . . .' said Prince Andrey with a forced smile. 

'Why do you say that?' Natasha interrupted. 'You know that from the 
very day when you first came to Otradnoe, I have loved you,' she said, 
firmly persuaded that she was speaking the truth. 

'In a year you will learn to know yourself. . . .' 

A who-ole year!' cried Natasha suddenly, only now grasping that their 
marriage was to be deferred for a year. 

Prince Andrey began to explain to her the reasons for this delay. 

Her father and mother came into the room and gave the betrothed couple 
their blessing. 

There was no formal betrothal and no announcement was made of the 
engagement; Prince Andrey insisted upon that. He said that since he was 
responsible for the delay of their marriage, he ought to bear the whole 
burden of it. He said that he was bound for ever by his word, but he did 
not want to bind Natasha and would leave her perfect freedom. If in an- 
other six months she were to feel that she did not love him, she would 
have a perfect right to refuse him. It need hardly be said that neither 
Natasha nor her parents would hear of this possibility; but Prince Andrey 
insisted on having his own way. Prince Andrey came every day to the 
Rostovs', but he did not behave with Natasha as though he were engaged 
to her; he addressed her formally and kissed only her hand. At first there 
had been a feeling of awkwardness in the family in regard to Prince Andrey. 
He seemed a man from another world, and Natasha used for a long while 
to try and make her people understand Prince Andrey, and declared to 
every one with pride that he only seemed to be so different, that he was 
really like every one else, and that she was not afraid of him and no one 



WAR AND PEACE 223 

need be. After a few days, the rest of the family got accustomed to seeing 
him, and went on without constraint with their usual manner of life, in 
which he took part. 

The old count sometimes asked his advice about some question relating 
to Petya's education or Nikolay's position. The old countess sighed as she 
looked at them. Sonya was afraid every instant of being in their way, and 
was always trying to find excuses for leaving them alone, even when they 
had no wish to be alone. 

On the day before he was to leave Petersburg, Prince Andrey brought 
with him Pierre, who had not been at the Rostovs' since the day of the 
ball. Pierre seemed absent-minded and embarrassed. He talked chiefly to 
the countess. Natasha was sitting at the chess-board with Sonya, and in- 
vited Prince Andrey to join them. He went to them. 

'You have known Bezuhov a long while, haven't you?' he asked. 'Do you 
like him?' 

'Yes; he's very nice, but very absurd.' 

And she began, as people always did when speaking of Pierre, to tell 
anecdotes of his absent-mindedness, anecdotes which were made up, indeed, 
about him. 

'You know, I have confided our secret to him,' said Prince Andrey. 'I 
have known him from childhood. He has a heart of gold. I beg you, Natalie,' 
he said, with sudden seriousness, 'I am going away; God knows what may 
happen. You may change . . . Oh, I know I ought not to speak of that. 
Only one thing— if anything were to happen to you, while I am away . . .' 

'What could happen?' 

'If any trouble were to come,' pursued Prince Andrey. 'I beg you, Made- 
moiselle Sophie, if anything were to happen, to go to him and no one else 
for advice and help. He is a most absent-minded and eccentric person, but 
he has the truest heart.' 

Neither her father, nor her mother could have foreseen the effect of the 
parting on Natasha. She did not weep even at the moment when Prince 
Andrey kissed her hand for the last time. 

'Don't go away!' was all she said, in a voice that made him wonder 
whether he ought not really to remain, and that he remembered long after. 



PART VII 



The Biblical tradition tells us that the absence of work-idleness-was a 
condition of the first man's blessedness before the Fall. The love of idleness 
has remained the same in fallen man; but a secret voice tells us that we must 
be to blame for being idle. If a man could find a state in which while being 
idle he could feel himself to be of use and to be doing his duty, he would 
have attained to one side of primitive blessedness. And such a state of 
obligatory and irreproachable idleness is enjoyed by a whole class— the 
military class. 

Nikolay Rostov was enjoying this blessed privilege to the full, as after 
the year 1807 he remained in the Pavlograd regiment, in command of the 
squadron that had been Denisov's. 

Rostov had become a bluff, good-natured fellow, who would have been 
thought rather bad form by his old acquaintances in Moscow, though he 
was loved and respected by his comrades, his subordinates, and his superior 
officers, and was well content with his life. 

Of late— in the year 1809— he had found more and more frequently in 
letters from home complaints on the part of his mother that their pecuniary 
position was going from bad to worse, and that it was high time for him 
to come home, to gladden and comfort the hearts of his old parents. In 
18 10 he received letters in which he was told of Natasha's engagement to 
Bolkonsky, and of the marriage being deferred for a year, because the old 
prince would not consent to it. This chagrined and mortified Nikolay. In 
the first place, he was sorry to be losing from home Natasha, whom he 
cared more for than all the rest of the family. Secondly, from his hussar 
point of view, he regretted not having been at home at the time, as he 
would have shown this Bolkonsky that it was by no means such an honour 
to be connected with him, and that if he cared for Natasha he could get 
on just as well without his crazy old father's consent. For a moment he 
hesitated whether to ask for leave, so as to see Natasha engaged, but then 
the manoeuvres were just coming on, and thoughts of complications re- 
curred to him, and again he put it off. 

But in the spring of the same year he got a letter from his mother, written 
without his father's knowledge, and that letter decided him. She wrote that 
if Nikolay did not come and look after things, their whole estate would 
have to be sold by auction, and they would all be beggars. 'I beseech you, 

224 



WAR AND PEACE 225 

for God's sake, to come at once, if you don't want to make me and all 
your family miserable,' wrote the countess. 

That letter produced an effect on Nikolay. He had that common sense 
of mediocrity which showed him what was his duty. 

His duty now was, if not to retire from the army, at least to go home 
on leave. Why he had to go, he could not have said; but, after his after- 
dinner nap, he ordered his grey mare to be saddled, a terribly vicious beast 
that he had not ridden for a long while. He returned home with his horse 
in a lather, and told Lavrushka— he had kept on Denisov's old valet— and 
the comrades who dropped in that evening, that he had applied for leave 
and was going home. It was difficult for him to believe that he was going 
away without hearing from the staff whether he had been promoted to 
a captain or had received the St. Anne for the last manoeuvres. It seemed 
inconceivable that without him the ball could take place which the hussars 
were to give in honour of their favourite Polish belle. Yet he knew he 
must leave this world, where all was well and all was clear, to go where 
all was nonsensical and complicated. 

For the first half of the journey, from Krementchug to Kiev, all Rostov's 
thoughts— as is apt to be the case with travellers— turned to what he had 
left behind— to his squadron. But after being jolted over the first half of 
the journey, he had begun to wonder uneasily what he should find on 
reaching Otradnoe. At the station nearest to Otradnoe he gave the sledge- 
driver a tip of three roubles, and ran breathless up the steps of his home, 
like a boy. 

After the excitement of the first meeting, and the strange feeling of dis- 
appointment after his expectations— the feeling that 'it's just the same; 
why was I in such a hurry?'— Nikolay began to settle down in his old 
world of home. His father and mother were just the same, only a little 
older. All that was new in them was a certain uneasiness and at times a 
difference of opinion, which he had never seen between them before, and 
soon learned to be due to the difficulties of their position. 

Sonya was now nearly twenty. She would grow no prettier now; there 
was no promise in her of more to come; but what she had was enough. 
She was brimming over with love and happiness as soon as Nikolay came 
home, and this girl's faithful, steadfast love for him gladdened his heart. 
Petya and Natasha surprised Nikolay more than all the rest. Petya was 
a big, handsome lad of thirteen, whose voice was already cracking; he 
was full of gaiety and clever pranks. Nikolay did not get over his wonder 
at Natasha for a long while, and laughed as he looked at her. 

'You're utterly different,' he told her. 

'How? Uglier?' 

'No, quite the contrary; but what dignity! A real princess!' he whispered 
to her. 

'Yes, yes, yes,' cried Natasha gleefully. 

Natasha told him all the story of Prince Andrey's lovemaking, of his visit 
to Otradnoe, and showed him his last letter. 



226 WAR AND PEACE 

'Well, are you glad?' asked Natasha. 'I'm so at peace and happy now.' 

'Very glad,' answered Nikolay. 'He's a splendid fellow. Are you very 
much in love, then?' 

'How shall I say?' answered Natasha. 'I was in love with Boris, with 
our teacher, with Denisov; but this is utterly different. I feel calm, settled. 
I know there is no one better than he in the w T orld, and so I am calm now 
and content. It's utterly different from anything before. . . .' 

Nikolay expressed his dissatisfaction at the marriage being put off for 
a year. But Natasha fell on him with exasperation, proving to him that no 
other course was possible, that it would be a horrid thing to enter a family 
against the father's will, and that she would not consent to it herself. 

'You don't understand at all, at all,' she kept saying. 

Nikolay paused a moment, and then said he agreed with her. 

In the early part of his time at home Nikolay was worried by the neces- 
sity of meddling in the stupid business matters which his mother had sent 
for him to look after. To be rid of this burden as soon as possible, on the 
third day after his return, he marched angrily off, making no reply to in- 
quiries where he was going, with scowling brows entered Mitenka's lodge, 
and demanded from him an account in full. What he meant by an account 
in full, Nikolay knew even less than the panic-stricken and bewildered 
Mitenka. The conversation and Mitenka's accounts did not last lon^. The 
village elder, the deputy, and the village clerk, waiting in the entry of the 
lodge, heard with awe and delight at first the booming and snapping of the 
young count's voice in a constantly ascending scale, then terrible words 
of abuse, flung one after another. 

'Robber! Ungrateful brute! . . . I'll thrash the dog! . . . not papa to 
deal with . . . plundering us . . .' and so on. 

Then, with no less awe and delight, these persons saw the young count, 
with a red face and bloodshot eyes, dragging Mitenka out by the collar, 
kicking him with great dexterity at every appropriate moment between 
his words, and shouting: 

'Away with you! Never let me set eyes on you, blackguard!' 

The young count walked by, treading resolutely and breathing hard, 
taking no notice of them, and went into the house. 

The countess heard at once through her maids of what had been hap- 
pening in the lodge, and was comforted by the reflection that now their 
position would be sure to improve, though on the other hand she was 
uneasy as to the effect of the scene on her son. She went several times on 
tiptoe to his door, and listened as he lighted one pipe after another. 

The next day the old count drew his son on one side, and, with a timid 
smile, said to him, 'But you know, my dear boy, you had no reason to be 
so angry. Mitenka has told me all about it.' 

'I knew,' thought Nikolay, 'that I should never make head or tail of 
anything in this crazy world.' 

l You were angry at his not having put down these seven hundred and 



WAR AND PEACE 227 

eight roubles. But you see they were carried forward by double entry, 
and you didn't look at the next page.' 

'Papa, he's a blackguard and a thief, I am certain. And what I have done, 
I have done. But if you don't wish it, I will say nothing to him.' 

'No, my dear boy!' (The old count was confused. He was conscious 
that he had mismanaged his wife's estate and had wronged his children, 
but he had no notion how to rectify the position.) 'No, I beg you to go 
into things. I am old. I . . .' J 5 

'No, papa, forgive me if I have done what you dislike. I know less about 
it than you do.' 

After this, young Rostov took no further part in business of any sort, 
but devoted himself with passionate interest to everything to do with the 
chase, which was kept up on a great scale on the old count's estate. 

Wintry weather was already setting in, the morning frosts hardened the 
earth drenched by the autumn rains. Already the grass was full of tufts 
and stood out bright green against the patches of brown winter cornland 
trodden by the cattle, and the pale yellow stubble of the summer corn- 
fields, and the reddish strips of buckwheat. The uplands and copses, which 
at the end of August had still been green islands among the black fields 
ploughed ready for winter corn, and the stubble had become golden and 
lurid red islands in a sea of bright green autumn crops. The grey hare 
had already half-changed its coat, the foxes' cubs were beginning to leave 
their parents, and the young wolves were bigger than dogs. It was the 
best time of the year for the chase. 

On the morning of the 15th of September when young Rostov in his 
dressing-gown looked out of window he saw a morning which was all the 
heart could desire for hunting. It looked as though the sky were melting, 
and without the slightest wind, sinking down upon the earth. The only 
movement in the air was the soft downward motion of microscopic drops 
of moisture or mist. The bare twigs in the garden were hung with trans- 
parent drops which dripped on to the freshly fallen leaves. The earth in the 
kitchen-garden had a gleaming, wet, black look like the centre of a poppy, 
and at a short distance away it melted off into the damp, dim veil of fog. 

Nikolay went out on to the wet and muddy steps. There was a smell 
of decaying leaves and dogs. The broad-backed, black and tan bitch Milka, 
with her big, prominent, black eyes, caught sight of her master, got up' 
stretched out her hind legs, lay down like a hare, then suddenly jumped 
up and licked him right on his nose and moustache. Another harrier, catch- 
ing sight of his master from the bright coloured path, arched its back 
darted headlong to the steps, and, lifting its tail, rubbed itself against 
Nikolay's legs. 5 

'O, hoy!' He heard at that moment the inimitable hunting halloo which 
unites the deepest bass and the shrillest tenor notes. And round the corner 
came the huntsman and whipper-in, Danilo, a grev, wrinkled man, with 
his hair cropped round in the Ukrainian fashion. He held a bent whip in 



228 WAR AND PEACE 

his hand, and his face had that expression of independence and scorn for 
everything in the world, which is only to be seen in huntsmen. 

'It's a good day, eh? Just right for riding and hunting, eh?' said Nikolay, 
scratching Alilka behind the ears. 

Danilo winked and made no reply. 

After extracting from Danilo an admission that the dogs were fit, Nikolay 
told him to have the horses saddled. 

'x\re you going?' said Natasha. 'I knew you would! Sonya said you 
weren't going. I knew that on such a day you couldn't help going!' 

'Yes, we're going,' Nikolay answered reluctantly. As he meant to at- 
tempt serious hunting he did not want to take Natasha and Petya. 'We are 
going, but only wolf-hunting; it will be dull for you.' 

'You know that it's the greatest of my pleasures,' said Natasha. 

'No hindrance bars a Russian's path!' declaimed Petya; 'let's go!' 

Fifty-four hounds were led out under the charge of six whippers-in and 
grooms. Of huntsmen, properly speaking, there were taking part in the 
hunt eight men besides the members of the family, and more than forty 
greyhounds ran behind them, so that with the hounds in leashes there were 
about a hundred and thirty dogs and twenty persons on horseback. 

The horses stept over the field as over a soft carpet, splashing now and 
then into pools as they crossed the road. The foggy sky still seemed falling 
imperceptibly and regularly down on the earth; the air was still and warm, 
and there was no sound but now and then the whistle of a huntsman, the 
snort of a horse, the clack of a whip, or the whine of a dog who had 
dropped out of his place. When they had gone a verst, five more horsemen 
accompanied by dogs appeared out of the mist to meet the Rostovs. The 
foremost of them w T as a fresh, handsome old man with large, grey 
moustaches. 

"Good-day, uncle,' said Nikolay as the old man rode up to him. 

'All's well and march! ... I was sure of it,' began the man addressed as 
uncle. He was not really the Rostovs' uncle, but a distant relative, who 
had a small property in their neighbourhood. 

The hounds were joined into one pack, and the uncle and Nikolay rode 
on side by side. 

'Good-day, uncle; we're coming to the hunt too!' shouted Petya. 

'Good-day, good-day, and mind you don't ride down the dogs,' said the 
uncle sternly. 

The uncle looked with disapproval at Petya and Natasha. He did not 
like a mixture of frivolity w r ith the serious business of the hunt. 

'Nikolenka, what a delightful dog Trunila is! he knew me,' said Natasha 
of her favourite dog. 

'In the first place, Trunila's not a dog, but a wolf-hound,' thought 
Nikolay. He glanced at his sister trying to make her feel the distance that 
lay between them at that moment. Natasha understood it. 

'Don't imagine we shall get in anybody's way, uncle,' said Natasha. 'We'll 
stay in our right place and not stir from it.' 



WAR AND PEACE 229 

'And you'll do well, little countess,' said the uncle. 'Only don't fall off 
your horse,' he added, 'or you'd never get on again— all's well, quick 
march!' 

The Otradnoe preserve came into sight, an oasis of greenness, two hun- 
dred and fifty yards away. Rostov, settling finally with the uncle from 
what point to set the dogs on, pointed out to Natasha the place where she 
was to stand, a place where there was no chance of anything running out, 
and went round to close in from behind above the ravine. 

'Now, nephew, you're on the track of an old wolf,' said the uncle; 'mind 
he doesn't give you the slip.' 

'That's as it happens,' answered Rostov. 'Karay, hey!' he shouted, reply- 
ing to the uncle's warning by this call to his dog. Karay was an old, mis- 
shapen, muddy-coloured hound, famous for attacking an old wolf unaided. 
All took their places. 

Nikolay Rostov was standing at his post, waiting for the wolf. He was 
aware of what must be taking place within the copse from the rush of the 
pack coming closer and going further away, from the cries of the dogs, 
whose notes were familiar to him, from the nearness, and then greater re- 
moteness, and sudden raising of the voices of the huntsmen. He knew that 
there were both young and also old wolves in the enclosure. He knew the 
hounds had divided into two packs, that in one place they were close on 
the wolf, and that something had gone wrong. 

He made a thousand different suppositions of how and at what spot the 
wolf would run out, and how he would set upon it. Several times he prayed 
to God that the wolf would rush out upon him. He prayed with that feel- 
ing of passion and compunction with which men pray in moments of 
intense emotion due to trivial causes. 'Why, what is it to Thee,' he said to 
God, 'to do this for me? I know Thou art great and that it's a sin to pray 
to Thee about this, but for God's sake do make the old wolf come out 
upon me, and make Karay fix his teeth in his throat and finish him before 
the eyes of "uncle," who is looking this way.' 

A thousand times over in that half-hour, with intent, strained and uneasy 
eyes Rostov scanned the thickets at the edge of the copse, with two scraggy 
oaks standing up above the undergrowth of aspen, and the ravine with its 
overhanging bank, and 'uncle's' cap peeping out from behind a bush on 
the right. 'No, that happiness is not to be,' thought Rostov, 'yet what 
would it cost Him! It's not to be! I'm always unlucky, at cards, in war, and 
everything.' Austcrlitz and Dolohov flashed in distinct but rapid succession 
through his imagination. 'Only once in my life to kill an old wolf; I ask 
tor nothing beyond!' he thought, straining eyes and ears, looking from left 
to right, and back again, and listening to the slightest fluctuations in the 
sounds of the dogs. 

He looked again to the right, and saw something running across the open 
ground towards him. 'No, it can't be!' thought Rostov, taking a deep 
breath, as a man does at the coming of what he has long been hoping for. 
The greatest piece of luck had come to him, and so simply, without noise, 



230 WAR AND PEACE 

or flourish, or display to signalise it. The wolf was running forward; he 
leaped clumsily over a rut that lay across his path. 

Nikolay did not hear his own cry; he had no consciousness of galloping; 
he saw neither the dogs nor the ground over which he galloped. He saw 
nothing but the wolf, which, quickening its pace, was bounding in the same 
direction across the glade. Foremost of the hounds was the black and tan, 
broad-backed bitch, Alilka, and she was getting close upon him. But the 
wolf turned a sidelong glance upon her, and instead of flying at him, as she 
always had done, Alilka suddenly stopped short, her fore-legs held stiffly 
before her and her tail in the air. 

'Loo! loo! loo!' shouted Nikolay. 

The red hound, Lyubima, darted forward from behind Alilka, dashed 
headlong at the wolf, and got hold of him by the hind-leg, but in the same 
second bounded away on the other side in terror. The wolf crouched, 
gnashed its teeth, rose again, and bounded forward, followed at a couple 
of yards' distance by all the dogs: they did not try to get closer. 

'He'll get away! No, it's impossible!' thought Nikolay, still shouting in 
a husky voice. 

'Karay! Loo! loo! . . .' he kept shouting, looking for the old hound, who 
was his one hope now. 

Karay, straining his old muscles to the utmost, and watching the wolf 
intently, was bounding clumsily away from the beast, to cut across his path 
in front of him. But it w T as plain from the swiftness of the wolf's course 
and the slowness of the hounds that Karay was out in his reckoning. 
Nikolay saw the copse not far now ahead of him. If once the wolf reached 
it, he would escape to a certainty. But in front dogs and men came into 
sight, dashing almost straight towards the wolf. There was still hope. A 
long, young hound, not one of the Rostovs'— Nikolay did not recognise him 
—flew from in front straight at the wolf, and almost knocked him over. 
The wolf got up again with a surprising rapidity and flew at the young 
hound; his teeth clacked, and the hound, covered with blood from a gash 
in his side, thrust its head in the earth, squealing shrilly. 

'Karay! old man!' Nikolay wailed. 

The old dog, with the tufts of matted hair, quivering on his haunches, 
had succeeded, thanks to the delay, in cutting across the wolf's line of ad- 
vance, and was now five paces in front of him. The wolf stole a glance at 
Karay, as though aware of his danger, and tucking his tail further between 
his legs, he quickened his pace. But then— Nikolay could only see thet 
something was happening with Karay— the hound had dashed instantly at 
the wolf and had rolled in a struggling heap with him into the watercourse 
before them. 

The moment when Nikolay saw the dogs struggling with the wolf in the 
watercourse, saw the wolf's grey coat under them, his outstretched hind-leg, 
his head gasping in terror, and his ears turned back (Karay had him by the 
throat)— the moment when Nikolay saw all this was the happiest moment 
of his life. He had already grasped the pommel of his saddle to dismount 



WAR AND PEACE 231 

and stab the wolf, when suddenly the beast's head was thrust up above the 
mass of dogs, then his fore-legs were on the bank of the watercourse. The 
wolf clacked his teeth (Karay had not hold of his throat now), leaped with 
his hind-legs out of the hollow, and with his tail between his legs, pushed 
forward, getting away from the dogs again. Karay, his hair starting up, 
had difficulty in getting out of the watercourse; he seemed to be bruised 
or wounded. 'My God, why is this!' Nikolay shouted in despair. The 
uncle's huntsman galloped across the line of the wolf's advance from the 
other side, and again his hounds stopped the wolf, again he was hemmed in. 

Nikolay, his groom, the uncle, and his huntsman pranced about the beast 
with shouts and cries of 'loo,' every minute on the point of dismounting 
when the wolf crouched back, and dashing forward again every time the 
wolf shook himself free and moved towards the copse, where his safety lay. 

At the beginning of this onset Danilo, hearing the hunters' cries, had 
darted out of the copse. He saw that Karay had hold of the wolf and 
checked his horse, supposing the deed was done. But seeing that the hunters 
did not dismount from their horses, and that the wolf was shaking himself 
free, and again making his escape, Danilo galloped his own horse, not 
towards the wolf, but in a straight line towards the copse, to cut him off, 
as Karay had done. Thanks to this manoeuvre, he bore straight down on 
the wolf when the uncle's dogs had a second time fallen behind him. 

Danilo galloped up in silence, holding a drawn dagger in his left hand, 
and thrashing the heaving sides of his chestnut horse with his riding whip, 
as though it were a flail. 

It was obvious to the dogs, to the hunters, and to the wolf that all was 
over now. The beast, its ears drawn back in terror, tried to get up, but 
the dogs clung to him. Nikolay would have stabbed him, but Danilo 
whispered: 'Don't; we will string him up!' They put a stick in the wolf's 
jaws, fastened it, as it were bridling him with a leash, and tied his legs. 
With happy, exhausted faces they tied the great wolf alive on a horse, that 
started and snorted in alarm at it; and with all the dogs trooping after and 
whining at the wolf, they brought it to the place where all were to meet. 

In the evening, Nikolay found himself so great a distance from home 
that he accepted the uncle's invitation to stop hunting and to stay the night 
at the uncle's little place. 

'And if you all come to me— forward, quick march!' said the uncle, 'it 
would be even better; you see, the weather's damp, you could rest, and 
the little countess could be driven back in a trap.' The invitation Mas 
accepted; a huntsman was sent to Otradnoe for a trap, and Nikolay, 
Natasha, and Petya rode to the uncle's house. 

Five men servants— little and big— ran out on to the front steps to meet 
their master. Dozens of women, old and big and little, popped out at the 
back entrance to have a look at the huntsmen as they arrived. The presence 
of Natasha— a woman, a lady, on horseback— excited the curiosity of the 
uncle's house-serfs to such a pitch that many of them went up to her, 
stared her in the face, and, unrestrained by her presence, made remarks 



232 WAR AND PEACE 

about her, as though she were some prodigy on show, not a human being, 
and not capable of hearing and understanding what was said about her. 

'Arinka, look-ec, she sits sideways! Sits on so, while her skirt flies about. 
. . . And look at the little horn!' 

'Sakes alive! and the knife too. . . .' 

*A regular Tatar woman!' 

'How do you manage not to tumble off?' said the forwardest of them, 
addressing Natasha boldly. 

The uncle got off his horse at the steps of his little wooden house, which 
was shut in by an overgrown garden. Looking from one to another of 
his household, he shouted peremptorily to those who were not wanted to 
retire, and for the others to do all that was needed for the reception of 
his guests. 

They all ran off in different directions. The uncle helped Natasha to 
dismount, and gave her his arm up the shaky, plank steps. 

Inside, the house, with boarded, unplastered walls, was not very clean; 
there was nothing to show that the chief aim of the persons living in it 
was the removal of every spot, yet there were no signs of neglect. There 
was a smell of fresh apples in the entry, and the walls were hung with fox- 
skins and wolfskins. 

The uncle led his guests through the vestibule into a little hall with a 
folding-table and red chairs, then into a drawing-room with a round birch- 
wood table and a sofa, and then into his study, with a ragged sofa, a thread- 
bare carpet, and portraits of his father and mother, and of himself in. 
military uniform. The study smelt strongly of tobacco and dogs. In the 
study the uncle asked his guests to sit down and make themselves at home, 
and he left them. Rugay came in, his back still covered with mud, and lay 
on the sofa, cleaning himself w T ith his tongue and his teeth. There was a 
corridor leading from the study, and in it they could see a screen with 
ragged curtains. Behind the screen they heard feminine laughter and whis- 
pering. 

Natasha, Nikolay, and Petya took off their wraps and sat down on the 
sofa. Petya leaned on his arm and fell asleep at once; Natasha and Nikola v 
sat without speaking. Their faces were burning; they were very hungrv 
and very cheerful. They looked at one another— now that the hunt was 
over and they were indoors, Nikolay did not feel called upon to show his 
masculine superiority over his sister. Natasha winked at her brother; and 
they broke into a ringing laugh before they had time to invent a pretext 
for their mirth. 

After a brief interval, the uncle came in wearing a Cossack coat, blue 
breeches, and little top-boots. And this very costume, at which Natasha 
had looked with surprise and amusement when the uncle wore it at 
Otradnoe, seemed to her now the right costume here, and in no way 
inferior to frock coats or ordinary jackets. The uncle, too, was in good 
spirits. 

'Well, this young countess here— forward, quick march!— I have never 



WAR AND PEACE 233 

seen her like!' he said, giving a long pipe to Rostov, while with a prac- 
tised motion of three fingers he filled another— a short broken one— for 
himself. 

'She's been in the saddle all day— something for a man to boast of— and 
she's just as fresh as if nothing had happened!' 

Soon the door was opened obviously, from the sound, by a barefoot 
servant-girl, and a stout, red-cheeked, handsome woman of about forty, 
with a double chin and full red lips, walked in, with a big tray in her 
hands. With hospitable dignity and cordiality in her eyes and in every 
gesture, she looked round at the guests, and with a genial smile bowed to 
them respectfully. 

In spite of her exceptional stoutness, which made her hold her head 
flung back, while her bosom and all her portly person was thrust forward, 
this woman (the uncle's housekeeper) stepped with extreme lightness. She 
went to the table, put the tray down, and deftly with her plump, white 
hands set the bottles and dishes on the table. When she had finished this 
task she went away, standing for a moment in the doorway with a smile 
on her face. 'Here I am— 1 am she! Now do you understand the uncle?' 
her appearance had said to Rostov. Who could fail to understand? Not 
Nikolay only, but even Natasha understood the uncle now and the signifi- 
cance of his knitted brows, and the happy, complacent smile, which puck- 
ered his lips as Anisya Fyodorovna came in. 

On the tray there were liqueurs, herb-brandy, mushrooms, biscuits of rye 
flour made with buttermilk, honey in the comb, foaming mead made from 
honey, apples, nuts raw and nuts baked, and nuts preserved in honey. Then 
Anisya Fyodorovna brought in preserves made with honey and with sugar, 
and ham and a chicken that had just been roasted. 

All these delicacies were of Anisya Fyodorovna's preparing, cooking or 
preserving. All seemed to smell and taste, as it were, of Anisya Fyodorovna. 
All seemed to recall her buxomness, cleanliness, whiteness, and cordial smile. 

'A little of this, please, little countess,' she kept saying, as she handed 
Natasha first one thing, then another. Natasha ate of everything, and it 
seemed to her that such buttermilk biscuits, such delicious preserves, such 
nuts in honey, such a chicken, she had never seen nor tasted anywhere. 

Anisya Fyodorovna withdrew. Rostov and the uncle, as they sipped 
cherry brandy after supper, talked of hunts past and to come, of Rugay 
and Ilagin's dogs. Natasha sat upright on the sofa, listening with sparkling 
eyes. She tried several times to waken Pctya, and make him eat something, 
but he made incoherent replies, evidently in his sleep. Natasha felt so gay, 
so well content in these new surroundings, that her only fear was that the 
trap would come too soon for her. After a silence had chanced to fall 
upon them, as almost always happens when any one receives friends for the 
first time in his own house, the uncle said, in response to the thought in 
his guests' minds: 

'Yes, so you see how I am finishing my days. . . . One dies— forward, 
quick march!— nothing is left. So why sin!' 



234 WAR AND PEACE 

The uncle's face was full of significance and even beauty as he said 
this. Rostov could not help recalling as he spoke all the good things he 
had heard said by his father and the neighbours about him. Through the 
whole district the uncle had the reputation of being a most generous and 
disinterested eccentric. He was asked to arbitrate in family quarrels; he 
was chosen executor; secrets were entrusted to him; he was elected a 
justice, and asked to fill other similar posts; but he had always persisted 
in refusing all public appointments, spending the autumn and spring in the 
fields on his bay horse, the winter sitting at home, and the summer lying 
in his overgrown garden. 

'Why don't you enter the service, uncle?' 

'I have been in the service, but I flung it up. I'm not fit for it. I can't 
make anything of it. That's your affair. I haven't the wit for it. The chase, 
now, is a very different matter; there it's all forward and quick march! 
Open the door there!' he shouted. 'Why have you shut it?' A door at the 
end of the corridor (which word the uncle always pronounced collidor, 
like a peasant) led to the huntsmen's room, as the sitting-room for the 
huntsmen was called. There was a rapid patter of bare feet, and an unseen 
hand opened the door into the huntsmen's room. They could then hear 
distinctly from the corridor the sounds of the balalaika, unmistakably 
played by a master hand. Natasha had been for some time listening, and 
now she went out into the corridor to hear the music more clearly. 

'That's Mitka, my coachman ... I bought him a good balalaika; I'm 
fond of it,' said the uncle. 

'How well he plays! It's really very nice,' said Nikolay, with a certain 
unconscious superciliousness in his tone. 

'Very nice?' Natasha said reproachfully, feeling the tone in which her 
brother had spoken. 'It's not nice, but splendid, really! 

'More, more, please,' said Natasha in the doorway, as soon as the bala- 
laika ceased. 

The uncle sat listening w 7 ith his head on one side, and a slight smile. 
Several times the balalaika was tuned up and the same notes were thrummed 
again, but the audience did not weary of it, and still longed to hear it 
again and again. Anisya Fyodorovna came in and stood with her portly 
person leaning against the doorpost. 

'You are pleased to listen!' she said to Natasha, w r ith a smile extraor- 
dinarily like the uncle's smile. 'He does play nicely,' she said. 

'That part he never plays right,' the uncle said suddenly with a vigor- 
ous gesture. 'It ought to be taken more at a run— forward, quick march! 
... to be played lightly.' 

'Why, can you do it?' asked Natasha. 

The uncle smiled, and did not answer. 

'Just you look, Anisyushka, whether the strings are all right on the guitar, 
eh? It's a long while since I have handled it. I had quite given it up!' 

Anisya Fyodorovna went very readilv with her light step to do her 
master's bidding, and brought him his guitar. Without looking at any one 



WAR AND PEACE 235 

the uncle blew the dust off it, tapped on the case with his bony fingers, 
tuned it, and settled himself in a low chair. Arching his left elbow with a 
rather theatrical gesture, he held the guitar above the finger-board, and 
winking at Anisya Fyodorovna, he played a single pure musical chord, and 
then smoothly, quietly, but confidently began playing in very slow time the 
well-known song, 'As along the highroad.' 

'Splendid, splendid, uncle! Again, again!' cried Natasha, as soon as 
he had finished. The uncle got up, and there seemed to be two men in 
him at that moment— one smiled seriously at the antics of the merry player, 
while the merry player naively and carefully executed the steps preliminary 
to the dance. 

'Come, little niece!' cried the uncle, waving to Natasha the hand that had 
struck the last chord. 

Natasha flung off the shawl that had been wrapped round her, ran 
forward facing the uncle, and setting her arms akimbo, made the move- 
ments of her shoulder and waist. 

Where, how, when had this young countess, educated by a French 
emigree, sucked in with the Russian air she breathed the spirit of that 
dance? Where had she picked up these movements which the pas de chale 
would, one might have thought, long ago have eradicated? But the spirit, 
the motions were those inimitable, unteachable, Russian gestures the uncle 
had hoped for from her. As soon as she stood up, and smiled that trium- 
phant, proud smile of sly gaiety, the dread that had come on Nikolay and 
all the spectators at the first moment, the dread that she would not dance 
it well, was at an end and they were already admiring her. 

She danced the dance well, so well indeed, so perfectly, that Anisya 
Fyodorovna, who handed her at once the kerchief she needed in the 
dance, had tears in her eyes, though she laughed as she watched that 
slender, graceful little countess, reared in silk and velvet, belonging to 
another world than hers, who was yet able to understand all that was in 
Anisya and her father and her mother and her aunt and every Russian 
soul. 

'Well done, little countess— forward, quick march!' cried the uncle, 
laughing gleefully as he finished the dance. 'Ah, that's a niece to be proud 
of! She only wants a fine fellow picked out now for her husband,— and 
then, forward, quick march!' 

'One has been picked out already,' said Nikolay, smiling. 

'Oh!' said the uncle in surprise, looking inquiringly at Natasha. Natasha 
nodded her head with a happy smile. 

At ten o'clock there arrived the wagonette, a trap, and three men on 
horseback, who had been sent to look for Natasha and Pctya. Pctya was 
carried out and laid in the wagonette as though he had been a corpse. 
Natasha and Nikolay got into the trap. The uncle wrapped Natasha up, 
and said good-bye to her with quite a new tenderness, lie accompanied 
them on foot as far as the ridge which they had to ride round, fording the 
stream, and bade his huntsmen ride in front with lanterns. 



236 WAR AND PEACE 

There were red lights in the village they drove through and a cheerful 
smell of smoke. 

'What a darling that uncle is!' said Natasha as they drove out into the 
highroad. 

4 Yes,' said Nikolay. 'You're not cold?' 

'No, I'm very comfortable; very. I am so happy,' said Natasha, posi- 
tively perplexed at her own well-being. They were silent for a long while. 

The night was dark and damp. They could not see the horses, but could 
only hear them splashing through the unseen mud. 

'I know I shall never be as happy, as peaceful as I am now . . .' Natasha 
was thinking. 

'Ah! Still a light in the drawing-room,' she said, pointing to the windows 
of their house gleaming in the wet, velvety darkness of the night. 

Count ilya andreivitch had given up being a marshal of nobility, because 
that position involved too heavy an expenditure. But his difficulties were 
not removed by that. Often Natasha and Nikolay knew of uneasy, private 
consultations between their parents, and heard talk of selling the sumptuous 
ancestral house of the Rostovs and the estate near Moscow. 

They led a quieter life at Otradnoe than in former years, but the im- 
mense house and the lodges were still full of people; more than twenty 
persons still sat down to table with them. These were all their own people, 
time-honoured inmates of their household, almost members of the family, 
or persons who must, it seemed, inevitably live in the count's house. 
There was still the same hunting establishment, increased indeed by Niko- 
lay. There were still the same fifty horses and fifteen grooms in the stables; 
the same costly presents on name-days, and ceremonial dinners to the 
whole neighbourhood. There were still the count's games of whist and 
boston, at which, letting every one see his cards, he allowed himself to be 
plundered every day of hundreds by his neighbours, who looked upon the 
privilege of making up a rubber with Count Ilya Andreivitch as a profit- 
able investment. 

The countess with her loving heart felt that her children were being 
ruined, that the count was not to blame, that he could not help being 
what he was, that he was distressed himself (though he tried to conceal 
it) at the consciousness of his own and his children's ruin, and was seek- 
ing means to improve their position. To her feminine mind only one way 
of doing so occurred— that was, to marry Nikolay to a wealthy heiress. 
She felt that this was their last hope. 

'What, if I loved a girl with no fortune would you really desire me, 
mamma, to sacrifice my feeling and my honour for the sake of money?' 
he asked his mother, with no notion of the cruelty of his question, but 
simply wishing to show his noble sentiments. 

'No; you misunderstand me,' said his mother, not knowing how to 
retrieve her mistake. 'You misunderstand me, Nikolenka. It is your hap- 



WAR AND PEACE 237 

piness I wish for,' she added, and she felt she was speaking falsely, that 
she was blundering. She burst into tears. 

'Mamma, don't cry, and only tell me that you wish it, and you know 
that I would give my whole life, everything for your peace of mind,' said 
Nikolay; 'I will sacrifice everything for you, even my feelings.' 

But the countess did not want the question put like that; she did not 
want to receive sacrifices from her son, she would have liked to sacrifice 
herself to him. 

'No; you don't understand me, don't let us talk of it,' she said, wiping 
away her tears. 

Nikolay did not go to Moscow, the countess did not renew her con- 
versations with him about matrimony, and with grief, and sometimes 
with exasperation, saw symptoms of a growing attachment between her 
son and the portionless Sonya. Nikolay went on spending his term of 
leave with his parents. 

From Prince Andrey a fourth letter had been received from Rome. In 
it he wrote that he would long ago have been on his way back to Russia, 
but that in the warm climate his wound had suddenly re-opened, which 
would compel him to defer his return till the beginning of the new year. 

Christmas came, and except for the High Mass, the solemn and weari- 
some congratulations to neighbours and house-serfs, and the new gowns 
donned by every one, nothing special happened to mark the holidays, 
though the still weather with twenty degrees of frost, the dazzling sun- 
shine by day and the bright, starlit sky at night seemed to call for some 
special celebration of the season. 

On the third day of Christmas week, after dinner, all the members of 
the household had separated and gone to their respective rooms. It was 
the dullest time of the day. Nikolay, who had been calling on neighbours 
in the morning, was asleep in the divan-room. The old count was resting 
in his own room. In the drawing-room Sonya was sitting at a round table 
copying a design for embroidery. The countess was playing patience. 
Natasha came into the room, went up to Sonya, looked at what she was 
doing, then went up to her mother and stood there mutely. 

'Why are you wandering about like an unquiet spirit?' said her mother. 
'What do you want?' 

Natasha went into the big hall, took up the guitar, and sat down with it 
in a dark corner behind a bookcase. She began fingering the strings in the 
bass, picking out a phrase she recalled from an opera she had heard in 
Petersburg with Prince Andrey. For other listeners the sounds that came 
from her guitar would have had no sort of meaning, but these sounds 
called up in her imagination a whole series of reminiscences. She sat be- 
hind the bookcase with her eyes fixed on a streak of light that fell from 
the crack in the pantry door, and listened to herself and recalled the past. 
She was in the mood for brooding over memories. 

Sonya crossed the hall, and went into the pantry with a glass in her 
hand. Natasha glanced at her through the crack in the pantry door, and 



238 WAR AND PEACE 

it seemed to her that she remembered the light falling through the crack 
in the pantry door, and Sonya passing with the glass in just the same way. 
'Yes, and it was exactly the same in every detail,' thought Natasha. 

'Sonya, what is this?' called Natasha, twanging the thick cord with her 
fingers. 

'Oh, are you there?' said Sonya starting, and she came up and listened, 
'I don't know. A storm?' she said timidly, afraid of being wrong. 

'Why, she started in just the same way, and came up and smiled the 
same timid smile when it all happened before,' thought Natasha; 'and 
just in the same way, too. ... I thought there was something wanting in 
her.' 

'No, it's the chorus from the "Water Carrier," listen.' And Natasha 
hummed the air of the chorus, so that Sonya might catch it. 'Where were 
you going?' asked Natasha. 

'To change the water in my glass. I am just finishing colouring the 
design.' 

'You always find something to do, but I can't, you know,' said Natasha. 

She sat down to the table and listened to the talk of the elders and 
Nikolay, who had come in to tea. 'My God, my God, the same people, the 
same talk, papa holding his cup, and blowing it just the same as always,' 
thought Natasha, feeling with horror an aversion rising up in her for all her 
family, because they were always the same. 

'Do you know, I think,' said Natasha, in a whisper, moving up to 
Nikolay and Sonya, 'that one goes on remembering, and remembering; one 
remembers till one recalls what happened before one was in this world. . . .' 

'That's metempsychosis,' said Sonya, who had been good at lessons, and 
remembered all she had learned. 'The Egyptians used to believe that oui 
souls had been in animals, and would go into animals again.' 

'No, do you know, I don't believe that we were once in animals,' said 
Natasha, 'but I know I have existed before. The soul is immortal, you know 
... so, if I am to live for ever, I have lived before too, I have lived for all 
eternity.' 

'Natasha! Sing me something,' called the voice of the countess. 'Why are 
you sitting there so quietly, like conspirators?' 

'Mamma, I don't want to a bit!' said Natasha, but she got up as she said it. 

Natasha had not finished singing when fourteen-year-old Petya ran in 
great excitement into the room to announce the arrival of the mummers. 

Natasha stopped abruptly. 

'Idiot!' she screamed at her brother. She ran to a chair, sank into it, 
and broke into such violent sobbing that it was a long while before she 
could stop. 

'It's nothing, mamma, it's nothing really, it's all right; Petya startled 
me,' she said, trying to smile; but the tears still flowed, and the sobs stil) 
choked her. 

The mummers— house-serfs dressed up as bears, Turks, tavern-keepers, 
and ladies— awe-inspiring or comic figures, at first huddled shyly together 



WAR AND PEACE 239 

in the vestibule, bringing in with them the freshness of the cold outside, 
and a feeling of gaiety. Then, hiding behind one another, they crowded 
together in the big hall; and at first with constraint, but afterwards with 
more liveliness and unanimity, they started singing songs, and performing 
dances, and songs with dancing, and playing Christmas games. The countess, 
after identifying them, and laughing at their costumes, went away to the 
drawing-room. Count Ilya Andreivitch sat with a beaming smile in the big 
hall, praising their performances. The young people had disappeared. 

Half an hour later there appeared in the hall among the other mummers 
an old lady in a crinoline— this was Nikolay. Petya was a Turkish lady, 
Dimmler was a clown, Natasha a hussar, and Sonya a Circassian with eye- 
brows and moustaches smudged with burnt cork. Sonya's disguise was the 
best of all. Her moustaches and eyebrows were extraordinarily becoming 
to her. Every one told her she looked very pretty, and she was in a mood 
of eager energy unlike her. Some inner voice told her that now or never 
her fate would be sealed, and in her masculine attire she seemed quite an- 
other person. 

After those of the household who were not dressed up had expressed 
condescending wonder and approval, and had failed to recognise them, 
the young people began to think their costumes so good that they must 
display them to some one else. 

Natasha was foremost in setting the note tone of holiday gaiety; and 
that gaiety, reflected from one to another, grew wilder and wilder, and 
reached its climax when they all went out into the frost, and talking, and 
calling to one another, laughing and shouting, got into the sledges. 

At first they drove at a slow trot along the narrow road. As they drove 
by the garden, the shadows of the leafless trees often lay right across the 
road and hid the bright moonlight. But as soon as they were out of their 
grounds, the snowy plain, glittering like a diamond with bluish lights in it, 
lay stretched out on all sides, all motionless and bathed in moonlight. Now 
and again a hole gave the first sledge a jolt; the next was jolted in just the 
same way, and the next, and the sledges followed one another, rudely 
breaking the iron-bound stillness. 

'A hare's track, a lot of tracks!' Natasha's voice rang out in the frost- 
bound air. 

'How light it is, Nikolenka,' said the voice of Sonya. 

Nikolay looked round at Sonya, and bent down to look at her face 
closer. It was a quite new, charming face with black moustaches, and eye- 
brows that peeped up at him from the sable fur— so close yet so distant— 
in the moonlight. 

'That used to be Sonya,' thought Nikolay. He looked closer at her and 
smiled. 

'What is it, Nikolenka? ' 

'Nothing,' he said, and turned to his horses again. 

But now came a sort of enchanted forest with shifting, black shadows, 
and the glitter of diamonds, and a flight of marble steps, and silver roofs 



240 WAR AND PEACE 

of enchanted buildings, and footmen and maid-servants were running out 
with lights and beaming faces. 

'Who is it?' was asked from the entrance. 

'The mummers from the count's; I can see by the horses,' answered 
voices. 

A broad-shouldered, energetic woman in spectacles and a loose house 
dress was sitting in her drawing-room, surrounded by her daughters, and 
doing her utmost to keep them amused. They were quietly occupied in 
dropping melted wax into water and w T atching the shadows of the shapes 
it assumed, when they heard the noise of steps in the vestibule, and the 
voices of people arriving. 

The hussars, fine ladies, witches, clowns, and bears, coughing and rub- 
bing the hoar-frost off their faces, came into the hall, where they were 
hurriedly lighting candles. Surrounded by the shrieking children, the 
mummers hid their faces, and disguising their voices, bowed to their hostess 
and dispersed about the room. 

Natasha, the favourite of the young Melyukovs, disappeared with them 
into rooms at the back of the house, and burnt cork and various dressing- 
gowns and masculine garments were sent for and taken from the footman 
by bare, girlish arms through the crack of the half-open door. In ten 
minutes all the younger members of the Melyukov family reappeared in 
fancy dresses too. 

After Russian dances and songs in chorus, all the party, servants and 
gentry alike, began playing games. An hour later all the fancy dresses were 
crumpled and untidy. The corked moustaches and eyebrows were wearing 
off the heated, perspiring, and merry faces. The guests were invited into 
the drawing-room for supper, while the servants were regaled in the hall. 

'Oh, trying one's fate in the bath-house, that's awful!' was said at the 
supper-table by an old maiden lady. 

'It needs courage . . .' 

'I'll go,' said Sonya. 'And how do they try fate in a granary?' 

'Why, at a time like this they go to the granary and listen. And accord- 
ing to what you hear,— if there's a knocking and a tapping, it's bad; but 
if there's a sound of sifting corn, it is good. But sometimes it happens . . .' 

'Mamma, tell us what happened to you in the granarv?' 

'Why, I have forgotten . . .' she said. 'I know none of you will go.' 

'No. I'll go,' said Sonya. 

'Oh, well, if you're not afraid.' 

Whether they were playing at the ring and string game, or the rouble 
game, or talking as now, Nikolay did not leave Sonya's side, and looked 
at her with quite new eyes. It seemed to him as though to-day, for the 
first time, he had, thanks to that corked moustache, seen her fully as she 
was. Sonya certainly was that evening gay, lively, and pretty, as Nikolay 
had never seen her before. 

'I'm not afraid of anything,' said Sonya. 'May I go at oncer' She got 
up. They told Sonya where the granary was; how she was to stand quite 



WAR AND PEACE 241 

silent and listen, and they gave her a cloak. She threw it over her head and 
glanced at Nikolay. 

'How exquisite that girl is!' he thought. 'And what have I been think- 
ing about all this time?' 

Sonya went out into the corridor to go to the granary. Nikolay hastily 
went out to the front porch, saying it certainly was stuffy indoors. 

Outside there was the same still frost, the same moonlight, only even 
brighter than before. The light was so bright, and there were so many 
stars sparkling in the snow, that the sky did not attract the eye, and the 
real stars were hardly noticeable. The sky was all blackness and dreari- 
ness, the earth all brightness. 

Tm a fool; a fool! What have I been waiting for all this time?' thought 
Nikolay; and running out into the porch he went round the corner of the 
house along the path leading to the back door. He knew Sonya would come 
that way. Half-way there was a pile of logs of wood, seven feet long. It was 
covered with snow and cast a shadow. Across it and on one side of it there 
fell on the snow and the path a network of shadows from the bare old 
lime-trees. The wall and roof of the granary glittered in the moonlight, as 
though hewn out of some precious stone. There was the sound of the 
snapping of wood in the garden,, and all was perfect stillness again. The 
lungs seemed breathing in, not air, but a sort of ever-youthful power and 
joy. 

From the maid-servants' entrance came the tap of feet on the steps; 
there was a ringing crunch on the last step where the snow was heaped, 
and the voice of the old maid said: 

'Straight on, along this path, miss. Only don't look round!' 

'I'm not afraid,' answered Sonya's voice, and Sonya's little feet in their 
dancing-shoes came with a ringing, crunching sound along the path to- 
wards Nikolay. 

Sonya was muffled up in the cloak. She was two paces away when she 
saw him. She saw him, too, not as she knew him, and as she was always a 
little afraid of him. He was in a woman's dress, with towzled hair, and a 
blissful smile that was new to Sonya. She ran quickly to him. 

'Quite different, and still the same,' thought Nikolay, looking at her 
face, all lighted up by the moon. He slipped his hands under the cloak that 
covered her head, embraced her, drew her to him, and kissed the lips 
that wore a moustache and smelt of burnt cork. Sonya kissed him full on 
the lips, and putting out her little hands held them against his cheeks on 
both sides. 

'Sonya! . . . Nikolenka! . . .' was all they said. They ran to the granary 
and went back to the house, each at their separate door. 

When they were all driving back, Natasha, who always saw and noticed 
everything, managed a change of places, so that Sonya was with Nikolay 
and the maids. 

On reaching home, the young ladies told the countess how they had 
spent the time at the Melyukovs', and then went to their room. They 



242 WAR AND PEACE 

changed their dresses, Dut without washing off their moustaches, sat for a 
long while talking of their happiness. They talked of how they would live 
when they were married, how their husbands would be friends, and they 
would be happy. Looking-glasses were standing on Natasha's table, set 
there earlier in the evening by Dunyasha, and arranged in the traditional 
way for looking into the future. 

'Sit down, Natasha, perhaps you will see him,' said Sonya. 

Natasha lighted the candles and sat down. 'I do see some one with a 
moustache,' said Natasha, seeing her own face. 

'You mustn't laugh, miss,' said Dunyasha. 

With the assistance of Sonya and the maid, Natasha got the mirrors 
into the correct position. Her face took a serious expression, and she was 
silent. For a long while she went on sitting, watching the series of retreat- 
ing candles reflected in the looking-glasses, and expecting (in accordance 
with the tales she had heard) at one minute to see a coffin, at the next to 
see him, Prince Andrey, in the furthest, dimmest, indistinct square. But 
ready as she was to accept the slightest blur as the form of a man or of a 
coffin, she saw nothing. She began to blink, and moved away from the 
looking-glass. 

'Why is it other people see things and I never see anything?' she said. 
'Come, you sit down, Sonya; to-day you really must. Only look for me 
. . . I feel so full of dread to-day!' 

Sonya sat down to the looking-glass, got the correct position, and began 
looking. All at once Sonya drew back from the glass she was holding and 
put her hand over her eyes. 'O Natasha!' she said. 

'Seen something? Seen something? What did you see?' cried Natasha, 
supporting the looking-glass. 

Sonya had seen nothing. She did not know herself how and why that 
exclamation had broken from her as she covered her eyes. 

'Did you see him?' asked Natasha, clutching her by the hand. 

'Yes. Wait a bit. . . . I . . . did see him,' Sonya could not help saying. 
not yet sure whether by him Natasha meant Nikolay or Andrey. 'Why 
not say I saw something? Other people see things! And who can tell 
whether I have or have not?' flashed through Sonya's mind. 

'Yes, I saw him,' she said. 

'How was it? How? Standing or lying down?' 

'No, I saw ... At first there was nothing; then I saw him lying down.' 

'Andrey lying down? Is he ill?' Natasha asked, fixing eyes of terror on 
her friend. 

'No, on the contrary— on the contrary, his face was cheerful, and he 
turned to me'; and at the moment she was saying this, it seemed to her- 
self that she really had seen what she described. 

'Well, and then, Sonya? . . .' 

'Then I could make out more; something blue and red. . . .' 

'Sonya, when will he come back? When shall I see him? A4y God! 1 
feel so frightened for him, and for me, and frightened for everything . . .' 



WAR AND PEACE 243 

cried Natasha; and answering not a word to Sonya's attempts to comfort 
her, she got into bed, and long after the candle had been put out she lay 
with wide-open eyes motionless on the bed, staring into the frosty moon- 
light through the frozen window-panes. 

Soon after the Christmas fetes were over, Nikolay spoke to his mother of 
his love for Sonya, and his immovable resolution to marry her. The coun- 
tess had long before observed what was passing between Sonya and Niko- 
lay, and was expecting this announcement. She listened to his words with- 
out comment, and then told her son that he could marry whom he chose, 
but that neither she nor his father would give their blessing to such a 
marriage. For the first time in his life Nikolay felt that his mother was 
displeased with him, that in spite of all her love for him she would not 
give way to him. Coldly, without looking at her son, she sent for her 
husband; and when he came in, the countess would have briefly and coldly, 
in Nikolay's presence, told him her son's intention, but she could not 
control herself, burst into tears of anger, and went out of the room. The 
old count began irresolutely persuading and entreating Nikolay to give up 
his intention. Nikolay replied he could not be false to his word, and his 
father, sighing and visibly embarrassed, quickly cut short the conversation. 

Firmly resolved to settle things in his regiment, to retire, come home, 
and marry Sonya, Nikolay at the beginning of January went back to his 
regiment, sad and serious at being on bad terms with his parents, but, as it 
seemed to him, passionately in love. 

After Nikolay's departure, it was more depressing than ever in the 
Rostovs' house. The countess fell ill from the emotional strains she had 
passed through. 

Sonya was depressed at parting from Nikolay, and still more at the 
hostile tone the countess could not help adopting towards her. The count 
was more worried than ever by the difficulties of his position, which called 
for some decisive action. It was necessary to sell the Moscow house and 
the estate near Moscow, and to do so it was necessary to go to Moscow. 
But the countess's illness forced them to put off going. 

Natasha grew now more impatient and overstrung every day. Prince 
Andrey's letters generally angered her. It mortified her to think that while 
she was simply living in the thought of him, he was living a real life, seeing 
new places and new people who were interesting to him. The more interest- 
ing his letters were, the more they vexed her. 

The countess's health still did not mend, but the visit to Moscow could 
be deferred no longer. The trousseau had to be got, the house had to be 
sold, and Prince Andrey was to arrive first in Moscow, where his father 
was spending the winter, and Natasha believed that he had already arrived 
there. The countess was left in the country, and towards the end of 
January the count took Sonya and Natasha with him to Moscow. 



PART VIII 



After Prince Andrey's engagement to Natasha, Pierre suddenly, for no 
apparent reason, felt it impossible to go on living in the same way as before. 
Firm as his belief was in the truths revealed to him bv his benefactor, the 
old freemason, and happy as he had been at first in the task of perfecting 
his inner spiritual self, to which he had devoted himself with such ardour, 
yet after Prince Andrey's engagement to Natasha, and the death of Osip 
Alexyevitch, the news of which reached him almost simultaneously, the 
whole zest of his religious life seemed to have suddenly vanished. Nothing 
but the skeleton of life remained: his house with his brilliant wife, now 
basking in the favours of a very grand personage indeed, the society of all 
Petersburg, and his service at court with its tedious formalities. And that 
life suddenly filled Pierre with unexpected loathing. 

He gave up keeping his diary, avoided the society of brother-masons, 
took to visiting the club again and to drinking a great deal; associated once 
more with gay bachelor companions, and began to lead a life so dissipated 
that Countess Elena Vassilyevna thought it necessary to make severe 
observations to him on the subject. Pierre felt that she was right; and to 
avoid compromising his wife, he went away to Moscow. 

In Moscow, as soon as he entered his huge house with faded and fading 
princesses, his cousins, and the immense retinue of servants, as soon as, 
driving through the town, he saw the Iversky chapel with the lights of 
innumerable candles before the golden setting of the Madonna, the square 
of the Kremlin with its untrodden snow, the sledge-drivers, and the hovels 
of Sivtsev Vrazhok; saw the old Moscow gentlemen quietly going on with 
their daily round, without hurry or desire of change; saw the old Moscow 
ladies, the Moscow balls, and the English Club— he felt himself at home, in 
a quiet haven of rest. In Moscow he felt comfortable, warm, at home, and 
snugly dirty, as in an old dressing-gown. 

All Moscow society, from the old ladies to the children, welcomed 
Pierre back like a long-expected guest, whose place was always ready for 
him, and had never been filled up. For the Moscow world, Pierre was the 
most delightful, kind-hearted, intellectual, good-humoured, and generous 
eccentric, and a heedless and genial Russian gentleman of the good old 
school. His purse was always empty, because it was always open to 
every one. 

When after a bachelor supper, with a weak and good-natured smile, he 

244 



WAR AND PEACE 245 

yielded to the entreaties of the festive party that he would drive off with 
them to share their revels, there were shouts of delight and triumph. At 
balls he danced if there were a lack of partners. Girls and young married 
ladies liked him, because he paid no special attention to any one, but was 
equally amiable to all, especially after supper. 'He is charming; he is of 
no sex,' they used to say of him. 

Pierre no longer suffered from moments of despair, melancholy, and 
loathing for life as he had done. But the same malady that had manifested 
itself in acute attacks in former days was driven inwards and never now left 
him for an instant. 'What for? What's the use? What is it is going on in 
the world?' he asked himself in perplexity several times a day. 

'Elena Vassilyevna, who has never cared for anything but her own 
body, and is one of the stupidest women in the world,' Pierre thought, 'is 
regarded by people as the acme of wit and refinement, and is the object 
of their homage. Napoleon Bonaparte was despised by every one while he 
was really great, and since he became a pitiful buffoon the Emperor 
Francis seeks to offer him his daughter in an illegal marriage. The Spaniards, 
through their Catholic Church, return thanks to God for their victory 
over the French on the 14th of June, and the French, through the same 
Catholic Church, return thanks to God for their victory over the Spaniards 
on the same 14th of June. My masonic brothers swear in blood that they 
are ready to sacrifice all for their neighbour, but they don't give as much 
as one rouble to the collections for the poor. We all profess the Christian 
law of forgiveness of sins and love for one's neighbour— the law, in honour 
of which we have raised forty times forty churches in Moscow— but 
yesterday we knouted to death a deserter; and the minister of that same 
law of love and forgiveness, the priest, gave the soldier the cross to kiss 
before his punishment.' 

He suffered from an unlucky faculty— common to many men, especially 
Russians— the faculty of seeing and believing in the possibility of good and 
truth, and at the same time seeing too clearly the evil and falsity of life to 
be capable of taking a serious part in it. Every sphere of activity was in 
his eyes connected with evil and deception. Whatever he tried to be, what- 
ever he took up, evil and falsity drove him back again and cut him off 
from every field of energy. And meanwhile he had to live, he had to be 
occupied. It was too awful to lie under the burden of those insoluble 
problems of life, and he abandoned himself to the first distraction that 
offered, simply to forget them. He visited every possible society, drank a 
great deal, went in for buying pictures, building, and above all reading. 
He read and re-read everything he came across. 

Although the doctors told him that in view of his corpulence wine was 
injurious to him, he drank a very great deal. Fie never felt quite content 
except when he had, almost unconsciously, lifted several glasses of wine to 
his big mouth. Then he felt agreeably warm all over his body, amiably 
disposed towards all his fellows, and mentally ready to respond superficially 
to every idea, without going too deeply into it. 



246 WAR AND PEACE 

Sometimes Pierre remembered what he had been told of soldiers under 
fire in ambuscade when they have nothing to do, how they try hard to 
find occupation so as to bear their danger more easily. And Pierre pictured 
all men as such soldiers trying to find a refuge from life: some in ambition, 
some in cards, some in framing laws, some in women, some in playthings, 
some in horses, some in politics, some in sport, some in wine, some in 
the government service. 'Nothing is trivial, nothing is important, every- 
thing is the same; only to escape from it as best one can,' thought Pierre. 
'Only not to see it, that terrible it. 9 

At the beginning of the winter Prince Nikolay Andreivitch Bolkonsky and 
his daughter moved to Moscow. His past, his intellect and originality, and 
still more the falling off at about that time of the popular enthusiasm for 
the rule of the Tsar Alexander and the anti-French and patriotic senti- 
ments then prevailing at Moscow, all contributed to make Prince Nikolay 
Andreivitch at once an object of peculiar veneration and the centre of the 
Moscow opposition to the government. 

The prince had greatly aged during that year. He had begun to show 
unmistakable signs of failing powers, sudden attacks of drowsiness, and 
forgetfulness of events nearest in time, and exact memory of remote in- 
cidents, and a childlike vanity in playing the part of leader of the Moscow 
opposition. But in spite of that, when the old man came into the drawing- 
room in the evenings to tea, in his wig and fur coat, and on being incited 
to do so by some one, began uttering abrupt observations on the past, or 
still more abrupt and harsh criticisms on the present— he aroused the same 
feeling of esteem and reverence in all his guests. For visitors, that old- 
fashioned house, with its huge mirrors, pre-revolutionary furniture, and 
powdered lackeys, and the stern and shrewd old man, himself a relic of a 
past age, with the gentle daughter and the pretty Frenchwoman, both so 
reverently devoted to him, made a stately and agreeable spectacle. But 
those visitors did not reflect that, apart from the couple of hours during 
which they saw the household, there were twenty-two hours of the dav 
and night during which the secret, private life of the house went on its 
accustomed way. 

That inner life had become very hard for Princess Marya of late in 
Moscow. She did not go into society; every one knew that her father 
would not allow her to go anywhere without him, and owing to his failing 
health he could go nowhere himself. She was not even invited now to 
dinner-parties or balls. 

Princess Marya had laid aside all hopes of marriage. She saw the coldness 
and hostility with which the old prince received and dismissed the young 
men, possible suitors, who sometimes appeared at the house. Friends, 
Princess Marya now had none; during this stay in Moscow she had lost 
all faith in the two friends who had been nearest to her. Mademoiselle 
Bourienne, with whom she had never been able to be perfectly open, she 
now regarded with dislike, and for certain reasons kept at a distance. Julie, 



WAR AND PEACE 247 

with whom Princess Marya had kept up an unbroken correspondence for 
five years, was in Moscow. When Princess Marya renewed her personal 
relations with her, she felt her former friend to be utterly alien to her. 
Julie, who had become, by the death of her brothers, one of the wealthiest 
heiresses in Moscow, was at that time engrossed in a giddy whirl of 
fashionable amusements. She was surrounded by young men, whom she 
believed to have become suddenly appreciative of her qualities. Princess 
Marya reflected every Thursday that she had now no one to write to, 
seeing that Julie was here and saw her every week, though her friend's' 
actual presence gave her no sort of pleasure. The time for Prince Andrey's 
return and marriage was approaching, and his commission to her to pre- 
pare her father's mind was so far from being successfully carried out that 
the whole thing seemed hopeless; any reference to the young Countess 
Rostov infuriated the old prince, who was for the most part out of humour 
at all times now. 

^ Another trouble that weighed on Princess Marya of late was due to her 
six-year-old nephew. In her relations with little Nikolay she recognised to 
her consternation symptoms of her father's irritable character in herself. 
However often she told herself that she must not let herself lose her 
temper, when teaching her nephew, almost every time she sat down with 
a pointer showing him the French alphabet, she so longed to hasten the 
process of transferring her knowledge to the child that at the slightest 
inattention she was quivering in nervous haste and vexation, she raised her 
voice and sometimes stood him in the corner. When she had stood him 
in the corner she would begin to cry herself over her evil, wicked nature. 
But the greatest of the princess's burdens was her father's irascibility, 
which had reached the point of cruelty. Of late he had taken a new 
departure, which caused Princess Marya more misery than anything— that 
was his closer and closer intimacy with Mademoiselle Bourienne. The 
idea that had occurred to him in jest at the first moment of receiving the 
news of his son's intentions, that if Andrey got married he, too, would 
marry Mademoiselle Bourienne, obviously pleased him, and he had of late- 
simply, as Princess Marya fancied, to annoy her-persisted in being 
particularly gracious to Mademoiselle Bourienne and manifesting his dis- 
satisfaction with his daughter by demonstrations of love for the French- 
woman. 

One day in Princess Marya's presence (it seemed to her that her father 
did it on purpose because she was there) the oM prince kissed Made- 
moiselle Bourienne's hand, and drawing her to him embraced her affection- 
ately. Princess Marya flushed hotly and ran out of the room. A few min- 
utes^ later, Mademoiselle Bourienne went into Princess Marya's room, 
making some cheerful remarks in her agreeable voice. Princess Marya 
began screaming at her: 

'It's loathsome, vile, inhuman to take advantage of feebleness . . .' She 
could not go on. 'Go out of my room,' she cried, and broke into sobs. 

The next day the old prince did not say a word to his daughter, but she 



248 WAR AND PEACE 

noticed that at dinner he gave orders for the dishes to be handed to Made- 
moiselle Bourienne first. When towards the end of dinner, the footman 
from habit handed the coffee, beginning with the princess, the old prince 
flew into a sudden frenzy of rage, flung his cane at Filipp, and im- 
mediately gave orders for him to be sent for a soldier. 

'He won't obey . . . twice I told him! . . . and he didn't obey. She's 
the first person in this house, she's my best friend,' screamed the old 
prince. 

At such moments the feeling that prevailed in Princess Marya's soul was 
akin to the pride of sacrifice. And all of a sudden at such moments, that 
father whom she was judging would look for his spectacles, fumbling by 
them and not seeing them, or would forget what had just happened, or 
would take a tottering step with his weak legs, and look round to see 
whether any one had noticed his feebleness, or what was worst of all, at 
dinner w 7 hen there were no guests to excite him, he would suddenly fall 
asleep, letting his napkin drop and his shaking head sink over his plate. 'He 
is old and feeble, and I dare to judge him!' she thought, revolted by herself. 

On St. Nikolay's day, the name-day of the old prince, all Moscow was 
driving up to the approach of his house, but he gave orders for no one to 
be admitted to see him. Only a few guests, of whom he gave a list to 
Princess Marva, were to be invited to dinner. 

At two o'clock the six persons he had selected arrived: the celebrated 
Count Rastoptchin, Prince Lopuhin and his nephew, Tchatrov, an old 
comrade of the prince's in the field, and of the younger generation Pierre 
and Boris Drubetskoy. 

The prince did not receive w T hat is called 'society,' but his house was the 
centre of a little circle into which— though it w T as not talked of much in 
the town— it was more flattering to be admitted than anywhere else. Boris 
had grasped that fact a week previously, when he heard Rastoptchin tell 
the commander-in-chief of Moscow, who had invited him to dine on St. 
Nikolay's dav, that he could not accept his invitation. 

'On that day I always go to pay my devotions to the relics of Prince 
Nikolay Andreivitch.' 

The little party assembled before dinner in the old-fashioned, lofty 
drawing-room, with its old furniture, was like the solemn meeting of some 
legal council board. The tone of the conversation was based on the assump- 
tion that no one approved of what was being done in the political world. 
Incidents were related obviously confirming the view that everything was 
going from bad to worse. 

At dinner the conversation turned on the last political news, Napoleon's 
seizure of the possessions of the Duke of Oldenburg, and the Russian note, 
hostile to Napoleon, which had been despatched to all the European courts. 

'Bonaparte treats all Europe as a pirate does a captured vessel,' said 
Rastoptchin, repeating a phrase he had uttered several times before. 'One 
only marvels at the long-suffering or the blindness of the ruling sovereigns. 
Now it's the Pope's turn, and Bonaparte doesn't scruple to try and depose 



WAR AND PEACE 249 

the head of the Catholic Church, and no one says a word. Our Emperor 
alone has protested against the seizure of the possessions of the Duke of 
Oldenburg. And even . . .' Count Rastoptchin broke off, feeling that he 
was on the very border line beyond which criticism was impossible. 

'Other domains have been offered him instead of the duchy of Olden- 
burg,' said the old prince. 'He shifts the dukes about, as I might move my 
serfs from Bleak Hills to Bogutcharovo and the Ryazan estates.' 

'I have read our protest about the Oldenburg affair, and I was surprised 
at how badly composed the note was,' said Count Rastoptchin in the 
casual tone of a man criticising something with which he is very familiar. 

Pierre looked at Rastoptchin in naive wonder, unable to understand why 
he should be troubled by the defective composition of the note. 

'Does it matter how the note is worded, count,' he said, 'if the meaning 
is forcible?' 

'My dear fellow, with our five hundred thousand troops, it should be 
easy to have a good style,' said Count Rastoptchin. 

Pierre perceived the point of Count Rastcptchin's dissatisfaction with the 
wording of the note. 

'I should have thought there were scribblers enough to write it,' said the 
old prince. 'Up in Petersburg they do nothing but write— not notes only, 
but new laws they keep writing. My Andryusha up there has written a 
whole volume of new laws for Russia. Nowadays they're always at it!' 
And he laughed an unnatural laugh. 

Prince Nikolay Andreivitch grew more animated, and began to express 
his views on the impending war. He said that our wars with Bonaparte 
would be unsuccessful so long as we sought alliances with the Germans 
and went meddling in European affairs. Our political interests all lay in 
the East, and as regards Bonaparte, the one thing was an armed force on 
the frontier, and a firm policy, and he would never again dare to cross the 
Russian frontier, as he had done in 1807. 

Princess Marya, sitting in the drawing-room, thought of nothing but 
whether all their guests were noticing her father's hostile attitude to her. 
She did not even notice the marked attention and amiability shown her 
during the whole dinner by Drubetskoy, who was that day paying them 
his third visit. 

Princess Marya turned with an absent-minded, questioning glance to 
Pierre, who, with a smile on his face, came up to her, hat in hand, the 
last of the guests, after the prince had gone out, and they were left alone 
together in the drawing-room. 

'Can I stay a little longer?' he said, dropping his bulky person into a low 
chair beside Princess Marya. 

'Oh, yes,' she said. 'You noticed nothing?' her eves asked. 

Pierre was in an agreeable, after-dinner mood. He looked straight before 
him and smiled softly. 'Have you known that young man long, princess?' 
he said. 

'Which one?' 



250 WAR AND PEACE 

'Drubetskoy.' 

'No, not long. a . .' 

'Well, do you like him?' 

'Yes; he's a very agreeable young man. Why do you ask me?' said 
Princess Marya, still thinking of her conversation in the morning with 
her father. 

'Because I have observed, that when a young man comes from Peters- 
burg to Moscow on leave, it is invariably with the object of marrying 
an heiress.' 

'Have you observed that?' said Princess Marya. 

'Yes,' Pierre went on with a smile, 'and that young man now manages 
matters so that wherever there are wealthy heiresses— there he is to be 
found. I can read him like a book. He is hesitating now which to attack, 
you or Mademoiselle Julie Karagin. He is very attentive to her,' 

'Does he visit them?' 

'Yes, very often. And do you know the new-fashioned method of 
courting?' said Pierre, smiling good-humouredly, and obviously feeling in 
that light-hearted mood of good-natured irony, for which he had so often 
reproached himself in his diary. 

'No,' said Princess Marya. 

'To please the Moscow girls nowadays one has to be melancholy. He is 
very melancholy with Mademoiselle Karagin,' said Pierre. 

'Really!' said Princess Marya, looking at the kindly face of Pierre, and 
thinking, 'if I could make up my mind to confide all I am feeling to some 
one, it is just Pierre I should like to tell it all to. He is so kind and 
generous. It would ease my heart. He would give me advice.' 

'Would you marry him?' asked Pierre. 

'O my God, count! there are moments when I would marry any one'-^ 
to her own surprise Princess Marya said, with tears in her voice. 'Ah! how 
bitter it is to love some one near to one and to feel,' she went on in a 
shaking voice, 'that you can do nothing for him, but cause him sorrow, 
and when you know you cannot alter it. There's only one thing— to go 
away, and where am I to go?' 

'What is wrong? what is the matter with you, princess?' 

But Princess Marya, without explaining further, burst into tears. 

'I don't know what is the matter with me to-day. Don't take any notice 
of me, forget what I said to you.' 

All Pierre's gaiety had vanished. He questioned the princess anxiously, 
begged her to speak out, to confide her trouble to him. But she would only 
repeat that she begged him to forget what she had said, that she did not 
remember what she had said, and that she had no trouble except the one 
he knew— her anxiety lest Prince Andrey's marriage should cause a breach 
between him and his father. 

'Have you heard anything of the Rostovs?' she asked to change the 
subject. 'I was told they would soon be here. I expect Andrey, too, every 
day. I should have liked them to see each other here.' 



WAR AND PEACE 251 

'And how does he look at the matter now?' said Pierre, meaning by he 
the old prince. Princess Marya shook her head. 

'But it can't be helped. There are only a few months left now before 
the year is over. And it can't go on like this. I hope to get to know her 
well. . . . You have known them a long while,' said Princess Marya. 'Tell 
me the whole truth, speaking quite seriously. What sort of a girl is she, 
and how do you like her? But the whole truth, because, you see, Andrey is 
risking so much in doing this against our father's will, that I should like 
to know . . .' 

A vague instinct told Pierre that these repeated requests to him to tell 
her the whole truth betrayed Princess Marya's ill-will towards her future 
sister-in-law, that she wanted Pierre not to approve of Prince Andrey's 
choice; but Pierre said what he felt rather than what he thought. 'I don't 
know how to answer your question,' said he, blushing though he could 
not have said why himself. 'I really don't know what kind of girl she is. I 
can't analyse her. She's fascinating; and why she is, I don't know; that's 
all that one can say about her.' 

Princess Marya sighed, and her face expressed: 'Yes; that's what I 
expected and feared.' 

'Is she clever?' asked Princess Marya. Pierre thought a moment. 

'I suppose not,' he said. 'Yes, no; she is fascinating, and nothing more.' 

Princess Marya again shook her head disapprovingly. 

'Ah, I do so want to like her! You tell her so if you see her before I do.' 

'I have heard that they will be here in a few days,' said Pierre. 

Boris had not succeeded in marrying a wealthy heiress in Petersburg, and 
it was with that object that he had come to Moscow. In Moscow Boris 
found himself hesitating between two of the wealthiest heiresses,— Julie 
and Princess Marya. Though Princess Marya, in spite of her plainness, 
seemed to him anyway more attractive than Julie, he felt vaguely awkward 
in paying court to the former. In his last conversation with her, en the old 
prince's name-day, she had met all his attempts to talk of the emotions 
with irrelevant replies, and had obviously not heard what he was saying. 
Julie, on the contrary, received his attentions eagerly, though she 
showed it in a peculiar fashion of her own. Julie did not miss a single ball, 
entertainment, or theatre. Her dresses were always of the most fashionable. 
But in spite of that, Julie appeared to have lost all illusions, told every one 
that she had no faith in love or friendship, or any of the joys of life, and 
looked for consolation only to the realm beyond. She had adopted the tone 
of a girl who has suffered a great disappointment, a girl who has lost her 
lover or been cruelly deceived by him. Though nothing of the kind had 
ever happened to her, she was looked upon as having been disappointed 
in that way, and she did in fact believe herself that she had suffered a 
great deal in her life. A few young men only, among them Boris, entered 
more deeply into Julie's melancholy, and with these young men she had 
more prolonged and secluded conversations on the nothingness of all things 



252 WAR AND PEACE 

earthly, and to them she opened her albums, full of mournful sketches, 
sentences, and verses. 

Boris sketched two trees in her album, and wrote under them: 'Rustic 
trees, your gloomy branches shed darkness and melancholy upon me.' 

In another place he sketched a tomb and inscribed below it: — 

'Death is helpful, and death is tranquil, 
Ah, there is no other refuge from sorrow!' 

Julie said that couplet was exquisite. 

Anna Mihalovna, who often visited the Karagins, took a hand at cards 
with the mother, and meanwhile collected trustworthy information as 
to the portion that Julie would receive on her marriage (her dowry was 
to consist of two estates in the Penza province and forests in the Nizhni- 
gorod province). With tender emotion and deep resignation to the will 
of Providence, Anna Mihalovna looked on at the refined sadness that 
united her son to the wealthy Julie. 

'Still as charming and as melancholy as ever, my sweet Julie,' she would 
say to the daughter. 'Boris says he finds spiritual refreshment in your 
house. He has suffered such cruel disillusionment, and he is so sensitive,' 
she would say to the mother. 

'Ah, my dear, how attached I have grown to Julie lately,' she would 
say to her son, 'I can't tell you. But, indeed, who could help loving her! 
A creature not of this earth! Ah, Boris! Boris!' She paused for a moment. 
'And how I feel for her mother,' she would go on. 'She showed me to-day 
the letters and accounts from Penza (they have an immense estate there), 
and she, poor thing, w T ith no one to help her. Thev do take such advantage 
of her!' 

Boris heard his mother with a faintly perceptible smile. He laughed 
blandly at her simple-hearted wiles, but he listened to her and sometimes 
questioned her carefully about the Penza and Nizhnigorod estates. 

Julie had long been expecting an offer from her melancholy adorer, 
and was fully prepared to accept it. But a sort of secret feeling of repul- 
sion for her, for her passionate desire to be married, for her affectation, 
and a feeling of horror at renouncing all possibility of real love made Boris 
still delay. 

'My dear,' said Anna Mihalovna to her son, 'I know from a trust- 
worthy source that Prince Vassiiy is sending his son to Moscow to marry 
him to Julie. I am so fond of Julie that I should be most sorry for her. 
What do you think about it, my dear?' said Anna Mihalovna. 

Boris was mortified at the idea of being unsuccessful, of having wasted 
all that month of tedious, melancholy courtship of Julie, and of seeing all 
the revenues of those Penza estates— which he had mentally assigned to 
the various purposes for which he needed them— pass into other hands, 
especially into the hands of that fool Anatole. 



WAR AND PEACE 253 

'I can always manage so as to see very little of her,' thought Boris. 'And 
the thing's been begun and must be finished!' 

Count ilya andreivitch rostov arrived in Moscow towards the end of 
January with Natasha and Sonya. The countess was still unwell, and 
unable to travel, but they could not put off coming till she recovered, 
for Prince Andrey was expected in Moscow every day. They had, besides, 
to order the trousseau, to sell the estate in the suburbs of Moscow, and to 
take advantage of old Prince Bolkonsky's presence in Moscow to present 
his future daughter-in-law to him. The Rostovs' house in Moscow had not 
been heated all the winter; and as they were coming only for a short 
time, and the countess was not with them, Count Ilya Andreivitch made up 
his mind to stay with Marya Dmitryevna Ahrostimov, who had long been 
pressing her hospitality upon the count. 

Late in the evening the four loaded sledges of the Rostovs drove into 
the courtyard of Marya Dmitryevna in Old Equerrys' Place. Marya 
Dmitryevna lived alone. She had by now married off her daughter. Her 
sons were all in the service. 

When they had all taken off their outdoor things, set themselves straight 
after the journey, and come in to tea, Marya Dmitryevna kissed them all 
in due course. 

'Heartily glad you have come, and are staying with me,' she said. 'It's 
long been time you were here,' she said, with a significant glance at 
Natasha. . . . 'The old fellow's here, and his son's expected from day to 
day. You must, you must make their acquaintance. Oh, well, we shall talk 
of that later on,' she added. 'Now, listen,' she turned to the count, 'what 
do you want to do to-morrow? Whom will you send for? The tearful 
Anna Mihalovna— she's here with her son. The son's to be married too! 
Then Bezuhov. He's here, too, with his wife. He ran away from her, and 
she has come trotting after him. He dined with me last Wednesday. Well, 
and I'll take them'— she indicated the young ladies— "to-morrow to Iversky 
chapel, and then we shall go to Aubert-Chalmey. You'll be getting every- 
thing now, I expect! Don't judge by me— the sleeves nowadays are 
like this!' 

Next morning Marya Dmitryevna bore the young ladies off to Iversky 
chapel and to Madame Aubert-Chalmey, who was so frightened of Marya 
Dmitryevna that she always sold her dresses at a loss simply to get rid oi 
her as soon as possible. Marya Dmitryevna ordered almost the whole 
trousseau. On their return, she sent every one out of the room but Natasha, 
and called her favourite to sit beside her arm-chair. 

'Well, now we can have a chat. I congratulate you on your betrothed. 
A fine fellow you have hooked! I'm glad of it for your sake, and I have 
known him since he was that high'— she held her hand a yard from the 
floor. Natasha flushed joyfully. 'I like him and all his family. Now, listen! 
You know, of course, that old Prince Nikolay was very much against his 



254 WAR AND PEACE 

son's marrying. He's a whimsical old fellow! Of course, Prince Andrey h 
not a child, he can get on without him, but to enter a family against the 
father's will is not a nice thing to do. One wants peace and love in a 
family. You're a clever girl, you'll know how to manage things. You must 
use your wits and your kind heart. And every thing will come right.' 

Natasha was silent, not as Marya Dmitryevna supposed from shyness. 
In reality Natasha disliked any one's interfering in what touched her love 
for Prince Andrey, which seemed to her something so apart from all 
human affairs, that no one, as she imagined, could understand it. 

'I have known him a long while, do you see; and Masha, your sister-in- 
law, I love. Sisters-in-law are said to be mischief-makers, but she— well, 
she wouldn't hurt a fly. She has begged me to bring you two together. 
You must go to see her to-morrow with your father, and be as nice as 
possible; you are younger than she is. By the time your young man comes 
back, you'll be friends with his sister and his father, and they will have 
learned to love you. Yes or no? It will be better so, eh?' 

'Oh yes!' Natasha responded reluctantly. 

Next day, by the advice of Marya Dmitryevna, Count Ilya Andreivitch 
went with Natasha to call on Prince Nikolay Andreivitch. The count pre- 
pared for the visit by no means in a cheerful spirit: in his heart he was 
afraid. Count Ilya Andreivitch had a vivid recollection of his last interview 
with the old prince at the time of the levying of the militia, when, in 
reply to his invitation to dinner, he had had to listen to a heated reprimand 
for furnishing less than the required number of men. 

Natasha in her best dress was, on the contrary, in the most cheerful 
frame of mind. 'They can't help liking me,' she thought; 'every one always 
does like me. And I'm so ready to do anything they please for them, so 
readily to love them— him for being his father, and her for being his sister— 
they can have no reason for not loving me!' 

They drove to the gloomy old house in Vosdvizhenka, and went into 
the vestibule. 

Natasha noticed that her father was in a nervous fidget as he asked 
timidly and softly whether the prince and the princess were at home. 
After their arrival had been announced, there was some perturbation 
visible among the prince's servants. The footman, who was running to 
announce them, was stopped by another footman in the big hall, and they 
whispered together. A maid-servant ran into the hall, and hurriedly said 
something, mentioning the princess. At last one old footman came out 
with a wrathful air, and announced to the Rostovs that the prince was not 
receiving, but the princess begged them to walk up. 

The first person to meet the visitors was Mademoiselle Bourienne. She 
greeted the father and daughter with marked courtesy, and conducted 
them to the princess's apartment. The princess, with a frightened and 
agitated face, flushed in patches, ran in, treading heavily, to meet her 
visitors, doing her best to seem cordial and at ease. From the first glance 
Princess Marva disliked Natasha. She thought her too fashionably dressed, 



WAR AND PEACE 255 

too frivolously gay and vain. Princess Marya had no idea that before she 
had seen her future sister-in-law she had been unfavourably disposed to 
her, through unconscious envy of her beauty, her youth, and her happiness, 
and through jealousy of her brother's love for her. 

Apart from this insuperable feeling of antipathy, Princess Marya was 
at that moment agitated by the fact that on the Rostovs having been 
announced the old prince had shouted that he didn't want to see them, 
that Princess Marya could see them if she chose, but they were not to be 
allowed in to see him. Princess Marya resolved to see the Rostovs, but 
she was every instant in dread of some freak on the part of the old 
prince, as he had appeared greatly excited by the arrival of the Rostovs. 

'Well, here I have brought you my songstress, princess,' said the count, 
bowing and scraping, while he looked round uneasily as though he were 
afraid the old prince might come in. 'How glad I am that you should 
make friends. . . . Sorry, very sorry, the prince is still unwell'; and 
uttering a few more stock phrases, he got up. 'If you'll allow me, princess, 
to leave you my Natasha for a quarter of an hour, I will drive round- 
only a few steps from here— to Dogs' Square to see Anna Semyonovna, 
and then come back for her.' 

Count Ilya Andreivitch bethought himself of this diplomatic stratagem 
to give the future sisters-in-law greater freedom to express their feelings 
to one another (so he told his daughter afterwards), but also to avoid the 
possibility of meeting the prince, of whom he was afraid. He did not tell 
his daughter this; but Natasha perceived this dread and uneasiness of her 
father's, and felt mortified by it. She blushed for her father, felt still 
angrier at having blushed, and glanced at the princess with a bold, challeng- 
ing air, meant to express that she was not afraid of any one. The princess 
told the count that she would be delighted, and only begged him to stay a 
little longer at Anna Semyonovna's, and Ilya Andreivitch departed. 

In spite of the uneasy glances flung at her by Princess Marya, who wanted 
to talk to Natasha by herself, Mademoiselle Bourienne would not leave the 
room, and persisted in keeping up a conversation about Moscow entertain- 
ments and theatres. Natasha felt offended by the delay in the entry, by her 
father's nervousness, and by the constrained manner of the princess, who 
seemed to her to be making a favour of receiving her. And then everything 
displeased her. She did not like Princess Marya. She seemed to her very 
ugly, affected, and frigid. Natasha suddenly, as it were, shrank into herself, 
and unconsciously assumed a nonchalant air, which repelled Princess Marya 
more and more. After five minutes of irksome and constrained conversation, 
they heard the sound of slippered feet approaching rapidly. Princess Marya's 
face expressed terror: the door of the room opened, and the prince came in, 
in a white night-cap and dressing-gown. 

'Ah, madam,' he began, 'madam, countess. . . . Countess Rostov ... if 
I'm not mistaken ... I beg you to excuse me, to excuse me ... I didn't 
know, madam. As God's above, I didn't know that you were deigning to 
visit us, and came in to my daughter in this costume. I beg you to excuse 



256 WAR AND PEACE 

me ... as God's above, I didn't know,' he repeated so unnaturally, with 
emphasis on the word 'God,' and so unpleasantly, that Princess Marya rose 
to her feet with her eyes on the ground, not daring to look either at her 
father or at Natasha. Natasha, getting up and curtseying, did not know 
either what she was to do. Only Mademoiselle Bourienne smiled agreeably. 

'I beg you to excuse me, I beg you to excuse me! As God's above, I 
didn't know,' muttered the old man, and looking Natasha over from head 
to foot, he went out. 

Mademoiselle Bourienne was the first to recover herself after this appari- 
tion, and began talking about the prince's ill-health. Natasha and Princess 
Marya gazed dumbly at one another, and the longer they gazed dumbly at 
one another without saying what they wanted to say, the more unfavour- 
ably each felt disposed to the other. 

When the count returned, Natasha showed a discourteous relief at seeing 
him, and made haste to get away. At that moment she almost hated that 
stiff, oldish princess, who could put her in such an awkward position, and 
spend half an hour with her without saying a word about Prince Andrey. 
'I couldn't be the first to speak of him before that Frenchwoman,' thought 
Natasha. Princess Marya meanwhile was tortured by the very same feeling. 

She knew what she had to say to Natasha, but she could not do it, both 
because Mademoiselle Bourienne prevented her, and because— she did not 
know herself why— it was difficult for her to begin to speak of the marriage. 
The count was already going out of the room when Princess Marya moved 
rapidly up to Natasha, took her hand, and, with a heavy sigh, said: 'Wait a 
moment, I want . . .' Natasha's expression as she looked at Princess Marya 
was ironical, though she did not know why. 

'Dear Natalie,' said Princess Marya, 'do believe how glad I am that my 
brother has found such happiness . . .' She paused, feeling she was telling 
a lie. Natasha noticed the pause, and guessed the reason of it. 

'What have I said, what have I done?' she thought as soon as she had 
gone out of the room. 

They had to wait a long while for Natasha to come to dinner with red 
eyes. Marya Dmitryevna, who had heard how the old prince had received 
the Rostovs, pretended not to notice, and kept up a loud, jesting conversa- 
tion at table with the count and the other guests. 

That evening the Rostovs went to the opera, for which Marya Dmitryevna 
had obtained them a box. 

Natasha had no wish to go, but it was impossible to refuse after Marya 
Dmitryevna's kindness, especially as it had been arranged expressly for her. 
When she was dressed and waiting for her father in the big hall, she looked 
at herself in the big looking-glass, and saw that she was looking pretty, very 
pretty. She felt even sadder, but it was a sweet and tender sadness. 

The two strikingly pretty girls, Natasha and Sonya, with Count Ilya 
Andreivitch, who had not been seen for a long while in Moscow, attracted 



WAR AND PEACE 257 

general attention. Moreover, every one had heard vaguely of Natasha's 
engagement to Prince Andrey, knew that the Rostovs had been living in 
the country ever since, and looked with curiosity at the girl who was to 
make one of the best matches in Russia. 

A tall, handsome woman with a mass of hair and very naked, plump, 
white arms and shoulders, and a double row of big pearls round her throat, 
walked into the next box, and was a long while settling into her place and 
rustling her thick silk gown. 

Natasha unconsciously examined that neck and the shoulders, the pearls, 
the coiffure of this lady, and admired the beauty of the shoulders and the 
pearls. While Natasha was scrutinising her a second time, the lady looked 
round, and meeting the eyes of Count Ilya Andreivitch, she nodded and 
smiled to him. It was the Countess Bezuhov, Pierre's wife. The count, who 
knew every one in society, bent over and entered into conversation with 
her. 

'Have you been here long?' he began. 'I'm coming; I'm coming to kiss 
your hand. I have come to town on business and brought my girls with me. 
They say Semyonovna's acting is superb,' the count went on. 'Count Pyotr 
Kiriliovitch never forgot us. Is he here?' 

'Yes, he meant to come,' said Ellen, looking intently at Natasha. 

Count Ilya Andreivitch sat down again in his place. 

'Handsome, isn't she?' he whispered to Natasha. 

'Exquisite!' said Natasha. 

At that moment they heard the last chords of the overture, and the tap- 
ping of the conductor's stick. Late comers hurried to their seats in the stalls. 

As soon as the curtain rose, a hush fell and all the men, old and young, 
in their frock coats or uniforms, all the women with precious stones on their 
bare flesh concentrated all their attention with eager curiosity on the stage. 

The stage consisted of a boarded floor in the middle, with painted card- 
board representing trees at the sides, and linen stretched over the boards 
at the back. In the middle of the stage there were sitting maidens in red 
bodices and white skirts. An excessively stout woman in a white silk dress 
was sitting apart on a low bench with green cardboard fixed on the back of 
it. They were all singing something. When they had finished their song, the 
woman in white moved towards the prompter's box, and a man, with his 
stout legs encased in silk tights, with a plume and a dagger, went up to her 
and began singing and waving his arms. 

The man in the tights sang alone, then she sang alone. Then both paused, 
while the music played, and the man fumbled with the hand of the woman 
in white, obviously waiting for the bar at which he was to begin singing 
with her. They sang a duet, and every one in the theatre began clapping 
and shouting, while the man and woman on the stage, supposed to represent 
lovers, began bowing with smiles and gesticulations. 

After the country, and in her serious mood, Natasha felt it all grotesque 
and extraordinary. She could not follow the opera; she could not even listen 



258 WAR AND PEACE 

to the music: she saw nothing but painted cardboard and strangely dressed- 
up men and women, talking, singing, and moving strangely about in the 
bright light. 

At a moment when there was a lull on the stage before the beginning of 
a song, the door opening to the stalls creaked on the side nearest the Ros- 
tovs' box, and there was the sound of a man's footsteps. Countess Bezuhov 
turned smiling to the new-comer. Natasha saw an exceedingly handsome 
adjutant coming towards their box with a confident, but yet courteous, 
bearing. It was Anatole Kuragin, whom she had seen long before, and no- 
ticed at the Petersburg ball. He walked with a jaunty strut, which would 
have been ridiculous if he had not been so handsome, and if his good- 
looking face had not expressed such simple-hearted satisfaction and good 
spirits. Although the performance was going on he walked lightly, without 
haste, along the carpeted corridor, holding his scented, handsome head high, 
and accompanied by a 'slight clank of spurs and sword. Glancing at Natasha, 
he went up to his sister, laid his hand in a close-fitting glove on the edge of 
her box, nodded his head at her, and, bending down, asked her a question, 
with a motion towards Natasha. 

'Very, very charming!' he said, obviously speaking of Natasha. She did 
not exactly hear the words, but divined them from the movement of his lips. 

'How like the brother is to his sister!' said the count. 'And how handsome 
they both are!' 

The first act was over; every one stood up in the stalls, changed places, 
and began going out and coming in. Ellen's box was filled and surrounded 
on the side of the stalls by the most distinguished and intellectual men, who 
seemed vying with one another in their desire to show every one that they 
knew her. 

All throughout that entr'acte Kuragin stood in front of the footlights 
staring at the Rostovs' box. Natasha knew he was talking about her, and 
that afforded her satisfaction. She even turned so that he could see her pro- 
file from what she believed to be the most becoming angle. Before the 
beginning of the second act she observed in the stalls the figure of Pierre, 
whom the Rostovs had not seen since their arrival. His face looked sad, and 
he had grown stouter since Natasha had seen him last. He walked up to 
the front rows, not noticing any one. Anatole went up to him, and began 
saying something to him, with a look and a gesture towards the Rostovs' 
box. Pierre looked pleased at seeing Natasha, and walked hurriedly along 
the rows of stalls towards their box. Leaning on his elbow, he talked smil- 
ingly to Natasha for a long while. While she was talking to Pierre, Natasha 
heard a man's voice speaking in Countess Bezuhov's box, and something 
told her it was Kuragin. She looked round and met his eyes. He looked her 
straight in the eyes, almost smiling, with a look of such warmth and ad- 
miration that it seemed strange to be so near him, to look at him like that, 
to be so certain that he admired her, and not to be acquainted with him. 

In the second act there was scenery representing monuments, and a hole 
in the drop at the back that represented the moon, and shades were put over 



WAR AND PEACE 259 

the footlights, and trumpets and bassoons began playing, and a number of 
people came in on the right and on the left wearing black cloaks. These 
people began waving their arms, and in their hands they had something of 
the nature of a dagger. Then some more people ran in and began dragging 
away the woman who had been in white but who was now in a blue dress. 
They did not drag her away at once; they spent a long while singing with 
her; but finally they did drag her away, and behind the scenes they struck 
something metallic three times, and then all knelt down and began singing 
a prayer. All these performances were interrupted several times by the 
enthusiastic shouts of the spectators. 

During that act, every time Natasha glanced towards the stalls, she saw 
Anatole Kuragin, with one arm flung across the back of his chair, staring 
at her. It pleased her to see that he was so captivated by her, and it never 
entered her head that there could be anything amiss in it. 

When the second act was over, Countess Bezuhov got up, turned towards 
the Rostovs' box, with her gloved little finger beckoned the old count to 
her, and taking no notice of the men who were thronging about her box, 
began with an amiable smile talking to him. 

'Oh, do make me acquainted with your charming daughters,' she said. 
'All the town is singing their praises, and I don't know them.' 

Natasha got up and curtseyed to the magnificent countess. Natasha was 
so delighted at the praise from this brilliant beauty that she blushed with 
pleasure. 

'I quite want to become a Moscow resident myself,' said Ellen. 'What a 
shame of you to bury such pearls in the country!' 

Countess Bezuhov had some right to her reputation of being a fascinating 
woman. She could say what she did not think, especially what was flattering, 
with perfect simplicity and naturalness. 

'No, dear count, you must let me help to entertain your daughters, though 
I'm not here now for very long, nor you either. But I'll do my best to amuse 
them. I have heard a great deal about you in Petersburg, and wanted to 
know you,' she said to Natasha, with her unvarying beautiful smile. 'I have 
heard of you, too, from my page, Drub etskoy— you have heard he is to be 
married— and from my husband's friend, Bolkonsky, Prince Andrey Bolkon- 
sky,' she said, with peculiar emphasis, by which she meant to signify that 
she knew in what relation he stood to Natasha. She asked that one of the 
young ladies might be allowed to sit through the rest of the performance in 
her box that they might become better acquainted, and Natasha moved into 
it. 

In the third act the scene was a palace in which a great many candles were 
burning, and pictures were hanging on the walls, representing knights with 
beards. In the middle stood a man and a woman, probably meant for a 
king and a queen. The king waved his right hand, and, obviously nervous, 
sang something very badly, and sat down on a crimson throne. The actress, 
who had been in white at first and then in blue, was now in nothing but a 
smock, and had let her hair down. She was standing near the throne, singing 



.60 WAR AND PEACE 

something very mournful, addressed to the queen. Then men and women 
with bare legs danced; then again the king shouted something to music, 
and they all began singing, and the curtain dropped. Again a fearful uproar 
of applause arose among the spectators. 

Natasha did not now feel this strange. She looked about her with pleasure, 
smiling joyfully. 

In the entr'acte there was a current of chill air in Ellen's box, the door 
was opened, and Anatole walked in, bending and trying not to brush against 
any one. 

'Allow me to introduce my brother,' said Ellen, her eyes shifting uneasily 
from Natasha to Anatole. Natasha turned her pretty little head towards the 
handsome adjutant and smiled over her bare shoulder. Anatole, who was 
as handsome on a closer view as he was from a distance, sat down beside 
her, and said he had long wished to have this pleasure, ever since the Narish- 
kins' ball, at which he had had the pleasure he had not forgotten of seeing 
her. Kuragin was far more sensible and straightforward with women than 
he was in men's society. He talked boldly and simply, and Natasha was 
strangely and agreeably impressed by finding nothing so formidable in this 
man, of whom such stories were told, but, on the contrary, seeing on his 
face the most innocent, merry and simple-hearted smile. 

Kuragin asked her what she thought of the performance, and told her 
that at the last performance Semyonovna had fallen down while she was 
acting. 

'And do you know, countess,' said he, suddenly addressing her as though 
she were an old friend, 'we are getting up a costume ball; you ought to take 
part in it; it will be great fun. Please, do come, really now, eh?' 

As he said this he never took his smiling eyes off the face, the neck, the 
bare arms of Natasha. Natasha knew beyond all doubt that he was fas- 
cinated by her. When she was not looking at him she felt that he was 
looking at her shoulders, and she could not help trying to catch his eyes that 
he might rather look in her face. But as she looked into his eyes, she felt 
with horror that, between him and her, there was not that barrier of 
modest reserve she had always been conscious of between herself and other 
men. In five minutes she felt— she did not know how— that she had come 
fearfully close to this man. When she turned away, she felt afraid he might 
take her from behind by her bare arm and kiss her on the neck. 

Natasha looked round at Ellen and at her father, as though to ask them 
what was the meaning of it. But Ellen was absorbed in talking to a general 
and did not respond to her glance, and her father's eye said nothing to 
her but what they always said: 'Enjoying yourself? Well, I'm glad then.' 

In one of the moments of awkward silence, during which Anatole gazed 
calmly and persistently at her, Natasha, to break the silence, asked him how 
he liked Moscow. She was feeling all the while that there she was doing 
something improper in talking to him. Anatole smiled as though to encour- 
age her. 

'At first I didn't like it much, for what is it makes one like a town? It's 



WAR AND PEACE 261 

the pretty women, isn't it? Well, but now I like it awfully,' he said, with 
a meaning look at her. 'You'll come to the fancy dress ball, countess? Do 
come,' he said, and putting his hand out to her bouquet he said, dropping 
his voice, 'You will be the prettiest. Come, dear countess, and as a pledge 
give me this flower.' 

Natasha did not understand what he was saying, but she felt that in his 
uncomprehended words there was some improper intention. She turned 
away as though she had not heard what he said. But as soon as she turned 
away she felt that he was here behind her, so close to her. 

'What is he feeling now? Is he confused? Is he angry? Must I set it 
right?' she wondered. She could not refrain from looking round. She 
glanced straight into his eyes, and his nearness and confidence, and the 
simple-hearted warmth of his smile vanquished her. She smiled exactly as 
he did, looking straight into his eyes. And again, she felt with horror that no 
barrier lay between him and her. 

The curtain rose again. Anatole walked out of the box, serene and good- 
humoured. Natasha went back to her father's box, completely under the 
spell of the world in which she found herself. All that passed before her 
eyes now seemed to her perfectly natural. But on the other hand all previ- 
ous thoughts of her betrothed, of Princess Marya, of her life in the country, 
did not once recur to her mind, as though all that belonged to the remote 
past. 

In the fourth act there was some sort of devil who sang, waving his arms 
till the boards were moved away under him and he sank into the opening. 
That was all Natasha saw of the fourth act. As they came out of the theatre 
Anatole came up to them, called their carriage and helped them into it. 
As he assisted Natasha he pressed her arm above the elbow. He gazed at her 
with flashing eyes and a tender smile. 

It was only on getting home that Natasha could form any clear idea of 
what had happened. Ail at once, remembering Prince Andrey, she was 
horrified. 

'Am I spoilt for Prince Andrey's love or not?' she asked herself, and with 
reassuring mockery she answered herself: 'What a fool I am to ask such a 
thing! What has happened to me? Nothing. I have done nothing; I did 
nothing to lead him on. No one will ever know, and I shall never see him 
again,' she told herself. 

Anatole kuragin was staying in Moscow because his father had sent him 
away from Petersburg, where he had been spending twenty thousand a 
year in hard cash and running up bills for as much more. The father in- 
formed his son that for the last time he would pay half his debts; but only 
on condition that he would go away to Moscow, and try finally to make a 
good match there. He suggested to him either Princess Marya or Julie 
Karagin. 
Anatole consented, and went away to Moscow, where he stayed with 



262 WAR AND PEACE 

Pierre. Pierre at first was by no means pleased to receive Anatole, but after 
a while he got used to his presence; sometimes accompanied him on his 
carousals, and by way of loans gave him money. 

There were rumours of several intrigues with Moscow ladies, and at 
balls Anatole flirted with a few of them. But he fought shy of unmarried 
ladies, especially the wealthy heiresses, who were most of them plain. He 
had a good reason for this, of which no one knew but his most intimate 
friends: he had been for the last two years married. While his regiment had 
been stationed in Poland, a Polish landowner, by no means well-to-do, had 
forced Anatole to marry his daughter. Anatole had very shortly afterwards 
abandoned his wife, and in consideration of a sum of money, which he 
agreed to send his father-in-law, he was allowed by the latter to pass as a 
bachelor unmolested. 

Anatole was very well satisfied with his position, with himself, and with 
other people. He was instinctively and thoroughly convinced that he could 
not possibly live except just in the way he did live, and that he had never 
in his life done anything base. He was incapable of considering either how 
his actions might be judged by others, or what might be the result of this 
or that action on his part. What he loved was dissipation and women; and 
as, according to his ideas, there was nothing dishonourable in these tastes, 
and as he was incapable of considering the effect on others of the gratifica- 
tion of his tastes, he believed himself in his heart to be an irreproachable 
man, felt a genuine contempt for scoundrels and mean persons, and with 
an untroubled conscience held his head high. Rakes, those masculine Mag- 
dalens, have a secret feeling of their own guiltlessness, just as have women 
Magdalens, founded on the same hope of forgiveness. 'All will be forgiven 
her, because she loved much; and all will be forgiven him, because he has 
enjoyed himself much.' 

Dolohov had that year reappeared in Moscow after his exile and his 
Persian adventures. He spent his time in luxury, gambling, and dissipation; 
renewed his friendship with his old Petersburg comrade Kuragin, and made 
use of him for his own objects. Anatole sincerely liked Dolohov for his 
cleverness and daring. 

Natasha had made a great impression on Kuragin. At supper, after the 
theatre, he analysed to Dolohov, with the manner of a connoisseur, the 
points of her arms, her shoulders, her foot, and her hair, and announced his 
intention of getting up a flirtation with her. What might come of such a 
flirtation Anatole was incapable of considering, and had no notion, as he 
never had a notion of what would come of any of his actions. 

'She's pretty, my lad, but she's not for us,' Dolohov said to him. 

'I'll tell my sister to ask her to dinner,' said Anatole. 'Eh?' 

'You'd better wait till she's married. . . .' 

'You know I adore little girls,' said Anatole; 'they're all confusion in a 
minute.' 

'You've come to grief once already over a "little girl," ' said Dolohov, who 
knew of Anatole's marriage. 'Beware!' 



WAR AND PEACE 263 

'Well, one can't do it twice! Eh?' said Anatole, laughing good-hum- 
ouredly. 

The next day Marya Dmitryevna had a discussion with Natasha's father, 
which she kept secret from her. Natasha guessed they were talking of the old 
prince and making some plan, and she felt worried and humiliated by it. 
Every minute she expected Prince Andrey, and twice that day she sent a 
man to Vosdvizhenka to inquire whether he had not arrived. He had not 
arrived. She felt more dreary now than during the first days in Moscow. 
To her impatience and pining for him there were now added the unpleas- 
ant recollections of her interview with Princess Marya and the old prince, 
and a vague dread and restlessness, of which she did not know the cause. 

On Sunday Marya Dmitryevna, dressed in her best shawl in which she 
paid calls, announced that she was going to call on Prince Nikolay Andrei- 
vitch Bolkonsky to ask for an explanation of his conduct about Natasha. 
After Marya Dmitryevna had gone, a dressmaker waited upon the Rostovs 
from Madame Chalmey, and Natasha, very glad of a diversion, went into a 
room adjoining the drawing-room, and shutting the door between, began 
trying on her new dresses. Just as she had put on a bodice basted together, 
with the sleeves not yet tacked in, and was turning her head to look at the 
fit of the back in the looking-glass, she caught the sound of her father's 
voice in the drawing-room in eager conversation with another voice, a 
woman's voice, which made her flush red. It was the voice of Ellen. Before 
Natasha had time to take off the bodice she was trying on, the door opened, 
and Countess Bezuhov walked into the room, wearing a dark heliotrope 
velvet gown with a high collar, and beaming with a good-natured and 
friendly smile. 

'Oh my enchantress!' she said to the blushing Natasha. 'Charming! No, 
this is really beyond anything, count,' she said to Count Uya Andreivitch, 
who had followed her in. 'How can you be in Moscow, and go nowhere? 
No, I won't let you off! This evening we have Mademoiselle George giving 
a recitation, and a few people are coming; and if you don't bring your 
lovely girls, who are much prettier than Mademoiselle George, I give up 
knowing you! My husband's not here, he has gone away to Tver, or I 
should have sent him for you. You must come, you positively must, before 
nine o'clock.' 

She nodded to the dressmaker, who knew her, and was curtseying 
respectfully, and seated herself in a low chair beside the looking-glass, drap- 
ing the folds of her velvet gown picturesquely about her. She kept up a flow 
of good-humoured and light-hearted chatter, and repeatedly expressed her 
enthusiastic admiration of Natasha's beauty. She looked through her dresses 
and admired them, spoke with admiration, too, of a new dress of her own 
'of metallic gas,' which she had received from Paris, and advised Natasha 
to have one like it. 

'But anything suits you, my charmer!' she declared. The smile of pleasure 
never left Natasha's face. She felt happy, and as it were blossoming out 



264 WAR AND PEACE 

under the praises of this charming Countess Bezuhov, who had seemed to her 
before a lady so unapproachable and dignified, and was now being so kind 
to her. Natasha's spirits rose, and she felt almost in love with this handsome 
and good-natured woman. Ellen, for her part, was genuine in her admira- 
tion of Natasha, and in her desire to make her enjoy herself. Anatole had 
begged her to throw him with Natasha, and it was with that object she had 
come to the Rostovs'. The idea of throwing her brother and Natasha to- 
gether amused her. 

As she was leaving, she drew her protegee aside. 

'My brother was dining with me yesterday— we half died with laughing 
at him— he won't eat, and does nothing but sigh for you, my charmer! He is 
madly, madly in love with you, my dear.' 

Natasha flushed crimson on hearing those words. 

'How she blushes, how she blushes, my pretty!' Ellen went on. 'You 
must be sure to come. If you do love some one, it is not a reason to cloister 
yourself. Even if you are betrothed, I am sure your betrothed would have 
preferred you to go into society rather than to languish in ennui.' 

'So then she knows I am engaged. So then they with her husband, with 
Pierre, with that good Pierre, talked and laughed about it. So that it means 
nothing.' 

And again under Ellen's influence what had struck her before as terrible 
seemed to her simple and natural. 'And she, such a grcmde da?7ie, is so kind, 
and obviously she likes me with all her heart,' thought Natasha. 'And why 
not enjoy myself,' thought Natasha, gazing at Ellen with wide-open, wan- 
dering eyes. 

Marya Dmitryevna came back to dinner silent and serious, having evi- 
dently been defeated by the old prince. She was too much agitated by the 
conflict she had been through to be able to describe the interview. To the 
count's inquiries, she replied that everything had been all right and she 
would tell him about it next day. On hearing of the visit of Countess Bezu- 
hov and the invitation for the evening, Marya Dmitryevna said: 

'I don't care to associate with Countess Bezuhov and I don't advise you to, 
but still, since you have promised, better go. It will divert your mind,' she 
added, addressing Natasha. 

Count Ilya Andreivitch took his two girls to the Countess Bezuhov's. 
There were a good many people assembled there, but Natasha hardly knew 
any of the persons present. Count Ilya Andreivitch observed with dis- 
satisfaction that almost all the company consisted of men or of ladies no- 
torious for the freedom of their behaviour. 

Anatole was at the door, unmistakably on the look-out for the Rostovs. 
At once greeting the count, he went up to Natasha and followed her in. 
As soon as Natasha saw him, the same feeling came upon her as at the 
theatre— the feeling of gratified vanity at his admiration of her, and terror 
at the absence of any moral barrier between them. 

Ellen gave Natasha a delighted welcome, and was loud in her admiration 
of her loveliness and her dress. In the drawing-room chairs were being set 



WAR AND PEACE 265 

in rows and people began to sit down. Anatole moved a chair for Natasha, 
and would have sat down by her, but the count, who was keeping his eye 
on Natasha, took the seat beside her. Anatole sat down behind. 

After the first monologue all the company rose and surrounded Made- 
moiselle George, expressing their admiration. 

'How handsome she is!' said Natasha to her father, as he got up with the 
rest and moved through the crowd to the actress. 

'I don't think so, looking at you,' said Anatole, following Natasha. He 
said this at a moment when no one but she could hear him. 'You are 
charming . . . from the moment I first saw you, I have not ceased . . .' 

'Come along, come along, Natasha!' said the count, turning back for his 
daughter. 

After several recitations in different styles, Mademoiselle George went 
away, and Countess Bezuhov invited all the company to the great hall. 
The count would have taken leave, but Ellen besought him not to spoil her 
improvised ball. The Rostovs stayed on. Anatole asked Natasha for a waltz, 
and during the waltz, squeezing her waist and her hand, he told her she was 
bewitching and that he loved her. During the ecossaise, Anatole simply 
looked at her. Natasha was in doubt whether she had not dreamed what he 
said to her during the waltz. At the end of the first figure he pressed her 
hand again. Natasha lifted her frightened eyes to his face, but there was an 
expression of such assurance and warmth in his fond look and smile that 
she could not as she looked at him say what she had to say to him. She 
dropped her eyes. 

'Don't say such things to me. I am betrothed, and I love another man 
. . .' Anatole was neither disconcerted nor mortified at what she had said. 

'Don't talk to me of that,' he said; 'I tell you I am mad, mad with love of 
you. Is it my fault that you are fascinating? . . .' 

Wherever she was, and with whomsoever she was speaking, she felt his 
eyes upon her. Ellen talked to her, laughing, of her brother's passion, and 
in the little divan-room Ellen somehow vanished, they were left alone, and 
Anatole, taking her by the hand, had said in a tender voice: 

'I can't come to see you, but is it possible that I shall never see you? 
Natalie?' his voice whispered, and her hands were squeezed till it hurt. 
'Natalie?' 

Burning lips were pressed to her lips, and at the same instant she felt her- 
self set free again, and caught the sound of Ellen's steps and rustling gown 
in the room again. 

'One word, just one word, for God's sake,' Anatole kept repeating, plainly 
not knowing what to say, and he repeated it till Ellen reached them. 

Ellen went back with Natasha to the drawing-room. The Rostovs went 
away without staying to supper. 

When she got home, Natasha did not sleep all night. She was tortured by 
the insoluble question, Which did she love, Anatole or Prince Andrey? 
Prince Andrey, she did love— she remembered clearly how great her love 
was for him. But she loved Anatole too, of that there was no doubt. 'Else 



266 WAR AND PEACE 

could all that have happened?' she thought. 'If after that I could answer 
with a smile to his smile at parting, if I could sink to that, it means that I 
fell in love with him from the first minute. So he must be kind, noble, and 
good, and I could not help loving him. What am I to do, if I love him and 
the other too?' she said to herself, and was unable to find an answer to 
those terrible questions. 

The morning came with daily cares and bustle. Everyone got up and 
began to move about and to talk; dressmakers came again; again Marya 
Dmitryevna went out and they were summoned to tea. Natasha kept un- 
easily looking round at every one with wide-open eyes, as though she 
wanted to intercept every glance turned upon her. She did her utmost to 
seem exactly as usual. 

After luncheon— it was always her best time— Marya Dmitryevna seated 
herself in her own arm-chair and drew Natasha and the old count to her. 

'Well, my friends, I have thought the whole matter over now, and I'll 
tell you my advice,' she began. 'Yesterday, as you know, I was at Prince 
Bolkonsky's; well, I had a talk with him . . . He thought fit to scream at 
me. But there's no screaming me down! I had it all out with him.' 

'Well, but what does he mean?' asked the count. 

'He's crazy ... he won't hear of it, and there's no more to be said. As 
it is we have given this poor girl worry enough,' said Marya Dmitryevna. 
'And my advice to you is, to make an end of it and go home to Otradnoe 
. . . and there to wait.' 

'Oh no!' cried Natasha. 

'Yes, to go home,' said Marya Dmitryevna, 'and to wait there. If your 
betrothed comes here now, there'll be no escaping a quarrel; but alone here 
he'll have it ail out with the old man, and then come on to you.' 

Count Ilya Andreivitch approved of this suggestion, and at once saw all 
the sound sense of it. If the old man were to come round, then it would be 
better to visit him at Moscow or Bleak Hills, later on; if not, then the wed- 
ding, against his will, could only take place at Otradnoe. 

'And that's perfectly true,' said he. 'I regret indeed that I ever went to 
see him and took her too,' said the count. 

'No, why regret it? Being here, you could do no less than show him 
respect. If he wouldn't receive it, that's his affair,' said Marya Dmitryevna, 
searching for something in her reticule. 'And now the trousseau's readv, 
what have you to wait for? What is not ready, I'll send after you. Though 
I'm sorry to lose you, still the best thing is for you to go, and God be with 
you.' Finding what she was looking for in her reticule, she handed it to 
Natasha. It was a letter from Princess Marya. 'She writes to you. How 
worried she is, poor thing! She is afraid you might think she does not like 
you.' 

'Well, she doesn't like me,' said Natasha. 

'Nonsense, don't say so,' cried Marya Dmitryevna. 

'I won't take any one's word for that, I know she doesn't like me,' said 
Natasha boldly as she took the letter, and there was a look of cold ant 



WAR AND PEACE 267 

angry resolution in her face, that made Marya Dmitryevna look at her 
more closely and frown. 

'Don't you answer me like that, my good girl,' she said. 'If I say so, it's 
the truth. Write an answer to her.' 

Natasha made no reply, and went to her own room to read Princess 
Marya's letter. 

Princess Marya wrote that she was in despair at the misunderstanding 
that had arisen between them. Whatever her father's feelings might be, 
wrote Princess Marya, she begged Natasha to believe that she could not 
fail to love her, as the girl chosen by her brother, for whose happiness she 
was ready to make any sacrifice. 

'Do not believe, though,' she wrote, 'that my father is ill-disposed to you. 
He is an old man and an invalid, for whom one must make excuses. But he 
is good-hearted and generous, and will come to love the woman who makes 
his son happy.' Princess Marya begged Natasha, too, to fix a time when she 
might see her again. 

After reading the letter, Natasha sat down to the writing-table to answer 
it. 'Dear princess,' she began, writing rapidly and mechanically in French, 
and there she stopped. What more could she write after what had happened 
the day before? 

'Can everything be over?' she thought. 'Can all this have happened so 
quickly and have destroyed all that went before?' She recalled in all its 
past strength her love for Prince Andrey, pictured herself the wife of 
Prince Andrey, and at the same time, all aglow with emotion, she recalled 
every detail of her interview the previous evening with Anatole. 

'Why could not that be as well?' she wondered sometimes in complete 
bewilderment. 'It's only so that I could be perfectly happy: as it is, I have 
to choose, and without either of them I can't be happy. There's one thing,' 
she thought, 'to tell Prince Andrey what has happened; to hide it from 
him— are equally impossible. But with hi?n nothing is spoilt.' 

'Madame,' whispered a maid, coming into the room with a mysterious air, 
'a man told me to give you this.' The girl gave her a letter. 'Only for 
Christ's sake . . .' said the girl, as Natasha, without thinking, mechanically 
broke the seal and began reading a love-letter from Anatole. 

With trembling hands Natasha held that passionate letter, composed for 
Anatole by Dolohov, and as she read it, she found in it echoes of all that 
it seemed to her she was feeling herself. 

'Since yesterday evening my fate is sealed: to be loved by you or to die. 
There is nothing else left for me,' the letter began. Then he wrote that he 
knew her relations would never give her to him, to Anatole; that there 
were secret reasons for that which he could only reveal to her alone; but 
that if she loved him, she had but to utter the word Yes, and no human 
force could hinder their happiness. Love would conquer all. He could cap- 
ture her and bear her away to the ends of the earth. 

'Yes, yes, I love him!' thought Natasha, reading the letter over for the 
twentieth time, and finding some special deep meaning in every word. 



268 . WAR AND PEACE 

That evening Marya Dmitryevna was going to the Arharovs', and pro- 
posed taking the young ladies with her. Natasha pleaded a headache and 
staved at home. 

On returning late in the evening, Sonya went into Natasha's room, and 
to her surprise found her not undressed asleep on the sofa. On the table 
near her Anatole's letter lay open. Sonya picked up the letter and began 
to read it. 

She looked at Natasha asleep, seeking in her face some explanation of 
what she had read and not finding it. Her face was quiet, gentle, and happy. 
Sonya, pale and shaking with horror and emotion, sat down in a low chair. 

'How was it I saw nothing? How can it have gone so far? Can she have 
ceased loving Prince Andrey? And how could she have let this Kuragin 
go as far as this? He's a deceiver and a villain, that's clear. What will Niko- 
lenka— dear, noble Nikolenka— do when he hears of it? But it's impossible 
that she can care for him! Most likely she opened the letter not knowing 
from whom it was. Most likely she feels insulted by it. She's not capable 
of doing such a thing!' 

'Natasha!' Sonya said, hardly audibly. 

Natasha waked up. 

'Ah, you have come back?' 

But noticing embarrassment in Sonya's face, her face too expressed em- 
barrassment and suspicion. 

'Sonya, you have read the letter?' she said. 

'Yes,' said Sonya softly. 

Natasha smiled ecstatically. 

'No, Sonya, I can't help it!' she said. 'I can't keep it secret from you any 
longer. You know we love each other!' 

Sonya gazed with wide-open eyes at Natasha, as though unable to believe 
her ears. 

'But Bolkonsky?' she said. 

Natasha looked with her big, wide eyes at Sonya as though not under- 
standing her question. 

''Are you breaking it off with Prince Andrey then?' said Sonya. 

'Oh, you don't understand; don't talk nonsense; listen,' said Natasha. 

'No, I can't believe it,' repeated Sonya. 'I don't understand it. What, for 
a whole year you have been loving one man, and all at once . . . Why, you 
have only seen him three times. In three days to forget everything . . .' 

'Three days,' Natasha said. 'It seems as though I had loved him for a 
hundred years. It seems to me that I have never loved any one before him. 
You can't understand that. Sonya, stay, sit here.' Natasha hugged her. 'I have 
been told of its happening, and no doubt you have heard of it too, but it's 
only now that I have felt such love. It's not what I have felt before. As soon 
as I saw him, I felt that he was my sovereign and I was his slave, and that I 
could not help loving him. Yes, his slave! Whatever he bids me, I shall do. 
You don't understand that. What am I to do? What am I to do, Sonya?' said 
Natasha, with a blissful and frightened face. 



WAR AND PEACE 269 

'But only think what you are doing,' said Sonya. 'I can't leave it like this. 
These secret letters . . . How could you let him go so far as that?' 

'I have told you,' answered Natasha, 'that I have no will. How is it you 
don't understand that? I love him!' 

'Then I can't let it go on like this. I shall tell about it,' cried Sonya. 

'What . . . for God's sake ... If you tell, you are my enemy,' said 
Natasha. 'You want to make me miserable, and you want us to be separated. 
For God's sake, Sonya, don't tell any one; don't torture me,' Natasha im- 
plored her. 

'But why this secrecy? Why doesn't he come to the house?' Sonya per- 
sisted. 'Why doesn't he ask for your hand straight out? Prince Andrey, you 
know, gave you complete liberty, if it really is so; but I can't believe in it. 
Natasha, have you thought what the secret reasons can be?' 

Natasha looked with wondering eyes at Sonya. Evidently it was the first 
time that question had presented itself to her, and she did not know how to 
answer it. 

'What the reasons are, I don't know. But there must be reasons!' 

Sonya sighed and shook her head distrustfully. 

'Sonya, you mustn't doubt of him; you mustn't, you mustn't! Do you 
understand?' she cried. 

'Does he love you?' 

'Does he love me?' repeated Natasha, with a smile of compassion for 
her friend's dulness of comprehension. 'Why, you have read his letter, 
haven't you? You've seen him.' 

'But if he is a dishonourable man?' 

'He! ... a dishonourable man? If only you knew!' said Natasha. 

'If he is an honourable man, he ought either to explain his intentions, or 
to give up seeing you; and if you won't do that, I will do it. I'll write to him. 
I'll tell papa,' said Sonya resolutely. 

'But I can't live without him!' cried Natasha. 

'Natasha, I don't understand you. And what are you saying? Think of 
your father, of Nikolenka.' 

'I don't care for any one, I don't love any one but him. How dare you 
say he's dishonourable! Don't you know that I love him?' cried Natasha. 
'Sonya, go away. I don't want to quarrel with you; go away, for God's sake, 
go away.' 

Natasha went to the table, and without a moment's reflection wrote that 
answer to Princess Marya, which she had been unable to write all the morn- 
ing. In her letter she told Princess Marya briefly that all misunderstandings 
between them were at an end, as taking advantage of the generosity of 
Prince Andrey, who had at parting given her full liberty, she begged her 
to forget everything and forgive her if she had been in fault in any way, but 
she could not be his wife. It all seemed to her so easy, so simple, and so clear 
at that moment. 

The Rostovs were to return to the country on Friday, but on Wednesday 
the count went with the intending purchaser to his estate near Moscow. 



270 WAR AND PEACE 

On the day the count left, Sonya and Natasha were invited to a big 
dinner-party at Julie Karagin's, and Marya Dmitryevna took them. At that 
dinner Natasha met Anatole again, and Sonya noticed that Natasha said 
something to him, trying not to be overheard, and was all through the 
dinner more excited than before. When they got home, Natasha was the 
first to enter upon the conversation with Sonya that her friend was 
expecting. 

'Well, Sonya, you said all sorts of silly things about him,' Natasha began 
in a meek voice, the voice in which children speak when they want to be 
praised for being good. 'I have had it all out with him to-day.' 

'Well, what did he say? Well? Come, what did he say? Natasha, I'm so 
glad you're not angry with me. Tell me everything, all the truth. What did 
he say?' 

Natasha sank into thought. 

'O Sonya, if you knew him as I do! He said . . . He asked me what 
promise I had given Bolkonsky. He was so glad that I was free to refuse 
him.' 

Sonya sighed dejectedly. 

'But you haven't refused Bolkonsky, have you? ' she said. 

'Oh, perhaps I have refused him! Perhaps it's all at an end with Bolkonsky. 
Why do you think so ill of me?' 

'I don't think anything, only I don't understand this. . . .' 

'Wait a little, Sonya, you will understand it all. You will see the sort of 
man he is. Don't think ill of me, or of him.' 

'I don't think ill of any one; I like every one and am sorry for every one. 
But what am I to do?' 

Sonya would not let herself be won over by the affectionate tone Natasha 
took with her. The softer and the more ingratiating Natasha's face became, 
the more serious and stern became the face of Sonya. 

'Natasha,' she said, 'you asked me not to speak to you, and I haven't 
spoken; now you have begun yourself. Natasha, I don't trust him. Why 
this secrecy?' 

'Again, again!' interrupted Natasha. 

'Natasha, I am afraid for you.' 

'What is there to be afraid of? ' 

'I am afraid you will be ruined,' said Sonya resolutely, herself horrified 
at what she was saying. 

Natasha's face expressed anger again. 

'Then I will be ruined, I will; I'll hasten to my ruin. It's not your business. 
It's not you, but I, will suffer for it. Leave me alone, leave me alone. I hate 
you!' 

'Natasha!' Sonya appealed to her in dismay. 

'I hate you, I hate you! And you're my enemy for ever!' 

Natasha ran out of the room. 

Hard as it Mas for Sonya, she kept watch over her friend and never let 
her out of her sight. 



WAR AND PEACE 271 

On the day before that fixed for the count's return, Sonya noticed that 
Natasha sat all the morning at the drawing-room window, as though ex- 
pecting something, and that she made a sign to an officer who passed by, 
whom Sonya took to be Anatole. 

Sonya began watching her friend even more attentively, and she noticed 
that all dinner-time and in the evening Natasha was unlike herself. She 
made irrelevant replies to questions asked her, began sentences and did not 
finish them, and laughed at everything. 

After tea Sonya saw the maid timidly waiting for her to pass at Natasha's 
door. She let her go in, and listening at the door, found out that another 
letter had been given her. And all at once it was clear to Sonya that Natasha 
had some dreadful plan for that evening. Sonya knocked at her door. Na- 
tasha would not let her in. 

'She is going to run away with him!' thought Sonya. 'She is capable of 
anything. She cried as she said good-bye to uncle,' Sonya remembered. 'Yes, 
it's certain, she's going to run away with him; but what am I to do? Write 
to Pierre, as Prince Andrey asked me to do in case of trouble? . . . But 
perhaps she really has refused Bolkonsky (she sent off a letter to Princess 
Marya yesterday). Uncle is not here.' 

To tell Marya Dmitryevna, who had such faith in Natasha, seemed to 
Sonya a fearful step to take. 

'But one way or another,' thought Sonya, standing in the dark corridor, 
'now or never the time has come for me to show that I am mindful of all the 
benefits I have received from their family and that I love Nikolay. No, if 
I have to go three nights together without sleep, I won't leave this corridor; 
and I will prevent her passing by force, and not let disgrace come upon 
their family.' 

Anatole had lately moved into Dolohov's quarters. The plan for the abduc- 
tion of Natasha Rostov had been prepared several days before by Dolohov, 
and on the day when Sonya had listened at Natasha's door and resolved to 
protect her, that plan was to be put into execution. Natasha had promised to 
come out at the back entrance at ten o'clock in the evening. Kuragin was 
to get her into a sledge that was to be all ready with three horses in it, and 
to drive her off sixty versts from Moscow to the village of Kamenka, where 
an unfrocked priest was in readiness to perform a marriage ceremony over 
them. At Kamenka a relay of horses was to be in readiness, which was to 
take them as far as the Warsaw road, and thence they were to hasten abroad 
by means of post-horses. 

Anatole had a passport and an order for post-horses and ten thousand 
roubles borrowed from his sister, and ten thousand more raised by the 
assistance of Dolohov. 

The two witnesses of the mock marriage ceremony— a petty official, a 
man of whom Dolohov made use at cards, and a retired hussar, a weak and 
good-natured man, whose devotion to Kuragin was unbounded— were sit- 
ting over their tea in the outer room. 



272 WAR AND PEACE 

In Dolohov's big study, decorated from the walls to the ceiling with 
Persian rugs, bearskins, and weapons, Dolohov was sitting in a travelling 
tunic and high boots in front of an open bureau on which lay accounts and 
bundles of bank notes. Anatole, in an unbuttoned uniform, was walking 
to and fro from the room where the witnesses were sitting through the 
study into a room behind, where his French valet with some other servants 
was packing up the last of his belongings. Dolohov was reckoning up money 
and noting down sums. 

'Well, here then, our accounts are finished,' said Dolohov, showing him 
the paper. 'That's all right?' 

'Yes, of course, it's all right,' said Anatole, evidently not attending to 
Dolohov, and looking straight before him with a smile that never left his 
face. 

Dolohov shut the bureau with a slam, and turned to Anatole with an 
ironical smile. 

'But I say, you drop it all; there's still time!' he said. 

'Idiot!' said Anatole. 

'You'd really better drop it,' said Dolohov. 'I'm speaking in earnest. I 
have helped you; but still I ought to tell you the truth: it's a dangerous 
business, and if you come to think of it, it's stupid. Come, you carry her 
off, well and good. Do you suppose they'll let it rest? It will come out that 
you are married. Why, they will have you up on a criminal charge, you 
know . . .' 

'You go to the devil!' said Anatole. 

'Well, your money will be gone, what then?' 

'What then? Eh?' repeated Anatole, with genuine perplexity at the 
thought of the future. 'What then? I don't know what then . . . Come, 
why talk nonsense?' He looked at his watch. 'It's time!' 

Anatole went into the back room. 'You're dawdling there,' he shouted 
at the servants. 

'Balaga is here,' Dolohov shouted to him from the other room. 

Balaga was a well-known driver, who had known Dolohov and Anatole 
for the last six years, and driven them in his three-horse sledges. More than 
once, when Anatole's regiment had been stationed at Tver, he had driven 
him out of Tver in the evening, reached Moscow by dawn, and driven him 
back the next night. More than once he had driven Dolohov safe away 
when he was being pursued. Many a time he had driven them about the 
town with gypsies and 'gay ladies,' as he called them. More than one horse 
had he ruined in driving them. More than once he had driven over people 
and upset vehicles in Moscow, and always his 'gentlemen,' as he called them, 
had got him out of trouble. Many a time had they beaten him, many a time 
made him drunk with champagne and madeira, a wine he loved, and more 
than one exploit he knew of each of them, which would long ago have sent 
any ordinary man to Siberia. 'Real gentlemen!' he thought. 

Anatole went out of the room, and a few minutes later he came back 
wearing a fur pelisse, girt with a silver belt, and a sable cap, jauntily stuck 



WAR AND PEACE 273 

on one side, and very becoming to his handsome face. Looking at himself 
in the looking-glass, and then standing before Dolohov in the same attitude 
he had taken before the looking-glass, he took a glass of wine. 

'Well, farewell; thanks for everything, and farewell,' said Anatole. 'Come, 
comrades, friends . . .'—he grew pensive— 'of my youth . . . farewell.' 

Although they were all going with him, Anatole wanted to make a 
touching and solemn ceremony of this address to his comrades. 

'All take glasses; you too, Balaga. Well, lads, friends of my youth, we 
have had jolly sprees together. Eh? Now, when shall we meet again? I'm 
going abroad! We've had a good time, and farewell, lads. Here's to our 
health! Hurrah! . . .' he said, tossing off his glass, and flinging it on the 
floor. 

'To your health!' said Balaga. 

'Start! start!' shouted Anatole. 

At the steps stood two three-horse sledges; Balaga took his seat in the 
foremost, and Anatole and Dolohov got in with him. 

'Ready, eh?' queried Balaga. 'Off!' he shouted. 

In Arbatsky Square the sledge came into collision with a carriage; there 
was a crash and snouts, and the sledge flew off along Arbaty. Turning twice 
along Podnovinsky, Balaga began to pull up, and turning back, stopped the 
horses at the Old Equerrys' crossing. 

Anatole and Dolohov walked along the pavement. On reaching the gates, 
Dolohov whistled. The whistle was answered, and a maid-servant ran out. 

'Come into the courtyard, or you'll be seen; she is coming in a minute,' 
she said. 

Dolohov stayed at the gate. Anatole followed the maid into the courtyard, 
turned a corner and ran up the steps. 

He was met by Gavrilo, Marya Dmitryevna's huge groom. 

'Walk this way to the mistress,' said the groom in his bass, blocking up 
the doorway. 

'What mistress? And who are you?' Anatole asked in a breathless whisper. 

'Walk in; my orders are to show you in.' 

'Kuragin! back!' shouted Dolohov. 'Treachery, back!' 

Dolohov, at the little back gate where he had stopped, was struggling with 
the porter, who was trying to shut the gate after Anatole as he ran in. With 
a desperate effort Dolohov shoved away the porter, and clutching at Ana- 
tole, pulled him through the gate, and ran back with him to the sledge. 

Marya Dmitryevna, coming upon Sonya weeping in the corridor, had 
forced her to confess everything. Marya Dmitryevna went in to Natasha, 
with the letter in her hand. 

'Vile girl, shameless hussy!' she said to her. 'I won't hear a word!' Pushing 
aside Natasha, who gazed at her with amazed but tearless eves, she locked 
her into the room, and giving orders to her gate porter to admit the persons 
who would be coming that evening, but not to allow them to pass out again, 
and giving her grooms orders to show those persons up to her, she seated 
herself in the drawing-room awaiting the abductors. 



274 WAR AND PEACE 

When Gavrilo came to announce to Marya Dmitryevna that the persons 
who had come had run away, she got up frowning, and clasping her hands 
behind her, walked a long while up and down through her rooms, ponder- 
ing what she was to do. At midnight she walked towards Natasha's room, 
feeling the key in her pocket. Sonya was sitting sobbing in the corridor. 
'Marya Dmitryevna, do, for God's sake, let me go in to her!' she said. 

Marya Dmitryevna, making her no reply, opened the door and went in. 
Natasha was lying on the sofa in exactly the same position in which Marya. 
Dmitryevna had left her. 

'You're a nice girl, a very nice girl!' said Marya Dmitryevna. 'Encour- 
aging meetings with lovers in my house! There's no use in humbugging. 
You listen when I speak to you.' Marya Dmitryevna touched her on the 
arm. 'You listen when I speak. You've disgraced yourself like the lowest 
wench. I don't know what I couldn't do to you, but I feel for your father. 
I will hide it from him.' 

Natasha did not change her position, only her whole body began to 
writhe with noiseless, convulsive sobs. Marya Dmitryevna looked round at 
Sonya, and sat down on the edge of the sofa beside Natasha. 

'It's lucky for him that he escaped me; but I'll get hold of him,' she said 
in her coarse voice. 'Do you hear what I say, eh?' She put her big hand 
under Natasha's face, and turned it towards her. Both Marya Dmitryevna 
and Sonya were surprised when they saw Natasha's face. 

'Let me be . . . what do I ... I shall die. . . .' she articulated, with 
angry effort. 

'Natalya! . . .' said Marya Dmitryevna. 'I wish for your good. Lie still; 
come, lie still like that then, I won't touch you, and listen. . . . I'm not 
going to tell you how wrongly you have acted. You know that yourself. 
But now your father's coming back to-morrow. What am I to tell him? Eh?' 

Again Natasha's body heaved with sobs. 

Well, he will hear of it, your brother, your betrothed!' 

'I have no betrothed; I have refused him,' cried Natasha. 

'That makes no difference,' pursued Marya Dmitryevna. 'Well, they hear 
of it. Do you suppose they will let the matter rest? Suppose he— your 
father, I know him— if he challenges him to a duel, will that be all right? Eh?' 

'Oh, let me be; why did you hinder everything! Why? why? who asked 
you to?' cried Natasha, getting up from the sofa, and looking vindictively 
at Marya Dmitryevna. 

'But what was it you wanted?' screamed Marya Dmitryevna, getting hot 
again. 'Why, you weren't shut up, were you? Who hindered his coming to 
the house? Why carry you off, like some gypsy wench? ... If he had 
carried you off, do you suppose they wouldn't have caught him? Your 
father, or brother, or betrothed? He's a wretch, a scoundrel, that's what 
he is!' 

'He's better than any of you,' cried Natasha, getting up. 'If you hadn't 
meddled . . . O my God, what does it mean? Sonya, why did you? Go 



WAR AND PEACE 275 

away! . . .' And she sobbed with a despair with which people only bewail 
a trouble they feel that they have brought on themselves. 

Marya Dmitryevna went on for some time longer lecturing Natasha, and 
urging on her that it must all be kept from the count, that no one would 
know anything of it if Natasha would only undertake to forget it all, and 
not to show a sign to any one of anything having happened. Natasha made 
no answer. She did not sob any more, but she was taken with shivering fits 
and trembling. Marya Dmitryevna put a pillow under her head, laid two 
quilts over her, and brought her some lime-flower water with her own 
hands; but Natasha made no response when she spoke to her. 

'Well, let her sleep,' said Marya Dmitryevna, as she went out of the room, 
supposing her to be asleep. But Natasha was not asleep, her wide-open eyes 
gazed straight before her out of her pale face. All that night Natasha did 
not sleep, and did not weep, and said not a word to Sonya. 

Next day, at lunch time, as he had promised, Count Ilya Andreivitch ar- 
rived from his estate. He was in very good spirits; he had come to terms 
with the purchaser, and there was nothing now to detain him in Moscow 
away from his countess, for whom he was pining. Marya Dmitryevna met 
him, and told him that Natasha had been very unwell on the previous day, 
that they had sent for a doctor, and that now she was better. Natasha did 
not leave her room that morning. With tightly shut, parched lips, and dry, 
staring eyes, she sat at the window, uneasily watching the passers-by along 
the street, and hurriedly looking round at any one who entered her room. 
She was obviously expecting news of him, expecting that he would come 
himself or would write to her. 

When the count went in to her, she turned uneasily and her face resumed 
its previous cold and even vindictive expression. 

'What is it, my angel; are you ill?' asked the count. 

Natasha was silent a moment. 

'Yes, I am ill,' she answered. 

In answer to the count's inquiries why she was depressed and whether 
anything had happened with her betrothed, she assured him that nothing 
had, and begged him not to be uneasy. Marya Dmitryevna confirmed 
Natasha's assurances that nothing had happened. From the pretence of ill- 
ness, from his daughter's agitated state, and the troubled faces of Sonya and 
Marya Dmitryevna, the count saw clearly that something had happened in 
his absence. But it was so terrible to him to believe that anything disgraceful 
had happened to his beloved daughter, and he so prized his own cheerful 
serenity, that he avoided inquiries. 

From the day of his wife's arrival in Moscow, Pierre had been intending to 
go away somewhere else, simply not to be with her. Soon after the Rostovs' 
arrival in Moscow, the impression made upon him by Natasha had impelled 
him to hasten in carrying out his intention. He went to Tver to see the 
widow of Osip Alexycvitch. 



276 WAR AND PEACE 

When Pierre came back to Moscow, he was handed a letter from Marya 
Dmitryevna, who summoned him to her on a matter of great importance, 
concerning Andrey Bolkonsky and his betrothed. Pierre had been avoiding 
Natasha. It seemed to him that he had for her a feeling stronger than a 
married man should have for a girl betrothed to his friend. And some fate 
was continually throwing him into her company. 

'What has happened? And what do they want with me?' he thought as 
he dressed to go to Marya Dmitryevna's. 'If only Prince Andrey would 
make haste home and marry her,' thought Pierre on the way to the house. 

In the Tverskoy Boulevard some one shouted his name. 

'Pierre! Been back long?' a familiar voice called to him. Pierre raised his 
head. Anatole dashed by in a sledge with a pair of grey trotting-horses, who 
were kicking up the snow on to the forepart of the sledge. His face was 
fresh and rosy; his hat, with its white plume, was stuck on one side, showing 
his curled, pomaded hair, sprinkled with fine snow. 

'Indeed, he is the real philosopher!' thought Pierre. 'He sees nothing 
beyond the present moment of pleasure; nothing worries him, and so he is 
always cheerful, satisfied, and serene. What would I not give to be just 
like him!' Pierre mused with envy. 

In Marya Dmitryevna's entrance-hall the footman, as he took off Pierre's 
fur coat, told him that his mistress begged him to come to her in her bed- 
room. 

As he opened the door into the reception-room, Pierre caught sight of 
Natasha, sitting at the window with a thin, pale, and ill-tempered face. She 
looked round at him, frowned, and with an expression of frigid dignity 
walked out of the room. 

'What has happened?' asked Pierre, going in to Marya Dmitryevna. 

'Fine doings,' answered Marya Dmitryevna. 'Fifty-eight years I have lived 
in the world— never have I seen anything so disgraceful.' And exacting from 
Pierre his word of honour not to say a word about all he was to hear, M?rya 
Dmitryevna informed him that Natasha had broken off her engagement 
without the knowledge of her parents; that the cause of her doing so was 
Anatole Kuragin, with whom Pierre's wife had thrown her, and with whom 
Natasha had attempted to elope in her father's absence in order to be 
secretly married to him. 

Pierre, with hunched shoulders and open mouth, listened to what Marya 
Dmitryevna was saying, hardly able to believe his ears. That Prince An- 
drey's fiancee, so passionately loved by him, Natasha Rostov, hitherto so 
charming, should give up Bolkonsky for that fool Anatole, who was mar- 
ried already (Pierre knew the secret of his marriage), and be so much in 
love with him as to consent to elope with him— that Pierre could not con- 
ceive and could not comprehend. He could not reconcile the sweet 
impression he had in his soul of Natasha, whom he had known from child- 
hood, with this new conception of her baseness, folly, and cruelty. He 
thought of his wife. 'They are all alike,' he said to himself. 

But still he felt ready to weep with sorrow for Prince Andrey, v/ith 



WAR AND PEACE 277 

sorrow for his pride. And the more he felt for his friend, the greater was 
the contempt and even aversion with which he thought of Natasha, who 
had just passed him with such an expression of rigid dignity. He could not 
know that Natasha's heart was filled with despair, shame, and humiliation, 
and that it was not her fault that her face accidentally expressed dignity 
and severity. 

'What! get married?' cried Pierre at Marya Dmitryevna's words. 'He 
can't get married; he is married.' 

'Worse and worse,' said Marya Dmitryevna. 'He's a nice youth. A perfect 
scoundrel. And she's expecting him; she's been expecting him these two 
days. We must tell her; at least she will leave off expecting him.' 

After learning from Pierre the details of Anatole's marriage, and pouring 
out her wrath against him in abusive epithets, Marya Dmitryevna informed 
Pierre of her object in sending for him. Marya Dmitryevna was afraid that 
the count or Bolkonsky, who might arrive any moment, might hear of the 
affair, though she intended to conceal it from them, and challenge Kuragin. 
She therefore begged Pierre to bid his brother-in-law from her to leave 
Moscow. Pierre promised to do as she desired him, only then grasping the 
danger menacing the old count, and Nikolay, and Prince Andrey. After 
briefly and precisely explaining to him her wishes, she let him go to the 
drawing-room. 

'Mind, the count knows nothing of it. You behave as though you know 
nothing,' she said to him. 'And I'll go and tell her it's no use for her to 
expect him! And stay to dinner, if you care to,' Marya Dmitryevna called 
after Pierre. 

Pierre met the old count. He seemed upset and anxious. That morning 
Natasha had told him that she had broken off her engagement to Bolkonsky. 

'I'm in trouble, in trouble, my dear fellow,' he said to Pierre, 'with those 
girls without the mother. I do regret now that I came. I will be open with 
you. Have you heard she has broken off her engagement without a word 
to any one? I never did, I'll admit, feel very much pleased at the marriage. 
He's an excellent man, of course, but still there could be no happiness 
against a father's will, and Natasha will never want for suitors. Still it had 
been going on so long, and then such a step, without her father's or her 
mother's knowledge! And now she's ill, and God knows what it is. It's a bad 
thing, count, a bad thing to have a daughter away from her mother. . . .' 
Pierre saw the count was greatly troubled, and tried to change the conversa- 
tion to some other subject, but the count went back again to his troubles. 

Sonya came into the drawing-room with an agitated face. 

'Natasha is not very well; she is in her room and would like to see you. 
Marya Dmitryevna is with her and she asks you to come too.' 

'Why, yes, you're such a great friend of Bolkonsky's; no doubt she wants 
to send him some message,' said the count. 'Ah, my God, my God! How 
happy it all was!' And clutching at his sparse locks, the count went out of 
the room. 

Marya Dmitryevna had told Natasha that Anatole was married. Natasha 



278 WAR AND PEACE 

would not believe her, and insisted on the statement being confirmed by 
Pierre himself. Sonya told Pierre this as she led him across the corridor to 
Natasha's room. 

Natasha, pale and stern, met Pierre at the door with eyes of feverish 
brilliance and inquiry. She did not smile nor nod to him. She simply looked 
hard at him, and that look asked him simply: was he a friend or an enemy 
like the rest, as regards Anatole? Pierre in himself had evidently no existence 
for her. 

'He knows everything,' said Marya Dmitryevna, addressing Natasha. 'Let 
him tell you whether I have spoken the truth.' 

As a hunted, wounded beast looks at the approaching dogs and hunters, 
Natasha looked from one to the other. 

'Natalya Ilyinitchna,' Pierre began, dropping his eyes and conscious of a 
feeling of pity for her and loathing for the operation he had to perform, 
'whether it is true or not cannot affect you since . . .' 

'Then it is not true that he is married?' 

'No; it is true.' 

'Has he been married long?' she asked. 'On your word of honour?' 

Pierre told her so on his word of honour. 

'Is he still here?' she asked rapidly. 

'Yes, I have just seen him.' 

She was obviously incapable of speaking; she made a sign with her hands 
for them to leave her alone. 

Pierre did not stay to dinner but went away at once on leaving Natasha's 
room. He drove about the town looking for Anatole Kuragin, at the very 
thought of whom the blood rushed to his heart, and he felt a difficulty in 
breathing. On the ice-hills, at the gypsies', at Somoneno he was not to be 
found. 

Pierre drove to the club. In the club everything was going on just as 
usual: the members who had come in to dinner were sitting in groups; they 
greeted Pierre, and talked of the news of the town. The footman, after 
greeting him, told him, as he knew his friends and his habits-, that there was 
a place left for him in the little dining-room. One of Pierre's acquaintances 
asked him in the middle of a conversation about the weather, whether he 
had heard of Kuragin's elopement with Natalie Rostov, of which every one 
was talking in the town; was it true? Pierre said, laughing, that it was all 
nonsense, for he had just come from the Rostovs'. 

He asked every one about Anatole; one man told him he had not come 
in yet; another said he was to dine there that day. 

Anatole was dining that day with Dolohov, and consulting with him how 
to achieve the exploit that had miscarried. It seemed to him essential to see 
Natasha. In the evening he went to his sister's, to discuss with her means for 
arranging their meeting. When Pierre, after vainly driving about all Mos- 
cow, returned home, his valet told him that Prince Anatole Vassilyevitch 
was with the countess. The drawing-room of the countess was full of guests. 

Pierre did not bestow a greeting on his wife, whom he had not seen since 



WAR AND PEACE 279 

his return (she was more hateful to him than ever at that moment); he 
walked into the drawing-room, and seeing Anatole, went straight up to him. 

'Ah, Pierre,' said the countess, going up to her husband, 'you don't know 
what a plight our poor Anatole is in . . .' She stopped short, seeing in her 
husband's bowed head, in his glittering eyes, in his resolute tread, that 
terrible look of rage and power, which she knew and had experienced in 
her own case after the duel with Dolohov. 

'Wherever you are, there is vice and wickedness,' said Pierre to his wife. 
'Anatole, come along, I want a word with you,' he said in French. 

Anatole followed with his usual jaunty swagger, but his face betrayed 
uneasiness. Going into his own room, Pierre shut the door, and addressed 
Anatole without looking at him. 'Did you promise Countess Rostov to 
marry her? Did you try to elope with her?' 

'My dear fellow,' answered Anatole, 'I don't consider myself bound to 
answer questions put to me in that tone.' 

Pierre's face, which had been pale before, was distorted by fury. With 
his big hand he clutched Anatole by the collar of his uniform, and pro- 
ceeded to shake him from side to side, till Anatole's face showed a sufficient 
degree of terror. 

'When I say I ivant a word with you . . .' Pierre repeated. 

'Well, what? this is stupid. Eh?' said Anatole, feeling a button of his 
collar that had been torn off with the cloth. 

'You're a scoundrel and a blackguard; and I don't know what prevents 
me from permitting myself the pleasure of braining you with this, see,' 
said Pierre. He took up a heavy paper-weight, and lifted it in a menacing 
way, but at once put it down. 

'Did you promise to. marry her?' 

'I . . . I . . . didn't think ... I never promised, though, because . . .' 

Pierre interrupted him. 

'Have you any of her letters?' 

Anatole thrust his hand in his pocket, and took out a pocket-book. Pierre 
took the letter he gave him, and pushing away a table that stood in the way, 
he plumped down on the sofa. 

'Letters— one,' said Pierre, as though repeating a lesson to himself. 'Two'— 
after a moment's silence he went on, getting up again and beginning to walk 
about— 'to-morrow you are to leave Moscow.' 

'But how can I . . . ? ' 

'Three'— Pierre went on, not heeding him— 'you are never to say a word 
of what has passed between you and the young countess. That I know 
I can't prevent your doing; but if you have a spark of conscience . . ,' 

Anatole sat at the table, scowling and biting his lips. 

'You surely must understand that, apart from your own pleasure, there's 
the happiness, the peace of other people; that you are ruining a whole life, 
simply because you want to amuse yourself. Amuse yourself with women 
like my wife— with them you're within your rights, they know what it is 
you want of them. They are armed against you by the same experience of 



280 WAR AND PEACE 

vice; but to promise a girl to marry her ... to deceive, to steal . . . Surely 
you must see that it's as base as attacking an old man or a child! . . .' 

'I don't know about that. Eh?' said Anatole, growing bolder as Pierre 
gained control over his rage. 'I don't know about that, and I don't want to/ 
he said, looking away from Pierre, and speaking with a slight quiver of his 
lower jaw, 'but vou have said words to me, base and all that sort of thing, 
which as a man of honour I can't allow any one to do.' 

Pierre looked at him in amazement. 

'Though it has been only tete-a-tete J Anatole went on, 'still I can't . . .' 

'What, do you want satisfaction?' said Pierre sarcastically. 

'At any rate you might take back your words. Eh? If you want me to 
do as you wish. Eh!' 

'I'll take them back, I'll take them back/ said Pierre, 'and beg you to 
forgive me/ Pierre could not help glancing at the loose button. 'And here's 
money too, if you vanr some for your journey.' 

Anatole smiled. Next day Anatole left for Petersburg. 

Pierre drove to Marya Dmitryevna's to report to her the execution of 
her commands. The whole house was in excitement and alarm. Natasha was 
very ill; and as Marya Dmitryevna told him in secret, she had on rhe night 
after she had been told Anatole was married, taken arsenic, which she had 
procured by stealth. After swallowing a little, she had been so frightened 
that she waked Sonya, and told her what she had done. Antidotes had been 
given in time, and now she was out of danger; but she was still so weak, 
that they could not dream of moving her to the country, and the countess 
had been sent for. 

That day Pierre dined at the club, and heard on every side gossip about 
the attempted abduction of the young Countess Rostov, and persistently 
denied the story, assuring every one that the only foundation for it was 
that his brother-in-law had made the young lady an offer and had been 
refused. 

He was looking forward with terror to Prince Andrey's return, and 
drove round every day to ask for news of him from the old prince. 

Prince Nikolay Andreivitch heard all the rumours current in the town 
through Mademoiselle Bourienne; and he had read the note to Princess 
Marya, in which Natasha had broken off her engagement. He seemed in 
better spirits than usual, and looked forward with impatience to seeing 
his son. 

A few days after Anatole's departure, Pierre received a note from Prince 
Andrey to inform him that he had arrived, and to beg him to go and 
see him. 

The first minute of Prince Andrey's arrival in Moscow, he was handed 
by his father Natasha's note to Princess Marya, in which she broke off her 
engagement (the note had been stolen from Princess Marya, and given to 
the old prince by Mademoiselle Bourienne). He heard from his father's 
lips the story of Natasha's elopement, with additions. 



WAR AND PEACE 281 

Prince Andrey had arrived in the evening; Pierre came to see him the 
following morning. Pierre had expected to find Prince Andrey almost in the 
same state as Natasha, and he was therefore surprised when as he entered 
the drawing-room he heard the sound of Prince Andrey's voice in the 
study, loudly and eagerly discussing some Petersburg intrigue. The old 
prince and some other voice interrupted him from time to time. Princess 
Marya came out to meet Pierre. She sighed, turning her eyes towards the 
door of the room, where Prince Andrey was, plainly intending to express 
her sympathy with his sorrow; but Pierre saw by Princess Marya's face 
that she was glad both at what had happened and at the way her brother 
had taken the news of his fiancee's treachery. 

'He said he had expected it,' she said. 'I know his pride will not allow 
him to express his feelings; but anyway, he has borne it better, far better, 
than I had expected. It seems it was to be so . . .' 

'But is it all really at an end?' said Pierre. 

Princess Marya looked at him with surprise. She could not understand 
how one could ask such a question. 

Pierre went into the study. Prince Andrey was very much changed, and 
visibly much more robust, but there was a new horizontal line between his 
brows. He was in civilian dress, and standing facing his father and Prince 
Meshtchersky, he was hotly arguing, making vigorous gesticulations. 

The subject was Speransky, of whose sudden dismissal and supposed 
treason news had just reached Moscow. 

'Now he' (Speransky) 'will be criticised and condemned by all who were 
enthusiastic about him a month ago,' Prince Andrey was saying, 'and were 
incapable of understanding his aims. It's very easy to condemn a man when 
he's out of favour, and to throw upon him the blame of all the mistakes of 
other people. But I maintain that if anything of value has been done in the 
present reign, it has been done by him— by him alone . . .' He stopped, 
seeing Pierre. His face quivered, and at once assumed a vindictive expres- 
sion. 'And posterity will do him justice,' he finished, and at once turned 
to Pierre. 'Well, how are you, still getting stouter?' he said eagerly, but the 
new line was still more deeply furrowed on his forehead. 'Yes, I'm very 
well,' he answered to Pierre's question, and he smiled. It was clear to Pierre 
that his smile meant, 'I am well, but my health is of no use to any one now.' 

After saying a few words to Pierre of the awful road from the frontiers 
of Poland, of people he had met in Switzerland who knew Pierre, and of 
M. Dessalle, whom he had brought back from Switzerland as a tutor for 
his son, Prince Andrey warmly took part again in the conversation about 
Speransky, which had been kept up between the two old gentlemen. 

'If there had been treason, and there were proofs of his secret relations 
with Napoleon, they would have made them public,' he said, with heat and 
haste. 'I don't and I didn't like Speransky personally, but I do like justice.' 

When Prince Meshtchersky had gone, Prince Andrey took Pierre's arm, 
and asked him to come to the room that had been assigned him. In that 
room there was a folding bedstead and open trunks and boxes. Prince 



282 WAR AND PEACE 

Andrey went up to one of them and took out a case. Out of the case he 
took a packet of letters. He did all this in silence, and very rapidly. He 
stood up again and cleared his throat. His face was frowning, and his lips set. 

'Forgive me, if I'm troubling you . . .' Pierre saw that Prince Andrey 
was going to speak of Natasha, and his broad face showed sympathy and 
pity. That expression in Pierre's face exasperated Prince Andrey. He w r ent 
on resolutely, clearly, and disagreeably: 'I have received a refusal from 
Countess Rostov, and rumours have reached me of your brother-in-law's 
seeking her hand, or something of the kind. Is that true?' 

'Both true and untrue,' began Pierre; but Prince Andrey cut him short. 

'Here are her letters and her portrait,' he said. He took the packet from 
the table and gave it to Pierre. 

'Give that to the countess ... if you will see her.' 

'She is very ill,' said Pierre. 

'So she's still here?' said Prince Andrey. 'And Prince Kuragin?' 

'He could not have married her, because he is married,' said Pierre. 

Prince Andrey laughed unpleasantly. 

'And where is he now, your brother-in-law, may I ask?' he said. 

'He went to Peter . . . but, really, I don't know,' said Pierre. 

'Well, that's no matter,' said Prince Andrey. 'Tell Countess Rostov from 
me that she was and is perfectly free, and that I wish her all prosperity.' 

Pierre took the packet. 

'Listen. Do you remember our discussion in Petersburg?' said Pierre. 'Do 
you remember about — ?' 

'I remember,' Prince Andrey answered hurriedly. 'I said that a fallen 
woman should be forgiven, but I did not say I could forgive one. I can't.' 

'How can you compare it? . . .' said Pierre. 

Prince Andrey cut him short. He cried harshly: 'Yes, ask her hand again, 
be magnanimous, and all that sort of thing? . . . Oh, that's all very noble, 
but I'm not equal to following in that gentleman's tracks. If you care to 
remain my friend, never speak to me of that ... of all this business. Well, 
good-bye. So you'll give that? . . .' 

Pierre left him, and went in to the old prince and Princess Marya. 

The old man seemed livelier than usual. Princess Marya was the same 
as usual, but behind her sympathy for her brother, Pierre detected her 
relief that her brother's marriage was broken off. Looking at them, Pierre 
felt what a contempt and dislike they all had for the Rostovs; felt that it 
would be impossible in their presence even to mention the name of the 
girl who could give up Prince Andrey for any one in the world. 

At dinner they talked of the coming war, of which there could now be 
no doubt in the near future. Prince Andrey talked incessantly, and seemed 
more eager than usual, with that eagerness of which Pierre knew so well 
the inner cause. 

That evening Pierre went to the Rostovs' to fulfil Prince Andrey's com- 
mission. Natasha was in bed, the count was at the club, and Pierre, after 
giving the letters to Sonya, went in to see Marya Dmitryevna, who was 



WAR AND PEACE 283 

interested to know how Prince Andrey had taken the news. Ten minutes 
later, Sonya came into Marya Dmitryevna. 

'Natasha insists on seeing Count Pyotr Kirillovitch,' she said. 

'Why, are we to take him up to her, eh? Why, you are all in a muddle 
there,' said Marya Dmitryevna. 

'No, she has dressed and gone into the drawing-room,' said Sonya. 

Marya Dmitryevna could only shrug her shoulders. 'When will the 
countess come? She has quite worn me out! You mind now, don't tell her 
everything,' she said to Pierre. 'One hasn't the heart to scold her, she's so 
piteous, poor thing.' 

Natasha was standing in the middle of the drawing-room; Pierre went 
hurriedly towards her. 

'Pyotr Kirillovitch,' she began, speaking quickly, 'Prince Bolkonsky was 
your friend— he is your friend,' she corrected herself. 'He told me to apply 
to you . . .' 

Pierre choked dumbly as he looked at her. Till then he had in his heart 
blamed her, and tried to despise her; but now he felt so sorry for her, that 
there was no room in his heart for blame. 

'He is here now, tell him ... to for ... to forgive me.' She stopped 
short and breathed even more quickly, but she did not weep. 

'Yes ... I will tell him,' said Pierre; 'but . . .' He did not know what 
to say. 

Natasha was evidently dismayed at the idea that might have occurred to 
Pierre. 

'No, I know that everything is over,' she said hurriedly. 'No, that can 
never be. I'm only wretched at the wrong I have done him. Only tell him 
that I beg him to forgive, to forgive, forgive me for everything . . .' 

A feeling of pity he had never known before flooded Pierre's heart. 

'I will tell him, I will tell him everything once more,' said Pierre; 'but 
... I should like to know one thing . . .' 

'To know what?' Natasha's eyes asked. 

'I should like to know, did you love . . .' Pierre did not know what to 
call Anatole, and flushed at the thought of him— 'did you love that bad 
man?' 

'Don't call him bad,' said Natasha. 'But I don't . . . know, I don't 
know . . .' She began crying again, and Pierre was more than ever over- 
whelmed with pity, tenderness, and love. He felt the tears trickling under 
his spectacles, and hoped they would not be noticed. 

'We won't talk any more of it, my dear,' he said. It seemed suddenly 
so strange to Natasha to hear the gentle, tender, sympathetic voice in which 
he spoke. 'We won't talk of it, my dear, I'll tell him everything. But one 
thing I beg you, look on me as your friend; and if you want help, think of 
me.' He took her hand and kissed it. 'I shall be happy, if I am able . . .' 
Pierre was confused. 

'Don't speak to me like that; I'm not worth it!' cried Natasha, and she 
would have left the room, but Pierre held her hand. He knew there was 



284 WAR AND PEACE 

something more he must say to her. But when he said it, he was surprised 
at his own words. 

'Hush, hush, your whole life lies before you,' he said to her. 

'Before me! No! All is over for me,' she said, with shame and self- 
humiliation. 

'All over?' he repeated. 'If I were not myself, but the handsomest, 
cleverest, best man in the world, and if I were free I would be on my knees 
this minute to beg for your hand and your love.' 

Almost running into the vestibule, Pierre flung on his fur coat, unable to 
find the armholes, and got into his sledge. 

'Now where, your excellency?' asked the coachman. 

'Home,' said Pierre, throwing open the bearskin coat in spite of ten 
degrees of frost. 

Over the dirty, half-dark streets, over the black roofs was a dark, starlit 
sky. Almost in the centre of it above the Prechistenskv Boulevard, sur- 
rounded on all sides by stars, but distinguished from all by its white light 
and long, upturned tail, shone the huge, brilliant comet of 1812; the comet 
which betokened, it was said, all manner of horrors and the end of the 
world. 



PART IX 



Towards the end of the year 1811, there began to be greater activity in 
levying troops and in concentrating the forces of Western Europe, and in 
18 1 2 these forces— millions of men, reckoning those engaged in the transport 
and feeding of the army— moved from the west eastward, towards the 
frontiers of Russia, where, since 181 1, the Russian forces were being in like 
manner concentrated. 

On the 1 2th of June the forces of Western Europe crossed the frontier, 
and the war began, that is, an event took place opposed to human reason 
and all human nature. Millions of men perpetrated against one another so 
great a mass of crime— fraud, swindling, robbery, forgery, issue of counter- 
feit money, plunder, incendiarism, and murder— that the annals of all the 
criminal courts of the world could not muster such a sum of wickedness in 
whole centuries, though the men who committed those deeds did not at 
that time look on them as crimes. 

What led to this extraordinary event? What were its causes? Historians, 
with simple-hearted conviction, tell us that the causes of this event were 
the insult offered to the Duke of Oldenburg, the failure to maintain the 
continental system, the ambition of Napoleon, the firmness of Alexander, 
the mistakes of the diplomatists, and so on. 

According to them, if only Metternich, Rumyantsev, or Talleyrand had, 
in the interval between a levee and a court ball, really taken pains and 
written a more judicious diplomatic note, or if only Napoleon had written 
to Alexander, 'I consent to restore the duchy to the Duke of Oldenburg,' 
there would have been no war. 

We can readily understand that being the conception of the war that 
presented itself to contemporaries. We can understand Napoleon's sup- 
posing the cause of the war to be the intrigues of England (as he said, 
indeed, in St. Helena); we can understand how to the members of the 
English House of Commons the cause of the war seemed to be Napoleon's 
ambition; how to the Duke of Oldenburg the war seemed due to the out- 
rage done him; how to the trading class the war seemed due to the conti- 
nental system that was ruining Europe; to the old soldiers and generals the 
chief reason for it seemed their need of active service; to the regiments of 
the period, the necessity of re-establishing les bons principes; while the 
diplomatists of the time set it down to the alliance of Russia with Austria 
in 1809 not having been with sufficient care concealed from Napoleon, 

285 



286 WAR AND PEACE 

and the memorandum, No. 178, having been awkwardly worded. We may 
well understand contemporaries believing in those causes, and in a count- 
less, endless number more, the multiplicity of which is due to the infinite 
variety of men's points of view. 

But to us of a later generation, contemplating in all its vastness the immen- 
sity of the accomplished fact, and seeking to penetrate its simple and fearful 
significance, those explanations must appear insufficient. To us it is incon- 
ceivable that millions of Christian men should have killed and tortured each 
other because Napoleon was ambitious, Alexander firm, English policy 
crafty, and the Duke of Oldenburg hardly treated. We cannot grasp the 
connection between these circumstances and the bare fact of murder and 
violence, nor why the duke's wrongs should induce thousands of men from 
the other side of Europe to pillage and murder the inhabitants of the 
Smolensk and Moscow provinces and to be slaughtered bv them. 

For us of a later generation, the causes of this war appear innumerable 
in their multiplicity. The more deeply we search out the causes the more 
of them we discover; and every cause, and even a whole class of causes taken 
separately, strikes us as being equally true in itself, and equally deceptive 
through its insignificance in comparison with the immensity of the result. 
Such a cause, for instance, occurs to us as Napoleon's refusal to withdraw 
his troops beyond the Vistula, and to restore the duchv of Oldenburg; 
and then again we remember the readiness or the reluctance of the first 
chance French corporal to serve on a second campaign; for had he been 
unwilling to serve, and a second and a third, and thousands of corporals 
and soldiers had shared that reluctance, Napoleon's army would have been 
short of so many men, and the war could not have taken place. 

If Napoleon had not taken offence at the request to withdraw bevond 
the Vistula, and had not commanded his troops to advance, there would 
have been no war. But if all the sergeants had been unwilling to serve on 
another campaign, there could have been no war either. 

The acts of Napoleon and Alexander, on whose words it seemed to 
depend whether this should be done or not, were as little voluntary as the 
act of each soldier, forced to march out by the drawing of a lot or by con- 
scription. This could not be otherwise, for in order that the will of 
Napoleon and Alexander (on whom the whole decision appeared to rest) 
should be effective, a combination of innumerable circumstances was essen- 
tial, without any one of which the effect could not have followed. It was 
essential that the millions of men in whose hands the real power lav— the 
soldiers who fired guns and transported provisions and cannons— should 
consent to carry out the will of those feeble and isolated persons. 

Although in that year, 181 2, Napoleon believed more than* ever that to 
shed or not to shed the blood of his peoples depended entirely on his will 
(as Alexander said in his last letter to him), yet then, and more than at any 
time, he was in bondage to those laws which forced him, while to himself 
he seemed to be acting freely, to do what was bound to be his share in the 
common edifice of humanity. 



WAR AND PEACE 287 

On the 29th of May Napoleon left Dresden, where he had been spending 
three weeks surrounded by a court that included princes, dukes, kings, 
and even one emperor. Before his departure, Napoleon took a gracious leave 
of the princes, kings, and emperor deserving of his favour, and sternly 
upbraided the kings and princes with whom he was displeased. He made a 
present of his own diamonds and pearls— those, that is, that he had taken 
from other kings-to the Empress of Austria. He tenderly embraced the 
Empress Marie Louise— who considered herself his wife, though he had 
another wife still living in Paris-and left her, so his historian relates, deeply 
distressed and hardly able to support the separation. 

Although diplomatists still firmly believed in the possibility of peace, and 
were zealously working with that object, although the Emperor Napoleon, 
with his own hand, wrote a letter to the Emperor Alexander calling him 
'Monsieur ?non frere,' and assuring him with sincerity that he had no desire 
of war, and would always love and honour him, he set off to join the army, 
and at every station gave fresh commands, hastening the progress of his 
army from west to east. On the 10th of June he overtook the army. The 
following day Napoleon drove on ahead of the army, reached the Niemen 
put on a Polish uniform and rode out on the river bank. 

When he saw the Cossacks posted on the further bank and the expanse 
of the steppes— in the midst of which, far away, was the holy city, Moscow, 
capital of an empire, like the Scythian empire invaded by Alexander of 
Macedon— Napoleon surprised the diplomatists and contravened all rules 
of strategy by ordering an immediate advance, and his troops began crossing 
the Niemen next day. 

Early on the morning of the 12th of June he came out of his tent, which 
had been pitched that day on the steep left bank of the Niemen, and looked 
through a field-glass at his troops pouring out of the Vilkovik forest, and 
dividing into three streams at the three bridges across the river. The troops 
knew of the Emperor's presence, and were on the look-out for him. When 
they caught sight of his figure in his greatcoat and hat standing apart from 
his suite in front of his tent on the hill opposite, they threw up their capi 
and shouted, *Vive VEmpereurP And one regiment after another, in a 
continuous stream, flowed out of the immense forest that had concealed 
thern, and split up to cross the river by the three bridges. 'We shall make 
some way this time. Oh, when he takes a hand himself things begin to get 
warm! . . . Hurrah for the Emperor! So those are the Steppes of Asia! A 
nasty country it is, though. Good-bye; I'll keep the finest palace in Moscow 
for you. The rascally Cossacks, how they are running. Hurrah for the 
Emperor! There he is! Do you see him? I have seen him twice as I am 
seeing you. The little corporal . . . Hurrah for the Emperor!' 

On the 13th of June Napoleon mounted a small thoroughbred Arab 
horse and galloped towards one of the bridges over the Niemen, deafened 
all the while by shouts of enthusiasm. On reaching the broad river, he 
pulled up beside a regiment of Polish Uhlans on the bank. 

'Vive VEmpereurP the Poles shouted with the same enthusiasm, breaking 



288 WAR AND PEACE 

their line and squeezing against each other to get a view of him. Napoleon 
looked up and down the river, got off his horse, and sat down on a log that 
lay on the bank. At a mute sign from him, they handed him the field-glass. 
He propped it on the back of a page who ran up delighted. He began 
looking at the other side, then, with absorbed attention, scrutinised the map 
that was unfolded on the logs. Without raising his head he said something, 
and two of his adjutants galloped off to the Polish Uhlans. 

'What? what did he say?' was heard in the ranks of the Polish Uhlans as 
an adjutant galloped up to them. They were commanded to look for a 
fording-place and to cross to the other side. The colonel of the Polish 
Uhlans, a handsome old man, set spurs to his horse and galloped down to 
the river. Hundreds of Uhlans galloped in after him. It was cold and 
dangerous in the middle in the rapid current. Some of the horses were 
drowned, some, too, of the men. They tried to swim straight across, and 
although there was a ford half a verst away they were proud to be swim- 
ming and drowning in the river before the eyes of that man sitting on the 
log and not even looking at what they were doing. 

Forty Uhlans were drowned in the river in spite of the boats sent to their 
assistance. The colonel, with several of his men, swam across the river and 
with difficulty clambered up the other bank. As soon as they clambered out 
in drenched and streaming clothes they shouted 'Vive VEmpereurP looking 
ecstatically at the place where Napoleon had stood. 

In the evening between giving two orders— one for hastening the arrival 
of the counterfeit rouble notes that had been prepared for circulation in 
Russia, and the other for shooting a Saxon who had been caught with a 
report on the disposition of the French army— Napoleon gave a third order 
for presenting the colonel, who had quite unnecessarily flung himself in the 
river, the order of the Legion d'Honneur. Quos vult perdere, dementat. 

The Russian Emperor had meanwhile been spending more than a month in 
Vilna, holding reviews and inspecting manoeuvres. Nothing was in readiness 
for the war, which all were expecting, though it was to prepare for it that 
the Tsar had come from Petersburg. There was no general plan of action. 

The 13th of June was the day fixed for a ball, a dinner, with a regatta and 
fireworks. 

On the very day on which Napoleon gave the order to cross the Russian 
frontier, driving back the Cossacks, Alexander was at the ball given by the 
generals on his staff. 

It was a brilliant and festive entertainment. Countess Bezuhov, who had 
been among the Russian ladies who had followed the Tsar from Petersburg 
to Vilna, was at that ball, and the Tsar had deigned to bestow a dance upon 
her. 

Boris Drubetskoy, who had left his wife at Moscow, and was living 
'en gargoiiy as he said, at Vilna, was also at that ball. Boris was now a 
wealthy man who had risen to high honours. 

At midnight dancing was still going on. Boris was looking coldly at Ellen's 



WAR AND PEACE 289 

splendid bare shoulders, which rose out of her dress of dark gauze and gold, 
and was talking to her of old acquaintances, and yet though others and 
himself too were unaware of it, he never for a second ceased observing the 
Tsar who was in the same room. 

At the beginning of the mazurka, Boris saw that a general of the staff, 
Balashov, went up to him. The Tsar's countenance betrayed amazement, 
as soon as Balashov had begun to speak. He took Balashov's arm and walked 
across the room with him, unconsciously clearing a space of three yards on 
each side of him as people hastily drew back, and walked out by the door 
into the lighted garden. 

Boris went on performing the figures of the mazurka, but he was all the 
while fretted by wondering what the news could be that Balashov had 
brought, and in what way he could find it out before other people. In the 
figure in which he had to choose a lady, he whispered to Ellen that he 
wanted to choose Countess Pototsky, who had, he thought, gone out on to 
the balcony; and gliding over the parquet, he flew to the door that opened 
into the garden. The Tsar and Balashov moved towards the door. Boris, 
with a show of haste, as though he had not time to move away, squeezed 
respectfully up to the doorpost and bowed his head. The Tsar in the tone 
of a man resenting a personal insult was saying: 

'To enter Russia with no declaration of war! I will consent to conciliation 
only when not a single enemy under arms is left in my country,' he said. 

Boris was the first person to learn the news that the French troops had 
crossed the Niemen; and, thanks to that fact, was enabled to prove to 
various persons of great consequence, that much that was hidden from 
others was commonly known to him, and was thereby enabled to rise even 
higher than before in the opinion of those persons. 

At two o'clock in the night of the 13th of June, the Tsar sent for 
Balashov, and commanded him to go in person to the French Emperor. As 
he dismissed Balashov, he repeated to him his declaration that he would 
never make peace as long as a single enemy under arms remained on Russian 
soil, and told him to be sure to repeat those words to Napoleon. 

Four days before sentinels of the Preobrazhensky regiment had been on 
guard before the very house to which Balashov was conducted. Now two 
French grenadiers were on duty before it. Napoleon received Balashov 
in the very house in Vilna from which Alexander had despatched him. 

Though Balashov was accustomed to the pomp of courts, he was im- 
pressed by the splendour and luxury of Napoleon's court. 

Count de Turenne led him into the great reception-room, where a num- 
ber of generals, gentlemen-in-waiting, and Polish magnates were waiting 
to see the Emperor. Many of them Balashov had seen at the court of the 
Russian Emperor. After a delay of several moments, a gentleman-in-waiting 
came into the great reception-room, and bowing courteously to Balashov, 
invited him to follow him. 

Balashov went into the little reception-room, from which one door led 
to the study, the room where he had received the Russian Emperor's last 



290 WAR AND PEACE 

charges before setting off. Balashov stood for a couple of minutes waiting. 
Hurried steps were audible through the door. Both halves of the door 
were swiftly thrown open, and in the complete stillness that followed other 
firm and resolute steps could be heard from the study: it was Napoleon. 
He had only just finished dressing for his ride.- He was wearing a blue uni- 
form, open over a white waistcoat, that came low down over his round 
belly, riding-boots, and white doeskin breeches, fitting tightly over his fat. 
short legs. His short hair had evidently just been brushed, but one lock 
hung down in the middle of his broad forehead. 

He walked out with a quivering strut, his head thrown a little back. His 
whole stout, short figure, with his broad, fat shoulders and his prominent 
stomach and chest, had that imposing air of dignity common in men of 
forty who live in comfort. It was evident, too, that he happened that day 
to be in a particularly good humour. 

He nodded in acknowledgment of Balashov's low and respectful bow, 
and going up to him, began to talk at once like a man who values every 
minute of his time, and will not deign to preface what he is going to say, 
as he is sure of always speaking well and saying the right thing. 

'Good-day, general!' said he. 'I have received the Emperor Alexander's 
letter that you brought, and I am very glad to see you.' 

It was obvious that he took no interest in Balashov; only what was pass- 
ing in his soul had for him any interest. All that was outside had no signifi- 
cance for him, because everything in the world depended, as he fancied, 
on his will. 

'I do not, and did not, desire war,' he said, 'but you have forced me to 
it. Even now 9 (he threw emphasis on the word) 'I am ready to receive any 
explanations you can give me.' And he began briefly and clearly explain- 
ing the grounds of his displeasure with the Russian government. 

Judging from the studiously composed and amicable tone of the French 
Emperor, Balashov was thoroughly persuaded that he was desirous of 
peace, and intended to enter into negotiations. 

Balashov began to speak. He said that the Tsar did not desire war, and 
that he had no relations with England. 

'Not as yet, 9 Napoleon put in, and as though afraid to abandon himself 
to his feelings, he frowned and nodded slightly as a sign to Balashov that 
he might continue. 

After saying all he had been instructed to say, Balashov wound up by 
saying that the Emperor Alexander was desirous of peace, but that he 
would not enter into negotiations except upon condition that ... At that 
point Balashov hesitated; he recollected words the Emperor Alexander had 
commanded Balashov to repeat to Napoleon. Balashov remembered those 
words: 'As long as a single enemy under arms remains on Russian soil,' 
but some complicated feeling checked his utterance of them. He could not 
utter those words, though he tried to do so. He stammered, and said: 'On 
condition the French troops retreat beyond the Niemen.' 

Napoleon observed Balashov's embarrassment in the utterance of those 



WAR AND PEACE 291 

last words: his face quivered, and the calf of his left leg began twitching 
rhythmically. Not moving from where he stood, he began speaking in a 
louder and more hurried voice than before. During the speech that fol- 
lowed Balashov could not help staring at the twitching of Napoleon's left 
leg, which grew more marked as his voice grew louder. 

'I am no less desirous of peace than the Emperor Alexander,' he began. 
'Haven't I been doing everything for the last eighteen months to obtain it? 
For eighteen months I have been waiting for an explanation, but before 
opening negotiations, what is it that's required of me?' he said, frowning 
and making a vigorous gesticulation with his fat, little white hand. 

'The withdrawal of the forces beyond the Niemen, sire,' said Balashov. 

'Beyond the Niemen?' repeated Napoleon. 'So now you want me to 
retreat beyond the Niemen— only beyond the Niemen?' repeated Na- 
poleon, looking straight at Balashov. 

Balashov bowed his head respectfully. 

Four months before he had been asked to withdraw from Pomerania; 
now withdrawal beyond the Niemen was all that was required. Napoleon 
turned quickly away, and began walking up and down the room. 

'You say that I am required to withdraw beyond the Niemen before 
opening negotiations; but two months ago I was required in the same way 
to withdraw beyond the Oder and the Vistula, and in spite of that you 
agree to enter into negotiations.' 

He strode in silence from one corner of the room to the other and 
stopped again, facing Balashov. Balashov noticed that his left leg was 
twitching more rapidly than ever, and his face looked as though petrified 
in its stern expression. 

'Such demands as to retire beyond the Oder and the Vistula may be 
made to a prince of Baden, but not to me,' Napoleon almost screamed, 
quite to his own surprise. 'If you were to give me Petersburg and Moscow 
I wouldn't accept such conditions. You say: I began the war. But who was 
the first to join his army? The Emperor Alexander, and not I. And you 
offer me negotiations when I have spent millions, when you are in alliance 
with England, and when your position is weak— you offer me negotiations! 
What is the object of your alliance with England? What has it given you?' 
he asked hurriedly. The motive of his v/ords was obviously now not to 
enlarge on the benefits of peace and to consider its possibility, but simply 
to prove his own rectitude, and his own power, and point out the duplicity 
and the errors of Alexander. 

He had plainly intended in entering on his conversation to point out 
the advantages of his own position, and to signify that in spite of them he 
would entertain the proposal of negotiations. But he had begun talking, 
and the more he talked the less able was he to control the tenor of his 
words. 

'I am told you have concluded a peace with the Turks?' 

Balashov bent his head affirmatively. 'Peace has been concluded . . .' 
he began. But Napoleon did not allow him to speak. He clearly did not 



292 WAR AND PEACE 

wish any one to speak but himself, and he went on with the unrestrained 
volubility and irritability to which people spoilt by success are so prone. 

'Yes, I know you have made peace with the Turks without gaining 
Moldavia and Wallachia. I would have given your Emperor those provinces 
just as I gave him Finland. Yes/ he went on, 'I promised, and would have 
given the Emperor Alexander Moldavia and Wallachia, but now he will 
not possess those fair provinces. He might have united them to his empire, 
however, and he would have enlarged the frontiers of Russia from the 
Gulf of Bothnia to the mouths of the Danube. Catherine the Great could 
have done no more,' Napoleon declared, growing hotter and hotter as he 
walked up and down the room, and repeated to Balashov almost the words 
he had used to Alexander himself at Tilsit. 'All that he would have owed 
to my friendship. Ah, what a fine reign! what a fine reign might have 
been that of the Emperor Alexander. Oh, what a grand reign,' he repeated 
several times. He stopped, took a gold snuff-box out of his pocket, and 
greedily put it to his nose. 

He turned a commiserating glance on Balashov, and as soon as he would 
have made some observation, he hurriedly interrupted him again. 

'What could he desire and look for that he would not have gained from 
my friendship? . . .' said Napoleon, shrugging his shoulders with an air of 
perplexity. 'No, he has thought better to surround himself with my enemies. 
Even supposing he might make use of them if they were competent,' Na- 
poleon went on, his words hardly able to keep pace with the rush of ideas 
that proved to him his right or his might (which to his mind meant the 
same), 'but they are not even that! They are no use for war or for peace! 
It's a week now since the campaign commenced, and you haven't even 
succeeded in defending Vilna. You have been divided in two and driven 
out of the Polish provinces. Your army is discontented . . .' 

'On the contrary, your majesty,' said Balashov, who scarcely had time 
to recollect what had been said to him, and had difficulty in following these 
verbal fireworks, 'the troops are burning with eagerness . . .' 

'I know all that,' Napoleon cut him short; 'I know all that, and I know 
the number of your battalions as exactly as I know my own. You have not 
two hundred thousand troops, while I have three times as many. I give 
you my word of honour,' said Napoleon, forgetting that his word of 
honour could carry no weight— 'my word of honour that I have live hun- 
dred and thirty thousand men this side of the Vistula. The Turks will be 
no help to you; they are good for nothing, and have proved it by making 
peace with you.' 

Napoleon laughed malignantly, and again put his snuff-box to his nose. 

To each of Napoleon's phrases Balashov had a reply ready, and tried 
to utter it. He was continually making gestures indicative of a desire to 
speak, but Napoleon always shouted angrily to drown his voice. Napoleon 
was in that state of exasperation when a man wants to go on talking and 
talking simply to prove to himself that he is right. Balashov began to feel 
uncomfortable. As an envoy, he was anxious to keep up his dignity, and 



WAR AND PEACE 293 

felt it essential to make some reply. But as a man he felt numb, repelled 
by the uncontrolled, irrational fury to which Napoleon abandoned him- 
self. He knew that nothing Napoleon might say now had any significance 
and believed that he would himself on regaining his composure be ashamed 
of his words. 

'And what are your allies to me?' said Napoleon. 'I have allies too— 
the Poles. There are eighty thousand of them and they fight like lions. And 
there will be two hundred thousand.' 

He was probably still more exasperated at having told this obvious false- 
hood. He turned sharply round and going right up to Balashov, gesticulat- 
ing rapidly and vigorously with his white hands close to his face, he almost 
shouted: 'Let me tell you, if you stir Prussia up against me, let me tell you, 
I'll wipe her off the map of Europe,' he said, his face pale and distorted 
with anger, as he smote one little hand vigorously against the other. 'Yes, 
I'll thrust you beyond the Dwina, beyond the Dnieper, and I'll restore the 
frontier that Europe was criminal and blind to let you overstep. Yes, that's 
what's in store for you, that's what you will gain by alienating me,' he 
said, and he walked in silence several times up and down the room, his 
thick shoulders twitching. He paused, looked sarcastically straight into 
Balashov's face and said in a low voice: 'And yet what a fine reign your 
master might have had.'' 

Balashov, feeling it incumbent upon him to reply, said Russia did not 
look at things in such a gloomy light. Napoleon was silent, still looking 
ironically at him and obviously not listening to him. Balashov said that in 
Russia the best results were hoped for from the war. Napoleon nodded 
condescendingly, as though to say, 'I know it's your duty to say that, but 
you don't believe in it yourself; you are convinced by me.' Towards the 
end of Balashov's speech, Napoleon pulled out his snuff-box again, took 
a sniff from it and tapped twice with his foot on the ground as a signal. The 
door opened, a gentleman-in-waiting, threading his way in respectfully, 
handed the Emperor his hat and gloves, another handed him a pocket- 
handkerchief. Napoleon, without bestowing a glance upon them, turned to 
Balashov. 

'Assure the Emperor Alexander from me,' he said, taking his hat, 'that 
I am devoted to him as before; I know him thoroughly, and I prize very 
highly his noble qualities. I detain you no longer, general; you shall receive 
my letter to the Emperor.' And Napoleon walked rapidly to the door. 

After all Napoleon had said to him, after those outbursts, of wrath, and 
after the last frigidly uttered words, 'I will not detain you, general'; 
Balashov felt certain that Napoleon would not care to see him again, would 
avoid indeed seeing again the envoy who had been treated by him with 
contumely, and had been the eyewitness of his undignified outburst of fury. 
But to his surprise Balashov received through Duroc an invitation to dine 
that day at the Emperor's table. 

Napoleon had not the slightest appearance of embarrassment or regret 
for his outbreak in the morning. On the contrary he seemed trying to 



294 WAR AND PEACE 

encourage Balashov. It was evident that it had long been Napoleon's con- 
viction that no possibility existed of his making mistakes. To his mind 
all he did was good, not because it was in harmony with any preconceived 
notion of good or bad, but simply because it was he who did it. 

At dinner he sat Balashov beside him, and addressed him affably. He 
addressed him indeed as though he regarded Balashov as one of his own 
courtiers, as one of the people, who would sympathise with his plans and 
be sure to rejoice at his successes. He talked, among other things, of Mos- 
cow, and began asking Balashov questions about the ancient Russian capital, 
not simply as a traveller of inquiring mind asks about a new place he 
intends to visit, but apparently with the conviction that Balashov as a 
Russian must be flattered at his interest in it. 

'How many inhabitants are there in Moscow, how many horses? Is it 
true that Moscow is called the holy city? How many churches are there 
in Moscow?' he asked. 

And when he was told there were over two hundred churches, he said: 

'Why is there such a great number of churches?' 

'The Russians are very religious,' replied Balashov. 

'A great number, however, of monasteries and churches is always a sign 
of the backwardness of a people,' said Napoleon. 

Balashov ventured respectfully to differ from the opinion of the French 
Emperor. 

'Every country has its customs,' he observed. 

'But there's nothing like that anywhere else in Europe,' said Napoleon. 

'I beg your majesty's pardon,' said Balashov; 'besides Russia, there is 
Spain, where there is also a great number of churches and monasteries.' 

This reply of Balashov's, which suggested a covert allusion to the re- 
cent discomfiture of the French in Spain, was highly appreciated when 
Balashov repeated it at the court of the Emperor Alexander, though at the 
time at Napoleon's dinner-table it was very little appreciated and passed 
indeed unnoticed. 

Napoleon indeed certainly saw nothing in it; and he naively asked 
Balashov through what towns the direct road from Vilna to Moscow 
passed. Balashov, who had been all dinner-time on his guard, replied that as, 
according to the proverb, every road leads to Rome, every road leads to 
Moscow; that there were very many roads, and among them was the road 
to Poltava, the one selected by Charles xn. 

After dinner thev went to drink coffee in Napoleon's studv, which had 
four days before been the study of the Emperor Alexander. Napoleon sat 
down, stirring his coffee in a Sevres cup, and motioned Balashov to a seat 
beside him. 

There is a well-known after-dinner mood which is more potent than any 
rational consideration in making a man satisfied with himself and disposed 
to regard every one as a friend. Napoleon was under the influence of this 
mood. He fancied himself surrounded by persons who adored him. He felt 
no doubt that Balashov too after his dinner was his friend and his worship- 



WAR AND PEACE 295 

per. Napoleon addressed him with an amicable and rather ironical smile. 

'This is the very room, I am told, in which the Emperor Alexander used 
to sit. Strange, isn't it, general?' he said, obviously without the slightest 
misgiving that this remark could be other than agreeable to the Russian, 
since it afforded a proof of his, Napoleon's, superiority over Alexander. 

Balashov could make no reply to this, and he bowed in silence. 

'Yes, four days ago, in this very room,' Napoleon continued, with the 
same confident and ironical smile. 'What I can't understand,' he said, 'is the 
Emperor Alexander's gathering round him all my personal enemies. That 
I do not understand. Didn't he consider that I might do the same?' he asked 
Balashov; and obviously the question brought him back to a reminiscence 
of the morning's anger, which was still fresh in him. 'And let him know that 
I will do so,' Napoleon said, getting up and pushing away his cup. 

Balashov bowed his head, with an air that indicated that he would be 
glad to withdraw, and was simply listening because he had no alternative 
but to listen to what was said to him. Napoleon did not notice this express- 
sion. He was addressing Balashov now, not as the envoy of his enemy, but 
as a man now quite devoted to him and certain to rejoice at the humilia- 
tion of his former master. 

The letter taken back by Balashov was Napoleon's last letter to Alex- 
ander. Every detail of the conversation was transmitted to the Russian 
Emperor, and the war began. 

After his interview with Pierre in Moscow, Prince An drey went away to 
Petersburg, telling his family that he had business there. In reality his 
object was to meet Anatole Kuragin. He thought it necessary to meet him, 
but on inquiring for him when he reached Petersburg, he found he was no 
longer there. Pierre had let his brother-in-law know that Prince Andrey 
was on his track. Anatole Kuragin had promptly obtained a commission 
from the minister of war, and had gone to join the army. While in Peters- 
burg Prince Andrey received an appointment on the' staff of the com- 
mander, and went to Turkey. 

Prince Andrey did not think it proper to write to Kuragin to challenge 
him to a duel. He thought that a challenge coming from him, without 
any new pretext for a duel, would be compromising for the young Countess 
Rostov; and therefore he was seeking to encounter Kuragin in person in 
order to pick a quarrel with him that would serve as a pretext for a duel. 
But in the Turkish army too Prince Andrey failed to come across Kuragin. 
The latter had returned to Russia shortly after Prince Andrey reached 
the Turkish army. 

In a new country, amid new surroundings, Prince Andrey found life 
easier to bear. Now he was occupied only with the most practical interests 
lying close at hand. He performed the duties of a general on duty on 
Kutuzov's staff with zeal and perseverance, surprising Kutuzov by his 
eagerness for work and his conscientiousness. When he missed Kuragin in 
Turkey, Prince Andrey did not feel it necessary to gallop back to Russia 



296 WAR AND PEACE 

in search of him. Yet in spite of all his contempt for Kuragin, he knew 
that when he did meet him, he would be unable to help challenging him. 

In 1812, when the news of the war with Napoleon reached Bucharest, 
Prince Andrey asked to be transferred to the western army. Kutuzov, who 
was by now sick of Bolkonsky's energy, and felt it a standing reproach to 
his sloth, was very ready to let him go. 

Before joining the army of the west, which was in May encamped at 
Drissa, Prince Andrey went to Bleak Hills, which was directly in his 
road, only three versts from the Smolensk high-road. The last three years 
of Prince Andrey 's life had been so full of vicissitudes, he had passed 
through such changes of thought and feeling, and seen such varied life 
(he had travelled both in the east and the west), that it struck him as strange 
and amazing to find at Bleak Hills life going on in precisely the same 
routine as ever. 

He rode up the avenue to the stone gates of the house, feeling as though 
it were the enchanted, sleeping castle. The same sedateness, the same clean- 
liness, the same silence reigned in the house; there was the same furniture, 
the same walls, the same sounds, the same smell, and the same timid faces, 
only a little older. Princess Mary a was just the same timid, plain girl, no 
longer in her first youth, wasting the best years of her life in continual 
dread and suffering, and getting no benefit or happiness out of her existence. 
Mademoiselle Bourienne was just the same self-satisfied, coquettish girl. 
The only physical change apparent in the old prince was the loss of a tooth, 
that left a gap at the side of his mouth. In character he was the same as ever, 
only showing even more irritability and scepticism as to everything that 
happened in the world. Nikolushka was the only one who had changed: 
he had grown taller, and rosy, and had curly dark hair. When he was 
merry and laughing, he unconsciously lifted the upper lip of his pretty 
little mouth, just as his dead mother, the little princess, used to do. He was 
the only one not in bondage to the law of sameness that reigned in that 
spellbound sleeping castle. 

But though externally all was exactly as of old, the inner relations of all 
the persons concerned had changed since Prince Andrey had seen them 
last. The household was split up into two hostile camps, which held aloof 
from one another, and only now came together in his presence, abandoning 
their ordinary habits on his account. To one camp belonged the old prince, 
Mademoiselle Bourienne, and the architect; to the other Princess Marya, 
Nikolushka, and all the nurses. 

During his stay at Bleak Hills all the family dined together, but every 
one was ill at ease, and Prince Andrey felt that he was being treated as a 
guest for whom an exception was being made. The old prince preserved 
a sullen silence, and immediately after dinner withdrew to his own room. 
Later in the evening when Prince Andrey went in, the old prince, to his 
surprise, began talking about Princess Marya, grumbling at her superstitious- 
ness, and her dislike of Mademoiselle Bourienne, who was, he said, the 
only person really attached to him. 



WAR AND PEACE 297 

The old prince declared that it was all Princess Marya's doing if he were 
ill; that she plagued and worried him on purpose, and that she was spoiling 
little Prince Nikolay by the way she petted him, and the silly tales she 
told him. 

'If you ask me,' said Prince Andrey, not looking at his father (it was the 
first time in his life that he had blamed his father), 'I did not wish to speak 
of it— but, if you ask me, I'll tell you my opinion frankly in regard to the 
whole matter. If there is any misunderstanding and estrangement between 
you and Masha, I can't blame her for it— I know how she loves and respects 
you. If you ask me,' Prince Andrey continued, losing his temper, as he 
very readily did in these latter days, 'I can only say one thing; if there are 
misunderstandings, the cause of them is that worthless woman, who is not 
fit to be my sister's companion.' 

The old man stared for a moment at his son. 

'What companion, my dear fellow? Eh! So you've talked it over al- 
ready! Eh?' 

'Father, I had no wish to judge you,' said Prince Andrey, in a hard and 
spiteful tone, 'but you have provoked me, and I have said, and shall always 
say, that Marie is not to blame, but the people to blame— the person to 
blame— is that Frenchwoman . . .' 

'Ah, he has passed judgment! ... he has passed judgment!' said the old 
man, m a low voice, and Prince Andrey fancied, with embarrassment. But 
immediately after he leapt up and screamed, 'Go away, go away! Let me 
never set eyes on you again! . . .' 

Prince Andrey would have set off at once, but Princess Marya begged 
him to stay one day more. During that day Prince Andrey did not see his 
father, who never left his room, and admitted no one to see him but Made- 
moiselle Bourienne and Tihon, from whom he inquired several times 
whether his son had gone. 

'Are you really going to this awful war, and he is so old?' his sister said 
to him. 

'Thank God that I can go,' said Prince Andrey. 'I am very sorry you 
can't too.' 

Prince Andrey reached the headquarters of the army at the end of June. 
The second army was retreating, striving to effect a junction with the 
first army, from which— so it was said— it had been cut off by immense 
forces of the French. Every one was dissatisfied with the general course 
of events but no one even dreamed of any danger of the Russian provinces 
being invaded, no one imagined the war could extend beyond the frontiers 
of the western Polish provinces. 

Anatole Kuragin, whom Prince Andrey had expected to find, was not 
here. He was in Petersburg, and Bolkonsky was glad to hear it. He was 
absorbed in the interest of being at the centre of the immense war that 
was in progress, and he was relieved to be free for a time from the ir- 
ritability produced in him by the idea of Kuragin. 

Barclay, at dinner one day, informed Bolkonsky that his Majesty would 



298 WAR AND PEACE 

be graciously pleased to see Prince Andrey in person, to ask him some 
questions about Turkey, and that Prince Andrey was to present himself 
at Bennigsen's quarters at six o'clock in the evening. 

Prince Andrey arrived at Bennigsen's quarters, a small manor-house on 
the very bank of the river. Neither Bennigsen nor the Tsar was there; 
but Tchernishev, the Tsar's aid-de-camp, received Bolkonsky, and informed 
him that the Tsar had set off with General Bennigsen and Marchese 
Paulucci to make his second inspection that day of the fortifications of 
the Drissa camp, of the utility of which they were beginning to entertain 
grave doubts. 

Tchernishev sat in the window of the outer room with a French novel. 
From the drawing-room came the sound of voices speaking German and 
occasionally French. There was being held, by the Tsar's desire, not a 
military council— the Tsar loved to have things vague— but a meeting of 
a few persons, whose opinions he wished to hear in the present difficult 
position. To this sort of semi-council had been bidden the Swedish general, 
Armfeldt, the general on the staff, Woltzogen, Wintzengerode, Michaud, 
Toll, Count Stein— by no means a military man— and finally Pfuhl. 

Prince Andrey had the opportunity of getting a good view of him, as 
Pfuhl came in shortly after his arrival and stopped for a minute to say a 
few words to Tchernishev before going on into the drawing-room. 

At the first glance Pfuhl, in his badly cut uniform of a Russian general, 
which looked out of keeping, like some fancy dress costume on him, seemed 
to Prince Andrey like a familiar figure, though he had never seen him 
before. He was of the same order as Weierother, and Mack, and Schmidt, 
and many other German generals, men of theory, whom Prince Andrey 
had seen in the war of 1808; but he was a more perfect type of the class 
than any of them. Such a typical German theorist, combining in himself 
all the characteristics of those other Germans, Prince Andrey had never 
seen before. 

Pfuhl was short and very thin, but broad-boned, of a coarsely robust 
build, with broad hips and projecting shoulder-blades. His hair had ob- 
viously been hastily brushed smooth in front, but stuck out behind in 
quaint wisps. Looking nervously and irritably about him, he walked in as 
though he were afraid of everything in the great room he had entered. 
He was unmistakably eager to get through the rooms, to get the bows 
and greetings over as quickly as possible, and to sit down to work at a 
map, where he would feel at home. 

He gave a hurried nod in response to Tchernishev's words, and smiled 
ironically on hearing that the Tsar was inspecting the fortifications that 
he, Pfuhl, had planned in accordance with his theory. It was evident that 
Pfuhl— disposed at all times to be irritable and sarcastic— was that day par- 
ticularly irritated at their having dared to inspect his camp and to criticise 
it without him. 

Thanks to his Austerlitz experiences, Prince Andrey could from this 
one brief interview form a clear idea of the man's character. Pfuhl was 



WAR AND PEACE 299 

one of those hopelessly, immutably conceited men, ready to face martyr- 
dom for their own ideas, conceited as only Germans can be, just because 
it is only a German's conceit that is based on an abstract idea-science, that 
is, the supposed possession of absolute truth. The Frenchman is conceited 
from supposing himself mentally and physically to be inordinately fas- 
cinating both to men and to women. An Englishman is conceited on the 
ground of being a citizen of the best-constituted state in the world, and 
also because he as an Englishman always knows what is the correct thing 
to do, and knows that everything that he, as an Englishman, does do is 
indisputably the correct thing. An Italian is conceited from being excitable 
and easily forgetting himself and other people. A 'Russian is conceited 
precisely because he knows nothing and cares to know nothing, since he 
does not believe it possible to know anything fully. A conceited German is 
the worst of them all, and the most hardened of all, and the most repulsive 
of all; for he imagines that he possesses the truth in a science of his own 
invention, which is to him absolute truth. 

Prince Andrey had hardly seen the last of Pfuhl when Count Bennigsen 
came hurrying into the room, and bestowing a nod on Boikonsky, went 
straight through to the study, giving some instruction to his adjutant. The 
Tsar, following him, recognised Boikonsky and addressed him graciously: 

I am very glad to see you. Go in where they are meeting and wait 
for me.' 

The Tsar passed on into the study. He was followed by Prince Pyotr 
Mihalovitch Volkonsky and Baron Stein, and the study door was closed 
after them. Prince Andrey, taking advantage of the Tsar's permission to 
do so, accompanied Paulucci, whom he had met in Turkey, into the 
drawing-room where the council had assembled. 

Prince Pyotr Mihalovitch Volkonsky, performing the duties of a sort 
of informed head of staff, came out of the study and laid maps on the table. 
The important fact was that news (which afterwards proved to be false) 
had been received in the night of movements of the French with the 
object of making a circuit round the camp at Drissa. 

The first to begin speaking was General Armfeldt, who proposed that 
the army should move into a position away from the Petersburg and Mos- 
cow roads, and, united there, await the enemy. The voung Colonel Toll 
proposed another plan of campaign entirely opposed to'Armfeldt's, and also 
to Pfuhl's plan. Pfuhl merely snorted contemptuously and turned his back 
to indicate that he would never stoop to reply to the rubbish he was hearing. 
When called upon to give his opinion, he said: 'Why ask me? General 
Armfeldt has proposed an excellent position with the rear exposed to the 
enemy. Or why not a retreat? Excellent, too. Why ask me? You all know 
better than I do, it appears.' 

But Pfuhl rose, and growing suddenly excited, continued: 

'You have muddled and spoilt it all. You would all know better than I, 
and now you come to me to ask how to set things right. There is nothing 
tfiat needs setting right. The only thing is to carry out in exact detail the 



300 WAR AND PEACE 

plan laid down by me,' he said, rapping his bony fingers on the table. 
'Where's the difficulty? It's nonsense; child's play!' 

Of all these men the one for whom Prince Andrey felt most sympathy 
was the exasperated, determined, insanely conceited Pfuhl. He was the 
only one of all the persons present who was unmistakably seeking nothing 
for himself, and harbouring no personal grudge against anybody else. 
He desired one thing only— the adoption of his plan, in accordance with 
the theory that was the fruit of years of toil. He was ludicrous; he was 
disagreeable with his sarcasm, but yet he roused an involuntary feeling of 
respect from his boundless devotion to an idea. 

Apart from this, with the single exception of Pfuhl, every speech of 
every person present had one common feature, which Prince Andrey 
had not seen at the council of war in 1805— that was, a panic dread of the 
genius of Napoleon, a dread which was involuntarily betrayed in every 
utterance now, in spite of all efforts to conceal it. Anything was assumed 
possible for Napoleon; he was expected from every quarter at once, and 
to invoke his terrible name was enough for them to condemn each other's 
suggestions. Pfuhl alone seemed to look on him too, even Napoleon, as 
a barbarian, like every other opponent of his theory. And for ail his conceit 
and his German grumpy irony, he was pitiful with his flattened locks on 
his forehead and his wisps of uncombed hair sticking out behind. 

The debate lasted a long while, and the longer it continued the hotter 
it became, passing into clamour and personalities, and the less possible 
it was to draw any sort of general conclusion from what was uttered. 
Prince Andrey simply wondered at what they were all saying as he listened 
to the confusion of different tongues, and the propositions, the plans, the 
shouts, and the objections. The idea which had long ago and often occurred 
to him during the period of his active service, that there was and could be 
no sort of military science, and that therefore there could not be such 
a thing as military genius, seemed to him now to be an absolutely obvious 
truth. 

'A good general has no need of genius, nor of any great qualities; on 
the contrary, he is the better for the absence of the finest and highest of 
human qualities— love, poetry, tenderness, philosophic and inquiring doubt. 
He should be limited, firmly convinced that what he is doing is of great 
importance (or he would never have patience to go through with it), and 
only then will he be a gallant general. God forbid he should be humane, 
should feel love and compassion, should pause to think what is right and 
wrong. It is perfectly comprehensible that the theory of their genius 
should have been elaborated long, long ago, for the simple reason that they 
are the representatives of power. The credit of success in battle is not by 
right theirs; for victory or defeat depends in reality on the soldier in the 
ranks who first shouts, "Hurrah!" or "We are lost!" And it is only in the 
ranks that one can serve with perfect conviction, that one is of use!' 

Next day at the review the Tsar asked Prince Andrey where he desirec* 
to serve; and Bolkonsky ruined his chances for ever in the court \vorl(? 



WAR AND PEACE 301 

by asking to be sent to the front, instead of begging for a post in attendance 
on the Tsar's person. 

Before the beginning of the campaign Rostov had received a letter from 
his parents, in which they informed him briefly of Natasha's illness and 
of the breaking off of her engagement, and again begged him to retire 
from the army and come home to them. Natasha had, they explained, 
broken off the engagement by her own wish. On receiving this letter 
Nikolay did not even attempt to retire from the army or to obtain leave, 
but wrote to his parents that he was very sorry to hear of Natasha's illness 
and her rupture with her betrothed, and that he would do everything in 
his power to follow their wishes. To Sony a he wrote separately. 

'Adored friend of my heart,' he wrote; 'nothing but honour could avail 
to keep me from returning to the country. But now, at the beginning of 
a campaign, I should feel myself dishonoured in my comrades' eyes, as 
well as my own, if I put my own happiness before my duty and my love 
for my country. But this shall be our last separation. Believe me, im- 
mediately after the war, if I be living and still loved by thee, I shall throw 
up everything and fly to thee to press thee for ever to my ardent breast.' 

It was, in fact, only the outbreak of the war that detained Rostov and 
hindered him from returning home, as he had promised. 'A charming 
wife, children, a good pack of hounds, ten to twelve leashes of swift 
harriers, the estate to look after, the neighbours, election to offices, perhaps, 
by the provincial nobility,' he mused. But now war was breaking out, and 
he had to remain with his regiment. In his absence he had been promoted 
to be captain. 

The campaign was beginning, pay was doubled, the regiment was rein- 
forced with new officers, new men, and fresh horses, and had moved into 
Poland. The temper of eager cheerfulness, always common at the beginning 
of a war, was general in the army. 

On the 13 th of July the Pavlograd hussars took part in their first serious 
action. 

The two Pavlograd squadrons were bivouacking in the middle of a field 
of rye, which was already in ear, but had been completely trodden down 
by the cattle and horses. The rain was falling in torrents, and Rostov was 
sitting under a shanty hastily rigged up. Rostov smoked his pipe, and 
wriggled his neck, down which the water was trickling. The young 
officer Ilyin was squatting beside him. Ilyin, a lad of sixteen, who had 
lately joined the regiment, took now with Nikolay the place Nikolay had 
taken seven years before with Denisov. 

'I can't stand this,' said Ilyin, 'stockings and shirt and all— I'm wet through. 
I'm going to look for shelter.' 

Five minutes later Ilyin came splashing through the mud to the shanty. 

'Hurrah! Rostov, make haste and come along. I have found an inn, two 
hundred paces or so from here; a lot of our fellows are there already. We 
can get dry anyway, and Marya Hendrihovna's there' 



302 WAR AND PEACE 

Marya Hendrihovna was the wife of the regimental doctor; a pretty 
young German woman, whom he had married in Poland. 

In the inn there were already some half-dozen officers. Marya Hendri- 
hovna, a plump, flaxen-headed little German in a dressing- jacket and 
nightcap, was sitting on a board bench in the foremost corner. Her husband, 
the doctor, lay asleep behind her. Rostov and Ilyin entered the room, 
welcomed with shouts. 

'Pretty figures you look! There's a perfect waterfall from them! Don't 
swamp our drawing-room.' 

'Mind you don't spatter Marya Hendrihovna's dress,' chimed in voices. 

Rostov and Ilyin made haste to look for a retreat where, without offence 
to the modesty of Marya Hendrihovna, they might change their wet clothes. 

Marya Hendrihovna lent them her petticoat to be hung by way of 
a curtain; and screened by it, Rostov and Ilyin took off their wet things 
and put on dry clothes. 

They made up a fire in the broken-down stove. They got hold of a 
board, propped it on two saddles, and covered it with a horse-cloth; then 
brought out a little samovar, a case of wine, and half a bottle of rum. 

There w T ere only three glasses; the water w T as so dirty 7 that there was 
no telling whether the tea were strong or weak, and the samovar would 
only hold water enough for six glasses. But that made it all the more fun 
to take turns in order of seniority to receive a glass from the plump, 
short-nailed, and not over clean ringers of Marya Hendrihovna. There 
was only one spoon; sugar there was in plenty, but it took so long for all 
to stir their glasses, that it was settled that Marya Hendrihovna must stir 
the sugar for each in turn. Rostov took his glass of tea, and adding rum 
to it, begged Marya Hendrihovna to stir it for him. 

'But you take it without sugar?' she said. 

'I don't care about sugar, all I want is for you to stir it with your little 
hand.' 

Marya Hendrihovna began looking for the spoon, which some one had 
pounced upon. 

'Use your little finger, Marya Hendrihovna,' said Rostov; 'it will be all 
the sweeter.' 

'It's hot,' said Marya Hendrihovna, blushing with pleasure. 

Ilyin took the bucket of water, and pouring a few drops of rum in it, 
went up to Marya Hendrihovna, begging her to stir it with her finger. 

'This is my cup,' he said. 'Only dip your finger in and I'll drink it all up.' 

The doctor's dishevelled head popped up behind his wife. He had been 
awake for some time and listening to the conversation, and apparently 
he saw nothing agreeable, funny, or amusing in what was being said and 
done. Looking at the doctor's gloomy face and sidelong glances at his 
wife, the officers grew even more lively, and there were peals of causeless, 
merry, childish laughter. 

No one was yet asleep when the quartermaster appeared, bringing a 
command to advance upon a little place called Ostrovna. Still with the 



WAR AND PEACE 303 

same chatter and laughter the officers began hurriedly getting ready; again 
the samovar was filled up with dirty water. But Rostov, without waiting 
for tea, went off to his squadron. It was already light; the rain had ceased, 
and the clouds were parting. 

'She's really very charming,' said Rostov to Ilyin. 

'An exquisite woman!' responded Ilyin, with all the gravity of a boy 
of sixteen. 

Half an hour later the squadron stood drawn up on the road. The word 
of command was heard. 'Mount!' and the soldiers crossed themselves and 
got on their horses. Rostov, riding ahead of them, gave the word: 'For- 
ward!' and drawing out four abreast, the hussars started with a sound of 
subdued talk, splashing hoofs, and jingling sabres. They trotted along 
the broad high-road, with birch-trees on each side of it, following the 
infantry and artillery, who had gone on before. 

The broken, purplish-blue clouds, flushed red by the sunrise, were 
scudding before the wind. It grew lighter and lighter. They could see 
distinctly, still glistening from the rain, the feathery grass which always 
grows beside by-roads. The drooping branches of the birch-trees swayed 
in the wind, and dripped bright drops aslant across the road. The faces of 
the soldiers showed more and more distinctly. Rostov, with Ilyin, who 
would not drop behind, rode on one side of the road between the two 
rows of birch-trees. 

On active service Rostov allowed himself the indulgence of riding a 
Cossack horse instead of the regimental horse, broken in for parade. He 
was a connoisseur and lover of horses, and had lately obtained a big sorrel 
horse with white tail and mane, a fine spirited beast of the Don breed, 
on whom he could out-gallop every one. It was an enjoyment to Rostov 
to ride this horse. He rode on, thinking of the horse, of the morning, of 
the doctor's wife, and never once giving a thought to the danger await- 
ing him. 

In former days Rostov had felt fear when he was going into an engage- 
ment; now he had not the slightest feeling of fear. He had not lost his 
fears from growing used to being under fire (one can never get accustomed 
to danger) but from gaining control of his feelings in face of danger. He 
felt sorry to see the excited face of Ilyin, who talked a great deal nervously. 
He knew by experience the agonising state of anticipation of terror and 
of death, in which the cornet was plunged, and he knew that nothing but 
time could help him out of it. 

The sun rose completely above the horizon. And with the bright light, 
as though in response to it, rang out shots in front of them. 

Rostov felt his spirits rise at those sounds, so long unheard, as though 
they had been the liveliest music. Trap-ta-ta-tap! rang out several shots, 
first together, then in rapid succession. 

The Uhlans galloped off, the streamers on their lances waving, and 
trotted downhill towards the French cavalry, who came into sight below 
on the left. 



304 WAR AND PEACE 

As soon as the Uhlans had started downhill, the hussars received the 
order to ride off uphill to cover the battery, just as the hussars were moving 
into the place of the Uhlans, there came flying from the outposts some 
cannon balls, hissing and whistling out of the distance, and hitting nothing. 

This sound, which he had not heard for so long, had an even more in- 
spiriting and cheering effect on Rostov than the report of the muskets. 
Drawing himself up, he surveyed the field of battle, as it opened out be- 
fore him riding uphill, and his whole heart went with the movements of 
the Uhlans. They were swooping down close upon the French dragoons; 
there was some confusion yonder in the smoke, and five minutes later 
the Uhlans were dashing back, not towards the spot where they had been 
posted, but more to the left. Between the ranks of Uhlans on the chestnut 
horses, and in a great mass behind them, could be seen blue French dragoons 
on grey horses. 

Rostov gazed at what was passing before him as at a hunt. He felt in- 
stinctively that if he were to charge with his hussars on the French dragoons 
now, they could not stand their ground; but if he were to charge it must 
be that very minute or it would be too late. He looked round. The captain 
standing beside him had his eyes too fixed on the cavalry below. 

'Andrey Sevastianitch,' said Rostov, 'we could close them in, surely . . .' 

Rostov, without waiting for his answer, set spurs to his horse and galloped 
off in front of his squadron. Before he had time to give the command, the 
whole squadron, sharing his feeling, flew after him. Rostov did it all, as 
he did everything in a wolf hunt, without thinking or considering. He saw 
that the dragoons were near, that they were galloping in no order, he 
knew they could not stand their ground; he knew there was only one 
minute to act in, which would not return if he let it slip. The cannon balls 
were hissing and whistling so inspiritingly about him, his horse pulled 
so eagerly forward that he could not resist. As they dashed downhill, the 
trot insensibly passed into a gallop that became swifter and swifter, as 
they drew nearer their Uhlans and the French dragoons pursuing them. 
The dragoons were close now. The foremost, seeing the hussars, began 
turning back; the hindmost halted. With the same feeling with which he 
had dashed off to cut off the wolf's escape, Rostov, letting his Don horse 
go at his utmost speed, galloped to cut off the broken ranks of the dragoons. 
One Uhlan halted; another, on foot, flung himself to the ground to avoid 
being knocked down; a riderless horse was carried along with the hussars. 

Almost all the dragoons were galloping back. Rostov picked out one of 
them on a grey horse and flew after him. On the way he rode straight 
at a bush; his gallant horse cleared it; and Nikolay was hardly straight in 
the saddle again when he saw in a few seconds he would overtake the enemy 
he had pitched upon as his aim. The Frenchman sat crouched upon his 
grey horse, and urging it on with his sword. In another instant Rostov's 
horse dashed up against the grey horse's hindquarters, almost knocking it 
over, and at the same second Rostov, not knowing why he did so, raised 
his sword, and aimed a blow at the Frenchman. 



WAR AND PEACE 305 

The instant he did this all Rostov's eagerness suddenly vanished. The 
officer fell to the ground, not so much from the sword cut, for it had only 
just grazed his arm above the elbow, as from fright and the shock to 
his horse. As Rostov pulled his horse in, his eyes sought his foe to see 
what sort of man he had vanquished. The French officer was hopping along 
on the ground, with one foot caught in the stirrup. Screwing up his eyes, 
as though expecting another blow every instant, he glanced up at Rostov 
frowning with an expression of terror. His pale, mud-stained face— fair 
and young, with a dimple on the chin and clear blue eyes— was the most 
unwarlike, most good-natured face, more in place by a quiet fireside than 
on the field of battle. Before Rostov could make up his mind what to do 
with him, the officer shouted, 'I surrender.' 

The hussars, galloping up, freed his foot, and galloped hastily back with 
their prisoners. Rostov galloped back with the rest, conscious of some 
disagreeable sensation, a kind of ache at his heart. 

All that day and the next Rostov's friends and comrades noticed that, 
without being exactly depressed or irritable, he was silent, dreamy, and 
preoccupied. He did not care to drink, tried to be alone, and seemed 
absorbed in thought. Rostov was still pondering on his brilliant exploit, 
which, to his amazement, had won him the St. George's Cross and made 
his reputation indeed for fearless gallantry. There was something he could 
not fathom in it. 'So they are even more frightened than we are,' he thought. 
'Why, is this all that's meant by heroism? And did I do it for the sake 
of my country? And was he to blame with his dimple and his blue eyes? 
How frightened he was! He thought I was going to kill him. Why should 
I kill him? My hand trembled. And they have given me the St. George's 
Cross. I can't make it out, I can't make it out!' 

Countess Rostov had not recovered her strength when she received the 
news of Natasha's illness. Weak as she still was, she set out at once for 
Moscow with Petya and the whole household, and the Rostovs moved 
from Marya Dmitryevna's into their own house, where the whole family 
were installed. 

Natasha's illness was so serious that, luckily for herself and her parents, 
all thought of what had caused it, of her conduct and of the breaking off 
of her engagement, fell into the background. She was so ill that no one 
could consider how far she was to blame for all that had happened, while 
she could not eat nor sleep, was growing visibly thinner, coughed, and 
was, as the doctors gave them to understand, in actual danger. Nothing 
could be thought of but how to make her well again. Doctors came to see 
Natasha, both separately and in consultation. They said a great deal in 
French, in German, and in Latin. They criticised one another, and pre- 
scribed the most diverse remedies for all the diseases they were familiar 
with. But it never occurred to one of them to make the simple reflection 
that they could not understand the disease from which Natasha was suffer- 
ing, as no single disease can be fully understood in a living person; for 



306 WAR AND PEACE 

every living person has his individual peculiarities and always has his own 
peculiar, new, complex complaints unknown to medicine. This simple re- 
flection can never occur to doctors (just as a sorcerer cannot entertain the 
idea that he is unable to work magic spells) because it is the work of 
their life to undertake the cure of disease, because it is for that that they 
are paid, and on that they have wasted the best years of their life. And 
what is more, that reflection could not occur to the doctors because they 
saw that they unquestionably were of use; and they certainly were of 
use to all the Rostov household. They were of use, not because they made 
the patient swallow drugs, mostly injurious (the injury done by them was 
hardly perceptible because they were given in such small doses). They were 
of use, were needed, were indispensable in fact (for the same reason that 
there have always been, and always will be, reputed healers, witches, 
homoeopaths, and allopaths), because they satisfied the moral cravings of 
the patient and those who loved her. They satisfied that eternal human 
need for sympathetic action that is shown in its simplest form in the little 
child, who when hurt runs at once to the arms of its mother or nurse for 
them to kiss or rub the tender spot, and feels better for the kissing and 
rubbing. The child cannot believe that these stronger, cleverer creatures 
have not the power to relieve its pain. And the hope of relief and the 
expressions of sympathy as the mother rubs it comfort it. To Natasha the 
doctors took the place of the mother when they declared that all the 
trouble would soon be over, if the coachman were to drive to the chemist's 
shop, in Arbatsky Place, and buy— for a rouble and seventy copecks— those 
powders and pills in a pretty little box, and if those powders were given 
to the patient in boiled water precisely every two hours, neither more 
nor less. 

What would Sonya, and the count, and the countess have done, how 
would they have felt if they had taken no steps, if they had not had 
those pills at certain hours, and the warm beverage, and the chicken cutlets, 
and all the detailed regime laid down by the doctors, which gave occupa- 
tion and consolation to all of them. How could the count have borne his 
dearly loved daughter's illness if he had not known that it was costing him 
a thousand roubles, and that he would not grudge thousands more, if that 
would do her any good? 

Natasha was calmer, but no happier. She did not merely shun every 
external form of amusement— balls, skating, concerts, and theatres— but 
she never even laughed without the sound of tears behind her laughter. 
She could not sing. As soon as she began to laugh or attempted to sing all 
by herself, tears choked her: tears of remorse; tears of regret for that time 
of pure happiness that could never return; tears of vexation that she should 
so wantonly have ruined her young life, that might have been so happy. 
Laughter and singing especially seemed to her like scoffing at her grief. 
It comforted her to think, not that she was better, but worse, far worse 
than any one in the whole world. 

It was only with her brother, Petya, that she felt at ease. She liked being 



WAR AND PEACE 307 

with him better than being with the rest, and sometimes even laughed 
when she was alone with him. She hardly left the house to go anywhere; 
and of the guests who came to the house she was only glad to see one 
person— Pierre. 

No one could have been more tender, circumspect, and at the same time 
serious, than Count Bezuhov in his manner to her. Natasha was uncon- 
sciously aware of this tenderness, and it was owing to it that she found 
more pleasure in his society. But she was not even grateful to him for it. 
Nothing good in him seemed to her due to an effort on Pierre's part. It 
seemed so natural to Pierre to be kind that there was no merit in his kind- 
ness. Sometimes Natasha noticed some confusion or awkwardness in Pierre 
in her presence, especially when he was trying to do something for her 
pleasure or afraid something in the conversation might suggest to her pain- 
ful reminiscences. She observed this, and put it down to his general kindli- 
ness and shyness, which she supposed would be the same with every one 
else. Ever since those unforeseen words— that if he had been free, he would 
have asked on his knees for her hand and her love— uttered in a moment 
full of violent emotion for her, Pierre had said nothing of his feelings to 
Natasha; and it seemed to her clear that those words, which had so com- 
forted her, had been uttered, just as one says any meaningless nonsense to 
console a w T eeping child. It was not because Pierre was a married man, 
but because Natasha felt between herself and him the force of that moral 
barrier— of the absence of which she had been so conscious with Kuragin 
—that the idea never occurred to her that her relations with Pierre might 
develop into love on her side, and still less on his, or even into that tender, 
self-conscious, romantic friendship between a man and a woman, of which 
she had known several instances. 

Towards the end of St. Peter's fast, a country neighbour of the Rostovs 
came to Moscow to pay her devotions to the saints there. She suggested to 
Natasha that she should prepare herself for the Sacrament, and Natasha 
caught eagerly at the suggestion. Although the doctors forbade her going 
out early in the morning, Natasha insisted on keeping the fast for a whole 
week, not missing a single early morning service, or litany, or vesper. 

The countess was pleased at these signs of religious fervour in Natasha. 
After the poor results of medical treatment, at the bottom of her heart 
she hoped that prayer would do more for her than medicine. 

Hurriedly washing, and in all humility putting on her shabbiest dress 
and old mantle, Natasha, shuddering at the chill air, went out into the de- 
serted streets, in the limpid light of the early dawn. She listened to the 
words of the service, and tried to follow and understand them. When she 
did not understand, it was still sweeter for her to think that the desire to 
understand all was pride, that she could not comprehend all; that she had 
but to believe and give herself up to God. She crossed herself, bowed to 
the ground, and prayed to God to forgive her everything, everything, and 
to have mercy on her, in horror at her own vileness. The prayer into which 
she threw herself heart and soul was the prayer of repentance. 



308 WAR AND PEACE 

On the way home in the early morning, when they met no one but 
masons going to their work, or porters cleaning the streets, and every 
one was asleep in the houses, Natasha had a new sense of the possibility 
of correcting herself of her sins and leading a new life of purity and hap- 
piness. And when on Sunday Natasha returned from the Sacrament wearing 
a white muslin dress, for the first time for many months she felt at peace, 
and not oppressed by the life that lay before her. 

The doctor came that day to see Natasha, and gave directions for the 
powders to be continued that he had begun prescribing a fortnight ago. 
'She must certainly go on taking them morning and evening,' he said, with 
visible and simple-hearted satisfaction at the success of his treatment. 'Please, 
don't forget them. You may set your mind at rest, countess,' the doctor 
said playfully, as he deftly received the gold in the hollow of his palm. 
'She will soon be singing and dancing again. The last medicine has done 
her great, great good. She is very much better.' 

The countess looked at her finger-nails and spat to avert the ill-omen of 
such words, as with a cheerful face she went back to the drawing-room. 

At the beginning of July the rumours as to the progress of the war cur- 
rent in Moscow became more and more alarming; there was talk of the 
Tsar's appeal to the people, and the Tsar himself was said to be coming 
from the army to Moscow. And as up to the nth of July the manifesto 
and appeal to the people had not been received, the most exaggerated re- 
ports about them and the position of Russia were common. It was said 
that the Tsar w r as coming away because the army was in danger; it was said 
that Smolensk had surrendered; that Napoleon had millions of troops, and 
that nothing short of a miracle could save Russia. 

On Saturday, the nth of July, the manifesto was received, but was not 
yet in print; and Pierre, who happened to be at the Rostovs', promised to 
come next day, Sunday, to dinner, and to bring the manifesto, which he 
could obtain from Count Rastoptchin. 

That Sunday the Rostovs attended service as usual in the private chapel 
of the Razumovskys. It was a hot July day. Even by ten o'clock, when 
the Rostovs got out of their carriage before the chapel, the sultry air, the 
shouts of the street hawkers, the gay, light summer dresses of the crowd, 
the dusty leaves of the trees on the boulevard, the martial music and white 
trousers of the battalion marching by to parade, the rattle of the pavements, 
and the brilliant, hot sunshine, were all full of that summer languor, that 
content and discontent with the present, which is felt particularly vividly 
on a bright, hot day in town. All the fashionable world of Moscow, all 
the Rostovs' acquaintances were in the chapel. A great number of wealthy 
families, who usually spent the summer in the country, were staying on in 
Moscow that year, as though in vague anticipation of something. 

As Natasha walked beside her mother, behind a footman in livery, who 
made way for them through the crowd, she heard the voice of some young 
man speaking in too loud a whisper about her: 

'That's the young Countess Rostov, the very girl!' 



WAR AND PEACE 309 

'She's ever so much thinner, but still pretty!' she caught, and fancied 
that the names of Kuragin and Bolkonsky were mentioned. But that was 
always happening. She was always fancying that any one who looked at 
her could be thinking of nothing but what happened to her. With a sinking 
heart, wretched as she always was now in a crowd, Natasha, in her lilac 
silk dress, trimmed with black lace, walked on, as only women know how 
to do, with an air of ease and dignity all the greater for the pain and 
shame in her heart. She knew for a fact that she was pretty, but that did 
not give her pleasure now, as once it had. On the contrary, it had been a 
source of more misery than anything of late, and especially so on this 
bright, hot summer day in town. 

'Another Sunday, another week,' she said to herself, 'and still the same 
life that is no life, and still the same circumstances in which life used to 
seem so easy once. Young and pretty, and I know that now I am good, 
and before I was wicked! But now I am good,' she mused, 'but yet the 
best years, the best of my life, are all being wasted, and no good to any one.' 

A handsome, clean-looking old priest read the service with the mild 
solemnity that has such an elevating and soothing effect on the souls of 
those who pray. The deacon came out to the steps before the altar screen 
and, laying the cross on his breast, began solemnly reading the prayer: 

'As one community let us pray to the Lord.' . 

'As one community, all together without distinction of class, free from 
enmity, all united in brotherly love, let us pray,' thought Natasha. 

When they prayed for the army, she thought of her brother and Denisov. 
When they prayed for all travelling by sea and by land, she thought of 
Prince Andrey, and prayed for him, and prayed that God would forgive 
her the wrong she had done him. When they prayed for all who love us, 
she prayed for all her family, her father and mother, and Sonya— for the 
first time feeling all the shortcomings in her behaviour to them, and all 
the strength of her own love for them. When they prayed for those who 
hate us, she tried to think of enemies, to pray for them. She reckoned as 
enemies all her father's creditors, and every one who had business relations 
with him; and always at the thought of enemies who hated her she thought 
of Anatole, who had done her so cruel an injury, and though he had not 
hated her, she prayed gladly for him, as an enemy. It was only at her 
prayers that she felt able to think calmly and clearly either of Prince 
Andrey or of Anatole, with a sense that her feelings for them were as 
nothing compared with her feeling of worship and awe of God. When 
they prayed for the Imperial family, she bowed and crossed herself more 
devoutly than ever. 

To the general surprise, there followed the prayer for the delivery of 
Russia out of the hands of the enemy. 

'Lord God of might, God of our salvation! Look in grace and blessing 
on Thy humble people, and hear with loving-kindness, and spare and have 
mercy on us. The foe is confounding Thy land, and is fain to rise up against 
all the earth and lay it waste. These lawless men are gathered together to 



310 WAR AND PEACE 

overwhelm Thy kingdom, to destroy Thy holy Jerusalem, Thy beloved 
Russia: to defile Thy temples, to overturn the altars and violate our holy 
shrines. How long, O Lord, how long shall the wicked prevail? How long 
shall they wreak their sinful will? 

'Almighty God! Hear us when we pray to Thee, strengthen with Thy 
might our most gracious and supreme sovereign, Emperor Alexander 
Pavlovitch. Be mindful of his truth and mercy, recompense him according 
to his good deeds, and let them preserve Thy chosen Israel. Bless his 
counsels, his undertakings, and his deeds; fortify his kingdom with Thy 
Almighty hand, and vouchsafe him victory over the enemy, even as Thou 
gavest Moses victory over Amalek, and Gideon over Midian, and David 
over Goliath. Preserve his army; put weapons of brass in the hands that 
wage war in Thy name, and gird them about with strength for the battle. 
Take Thou the lance and shield, and rise up to succour us, and put to shame 
and to confusion them that devise evil against us, and let them be scattered 
before the face of Thy faithful armament like dust before the wind; and 
may Thy mighty angel put them to flight and to confusion. And let the net 
ensnare them when they wot not of it, and their plots that they have 
hatched in secret be turned against them. And let them be laid^ low before 
the feet of Thy servants and vanquished by our hosts. Lord! it is nought 
for Thee to save both great and small. Thou art God, and man can do 
nought against Thee! 

'God of our Fathers! Remember Thy mercy and loving-kindness, that 
are everlasting. Turn not Thy face away from us; be gracious to our un- 
worthiness; but in the greatness of Thy mercy and the infinity of Thy good^ 
ness, overlook our transgressions and our iniquities. Purify our hearts, and 
renew the true spirit within us; strengthen us all by faith in Thee; fortify 
us with hope; breathe into us true love for one another; arm us with unity 
of spirit in the righteous defence of the heritage Thou hast given us and 
our fathers; and let not the sceptre of the unrighteous be exalted above 
the destinies of Thy holy people. 

'O Lord our God, in Whom we believe, and in Whom we put our trust, 
let us not be confounded in our faith in Thy mercy, and give us a sign for 
our blessing that they that hate us and our holy faith may see it and be put 
to shame and confusion, and that all lands may know that the Lord is Thy 
Name, and we are Thy people. Show Thy mercy upon us this day, O Lord, 
and grant us Thy salvation. Rejoice the hearts of Thy servants with Thy 
mercy; strike down our enemies and trample them swiftly under the feet 
of Thy faithful. Thou art the defence, the succour, and the victory of 
them that put their trust in Thee; and to Thee be the glory, to Father, and 
to Son, and to Holy Ghost, now and ever has been, for ever and ever. 
Amen!' 

In Natasha's religiously impressionable state, this prayer affected her 
strongly. She heard every word about Moses's victory over Amalek, and 
Gideon's over Midian, and David's over Goliath, and about the destruction 
of Thy Jerusalem; and she prayed to God with all the tenderness and 



WAR AND PEACE 311 

fervour with which her heart was overflowing. But she could not pray for 
the trampling of her enemies underfoot, when she had only a few minutes 
before been wishing she had more of them to forgive and pray for. Yet 
she could have no doubts of the righteousness of this prayer that had been 
read by the priest on his knees. She felt in her heart a thrill of awe and 
horror at the punishment in store for men's sins, and especially for her sins, 
and prayed to God to forgive them all, and her too, and give them all and 
her peace and happiness. And it seemed to her that God heard her prayer. 

Ever since the day when Pierre had looked up at the comet in the sky, on 
his way home from the Rostovs', and recalling Natasha's grateful look, had 
felt as though some new vista was opening before him, the haunting prob- 
lem of the vanity and senselessness of all things earthly had ceased to 
torment him. That terrible question: Why? what for? was replaced by 
the image of her. If he heard or talked of some instance of human baseness 
or folly, he was not cast down as of old; he said to himself, 'Well, let so and 
so rob the state and the Tsar, while the state and the Tsar heap honours 
on him; but she smiled at me yesterday, and begged me to come, and I love 
her, and nobody will ever know it,' he thought. 

Pierre still went into society, drank as much, and led the same idle and 
aimless life, because, apart from the hours he spent at the Rostovs', he had 
to get through the rest of his time somehow. But of late, since the reports 
from the seat of war had become more and more disquieting, he felt that 
the position he was in could not go on for long, that a catastrophe was 
coming that would change the whole course of his life, and he sought 
impatiently for signs of this impending catastrophe. One of his brother 
masons had revealed to Pierre the following prophecy relating to Napoleon, 
and taken from the Apocalypse of St. John. 

In the Apocalypse, chapter thirteen, verse seventeen, it is written: 'Here 
is wisdom; let him that hath understanding, count the number of the beast; 
for it is the number of a man, and his number is six hundred three-score 
and six.' 

And in the fifth verse of the same chapter: 'And there was given unto 
him a mouth speaking great things and blasphemies, and power was given 
unto him to continue forty and two months.' 

If the French alphabet is treated like the Hebrew system of enumeration, 
by which the first ten letters represent the units, ard the next the tens, and 
so on, the letters have the following value: — 

abcdefghiklmnopqrs t uvw x y z 
i 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 io 20 30 40 50 60 70 80 90 100 no 120 130 140 150 160 

Turning out the words Vempereur Napoleon into ciphers on this system, 
it happens that the sum of these numbers equals 666, and Napoleon is 
thereby seen to be the beast prophesied in the Apocalypse. Moreover, 
working out in the same way the words quarante-deux, that is, the term 
for which the beast was permitted to continue, the sum of these numbers 



312 WAR AND PEACE 

again equals 666, from which it is deduced that the terms of Napoleon's 
power had come in 1812, when the French Emperor reached his forty- 
second year. This prophecy made a great impression on Pierre. He fre- 
quently asked himself what would put an end to the power of the beast, 
that is, of Napoleon; and he tried by the same system of turning letters 
into figures, and reckoning them up to find an answer to this question. He 
wrote down as an answer, Vempereur Alexandre? La nation russe? He 
reckoned out the figures, but their sum was far more or less than 666. 

Once he wrote down his own name 'Comte Pierre Bezuhov,' but the 
sum of the figure was far from being right. He changed the spelling, putting 
s for z, added 'de,' added the article 'le,' and still could not obtain the 
desired result. Then it occurred to him that if the answer sought for were 
to be found in his name, his nationality ought surely to find a place in it 
too. He tried Le russe Besuhof, and adding up the figure made the sum 671. 
This was only five too much; the 5 was denoted by the letter 'e,' the letter 
dropped in the article in the expression Vempereur Napoleon. Dropping 
the V in a similar way, though of course incorrectly, Pierre obtained the 
answer he sought in Urnsse Besuhof, the letters of which on that system 
added up to 666. This discovery greatly excited him. How, by what con- 
nection, he was associated with the great event foretold in the Apocalypse, 
he could not tell. But he did not for a moment doubt that connection. 

The day before that Sunday on which the new prayer had been read in 
the churches, a special courier arrived from the army. The courier was a 
man whom Pierre knew, and often saw at the Moscow balls. 

'For mercy's sake, couldn't you relieve me of some of my burden,' said 
the courier; 'I have a sack full of letters to parents.' 

Among these letters was a letter from Nikolay Rostov to his father. 
Pierre took that; and Count Rastoptchin gave him a copy of the Tsar's 
appeal to Moscow, which had just been printed, the last announcements 
in the army, and his own last placard. Looking through the army announce- 
ments, Pierre found in one of them, among lists of wounded, killed and 
promoted, the name of Nikolay Rostov, rewarded with the order of St. 
George, of the fourth degree, for distinguished bravery in the Ostrovna 
affair, and in the same announcement the appointment of Prince Andrey 
Bolkonsky to the command of a regiment of light cavalry. Though he did 
not want to remind the Rostovs of Bolkonsky's existence, Pierre could not 
resist the inclination to rejoice their hearts with the news of their son's 
decoration. Keeping the Tsar's appeal, Rastoptchin's placard, and the other 
announcement to bring with him at dinner-time, Pierre sent the printed 
announcement and Nikolay's letter to the Rostovs. 

The conversation with Rastoptchin, and his tone of anxiety and hurry, 
the meeting with the courier, who had casually alluded to the disastrous 
state of affairs in the army, the rumours of spies being caught in Moscow, 
of a sheet circulating in the town stating that Napoleon had sworn to be in 
both capitals before autumn, of the Tsar's expected arrival next day— all 
combined to revive in Pierre with fresh intensity that feeling of excitement 



WAR AND PEACE 313 

and expectation, that he had been conscious of ever since the appearance 
of the comet, and with even greater force since the beginning of the war. 

The idea of entering the army had long before occurred to Pierre, and he 
would have acted upon it, but that, in the first place, he was pledged by his 
vow to the Masonic brotherhood, which preached universal peace and the 
abolition of war; and secondly, when he looked at the great mass of 
Moscow gentlemen, who put on uniforms, and professed themselves 
patriots, he felt somehow ashamed to take the same step. A cause that 
weighed with him even more in not entering the army was the obscure 
conception that he, Vrusse Besuhof, had somehow the mystic value of the 
number of the beast, 666, that his share in putting a limit to the power of 
the beast, 'speaking great things and blasphemies,' had been ordained from 
all eternity, and that therefore it was not for him to take any step what- 
ever; it was for him to wait for what was bound to come to pass. 

A few intimate friends were, as usual on Sundays, dining with the Rostovs. 
Pierre came early, hoping to find them alone. 

Pierre had that year grown so stout, that he would have been grotesque, 
had not he been so tall, so broad-shouldered, and so powerfully built that 
he carried off his bulky proportions with evident ease. 

Puffing, and muttering something to himself, he went up the stairs. His 
coachman did not even ask whether he should wait. He knew that when 
the count was at the Rostovs', it was till midnight. 

The first person he saw at the Rostovs' was Natasha. Before he saw her, 
he heard her. She was practising her sol-fa exercises in the hall. He knew 
she had given up singing since her illness, and so he was surprised and 
delighted at the sound of her voice. He opened the door softly, and saw 
Natasha, in the lilac dress she had worn at the service, walking up and 
down the room singing. 

'I want to try and sing again,' she said. 'It's something to do, any way,' 
she added as though in excuse. 

'Quite right too!' 

'How glad I am you have come! I'm so happy to-day,' she said with the 
old eagerness that Pierre had not seen for so long. 'You know, Nikolenka 
has got the St. George's Cross. I'm so proud of him.' 

'Of course, I sent you the announcement. Well, I won't interrupt you,' he 
added, and would have gone on to the drawing-room. 

Natasha stopped him. 

'Count, is it wrong of me to sing?' she said, blushing, but still keeping 
her eyes fixed inquiringly on Pierre. 

'No. . . . Why should it be? On the contrary. . . . But why do you 
ask me?' 

'I don't know myself,' Natasha answered quickly; 'but I shouldn't like 
to do anything you wouldn't like. I trust you in everything. You don't 
know how much you are to me, and what a great deal you have done for 
me!'. . . She spoke quickly, and did not notice how Pierre flushed at these 



314 WAR AND PEACE 

words. 'I saw in that announcement, he, Bolkonsky' (she uttered the word 
in a rapid whisper), 'he is in Russia, and in the army again. What do you 
think,' she said hurriedly, evidently in haste to speak because she was 
afraid her strength would fail her, 'will he ever forgive me? Will he not 
always have an evil feeling for me? What do you thinK? What do you 
think?' 

'I think . . .' said Pierre. 'He has nothing to forgive ... If I were in 
his place . . .' From association of ideas, Pierre was instantly carried back 
in imagination to the time when he had comforted her by saying that if he 
were not himself, but the best man in the world and free, he would beg on 
his knees for her hand, and the same feeling of pity, tenderness, and love 
took possession of him, and the same words rose to his lips. But she did 
not give him time to utter them. 

'Yes, you— you,' she said, uttering that word you with enthusiasm, 'that's 
a different matter. Any one kinder, more generous than you, I have never 
known— no one could be. If it had not been for you then, and now too 
... I don't know what would have become of me, because . . .' 

At that moment Petya ran in from the drawing-room. 

Petya was by now a handsome, rosy lad of fifteen, with full red lips, 
very like Natasha. He was being prepared for the university, but had 
lately resolved in secret with his comrade, Obolensky, to go into the 
hussars. Petya rushed up to his namesake, Pierre, to find out whether he 
would be accepted. 

'Come, tell me about my plan, Pyotr Kirillovitch, for mercy's sake! 
You're my only hope,' said Petya. 

'Oh yes, your plan. To be an hussar? I'll speak about it; to-day I'll tel) 
them all about it.' 

'Well, my dear fellow, have you got the manifesto?' asked the old count. 

'Yes, I have got it,' answered Pierre. 'The Tsar will be here tomorrow. 
. . . There's to be an extraordinary meeting of the nobility and a levy 
they say of ten per thousand. Oh, I congratulate you.' 

'Yes, yes, thank God. Well, and what news from the army?' 

'Our soldiers have retreated again. They are before Smolensk, they say,' 
answered Pierre. 

'Mercy on us, mercy on us!' said the count. 

At dinner they drank champagne to the health of the new cavalier of 
St. George, and Shinshin told them of the news of the town, and described 
how a German had been brought before Rastoptchin by the people, who 
declared (so Count Rastoptchin told the story) that he was a champignon, 
and how Count Rastoptchin had bade them let the champignon go, as he 
was really nothing but an old German mushroom. 

'They keep on seizing people,' said the count. 'I tell the countess she 
ought not to speak French so much. Now's not the time to do it.' 

'And did you hear,' said Shinshin, 'Prince Galitzin has engaged a Russian 
teacher— he's learning Russian. It begins to be dangerous to speak French 
in the streets.' 



WAR AND PEACE 315 

'Well, Count Pyotr Kirillovitch, now if they raise a general militia, you 
will have to mount a horse too, ah?' said the old count addressing Pierre. 

Pierre was dreamy and silent all dinner-time. He looked at the count as 
though not understanding. 

'Yes, yes, for the war,' he said. 'No! A fine soldier I should make! And 
yet everything's so strange; so strange! Why, I don't understand it myself. 
I don't know, I am far from being military in my taste, but in these days 
no one can answer for himself.' 

After dinner the count settled himself comfortably in a low chair, and 
with a serious face asked Sony a, who enjoyed the reputation of a good 
reader, to read the Tsar's appeal. 

' "To our metropolitan capital Moscow. The enemy has entered our bor- 
der with an immense host and comes to lay waste our beloved country,"' 
Sonya read conscientiously in her thin voice. The count listened with 
closed eyes, heaving abrupt sighs at certain passages. 

Natasha sat erect, looking inquisitively and directly from her father to 
Pierre. 

Pierre felt her eyes on him and tried not to look round. The countess 
shook her head disapprovingly and wrathfully at every solemn expression 
in the manifesto. In all these words she saw nothing but that the danger 
menacing her son would not soon be over. 

After reading of the dangers threatening Russia, the hopes the Tsar 
rested upon Moscow, and particularly on its illustrious nobility, Sonya, 
with a quiver in her voice, due principally to the attention with which they 
were listening to her, read the last words: ' "We shall without delay be in 
the midst of our people in the capital, and in other parts of our empire, 
for deliberation, and for the guidance of all our militia levies, both those 
which are already barring the progress of the foe, and those to be formed 
for conflict with him, wherever he may appear. And may the ruin which 
he threatens us recoil on his own head, and may Europe, delivered from 
bondage, glorify the name of Russia!" ' 

'That's right!' cried the count, opening his wet eyes. He went on, 'Only 
let our sovereign say the word, we will sacrifice everything without 
grudging. We're not a set of Germans!' 

Meanwhile Petya, to whom no one was paying attention, went up to his 
father, and very red, said in a voice that passed abruptly from gruffness to 
shrillness, 'Well, now, papa, I tell you positively— and mamma too, say what 
you will— I tell you you must let me go into the army, because I cannot 
. . . and that's all about it.' 

The countess in dismay turned her eyes up to heaven, clasped her hands, 
and said angrily to her husband: 

'See, what your talk has brought us to!' 

But the count recovered the same instant from the excitement. 

'Come, come,' he said. 'A fine warrior you'd make! Don't talk nonsense-, 
you have your studies to attend to.' 

'It's not nonsense, papa. Fedya Obolensky's younger than I am, and he's 



316 WAR AND PEACE 

going too; and what's more, I can't anyhow study now, when . . .' Petya 
stopped, flushed till his face was perspiring, yet stoutly went on . . . 
'when the country's in danger.' 

'Hush, hush, nonsense! . . .' 

'Why, but you said yourself you would sacrifice everything.' 

'Petya! I tell you be quiet,' cried the count, looking at his wife, who was 
gazing with a white face and fixed eyes at her younger son. 

'Let me say . . . Pyotr Kirillovitch here will tell you . . .' 

'I tell you, it's nonsense; the milk's hardly dry on his lips, and he wants 
to go into the army! Come, come, I tell you,' and the count, taking the 
papers with him, was going out of the room, probably to read them once 
more in his study before his nap. 

'Pyotr Kirillovitch, let us have a smoke. . . .' 

'No; I think I'll go home. . . .' 

'Go home? But you meant to spend the evening with us. . . . You come 
rarely enough, as it is. And this girl of mine,' said the count good- 
humouredly, looking towards Natasha, 'is never in spirits but when you 
are here. . . .' 

'But I have forgotten something. I really must go home. . . . Busi- 
ness. . . .' Pierre said hurriedly. 

'Well, good-bye then,' said the count as he went out of the room. 

'Why are you going away? Why are you so upset? What for?' Natasha 
asked Pierre, looking with challenging eyes into his face. 

'Because I love you!' he wanted to say, but he did not say it. He crim- 
soned till the tears came, and dropped his eyes. 

'Because it is better for me not to be so often with you. . . . Because 
. . . no, simply I have business. . . .' 

'What for? No, do tell me,' Natasha was beginning resolutely, and she 
suddenly stopped. Both in dismay and embarrassment looked at one an- 
other. He tried to laugh, but could not; he kissed her hand and went out 
without a word. 

Pierre made up his mind not to visit the Rostovs again. 

Next day, the Tsar arrived in Moscow. That morning Petya spent a 
long time dressing. He combed his hair and arranged his collar like a 
grown-up man. He screwed up his eyes before the looking-glass, gesticu- 
lated, shrugged his shoulders, and finally, without saying anything to any 
one, he put on his cap and went out of the house by the back way, trying 
to escape observation. 

Petya had resolved to go straight to where the Tsar was, and to explain 
frankly to some gentleman-in-waiting (Petya fancied that the Tsar was 
always surrounded by gentlemen-in-waiting) that he, Count Rostov, 
wished, in spite of his youth, to serve his country, that youth could be no 
hindrance to devotion, and that he was ready . . . Petya had, while he was 
dressing, prepared a great many fine speeches to make to the gentleman- 
in-waiting. 

Petya reckoned on the success of his presentation to the Tsar simply 



WAR AND PEACE 317 

because he was a child (Petya dreamed, indeed, of how they would wonder 
at his youth), and yet in the sedate, deliberate walk he adopted, he tried 
to act the part of an elderly man. But the further he went, the more inter- 
ested he became in the growing crowds about the Kremlin, and he forgot 
to keep up the sedateness and deliberation characteristic of grown-up 
people. As he got closer to the Kremlin, he began to try to avoid being 
crushed, and with a resolute and threatening mien, stuck elbows out on 
each side of him. But in the Toistsky Gate the crowd, probably unaware 
of his patriotic object in going to the Kremlin, pushed him against the wall 
into the stinking corner of the gateway. 

Petya rubbed the sweat off his face with his hands, and set straight the 
soaking collar, afraid that if he showed himself in this guise the gentlemen- 
in-waiting would not admit him to the Tsar's presence. When all the car- 
riages had driven by, the crowd made a rush, and swept Petya along with 
it into the square, which was already full of people. Not only in the 
square, but on the slopes, and the roofs, and everywhere there were people. 
Petya heard the ringing of bells and the joyous hum of the crowd filling the 
whole Kremlin. 

All the faces wore the same expression of excitement and enthusiasm. A 
shopkeeper's wife standing near Petya sobbed, and tears flowed down her 
cheeks. 

'Father, angel!* she kept saying, wiping her tears with her fingers. 

'Hurrah!' shouted the crowd on all sides. 

'So this is the Tsar!' thought Petya. 'No, I could never give him the 
petition myself, it would be too bold!' 

In spite of that, he still forced his way forward as desperately, and caught 
a glimpse of open space with a passage covered with red cloth in the midst 
of it. But at that moment the crowd began heaving back; the police in front 
were forcing back those who had pressed too close to the procession. The 
Tsar was passing from the palace to the Uspensky Sobor. Petya received 
such a sudden blow in the ribs, and was so squeezed, that all at once a mist 
passed before his eyes, and he lost consciousness. When he came to himself, 
a clerical personage, with a mane of grey hair on his shoulders, in a shabby 
blue cassock— probably a deacon— was holding him up with one arm, while 
with the other he kept off the crowd. 

'A young gentleman's been crushed!' the deacon was saying. 'Mind what 
you're about! . . . easy there! . . . you're crushing him, you're crushing 
him!' 

The Tsar had entered the Uspensky Sobor. The crowd spread out again, 
and the deacon got Petya pale and breathless on to the big cannon. 

'Any one may be crushed to death like that. What next! Killing people! 
Why, the poor dear's as white as a sheet,' said voices. 

Petya soon recovered, and the colour came back into his face; the pain 
was over, and by this temporary inconvenience he had gained a seat on the 
cannon, from which he hoped to see the Tsar, who was to walk back. Petya 



318 WAR AND PEACE 

thought no more now of presenting his petition. If only he could see him, 
he would think himself lucky! During the service in the Uspensky Sobor, 
in celebration of the Tsar's arrival, and also in thanksgiving for the peace 
with the Turks, the crowd dispersed about the square, and hawkers 
appeared crying kvass, gingerbread, and poppyseed sweets— of which Petya 
was particularly fond— and he could hear the usual talk among the people. 
One shopkeeper's wife was showing her torn shawl, and saying how much 
she had paid for it; while another observed that all silk things were very 
dear nowadays. 

Suddenly four men in uniforms and decorations came out from the doors 
of the Sobor. 'Hurrah! hurrah!' the crowd shouted again. 

'Which? which one?' Petya asked in a weeping voice of those around 
him, but no one answered him. Every one was too much excited, and Petya, 
picking out one of the four, and hardly able to see him for the tears that 
started into his eyes, concentrated all his enthusiasm on him, though it 
happened not to be the Tsar. He shouted 'Hurrah!' in a voice of frenzy, 
and resolved that to-morrow, come what might of it, he would join the 
army. 

From the Kremlin, Petya went not home, but to his comrade Obolensky's. 
He was fifteen, and he, too, was going into the army. On getting home, 
Petya announced with decision and firmness that if they would not let him 
do so too, he would run away. 

And next day, though Count Ilya Andreivitch had not quite yielded, he 
went to inquire if a commission could be obtained for Petya somewhere 
where there would be little danger. 

On the morning of the 15th, the next day but one, a great number of 
carriages stood outside the Slobodsky palace. 

Pierre, who had been since early morning in an uncomfortable uniform 
that had become too tight for him, was in a state of excitement. This 
extraordinary assembly, not only of the nobility, but of the merchant class 
too— the estates, etats generaux— called up in him a whole series of ideas of 
the Contrat Social and the French Revolution, ideas imprinted deeply on his 
soul, though they had long been laid aside. The words he had noticed in 
the manifesto, that the Tsar was coming to the capital for deliberation with 
his people, confirmed him in this chain of thought. And supposing that 
something of importance in that direction was near at hand, that what he 
had long been looking for was coming, he looked and listened attentively. 

The Tsar's manifesto was read, and evoked enthusiasm; and then all 
moved about, talking. Apart from their everyday interests, Pierre heard 
discussion as to where the marshals were to stand when the Tsar should 
come in, when the ball was to be given for the Tsar, whether they were 
to be divided according to districts or the whole province together . . . 
and so on. But as soon as the war and the whole object of their meeting 
together was touched upon, the talk was uncertain and hesitating. 

A manly looking, handsome^ middle-aged man, wearing the uniform 01 



WAR AND PEACE 319 

a retired naval officer, was speaking, and a little crowd was gathered about 
him in one of the rooms. 

'And were our militiamen of any service to the state? Not the slightest! 
They only ruined our agriculture. Even conscription is better. . . . We 
will go ourselves to a man; take recruits, too; and the Tsar has but to say 
the word, and we will all die for him,' added the orator, warming up. 

Pierre wanted to speak too. He was just opening his mouth when he was 
interrupted by a perfectly toothless senator with a shrewd and wrathful 
face, who was standing close by the last orator. 

'I imagine, my dear sir,' said the senator, mumbling with his toothless 
mouth, 'that we are summoned here not to discuss which is more suitable 
for the country at the present moment— conscription or the militia. We 
are summoned to reply to the appeal which our sovereign the Emperor 
graciously deigns to make to us. And to judge which is the fitter means- 
recruiting or a levy for militia— we leave to a higher power. . . .' 

Pierre suddenly found the right outlet for his excitement. 

'Excuse me, your excellency,' he began, 'but I imagine that the Tsar 
would himself be displeased if he should find in us only the owners of 
peasants, whom we give up to him, and chair a canon, which we offer in 
ourselves— and should not find in us co . . . co . . . counsel. . . .' 

Many persons moved a little away from the circle, noticing the disdainful 
smile of the senator and the freedom of Pierre's words. 

'I consider that before discussing these questions,' Pierre continued, 'we 
ought to ask the Emperor to communicate to us what forces we have, what 
is the position of our men and our army, and then . . .' 

Pierre had hardly uttered these words when he was promptly attacked 
on three sides at once. The most violent onslaught was made upon him by 
an old acquaintance who, with an old man's anger in his face, screamed at 
Pierre: 

'In the first place, let me tell you that we have no right to ask such 
questions of the Emperor; and secondly, if the nobility had any such right, 
the Emperor could not answer such questions. The movements of the 
troops depend on the movements of the enemy; the troops are augmented 
and decreased . . .' 

Another voice interrupted. 

'Yes, and it's not the time for deliberation. What's needed is action; there 
is war in Russia. Our foe comes to ruin Russia, to desecrate the tombs of 
our fathers, to carry away our wives and children.' The gentleman struck 
himself a blow on the chest. 'We will all rise up; we will all go to a man, we 
will follow our father the Tsar!' he cried, rolling his bloodshot eyes. Several 
approving voices could be heard in the crowd. 'We are Russians and we do 
not grudge our blood for the defence of our faith, our throne, and our 
country. But we must put a stop to idle talk, if we are true sons of our 
fatherland. We will show Europe how Russia can defend Russia!' shouted 
this gentleman. 

Pierre tried to reply, but he could not get in a word. A number of 



320 WAR AND PEACE 

voices were speaking and shouting together, all in the same tone. The editor 
of the Russian Messenger, recognized and greeted with shouts of 'the author, 
the author!' said that hell must be driven back by hell. 

'I only said that we could make sacrifices to better purpose when we 
know what is needed,' Pierre cried, trying to shout down the other voices. 

One old man close by him looked round, but his attention was imme- 
diately called off. 

'Yes, Moscow will be surrendered! She will be the expiation!' one man 
was shouting. 

'He is the enemy of mankind!' another shouted. 

At that moment Count Rastoptchin, with his prominent chin and alert 
eyes, strode in rapidly through the parting crowd, wearing the uniform 
of a general and a ribbon over his shoulder. 

'Our sovereign the Emperor will be here immediately,' said Rastoptchin. 
'I have just come from him. I presume that in the position in which we are 
placed, there is no need of much discussion. The Emperor has graciously 
seen fit to summon us and the merchants,' said Count Rastoptchin. 'They 
will pour out their millions' (he pointed to the merchants' hall); 'it is our 
duty to raise men and not to spare ourselves. ... It is the least we can do.' 

Pierre felt nothing at that moment but the desire to show that he was 
ready to sacrifice everything. The constitutional tenor of his speech 
weighed on him like a sin; he told Count Rastoptchin that he would furnish 
one thousand men and their equipment. 

Old Rostov agreed at once to Petya's wishes, and went himself to enter 
his name. 



PART X 



Napoleon began the war with Russia because he could not help going to 
Dresden, being dazzled by the homage paid him there, putting on the Polish 
uniform, yielding to the stimulating influence of a June morning, and giving 
way to an outburst of fury. 

Alexander refused all negotiations because he felt himself personally in- 
sulted. Rostov charged the French because he could not resist the temptation 
to gallop across the level plain. And all the innumerable persons who took 
part in the war acted similarly, in accordance with their personal peculiari- 
ties, habits, circumstances, and aims. They were all impelled by fear or 
vanity, enjoyment, indignation, or national consideration, supposing that 
they knew what they were about and that they were acting independently, 
while they were all the involuntary tools of history and were working out 
a result concealed from themselves but comprehensible to us. 

Providence compelled all those men in striving for the attainment of their 
personal aims to combine in accomplishing one immense result, of which 
no one individual man (not Napoleon, not Alexander, still less any one 
taking practical part in the campaign) had the slightest inkling. 

Now it is clear to us what was the cause of the destruction of the French 
army in 1812. No one disputes that the cause of the loss of Napoleon's 
French forces was, on one hand, their entering at too late a season upon a 
winter march in the heart of Russia without sufficient preparation; and on 
the other, the character the war had assumed from the burning of Russian 
towns and the hatred the enemy aroused in the peasantry. But obvious as it 
seems now, no one at the time foresaw that this was the only means by 
which the best army in the world, eight hundred thousand strong, led by the 
best of generals, could be defeated in a conflict with the inexperienced 
Russian army of half the strength, led by inexperienced generals. Not only 
was this utterly unforeseen, but every effort indeed was being continually 
made on the Russian side to hinder the one means that could save Russia; 
and in spite of the experience and so-called military genius of Napoleon, 
every effort was made on the French side to push on to Moscow at the end 
of the summer, that is to do the very thing bound to bring about their ruin. 

In historical works on the year 181 2, the French writers arc very fond of 
saying that Napoleon was aware of the danger of lengthening out his line, 
that he sought a decisive engagement, that his marshals advised him to stay 
at Smolensk, and similar statements to show that even at the time the real 

321 



322 WAR AND PEACE 

danger of the campaign was seen. The Russian historians are still fonder of 
declaring that from the beginning of the campaign there existed a plan of 
Scythian warfare by leading Napoleon on into the heart of Russia. But 
the notion that Napoleon was aware of the danger of extending his line, 
and that the Russians had a scheme for drawing the enemy into the heart 
of Russia, obviously belong to the same category; and only historians with 
a great bias can ascribe such reflections to Napoleon and his marshals, or 
such plans to the Russian generals. All the facts are directly opposed to 
such a view. 

Far from desiring to lure the French into the heart of Russia, the Russians 
did their utmost to arrest their progress throughout the war from the time 
they crossed the frontier. And far from dreading the extension of his line 
of communications, Napoleon rejoiced at every step forward as a triumph. 

The Emperor was with tne army to inspire it not to yield an inch of 
Russian soil and on no account to retreat further. The Tsar reprimanded the 
commander-in-chief for every retreat. The Tsar can never have anticipated 
the burning of Moscow, or even the enemy's presence at Smolensk, and 
when the armies had been reunited, the Tsar was indignant at the taking 
and burning of Smolensk without a general engagement having been fought 
before its walls. Russian generals, and the whole Russian people, were even 
more indignant at the idea of our men retreating. 

Napoleon, after dividing up the army, moved on into the heart of the 
country. In August he was in Smolensk and thinking of nothing but advanc- 
ing further, though, as we see now, that advance meant inevitable ruin. 

We were surprised into having to fight at Smolensk to save our com- 
munications. A battle was fought. Thousands were slain on both sides. 

Smolensk was abandoned against the will of the Tsar and the whole 
people. But Smolensk was burnt by its own inhabitants, who had been 
deceived by their governor. And those ruined inhabitants, after setting an 
example to the rest of Russia, full of their losses, and burning with hatred 
of the enemy, moved on to Moscow. Napoleon advances; we retreat; and 
so the very result is attained that is destined to overthrow Napoleon. 

The day after his son's departure, Prince Nikolay Andreivitch sent for 
Princess Marya. 

'Well, now are you satisfied?' he said to her. 'You have made me quarrel 
with my son! Are you satisfied? That was all you wanted! Satisfied? . . . 
It's a grief to me, a grief. I'm old and weak, and it was your wish. Well, 
now, rejoice over it. . . .' And after that, Princess Marya did not see her 
father again for a week. He was ill and did not leave his study. 

The war Princess Marya looked on as women do look on war. She was 
apprehensive for her brother who was at the front, and was horrified, 
without understanding it, at the cruelty of men, that led them to kill one 
another. But she had no notion of the significance of this war, which 
seemed to her exactly like all the preceding wars. 

The principal reason why Princess Marya failed to grasp the significance 



WAR AND PEACE 323 

of the war was that the old prince never spoke of it, refused to recognize 
its existence, and laughed at Dessalle when he mentioned the war at 
dinner-time. The prince's tone was so calm and confident that Princess 
Marya put implicit faith in him. 

On the first of August a second letter came from Prince Andrey. In his 
first letter, which had been received shortly after he left home, Prince 
Andrey had humbly asked his father's forgiveness for what he had permitted 
himself to say to him. To this letter, the old prince had sent an affectionate 
answer, and from that time he had kept the Frenchwoman at a distance. 
Prince Andrey's second letter was written under Vitebsk, after the French 
had taken it. In this letter Prince Andrey pointed out to his father the 
inconvenience of his position close to the theatre of war, and in the direct 
line of the enemy's advance, and advised him to move to Moscow. 

At dinner that day, on Dessalle's observing that he had heard that the 
French had already entered Vitebsk, the old prince recollected Prince 
Andrey's letter. 

'He writes about this war,' said the prince, with the contemptuous smile 
that had become habitual with him in speaking of the present war. 

'It must be very interesting,' said Dessalle. 'Prince Andrey is in a position 
to know. . . .' 

'Ah, very interesting!' said Mademoiselle Bourienne. 

'It is very possible that the field of operations may be brought so close 
to us . . .' 

'Ha-ha-ha! The field of operations indeed!' said the old prince. 'I have 
always said, and I say still, that the field of operations is bound to be Poland* 
and the enemy will never advance beyond the Niemen.' Dessalle looked in 
amazement at the prince, who was talking of the Niemen, when the enemy 
was already at the Dnieper. But Princess Marya, forgetting the geographical 
position of the Niemen, supposed that what her father said was true. 

'When the snows thaw they'll drown in the marshes of Poland. It's only 
that they can't see it,' said the old prince, obviously thinking of the cam- 
paign of 1807, which seemed to him so recent. 

In the evening Mihail Ivanitch was sent by the prince to Princess Marya 
to ask for the letter that had been forgotten on the table. Princess Marya 
ventured to ask what her father was doing. 

'Still very busy,' said Mihail Ivanitch, in a tone of deferential irony. 'Been 
reading a little: but now'— Mihail Ivanitch dropped his voice— 'he's at his 
bureau looking after his will, I expect.' 

'And is Alpatitch being sent to Smolensk?' asked Princess Marya. 

'To be sure; he's been waiting a long while for his orders.' 

When Mihail Ivanitch went back to the study with the letter, the old 
prince was sitting at his open bureau, surrounded by papers. He had noted 
down what he wanted in Smolensk, and he began walking up and down the 
room, as he gave his instructions to Alpatitch, standing at the door. 

'First, letter paper, do you hear, eight quires, like this pattern, you see; 
gilt edged . . . take the pattern, so as to be sure to match it; varnish, sealing- 



324 WAR AND PEACE 

wax— Well, go along, go along,' said the old prince; 'if anything is wanted, 
I'll send.' 

Bleak Hills was sixty versts from Smolensk, and three versts from the 
main road to Moscow. 

Dessale asked for a few words with Princess Marya, and told her that 
since the prince was not quite well and was taking no steps to secure his 
own safety, though from Prince Andrey's letter it was plain that to stay on 
at Bleak Hills was not free from danger, he respectfully advised her to send 
by Alpatitch a letter to the governor at Smolensk, and to ask him to let her 
know the degree of danger they were running at Bleak Hills. Dessalle wrote 
the letter to the governor for Princess Marya and she signed it, and the let- 
ter was given to Alpatitch with instructions to give it to the governor, and 
in case there was danger, to come back as quickly as possible. 

'If there's anything . . . you turn back, Yakov Alpatitch; for Christ's 
sake, think of us,' his wife called to him, alluding to the rumours of war 
and of the enemy near. 

'Ah, these women and their fuss!' Alpatitch muttered to himself as he 
drove off, looking about him at the fields. He saw rye turning yellow, thick 
oats still green, and here and there patches still black, where they were only 
just beginning the second ploughing. Alpatitch drove on, admiring the crop 
of corn, meditating like a true husbandman on the sowing and the harvest, 
and wondering whether he had forgotten any of the prince's instructions. 
He stopped twice to feed his horses on the way, and towards the evening 
of the 4th of August reached the town. 

All the way Alpatitch had met and overtaken waggons and troops, and 
as he drove into Smolensk he heard firing in the distance, but he scarcely 
heeded the sound. What struck him more than anything was that close to 
Smolensk he saw a splendid field of oats being mown down by some soldiers 
evidently for forage; there was a camp, too, pitched in the middle of it. 
This did make an impression upon Alpatitch, but he soon forgot it in think- 
ing over his own affairs. 

All the interests of Alpatitch's life had been for over thirty years bounded 
by the will of the prince, and he never stepped outside that limit. Anything 
that had nothing to do with carrying out the prince's orders had no interest, 
had in fact no existence, for Alpatitch. 

On reaching Smolensk on the evening of the 4th of August, Alpatitch 
put up where he had been in the habit of putting up for the last thirty years, 
at a tavern kept by a former house-porter. 

'You're kindly welcome, Yakov Alpatitch. Folk are going out of the 
town, while you come into it,' said he. 

'How's that? Out of town?' said Alpatitch. 

'To be sure, I always say folks are fools. Always frightened of the French.' 

Women's nonsense, women's nonsense!' replied Alpatitch. 

'That's just what I think, Yakov Alpatitch. I say there's a notice put up 
that they won't let them come in, so to be sure that's right. But the peasants 



WAR AND PEACE 325 

are asking as much as three roubles for a cart and horse— they've no 
conscience!' 

Yakov Alpatitch heard without heeding. He asked for a samovar, and for 
hay for his horses; and after drinking tea lay down to sleep. 

All night long the troops were moving along the street by the tavern* 
Next day Alpatitch put on a tunic, which he kept for wearing in town, and 
went out to execute his commissions. It was a sunny morning, and by eight 
o'clock it was hot. 'A precious day for the harvest,' as Alpatitch thought. 
From early morning firing could be heard from beyond the town. 

At eight o'clock the boom of cannon mingled with the rattle of musketry. 
The streets were thronged with people, hurrying about, and also with 
soldiers, but drivers plied for hire, the shopkeepers stood at their shops, 
and services were being held in the churches just as usual. Alpatitch went 
to the shops, to the government offices, to the post and to the governor's. 
Everywhere that he went every one was talking of the war, and of the 
enemy who was attacking the town. All were asking one another what was 
to be done, and trying to calm each other's fears. 

At the governor's house, Alpatitch found a great number of people, and 
saw Cossacks, and a travelling carriage belonging to the governor at the 
entrance. On the steps Yakov Alpatitch met two gentlemen, one of whom 
he knew. 

'Ah, Yakov Alpatitch, how do you come here?' 

'By command of his excellency to his honour the governor,' answered 
Alpatitch, lifting his head proudly as he always did when he mentioned the 
old prince. . . . 'His honour was pleased to bid me inquire into the position 
of affairs,' he said. 

'Well, you may as well know then,' cried the gentleman: 'they have 
brought matters to such a pass that there are no carts to be got, nothing! 
. . . That's it again, do you hear?' he said, pointing in the direction from 
which the sounds of firing came. 

'They have brought us all to ruin . . . the brigands!' he declared again, 
and he went down the steps. 

Alpatitch shook his head and went up. The waiting-room was full of 
merchants, women, and clerks, looking dumbly at one another. A clerk ran 
out, said something to a merchant, called a stout official with a cross on his 
neck to follow him, and vanished again, obviously trying to avoid all the 
looks and the questions addressed to him. Alpatitch moved forward, and the 
next time the same clerk emerged, he addressed him, handing him the two 
letters. 

'To his honour the Baron from the general-in-chicf Prince Bolkonsky/ 
he boomed out with so much pomposity and significance that the clerk 
turned to him and took the letters. A few minutes afterwards Alpatitch was 
shown into the presence of the governor, who said to him hurriedly, 'Inform 
the prince and the princess that I knew nothing about it. I acted on the 
highest instructions— here. . . .' 



326 WAR AND PEACE 

He gave Alpatitch a document. 

•Still, as the prince is not well my advice to him is to go to Moscow. I'm 
setting off myself immediately. Tell them . . .' But the governor did not 
finish; a dusty and perspiring officer ran into the room and began saying 
something in French. A look of horror came into the governor's face. 

'You can go/ he said, nodding to Alpatitch, and he put some questions to 
the officer. Alpatitch could not help listening now to firing, which seemed 
to come closer and to be getting hotter, as he hurried back to the inn. The 
document the governor had given to Alpatitch ran as follows: 

'I guarantee that the town of Smolensk is not in the slightest danger, and 
it is improbable that it should be threatened in any way. I myself from one 
side, and Prince Bagration from the other, will effect a junction before 
Smolensk on the 22nd instant, and both armies will proceed with their joint 
forces to defend their compatriots of the province under your government, 
till their efforts beat back the enemies of our country, or till their gallant 
ranks are cut down to the last warrior. You will see from this that you have 
a perfect right to reassure the inhabitants of Smolensk, as they are defended 
by two such valiant armies and can be confident of their victory. 

('By order of Barclay de Tolly to the civil governor of Smolensk, Baron 
Ash. 1812.') 

Crowds of people were moving uneasily about the streets. Waggons, 
loaded up with household crockery, chairs, and cupboards, were constantly 
emerging from the gates of houses. 

Alpatitch's step was more hurried than usual as he entered the yard, and 
went straight under the shed to his horses and cart. The coachman was 
asleep; he told him to put the horses in. 

It was by now long past midday, half the street lay in shadow, while half 
was in brilliant sunshine. All of a sudden there came a strange sound of a 
far-away hiss and thump, followed by the boom of cannons, mingling into 
a dim roar that set the windows rattling. 

Alpatitch went out into the street; two men were running towards the 
bridge. From different sides came the hiss and thud of cannon balls and the 
bursting of grenades, as they fell in the town. But these sounds were almost 
unheard, and the inhabitants scarcely noticed them, in comparison with the 
boom of the cannons they heard beyond the town. It was the bombardment, 
which Napoleon had ordered to be opened upon the town at four o'clock 
from one hundred and thirty cannons. 

People did not at first grasp the meaning of this bombardment. The 
sounds of the dropping grenades and cannon balls only excited curiosity. 
The cook and shopman came out to the gate. All were trying to get a 
glimpse of the projectiles as they flew over their heads. 

'What force!' one was saying; 'roof and ceiling were smashed up to 
splinters.' 
'Like a pig routing into earth, it went!' said another. 
Others stopped and described how a cannon ball had dropped on a house 
close to them. Meanwhile other projectiles— now a cannon ball, with rapid, 



WAR AND PEACE 327 

ominous hiss, and now a grenade with a pleasant whistle— flew incessantly- 
over the people's heads: but not one fell close, all of them flew over. 
Alpatitch got into his gig. 

Again something hissed, but very close this time, like a bird swooping 
down; there was a flash of fire in the middle of the street, the sound of a 
shot, and the street was filled with smoke. At the same instant there rose a 
piteous wailing from the women, and the people crowded round the cook. 

'O-o-oy, good kind souls, blessed friends! don't let me die! Good kind 
souls! . . .' 

Five minutes later no one was left in the street. The cook, with her leg 
broken by the bursting grenade, had been carried into the kitchen. Al- 
patitch, his coachman, and the porter were sitting in the cellar listening. The 
thunder of the cannon, the hiss of the balls, and the piteous moaning of the 
cook, which rose above all the noise, never ceased for an instant. The crowd 
had gone to the cathedral, where they were raising on high the wonder- 
working, holy picture of Smolensk. 

Towards dusk the cannonade began to subside. Alpatitch came out of 
the cellar and stood in the doorway. 

The clear evening sky was all overcast with smoke. After the terrible 
thunder of the cannons had ceased, a hush seemed to hang over the town, 
broken only by the sound of groans and distant shouts, and the crackle of 
fires. On two sides black clouds of smoke from fires rose up and drifted 
away. Soldiers in different uniforms walked and ran about the streets in 
different directions, not in ranks, but like ants out of a disturbed ant heap. 

'The town's surrendered; get away, get away,' said an officer, and turning 
immediately to the soldiers, he shouted, 'I'll teach you to run through the 
yards!' 

As Alpatitch was driving out of the gate, he saw about a dozen soldiers 
in an open shop. They were filling their bags and knapsacks with wheaten 
flour and sunflower seeds. At that moment the shopman returned. 

'Carry it all away, lads! Don't leave it for the devils,' he shouted, snatch- 
ing up the sacks himself and pitching them into the street. 

'It's all over with Russia!' he shouted. 'Alpatitch! it's all over! I'll set fire 
to it myself. It's over . . .' 

It was by now quite dark. There were stars in the sky, and from time to 
time the new moon shone through the veil of smoke. Alpatitch's vehicle 
moved slowly along in the rows of soldiers and of other conveyances, and 
on the slope down to the Dnieper they had to halt altogether. In a lane not 
far from the cross-roads where the traffic had come to a full stop, there 
were shops and a house on fire. The flame died down and was lost in black 
smoke, then flared up suddenly, lighting up with strange distinctness the 
faces of the crowd at the cross-roads. Black figures were flitting about 
before the fire, and talk and shouts could be heard above the unceasing 
crackling of the flames. Alpatitch, seeing that it would be some time before 
his gig could move forward, got out and went back to the lane to look at 
the fire. Soldiers were scurrying to and fro. 



328 WAR AND PEACE 

Alpatitch joined a great crowd of people standing before a high corn 
granary in full blaze. The walls were all in flames; the back wall had fallen 
in; the plank roof was breaking down, and the beams were glowing. The 
crowd were evidently watching for the moment when the roof would fall 
in. Alpatitch too waited to see it. 

'Alpatitch!' the old man suddenly heard a familiar voice calling to him. 

'Mercy on us, your excellency,' answered Alpatitch, recognising the 
voice of his young master. 

Prince Andrey, wearing a cape, and mounted on a black horse, was in 
the crowd. 

'How did you come here?' he asked. 

'Your . . . your excellency!' Alpatitch articulated, and he broke into 
sobs. . . . 'Your, your ... is it all over with us, really? Master . . .' 

'How is it you are here?' repeated Prince Andrey. The flames flared up 
at that instant, and Alpatitch saw in the bright light his young master's 
pale and worn face. Alpatitch told him how he had been sent to the town 
and had difficulty in getting away. 

'What do you say, your excellency, is it all over with us? ' he asked again. 

Prince Andrey, making no reply, took out his note-book. 

'Smolensk has surrendered,' he wrote. 'Bleak Hills will be occupied by 
the enemy within a week. Set off at once for Moscow. Let me know at 
once when you start; send a messenger to Usvyazh.' 

Scribbling these words, and giving Alpatitch the paper, he gave him 
further directions about sending off the old prince, the princess and his 
son with his tutor, and how and where to let him hear, as soon as they 
had gone. 

'Tell them then that I shall wait for an answer till the ioth, and if I 
don't receive news by the ioth, that they have all gone away, I shall be 
obliged to throw up everything and go myself to Bleak Hills.' 

There was a crash in the fire. The flames subsided for an instant; black 
clouds of smoke rolled under the roof. There was another fearful crash, 
and the falling of some enormous weight. 

'Ooo-roo!' the crowd yelled, as the ceiling of the granary fell in, and a 
smell of baked cakes rose from the burning wheat. The flames flared up 
again, and lighted up the delighted and careworn faces of the crowd 
around it. 

A man in a frieze coat, brandishing his arms in the air, was shouting: 

'First-rate! Now she's started! First-rate, lads! . . .' 

'That's the owner himself,' murmured voices. 

From Smolensk the troops continued to retreat. The enemy followed them. 
On the high-road along which the troops marched there was no coolness 
even at night, not even where the road passed through the woods. The 
transports and artillery moved noiselessly, buried up to their axles, and 
the infantry sank to their ankles in the soft, stifling, burning dust, that 
clung to their legs and to the wheels, rose in a cloud over their heads, and 



WAR AND PEACE 329 

got into the eyes and hair and nostrils and lungs of men and beasts. The 
higher the sun rose, the higher rose the cloud of dust. There was no wind, 
and the men gasped for breath. They marched with handkerchiefs tied 
over their mouths and noses. When they reached the villages, there was a 
rush for the wells. They fought over the water and drank it down to 
the mud. 

The burning and abandonment of Smolensk made an epoch in Prince 
Andrey's life. A new feeling of intense hatred of the enemy made him 
forget his own sorrow. But he saw everything in the darkest, gloomiest 
light, especially after Smolensk, which he considered could and should 
have been defended, had been abandoned. 

On the ioth of August, the column of which his regiment formed part 
reached the turning leading off to Bleak Hills. Two days before Prince 
Andrey had received the news that his father, his son, and his sister had 
gone away to Moscow. Though there was nothing for Prince Andrey to 
do at Bleak Hills, he decided, with characteristic desire to aggravate his 
own sufferings, that he must ride over there. 

There was no one to be seen at the stone gates and the door was open. 
The paths of the garden were already overgrown with weeds, and cattle 
and horses were straying about the English park. Prince Andrey rode up 
to the conservatory: the panes were smashed, and some of the trees in tubs 
were broken, others quite dried up. He called the gardener. No one 
answered. Going round the conservatory on the terrace, he saw that the 
paling-fence was all broken down, and branches of the plum-trees had 
been pulled off with the fruit. 

Prince Andrey rode up to the house. Several lime-trees in the old garden 
had been cut down; a piebald mare and a colt were among the rose-trees 
just before the house. The shutters were all up in the house, except on 
one open window downstairs. A servant lad caught sight of Prince Andrey 
and ran into the house. 

Alpatitch had sent his family away, and was staying on alone at Bleak 
Hills. He was sitting indoors, reading the Lives of the Saints. On hearing 
that Prince Andrey had come, he ran out, spectacles on nose, buttoning 
himself up, hurried up to the prince, and without uttering a word, burst 
into tears. 

Then he turned away in anger at his own weakness, and began giving 
him an account of the position of affairs. Everything precious and valuable 
had been moved to Bogutcharovo. Corn to the amount of a hundred 
measures had been carried away, but the hay, and the wheat— an extraor- 
dinary crop that season, so Alpatitch said— had been cut green and carried 
off by the troops. The peasants were ruined: some of them, too, had gone 
to Bogutcharovo; a small number remained. Prince Andrey, not heeding 
his words, asked, 'When did my father and sister go?' meaning when had 
they set off for Moscow. Alpatitch, assuming he was asking about the 
removal to Bogutcharovo, answered that they had set off on the 7th, and 
began going off again into details about the crops. 



330 WAR AND PEACE 

'If your excellency noticed any disorder in the garden,' said Alpatitch, 
'it could not be prevented; three regiments have been here and spent the 
night. The dragoons were the worst; I noted down the name and rank of 
the commanding officer to lodge a complaint.' 

'Well, good-bye!' said Prince Andrey, bending over to Alpatitch. 'Go 
away yourself; take what you can; and tell the peasants to set off for the 
Ryazan estate or the property near Moscow.' 

Alpatitch broke into sobs. Prince Andrey gently moved him away, and 
galloped down the garden walk. 

Two little girls came running from the plum-trees in the conservatories 
with their skirts full of plums. They ran almost against Prince Andrey, 
and seeing their young master, the elder one clutched her younger com- 
panion by the hand, with a panic-stricken face, and hid with her behind a 
birch-tree not stopping to pick up the green plums they had dropped. 
Prince Andrey turned away from them in nervous haste, afraid of letting 
them notice that he had seen them. He was sorry to have frightened the 
pretty child. He became aware of the existence of other human interests 
utterly remote from him, and as legitimate as his own. Those little girls 
were evidently possessed by one passionate desire to carry off and devour 
those green plums without being caught, and Prince Andrey wished them 
success in their enterprise. Fancying themselves already secure, they darted 
out of their hiding-place, and ran swiftly through the grass with their bare, 
sunburnt little feet. 

Prince Andrey overtook his regiment at the halting-place near the dike 
of a small pond. It was about two o'clock in the afternoon. The sun, a red 
ball through the dust, baked and scorched his back intolerably in his black 
coat. The dust stood as immovable as ever over the buzzing, halting troops. 
There was not a breath of wind. As he rode towards the dike, Prince 
Andrey smelt the fresh, muddy smell of the pond. He longed to be in the 
water, however muddy it might be. He looked round at the pond, from 
which he heard shrieks and laughter. The small pond, thickly covered 
with green slime, was visibly half a yard higher and overflowing the dam, 
because it was full of white, naked human bodies, with brick-red hands 
and heads and necks, all plunging about in it. All that bare, white human 
flesh was splashing about with shrieks and laughter, in the muddy pool, 
like carp floundering in a net. There was a ring of merriment in that 
splashing, and that was what made it peculiarly sad. 

One fair-haired young soldier— Prince Andrey knew him— of the third 
company, with a strap round the calf of his leg, stepped back, crossing 
himself, to get a good run, and plunged into the water. Another swarthy 
and very towzle-headed sergeant up to his waist in the water, bending his 
fine, muscular figure, was snorting with enjoyment, as he poured the water 
over his head with his blackened hands. There was a sound of them 
slapping each other, and shrieks and cries. 

The officer was rubbing himself with a towel on the dike, and was 
abashed at seeing Prince Andrey. 



WAR AND PEACE 331 

'It's pleasant, really, your excellency; you should try it!' he said. 

'It's dirty,' said Prince Andrey, grimacing. 

'We will clear it out for you in a minute.' And Prince Andrey hardly 
had time to check them. He thought it would be better for him to have a 
bath in a barn. 

On the 7 th of August, Prince Bagration, at his halting-place on the 
Smolensk road, had written a letter he knew would be read to the Tsar. 
Therefore he weighed every word: 

'Dear Count Alexey Andreevitch,— I presume that the minister has already re- 
ported the abandonment of Smolensk to the enemy. It is sad, it is pitiable, and the 
whole army is in despair at the most important place having been wantonly aban- 
doned. I for my part begged him personally in the most urgent manner, and finally 
wrote to him; but nothing would persuade him. I swear to you on my honour 
that Napoleon was in a greater fix than he has ever been, and he might have los r 
half his army, but could not have taken Smolensk. 

'Our troops have fought and are fighting as never before. With fifteen thousand 
men I have held the enemy in check for thirty-five hours and beaten them, but he 
wouldn't hold his ground for fourteen hours. It is a shame and a stain on our 
army, and as for himself, I consider he ought not to be alive. If he reports that 
our losses were great, it is false; perhaps about four thousand, not that, but that 
is nothing: if it had been ten thousand, what of it, that's war. But on the other 
hand the enemy's losses were immense. 

'What would it have cost him to hold his ground for a couple of days? In 
any case they must have retired of their own accord; for they had no water for 
their men or their horses. He gave me his word he would not retreat, but all of a 
sudden sent an announcement that he was withdrawing in the night. We cannot 
fight in this way, and we may soon bring the enemy on to Moscow. . . . 

'There is a rumour afloat that you are thinking of peace. To make peace, God 
preserve us! After all the sacrifices that have been made and after such mad 
retreats— to make peace, you will set all Russia against you, and every one of us 
will feel it a disgrace to 1 * wear the uniform. If it has come to that, we ought to 
fight as long as Russia can, and as long as there are men able to stand. . . .' 

After Smolensk, Napoleon tried to force on a battle at Vyazma. But 
the Russians could not give battle till Borodino, one hundred and twelve 
versts from Moscow. From Vyazma Napoleon gave instructions for an 
advance straight upon Moscow. 

'Moscow, the Asiatic capital of this great empire, the holy city of the 
peoples of Alexander, Moscow, with its innumerable churches in the form 
of Chinese pagodas!' 

This Moscow would not let Napoleon's imagination rest. On the march 
from Vyazma Napoleon was riding on his cream-coloured English horse, 
accompanied by his guards, and sentinels, and pages, and adjutants. The 
commander of the staff dropped behind to put questions to a Russian 
prisoner taken by the cavalry. 

'Well?' said Napoleon. 

*A Cossack. He is very shrewd and talkative.' 

Napoleon smiled, and bade them give the Cossack a horse and bring him 



332 WAR AND PEACE 

before him. He wished to talk to him himself. Within an hour Denisov's 
serf Lavrushka, whom his master had left with Rostov, rode up to 
Napoleon, sitting on a French cavalry saddle and looking sly, tipsy, and 
mirthful. Napoleon bade him ride at his side and began questioning him. 

'Are you a Cossack?' 

'Yes; a Cossack, your honour.' 

Lavrushka, who had been drunk the previous evening, had been thrashed 
for it and sent to the village in quest of fowls, where he was tempted on 
by plunder till he got caught by the French. Lavrushka was one of those 
coarse, impudent lackeys, who look on it as a duty to do nothing without 
cunning and trickery, and are particularly keen in scenting out the baser 
impulses of their superiors, especially on the side of vanity and pettiness. 
On coming into the presence of Napoleon, whom he easily recognised, 
Lavrushka was not in the least taken aback, and only did his utmost to 
win the favour of his new master. 

He repeated all the gossip that was talked among the officers' servants. 
Much of it was true. But when Napoleon asked him whether the Russians 
expected to conquer Bonaparte or not, Lavrushka screwed up his eyes and 
thought a bit. 

'Well, if it does come to a battle,' he said thoughtfully, 'and pretty soon, 
then yours will win. That's a sure thing. But if now, three days and there's 
a battle after that, well then, I say, that same battle will be a long job.' 
This was translated to Napoleon. 'If a battle is fought within three days 
the French will win it, but if later, God knows what will come of it.' 
Napoleon did not smile, though he was evidently in high good-humour, 
and told him to repeat the words. 

Lavrushka noticed that, and to entertain him further, said, pretending 
not to know who he was: 

'We know, you have got your Bonaparte; he has conquered every one 
in the world, ay, but with us it will be a different story . . .' himself 
hardly aware how and why this bit of bragging patriotism slipped out. 
The interpreter translated these words without the conclusion; Bonaparte 
smiled and rode on, dreaming of that Moscow that filled his imagination. 

Princess marya was not in Moscow and out of danger as Prince Andrey 
supposed. 

After Alpatitch's return from Smolensk, the old prince seemed as 
though he had suddenly waked out of a sleep. He gave orders for the 
militiamen to assemble out of the villages, and to be armed; and wrote a 
letter to the commander-in-chief, in which he informed him of his inten- 
tion to remain at Bleak Hills to the last. 

But though resolved himself to remain, the prince made arrangements 
for sending the princess with Dessalle and the little prince to Bogutcha- 
rovo, and from there on to Moscow. Frightened at her father's feverish, 
sleepless energy, following on his previous apathv, Princess Marya could 
not bring herself to leave him alone, and for the first time in her life 



WAR AND PEACE 333 

ventured not to obey him. She refused to go, and a fearful tempest of 
wrath burst upon her. The prince drove her out of his study. He told her 
that he did not want to hear of her existence, but gave her fair warning 
not to dare to show herself before him. 

Princess Marya was relieved that he had not, as she had dreaded, ordered 
her to be forcibly removed from Bleak Hills, but had simply commanded 
her not to show herself. She knew that this meant that in the secret recesses 
of his soul he was glad she was staying. 

The day after Nikolushka had left, the old prince dressed himself in the 
morning in full uniform, and prepared to make a call on the commander- 
in-chief. The carriage was standing ready. Princess Marya saw him in his 
uniform, with all his orders on his breast, walk out of the house and go 
down the garden to inspect the armed peasants and house-serfs. Princess 
Marya sat at the window listening to his voice resounding from the garden. 
Suddenly several men came running up the avenue with panic-stricken 
faces. 

Princess Marya ran out on to the steps, along the flower-bed path, and 
into the avenue. A great crowd of militiamen and servants were coming 
down it towards her, and in the middle of that crowd several men were 
holding up and dragging along a little old man in a uniform and decora- 
tions. Princess Marya ran towards him, and in the dancing, tiny rings of 
light that filtered through the shade of the lime-tree avenue, she could 
form no distinct impression of the change in his face. The only thing she 
could see was that the stern and determined expression of his face had 
changed to a look of timidity and submission. On seeing his daughter, he 
tried to move his powerless lips, and uttered a hoarse sound. It was 
impossible to understand what he meant. He was lifted up, carried into 
his study, and laid on the couch, which had been such an object of dread 
to him of late. 

The doctor, who was brought over the same night, bled him, and de- 
clared that the prince had had a stroke, paralysing his right side. 

To remain at Bleak Hills was becoming more and more dangerous, and 
the next day they moved the prince to Bogutcharovo. There they found 
Dessalle had already set off for Moscow with the little prince. 

For three weeks the old prince lay stricken with paralysis, getting 
neither better nor worse. He muttered incessantly, twitching his eyebrows 
and lips, and it was impossible to tell whether he understood his surround- 
ings or not. Only one thing could be said for certain: he was suffering, 
and had a craving to express something. But no one could tell whether it 
related to public affairs or family circumstances. 

The doctor said that this uneasiness meant nothing; that it was due to 
physical causes. But Princess Marya believed (and the fact that her presence 
seemed to intensify the restlessness, confirmed her supposition) that he 
wanted to tell her something. 

He was evidently suffering both physically and mentally. There was no 
hope of recovery. It was impossible to move him. What if he were to 



334 WAR AND PEACE 

die on the road? 'Wouldn't it be better if it were over, if all were over?' 
Princess Marya thought sometimes. Day and night, almost without sleep, 
she watched him, and, terrible to say, she watched him, not in the hope 
of finding symptoms of a change for the better, but often in the hope of 
seeing symptoms of the approaching end. 

And what was still more horrible to Princess Marva was the fact that 
ever since her father's illness (if not even before, when she resolved to 
stay with him, in vague expectation of something) all the forgotten hopes 
and desires slumbering within her had awakened. Ideas that had not 
entered her head for years— dreams of a life free from the terror of her 
father, even of the possibility of love and a happy married life, haunted 
her imagination. It was a temptation of the devil, and Princess Marya knew 
it. She threw herself into the attitude of prayer, gazed at the holy pictures, 
repeated the words of the prayer, but still she could not pray. She felt her- 
self carried off into a new world of real life, of labour and free activity, 
utterly opposed to the moral atmosphere in which she had been kept in 
bondage. She could not pray and could not weep, and practical cares 
absorbed her mind. 

To remain at Bogutcharovo was becoming unsafe. Rumours came from 
all sides of the French being near, and in one village, fifteen versts from 
Bogutcharovo, a house had been sacked by French marauders. The doctor 
insisted on the necessity of moving the prince; the marshal of the province 
sent an official to Princess Marya to persuade her to get away as quickly 
as possible. The captain of the police visited Bogutcharovo to insist on the 
same thing, telling her that the French were only forty versts away; that 
French proclamations were circulating in the villages, and that if the 
princess did not move her father before the 15th, he could not answer for 
the consequences. 

The princess made up her mind to leave on the 15th. The night of the 
14th she spent as usual, without undressing, in the room next to the one 
where the old prince lay. Several times she waked up, hearing his groaning 
and muttering, the creak of the bedstead, and the steps of Tihon and the 
doctor. Several times she went to the door, listening, tempted to go in, 
but unable to make up her mind to do so. Although he could not speak, 
Princess Marya knew how he disliked any expression of anxiety about him. 

But never had she felt so sorry for him; never had she felt it so dreadful 
to lose him. She went over all her life with him, and in every word, every 
action, she saw an expression of his love for her. Occasionally these 
reminiscences were interrupted by the temptation of the devil; dreams 
came back to her imagination of what would happen after his death, and 
how she would order her new independent existence. But she drove away 
such thoughts with horror. Towards morning he was quieter, and she 
fell asleep. 

She waked up late. The perfect sincerity, which often accompanies the 
moment of waking, showed her unmistakably what it was that was of 
most interest to her in her father's illness. She waked up, listened to wha? 



WAR AND PEACE 335 

was passing through the door, and catching the sound of his muttering, 
she told herself with a sigh that there was no change. 

'But what should there be? What did I hope for? I hope for his death,' 
she cried, with inward loathing of herself. 

She washed, dressed, said her prayers, and went out on to the steps. At 
the entrance the carriages in which their luggage was packed were stand- 
ing without horses. 

The doctor came downstairs and out to her. 

'He is a little better to-day,' said the doctor. 'I was looking for you. 
One can make out a little of what he says. His head is clearer. Come in. 
He is asking for you . . .' 

Princess Marya's heart beat so violently at this news that she turned 
pale and leaned against the door to keep from falling. To be under his 
eyes now, when all her soul was filled with these fearful, sinful imaginings, 
was full of an agonising joy and terror for her. 

Her father was lying raised high on his back; his little bony hands, 
covered with knotted purple veins, were laid on the quilt; his left eye was 
gazing straight before him, while the right eye was distorted, and his lips 
and eyebrows were motionless. He looked so thin, so small, and pitiable. 
His face looked withered up or melted away; his features all seemed 
smaller. Princess Marya went up and kissed his hand. His left hand clasped 
her hand in a way that showed he had long been wanting her. He twitched 
her hand, and his eyebrows and lips quivered angrily. 

She looked at him in dismay, trying to fathom what he wanted of her. 
When she changed her position so that his left eye could see her, he 
seemed satisfied, and for several seconds kept his eye fixed on her. Then 
his lips and tongue twitched; sounds came, and he tried to speak, looking 
with imploring timidity at her, evidently afraid she would not under- 
stand him. 

'O . . . o . . . aye . . . aye . . . !' he repeated several times. It was 
impossible to interpret these sounds. The doctor thought he had guessed 
it, and asked: 

'The princess is afraid?' 

He shook his head, and again repeated the same sounds. 

'The soul, the soul is in pain!' Princess Marya guessed. He grunted 
affirmatively. 

'Always thinking!— about you . . . thinking . . . !' he articulated, far 
more intelligibly than before now that he felt siire of being understood. 
Princess Marya pressed her head against his arm, trying to hide her sobs 
and tears. 

He passed his hand over her hair. 

'I called for you all night . . .' 

'If I had only known . . .' she said, through her tears. 'I was afraid to 
come in.' 

He pressed her hand. 

'Weren't you asleep?' 



336 WAR AND PEACE 

'No, I couldn't sleep/ said Princess Marya, shaking her head. 

Unconsciously imitating her father, she tried to speak more by signs, as 
he spoke, as though she, too, had a difficulty in articulating. 

'Darling!' ... or 'dear one!' . . . Princess Marya could not distinguish 
the word; but from the expression of his eyes she had no doubt what was 
said was a word of caressing tenderness such as he had never used to her 
before. 'Why didn't you come?' 

'And I was wishing, wishing for his death!' thought Princess Marya. 

He paused. 

'Thanks ... to you . . . child, dear one! for all, for all . . . forgive 
. . . thanks! . . . forgive! . . . thanks! . . .' And tears flowed from his 
eyes. 'Call Andryusha?' he said suddenly, and a look of childish and 
deprecating misgiving came into his face at the question. He seemed to be 
himself aware that his question had no meaning. So at least it seemed to 
Princess Marya. 

'I have had a letter from him/ answered Princess Marya. 

'Where is he?' 

'He's with the army, father, at Smolensk/ 

He was silent for a long while, closing his eyes. Then, as though to 
answer his doubts, and to assert that now he understood it all and remem- 
bered, he nodded his head and opened his eyes. 

'Yes/ he said, softly and distinctly. 'Russia is lost! They have lost her!' 

He closed his eyes again. He pointed to his eyes; and Tihon, under- 
standing him, wiped away his tears. 

Then he opened his eyes, and said something, which, for a long while, 
no one could understand; and at last Tihon understood and interpreted. 

Princess Marya looked for the drift of his words in the direction in 
which he had been speaking a minute before. She supposed he was speak- 
ing of Russia; then of Prince Andrey, of herself, of his grandson, then of 
his own death. And this was just why she could not understand his words. 

'Put on your white dress. I like it/ he had said. 

When she understood those words Princess Marya sobbed louder than 
ever, and the doctor, taking her on his arm, led her out of the room on to 
the terrace, trying to persuade her to calm herself, and to devote herself 
to preparations for the journey. After Princess Marya had left the prince, 
he began talking again of his son, of the war, of the Tsar, twitched his 
eyebrows angrily, began to raise his hoarse voice, and was seized by a 
second and final stroke. 

Princess Marya stayed on the terrace. The day had become brilliantly 
fine, sunny, and warm. She could grasp nothing, could think of nothing, 
and feel nothing but her passionate love for her father, of which it seemed 
to her that she had not been aware till that minute. She ran out into the 
garden, and ran sobbing towards the pond along the paths planted with 
young lime-trees by Prince Andrey. 

'Yes ... I ... I longed for his death! Yes, I wanted it soon to be 
over ... I wanted to be at peace . . . And what will become of me? 



WAR AND PEACE 337 

What use will peace be to me when he is gone?' Princess Marya muttered 
aloud. Going round the garden in a circle, which brought her back again 
to the house, she saw coming towards her Mademoiselle Bourienne and 
an unknown gentleman. It was the district marshal. 

'Princess, it is God's will! You must be prepared for the worst,' said the 
marshal. 

'It's not true!' she cried angrily at him. 

The doctor tried to stop her. She pushed him away and ran to the door. 
'What are these people with scared faces doing here?' she thought. She 
opened the door, and the bright daylight in the room, always hitherto 
darkened, frightened her. Her old nurse and other women were in the 
room. 

'No, he is not dead, it cannot be!' Princess Marya said to herself; but 
the stern look on his calm face arrested her on the threshold. 

They put the uniform with the decorations on the little dried-up body. 
Towards night candles were lighted round the coffin, a pall was laid over 
it, juniper was strewn on the floor, a printed prayer was put under the 
dead withered head, and a deacon sat in the corner reading aloud the 
Psalter. Numbers of familiar and unfamiliar figures crowded round— the 
marshal, and the village elder, and peasant women, and all with scared and 
fascinated eyes, crossed themselves, and bowed down and kissed the cold, 
stiff hand of the old prince. 

Until Prince Andrey's stay at Bogutcharovo, the estate had never had an 
owner in residence, and the Bogutcharovo peasants were of quite a differ- 
ent character from the peasants of Bleak Hills. They differed from them 
in speech, in dress, and in manners. They said they came from the 
steppes. The old prince praised them for their industry when they came to 
Bleak Hills for harvesting, or digging ponds and ditches; but he did not 
like them because of their savage manners. 

Prince Andrey's residence at Bogutcharovo, and his innovations— his 
hospitals and schools and the lowering of their rent— had not softened 
their manners, but, on the contrary, had intensified their traits of character, 
which the old prince called their savagery. 

Obscure rumours were always current among them: at one time a belief 
that they were all to be carried off to be made Cossacks, then that they 
were to be converted to some new religion, then rumours of the expected 
return of the Tsar Peter Fedorovitch, who was to rise again from the dead 
in seven years, and to bring perfect freedom, and to make an end of the 
existing order of things. Rumours of the war, and Bonaparte and his 
invasion, were connected in their minds with vague conceptions of Anti- 
christ, of the end of the world, and perfect freedom. 

In the vicinity of Bogutcharovo were large villages inhabited by Crown 
serfs, or peasants who paid rent to absentee owners. There were very few 
resident landowners in the neighbourhood, and consequently very few 
house-serfs or peasants able to read and write. And among the peasants of 



338 WAR AND PEACE 

that part of the country there could be seen more distinctly and strongly 
marked than among others those mysterious undercurrents in the life of 
the Russian peasantry, which are so baffling to contemporaries. In 1812 
any one living in close relations with the peasants might have observed that 
there was a violent ferment working below the surface, and an outbreak 
of some kind was at hand. 

Alpatitch, who came to Bogutcharovo a little while before the old 
prince's death, noticed that there was some excitement among the peasants; 
and noticed that, unlike the Bleak Hills district, where within a radius 
of sixty versts all the peasants had moved away, abandoning their villages 
to be wasted by the Cossacks, in the Bogutcharovo steppe country the 
peasants had entered, it was said, into communication with the French, 
and were remaining in their homes. He learned that the peasant Karp, a 
man of great influence in the village, had a few days previously accom- 
panied a government transport, and had returned with the news that the 
Cossacks were destroying the deserted villages, while the French would 
not touch them. He knew that another peasant had brought from the 
hamlet where the French were encamped a proclamation from the French 
general that no harm would be done to the inhabitants, and that every- 
thing taken from them would be paid for, if they would remain. In token 
of good faith, the peasant brought from Vislouhovo a hundred-rouble 
note (he did not know it was false), paid him in advance for hay. 

Meanwhile, time was pressing. On the day of the prince's death, the 
15th of August, the marshal said that he could not answer for what might 
happen after the 16th. He drove away that evening, promising to return 
next morning for the funeral. But next day he could not come, as he 
received information of an expected advance of the French, and was only 
just in time to get his family and valuables moved away from his own 
estate. 

For nearly thirty years Bogutcharovo had been under the direction of 
the village elder, Dron, called by the old prince, Dronushka. 

Dron was one of those physically and morally vigorous peasants, who 
grow a thick beard as soon as they are grown up, and go on almost 
unchanged till sixty or seventy, without a grey hair or the loss of a tooth, 
as upright and vigorous at sixty as at thirty. 

This peasant Dron it was for whom Alpatitch sent on coming from the 
plundered estate at Bleak Hills. He ordered him to get ready twelve 
horses for the princess's carriages, and eighteen conveyances for the move 
which was to be made from Bogutcharovo. Though the peasants paid rent 
instead of working as serfs, Alpatitch expected to meet no difficulty on 
their part in carrying out this order, since there were two hundred and 
thirty efficient families in Bogutcharovo, and the peasants were well-to-do. 
But Dron, on receiving the order, dropped his eyes and made no reply. 
Alpatitch mentioned the names of peasants from whom he told him to 
take the carts. 

Dron replied that the horses belonging to those peasants were away on 



WAR AND PEACE 339 

hire. Alpatitch mentioned the names of other peasants. They too, accord- 
ing to Dron, had no horses available: some were employed in government 
transport, others had gone lame, and others had died through the shortness 
of forage. In Dron's opinion, there was no hope of getting horses enough 
for the princess's carriages, not to speak of the transport of baggage. 

Alpatitch looked intently at Dron and scowled. Dron was a model village 
elder, but Alpatitch had not been twenty years managing the prince's 
estates for nothing, and he too was a model steward. 

'Now, Dronushka,' he said, 'you listen to me! Don't you talk nonsense 
to me. His excellency, Prince Andrey Nikolaevitch, himself gave me orders 
to move the folk away, and not leave them with the enemy, and the Tsar 
has issued a decree that it is to be so. Any one that stays is a traitor to the 
Tsar. Do you hear?' 

'I hear,' answered Dron, not raising his eyes. 

Alpatitch was not satisfied with his reply. 

'Ay, Dron, drop it! ' repeated Alpatitch, taking his hand out of the bosom 
of his coat, and pointing with a solemn gesture to the ground under Dron's 
feet. 'I can see right through you; and more than that, I can see three yards 
into the earth under you,' he said, looking at the ground under Dron's feet. 

Dron looked furtively at Alpatitch, and dropped his eyes again. 

'You drop this nonsense, and tell the folks to pack up to leave their 
homes and go to Moscow, and to get ready carts to-morrow morning for 
the princess's luggage. Do you hear?' 

All at once Dron threw himself at his feet. 

'Yakov Alpatitch, discharge me! Take the keys from me; discharge me, 
for Christ's sake!' 

'Stop that!' said Alpatitch sternly. 'I can see through you three yards 
into the earth,' he repeated, knowing that his skill in bee-keeping, his 
knowledge of the right day to sow the oats, and his success in pleasing the 
old prince for twenty years had long ago gained him the reputation of a 
wizard, and that the power of seeing for three yards under a man is 
ascribed to wizards. 

Dron got up, and would have said something, but Alpatitch interrupted 
him. 

'What's this you've all got in your head? Eh? . . . What are you 
thinking about? Eh?' 

'What am I to do with the people?' said Dron. They're all in a ferment. 
I do tell them . . .' 

'Oh, I dare say you do,' said Alpatitch. 'Are they drinking?' he asked 
briefly. 

'They're all in a ferment, Yakov Alpatitch; they have got hold of 
another barrel.' 

'Then you listen to me. I'll go to the police-captain and you tell them 
so, and tell them to drop all this and get the carts ready.' 

'Certainly,' answered Dron. 

Yakov Alpatitch did not insist further. He had much experience in 



340 WAR AND PEACE 

managing the peasants, and knew that the chief means for securing 
obedience was not to show the slightest suspicion that they could do any- 
thing but obey. Having wrung from Dron a submissive 'certainly,' Yakov 
Alpatitch rested content with it, though he had more than doubts— he had 
a conviction— that the carts would not be provided without the interven- 
tion of the military authorities. 

And as a fact when evening came, the carts had not been provided. 
There had been a village meeting at the tavern, and at the meeting it had 
been resolved to drive the horses out into the forest and not to provide 
the conveyances. 

Without saying a word of all this to the princess, Alpatitch ordered his 
own baggage to be unloaded from the waggons that had come from Bleak 
Hills and the horses to be taken from them for the princess's carriage, 
while he rode off himself to the police authorities. 

After her father's funeral Princess Marya locked herself in her room 
and would not let any one come near her. 

The windows of the room in which Princess Marya lay looked to the 
west. She lay on the sofa facing the wall, and fingering the buttons on 
the leather bolster, she saw nothing but that bolster, and her thoughts 
were concentrated obscurely on one subject. She thought of the finality 
of death and of her spiritual baseness, of which she had had no idea till it 
showed itself during her father's illness. She longed to pray, but dared 
not, in the spiritual state she was in, turn to God. 

The sun was setting, and the slanting rays lighted up the room through 
the open window, and threw a glow on part of the morocco cushion at 
which Princess Marya was looking. The current of her thoughts was sud- 
denly arrested. She unconsciously sat up, smoothed her hair, stood up, 
and walked to the window, involuntarily drawing a deep breath of the 
refreshing coolness of the clear, windy evening. 

' Yes, now you can admire the sunset at your ease! He is not here, and 
there is no one to hinder you,' she said to herself, and sinking into a chair, 
she let her head fall on the window-sill. 

Some one spoke her name in a soft and tender voice from the garden. 
It was Mademoiselle Bourienne in a black dress. 

All her old conflicts with her, her jealousy of her, recurred to Princess 
Marya's mind. She remembered too that he had changed of late to Made- 
moiselle Bourienne, could not bear the sight of her, and therefore how 
unjust had been the censure that she had in her heart passed upon her. 
'Yes, and is it for me, for me, after desiring his death, to pass judgment on 
any one?' she thought. 

'Your position is doubly dreadful, dear princess,' said Mademoiselle 
Bourienne. 'I know you could not and cannot think of yourself; but with 
my love for you I am bound to do so. . . . Has Alpatitch been with you? 
Has he spoken to you of moving?' she asked. 

Princess Marya did not answer. She did not understand who was to 



WAR AND PEACE 341 

move and where. 'Was it possible to undertake anything now, to think of 
anything? Could anything matter?' she wondered. 

'Do you know, chere Marie? said Mademoiselle Bourienne, 'that we are 
in danger, that we are surrounded by the French; it is dangerous to move 
now. If we move, we are almost certain to be taken prisoner, and God 
knows . . .' 

Princess Marya looked at her companion, with no notion what she was 
saying. 

'Oh, if any one knew how little anything matters to me now,' she said. 
'Of course, I would not on any account move away from him . . . Alpa- 
titch said something about going away. . . . You talk to him ... I can't 
do anything, and I don't want . . .' 

'I have been talking to him. He hopes that we may manage to get away 
to-morrow; but I think it would be better now to remain here,' said 
Mademoiselle Bourienne. 'Because you will agree, chere Marie, that to fall 
into the hands of the soldiers or of rioting peasants on the road would 
be awful.' 

Mademoiselle Bourienne took out of her reticule a document, not on the 
usual Russian paper. It was the proclamation of General Rameau, announc- 
ing that protection would be given by the French commanders to all 
inhabitants who did not abandon their homes. She handed it to the 
princess. 

'I imagine the best thing would be to appeal to this general,' said Made- 
moiselle Bourienne. 'I am convinced that all proper respect would be 
shown you.' 

Princess Marya read the document. 'Through whom did you get this?' 
she asked. 

'They probably found out I was French from my name,' said Mademoi- 
selle Bourienne, flushing. 

That the daughter of Prince Nikolay Andreivitch Bolkonsky should stoop 
to ask General Rameau to grant her his protection, and should take 
advantage of his good offices. The idea appalled her. She felt a rush of 
vindictive wrath and pride of which she had had no conception. All the 
bitterness, and still more the humiliation of her position rose vividly to her 
imagination. 'They, the French, would take up their quarters in the house: 
M. le General Rameau would occupy Prince Andrey's study; would amuse 
himself by looking through and reading his letters and papers; Mademoi- 
selle Bourienne would do the honours of Bogutcharovo; I should be given 
a room as a favour; the soldiers would break open my father's newly dug 
grave to take his crosses and decorations; they would tell me of their 
victories over the Russians, would affect hypocritical sympathy with my 
grief, . . .' thought Princess Marya, thinking not the thoughts natural to 
her, but feeling it a duty to think as her father and brother would have 
done. 

Flushed and excited she walked about the room. Dunyasha, the old 



342 WAR AND PEACE 

nurse, and the maids could not tell her how far Mademoiselle Bourienne's 
statements had been correct. Alpatitch was not in the house; he had gone 
to the police authorities. 

Lastly, the village elder, Dron, came into the room. 

'Dronushka, Alpatitch has gone off somewhere, I have no one to turn 
to. Is it true, as I'm told, that it is impossible for me to go away?' 

'Why shouldn't you go away, your excellency? You can go,' said Dron. 

'I want to set off without fail to-night or to-morrow morning early.' 

Dron looked up from under his brows at Princess Marya. 

'There are no horses,' he said. 'I have told Yakov Alpatitch so already/ 

'How is that?' said the princess. 

'It's all the visitation of the Lord,' said Dron. 'Some horses have been 
carried off for the troops, and some are dead; it's a bad year, it is. If only 
we don't die of hunger ourselves, let alone feeding the horses! Here they've 
been three days without a bit of bread. There's nothing, they have been 
plundered to the last bit.' 

Princess Marya listened attentively to what he said to her. 

'The peasants have been plundered? They have no bread?' she asked. 

'They are dying of hunger,' said Dron; 'no use talking of horses and 
carts.' 

'But why didn't you say so, Dronushka? Can't they be helped? I'll do 
everything I can . . .' It was strange to Princess Marya to think that at 
such a moment, when her heart was overflowing with such a sorrow, there 
could be rich people and poor, and that the rich could possibly not help 
the poor. She vaguely knew that there was a store of 'seignorial corn,' and 
that it was sometimes given to the peasants. She knew, too, that neither 
her brother nor her father would refuse the peasants in their need; she 
was only afraid of making some mistake in the wording of the order for 
this distribution. She was glad that she had an excuse for doing something 
in which she could, without scruple, forget her own grief. She began to 
question Dronushka about the peasants' needs, and to ask whether there 
was a 'seignorial store' at Bogutcharovo. 

'I suppose we have a store of wheat of my brother's?' she asked. 

'The wheat is all untouched,' Dron declared with pride. 'The prince 
gave me no orders about selling it.' 

'Give it to the peasants, give them all they need; I give you leave in my 
brother's name,' said Princess Marya. 

Dron heaved a deep sigh and made no answer. 

'You distribute the corn among them, if it will be enough for them. 
Distribute it all. I give you the order in my brother's name; and tell them, 
what's ours is theirs. We would grudge nothing for them. Tell them so.' 

Dron watched the princess intently all the while she was speaking. 

'Discharge me, ma'am, for God's sake, bid them take the keys from me,' 
said he. 'I have served twenty-three years, and done no wrong; discharge 
me, for God's sake.' 

Princess Marya had no notion what he wanted of her and why he asked 



WAR AND PEACE 343 

her to discharge him. She answered that she had never doubted his fidelity, 
and that she was ready to do everything for him and for the peasants. 

An hour later Dunyasha came with the news that all the peasants by the 
princess's orders were assembled at the granary and desirous of speaking 
with their mistress. 

'But I did not send for them,' said Princess Marya. 'I merely told 
Dronushka to give them the corn.' 

Dron on coming in confirmed Dunyasha's words; the peasants had come 
by the princess's instructions. 

'But I have never sent for them,' said the princess. 'You must have given 
them my message wrong. I only said that you were to give them the corn.' 

Dron sighed without replying. 

'If so you command, they will go away,' he said. 

'No, no, I'll go out to them,' said Princess Marya. 

In spite of Dunyasha's and the old nurse's attempts to dissuade her, 
Princess Marya went out on to the steps. Dronushka, Dunyasha, the old 
nurse, and Mihail Ivanitch followed her. 

'They probably imagine I am offering them the corn to keep them here 
while I go away myself, leaving them at the mercy of the French,' thought 
Princess Marya. 'I will promise them monthly rations and lodgings on the 
Moscow estate. I am sure Andrey would do more for them in my place,' 
she thought, as she went out in the twilight towards the crowd, waiting on 
the pasture near the granary. 

The crowd stirred, huddling closer, and rapidly took off their hats. So 
many different eyes, old and young, were fixed upon her, there were so 
many different faces that Princess Marya did not see a single one of them, 
and feeling it necessary to address all at once, did not know how to set 
about it. But again the sense that she was the representative of her father 
and brother gave her strength, and she boldly began her speech. 

'I am very glad you have come,' she began. 'Dronushka has told me 
that the war has ruined you. That is our common trouble, and I will 
grudge nothing to aid you. I am going away myself because it is dangerous 
here . , . and the enemy is near. I give you everything, my friends, and I 
beg you to take everything, all our corn, that you may not suffer want. 
But if you have been told that I am giving you corn to keep you here, 
it is false. On the contrary, I beg you to move away with all your belong- 
ings to our Moscow estate, and there I undertake and promise you that 
you shall not be in want. You shall be given houses and bread.' The 
princess stopped. Nothing was to be heard from the crow 1 but sighs. 

'I don't do this on my own account,' the princess went on; 'I do it in the 
name of my dead father, who was a good master to you, and for my 
brother and his son.' 

She paused again. No one broke the silence. 

'We have trouble in common, and we will share it all equally. All that 
is mine is yours,' she said, looking up at the faces before her. All the eyes 
were gazing at her with the same expression, the meaning of which she 



344 WAR AND PEACE 

could not fathom. Whether it were curiosity, devotion, gratitude, or ap- 
prehension, and distrust, the expression on all the faces was alike. 

'Very thankful for your kindness, only it's not for us to take the mas- 
ter's corn,' said a voice from the back. 

'But why not?' said the princess. No one answered, and Princess Marya, 
looking up at the crowd, noticed that now all the eyes dropped at once 
on meeting hers. 

'Why don't you want to?' she asked again. 

Princess Marya was oppressed by the silence; she tried to catch some- 
body's eye. 

'Why don't you speak!' she said, addressing a very old man who was 
standing near her, his arms propped on his stick. 'Tell me if you think 
something more is needed. I will do anything,' she said, catching his eye. 
But as though angered by her doing so, he bent his head, and said: 

'Why should we agree? We don't want your corn.' 

'Why are we to give up everything? We're not willing . . . Not will- 
ing. It's not with our consent. We are sorry for you, but we are not willing. 
You go away by yourself, alone . . .' was protested from different parts 
of the crowd. And again all the faces in the crowd wore the same expres- 
sion; and now it was unmistakably not an expression of curiosity and 
gratitude, but an expression of exasperated determination. 

'But you misunderstand me,' said Princess Marya, with a melancholy 
smile. 'Why don't you want to move away? I promise to settle you, to 
provide for you. And here the enemy will plunder you . . .' But her voice 
was drowned bv the voices of the crowd. 

'We're not willing, let him plunder us! We won't take your corn, we 
won't agree!' 

Princess Marya moved out of the ring, and went to the house with a 
dejected countenance. Repeating her command to Dron that horses were 
to be ready next day for her to start, she went away. 

On the 17th of August Rostov and Ilyin rode out from Yankovo, fifteen 
versts from Bogutcharovo. They meant to try a new horse that Ilyin had 
bought, and to find out whether there was hay to be had in the village. 

Bogutcharovo had been for the last three days between the two hostile 
armies, so that the Russian rear-guard could reach the village as easily as 
the French vanguard; and Rostov, like a careful officer, was anxious to 
anticipate the French in securing any provisions that might be left there. 
Rostov had no notion that the village to which he was going was the 
property of the Prince Bolkonsky who had been betrothed to his sister. 

They rode at a walking pace towards the granary, where there was a 
great crowd of peasants standing. Several of the peasants took off their 
caps, others stared without taking off their caps. Two old peasants came 
out of the tavern, reeling and singing a tuneless song. 

'They're fine fellows!' said Rostov, laughing. 'Well, have you any hay?' 

A peasant came out of the crowd and went up to Rostov. 



WAR AND PEACE 345 

'Which part will you be from? ' asked the peasant. 

'We're French,' answered Ilyin, laughing. 'And this is Napoleon himself.' 

'I suppose you are Russians then?' the peasant inquired. 

'And have you many troops here?' asked another short peasant, ap- 
proaching. 

'A great many,' answered Rostov. 'But why are you all assembled here?' 
he added. 'Is it a holiday or what?' 

'The old men are met about the village business,' answered the peasant 
moving away from him. 

At that moment there came into sight two women and a man in a white 
hat running from the prince's house towards the officers. 

'The one in pink's mine; hands off, beware!' said Ilyin, noticing Dunyasha. 
'What is it you want, my pretty?' 

'The princess sent me to ask of what regiment are you, and what is 
your name?' 

'This is Count Rostov, the commander of the squadron, and I am your 
humble servant.' 

Alpatitch followed Dunyasha, taking off his hat to Rostov as he 
approached. 

'I make bold to trouble your honour,' he said, speaking with a respectful* 
ness in which there was a shade of contempt for the officer's youth. 'My 
mistress, the daughter of general-in-chief Prince Nikolay Andreivitch Bol- 
konsky, who died on the 15th of this month, being in difficulties, begs you 
to come . . .' and he moved away. 'What is the matter?' Rostov inquired. 

'I make bold to submit to your excellency that the rude peasants here 
will not let their lady leave the estate, and threaten to take the horses out 
of her carriage, so that everything has been packed since morning, yet her 
excellency cannot get away.' 

'Impossible!' cried Rostov. 

The princess's offer of corn, and her interview with Dron and with the 
peasants, had, in fact, made the position so much worse that Dron had 
finally given up the keys of office, joined the peasants and refused to appear 
when Alpatitch sent for him. In the morning when the princess ordered 
the horses to be put in for her to set off, the peasants had come out in a 
great crowd to the granary, and had sent to say that they would not let the 
princess go out of the village; that there was an edict that people were not 
to leave their houses, and that they would unharness the horses. 

At the moment when Rostov and Ilyin were galloping along the village 
street, Princess Mary a had just ordered the horses to be put in, and was 
intending to start. But seeing the horsemen galloping up, the coachmen took 
them for the French, and ran away. 

Princess Marya was sitting helpless and distraught in the hall, when 
Rostov was shown in to see her. Rostov at once conceived a romance in 
this meeting. 'A defenceless girl, crushed by sorrow, alone, abandoned tc 
the mercy of coarse, rebellious peasants! And what strange destiny lias 
brought me here!' thought Rostov, as he listened to her and looked at her. 



346 WAR AND PEACE 

'And what mildness, what nobility in her features and expression!' he 
thought. As he listened to her story, there were tears in Rostov's eyes. 
Princess Marya noticed it, and looked at him with the luminous gaze that 
made one forget the plainness of her face. 

'I cannot express how glad I am, princess, that I happened to come this 
way, and am able to serve you in anything,' said Rostov, rising. 'I trust you 
will start at once, and I answer for it on my honour, no person shall dare 
to cause you annoyance, if you will only permit me to escort you,' and 
making a deep bow, such as are made to ladies of the royal family, he turned 
to the door. 

'Well, is she pretty? But, my boy, my pink girl's charming; her name is 
Dunyasha.' . . . But glancing into Rostov's face, Ilyin paused. He saw his 
hero and superior officer was absorbed in a very different train of thought. 

Rostov looked angrily at Ilyin, and without replying, strode off rapidly 
to the village. 

'I'll teach them; I'll pay them out; the scoundrels,' he muttered to himself. 

Alpatitch followed Rostov at a quick trot, which he could only just keep 
from breaking into a run. 

'What decision has your honour come to?' he said, overtaking him. Ros- 
tov stopped short, and clenching his fists moved suddenly up to Alpatitch 
with a menacing gesture. 

'Decision? What decision, old shuffler?' he shouted. 'What have you been 
thinking about? Eh? The peasants are unruly and you don't know how to 
manage them? You're a traitor yourself. I know you. I'll flog the skin off the 
lot of you . . .' And, as though afraid of wasting the energy of his anger, 
he left Alpatitch and went quickly ahead. 

Alpatitch, swallowing his wounded feelings, hurried with a swaying step 
after. He said that the peasants were in a very stubborn state, and would it 
not be better first to send for armed force? 

'I'll give them armed force.' Nikolay muttered meaninglessly, choking 
with irrational animal rage and d^^re to vent that rage on some one. With- 
out considering what he was going to do, he moved with a rapid, resolute 
step up to the crowd. 

After the hussars had entered the village and Rostov had gone in to see 
the princess, a certain hesitation and division of opinion had become appar- 
ent. Some of the peasants began to say that the horsemen were Russians, and 
it might be expected they would take it amiss that they had not let their 
young lady go. Dron was of that opinion; but as soon as he expressed it, 
Karp and others fell upon him. 

'How many years have you been fattening on the village?' shouted Karp. 
'It's all one to you! You'll dig up your pot of money and make off with it. 
What is it to you if our homes are ruined or not? ' 

'We were told everything was to be in order and no one to leave their 
homes, and not a thing to be moved away— and that's all about it!' shouted 
another. 

'It was your son's turn; but you spared your fat youngster,' a little old 



WAR AND PEACE 347 

man suddenly burst out, pouncing upon Dron, 'and sent my Vanka to be 
shaved for a soldier. Ugh, and yet we all have to die!' 

'To be sure, we all have to die!' 

'I'm not one to go against the mir,' said Dron. 

'Not one to go against it; you have grown fat off it.' . . . 

Two lanky peasants said their say. As soon as Rostov, accompanied by 
Ilyin, and Alpatitch approached, Karp, thrusting his fingers into his sash, 
walked forward with a slight smile. Dron, on the contrary, retreated to the 
back, and the crowd huddled closer together. 

'Hey! who is elder among you here?' shouted Rostov, walking quickly 
up to the crowd. 

'The elder? What do you want him for? . . .' asked Karp. But he hardly 
had time to get the words out when his hat was sent flying off his head, and 
he was sent reeling from a violent blow on the head. 

'Caps off, traitors!' shouted Rostov's full-blooded voice. 'Where is the 
elder?' he roared furiously. 

'The elder, the elder's wanted. Dron Zaharitch, he calls you,' voices were 
heard saying, hurriedly subservient, and caps were taken off. 

'We can't be said to be unruly; we're following the orders,' declared 
Karp. And several voices at the back began at the same instant: 

'It's as the elders settle; there are too many of you giving orders . . .' 

'Talking? . . . Mutiny! . . . Scoundrels! Traitors!' Rostov shouted, with- 
out thinking, in a voice unlike his own, as he seized Karp by the collar. 
'Bind him, bind him!' he shouted. 

Alpatitch turned to the peasants, calling upon two of them by name to 
bind Karp. The peasants obediently stepped out of the crowd and began 
undoing their belts. 

'Where's the village elder?' shouted Rostov. 

Dron, with a pale and frowning face, stepped out of the crowd. 

'Are you the elder? Bind him,' shouted Rostov, as though the order could 
meet with no sort of opposition. And in fact two peasants did begin binding 
Dron, who took off his sash, and gave it them as though to assist in the 
operation. 

'And all of you, listen to me,' Rostov turned to the peasants. 'March 
straight to your homes this minute, and don't let me hear your voices again.' 

'Why, we haven't done any harm. It was all, do you see, through foolish- 
ness. Only a bit of nonsense ... I always said that it wasn't the right thing,' 
said voices, blaming one another. 

'Didn't I tell you?' said Alpatitch, resuming his rightful position. 'You've 
done wrong, lads.' 

'It was our foolishness, Yakov Alpatitch,' answered voices, and the crowd 
at once began to break up and to disperse about the village. 

The two peasants who were bound they took to the manor-house. The 
two drunken peasants followed them. 

'Ay, now look at you!' said one of them, addressing Karp. 



348 WAR AND PEACE 

'Do you suppose you can talk to the gentry like that? What were you 
thinking about? You are a fool,' put in the other; 'a regular fool' 

Within two hours the horses and carts required were standing in the 
courtyard of the Bogutcharovo house. The peasants were eagerly hurrying 
out and packing in the carts their owners' goods; and Dron, who had at 
Princess Marya's desire been released from the lumber-room, where they 
had shut him up, was standing in the yard, giving directions to the men. 

'Don't pack it so carelessly,' said one of the peasants, a tall man with a 
round, smiling face, taking a casket out of a housemaid's hands. 'It's worth 
money too, you may be sure. Why, if you fling it down like that or put it 
under the cord, it will get scratched. I don't like to see things done so. Let 
everything be done honestly, according to rule, I say. There, like this, under 
the matting, and cover it up with hay; there, that's first-rate.' 

'Mercy on us, the books, the books,' said another peasant, bringing out 
Prince Andrey's bookshelves. 'Mind you don't stumble! Ay, but it's heavy, 
lads; the books are stout and solid!' 

'Yes, they must have worked hard to write them!' said a tall, round- 
faced peasant pointing with a significant wink to a lexicon lying uppermost. 

Rostov, not wishing to force his acquaintance on the princess, did not 
go back to the house, but remained at the village waiting for her to drive 
out. When Princess Marya's carriage drove out from the house, Rostov 
mounted his horse and escorted her as far as the road occupied by our 
troops, twelve versts from Bogutcharovo. At the inn at Yankovo he parted 
from her respectfully, for the first time permitting himself to kiss her hand. 

'How can you speak of it!' he said, blushing in response to Princess 
Marya's expression of gratitude to him for saving her, as she called it. 
'Any police officer would have done as much. If we only had to wage war 
with peasants, we would not have let the enemy advance so far. Good-bye, 
princess. I hope I may meet you again in happier circumstances. If you don't 
want to make me blush, please don't thank me.' 

But if the princess thanked him no more in words, she thanked him with 
the whole expression of her face, which was radiant with gratitude and 
warmth. To her mind it was an incontestable fact that had it not been for 
him, she must inevitably have fallen a victim to the rebellious peasants or 
the French; that he, to save her, had exposed himself to obvious and fearful 
danger; and even more certain was the fact that he was a man of noble and 
lofty soul, able to sympathise with her position and her grief. When she 
had said good-bye to him and was left alone, Princess Marya suddenly felt 
tears in her eyes, and then— not for the first time— the question occurred to 
her: 'Was she in love with him?' On the rest of the way to Moscow, though 
the princess's position was by no means a joyful one, Dunyasha, who was 
in the carriage with her, noticed that her mistress's face wore a vaguely 
happy and pensive smile, as she looked out of the window. 

'And to think that he should come to Bogutcharovo and at that very 
moment!' thought Princess Marya. 'And that his sister should have refused 
Andrey!' And in all that, Princess Marya saw the hand of Providence. 



WAR AND PEACE 349 

The impression made on Rostov by Princess Marya was a very agreeable 
one. When he thought of her, he felt pleased. And when his comrades, 
hearing of his adventure at Bogutcharovo, rallied him on having gone to 
look for hay, and having picked up one of the greatest heiresses in Russia, 
it made him angry. He was angry just because the idea of marrying the 
gentle, and, to his mind, charming Princess Marya with her enormous 
fortune had more than once, against his own will, occurred to his mind. 
As far as he personally was concerned, Nikolay could have asked nothing 
better than to have Princess Marya for his wife. To marry her would make 
the countess, his mother, happy, and would repair his father's broken for- 
tunes. And it would even— Nikolay felt it— make the happiness of the prin- 
cess herself. 

But Sony a? And his promise? And that was why it made Rostov angry to 
be rallied about the Princess Bolkonsky. 

On receiving the chief command of the army, Kutuzov remembered Prince 
Andrey and sent him a summons to headquarters. 

Prince Andrey stopped in the village at the house of the priest, where the 
commander-in-chief's carriage was standing, and sat down on a bench at 
the gate. A swarthy, little lieutenant-colonel of hussars, his face covered 
with bushy moustaches and whiskers, rode up to the gate, and asked whether 
his highness would soon be back. Bolkonsky made room for him on the 
bench. 

'You, too, waiting for the commander-in-chief? ' he began. 'They say he 
is willing to see any one, thank God! Now, I dare say, Russians may dare to 
speak again. And devil knows what they have been about. Nothing but 
retreating and retreating. Have you been in the field?' he asked. 

'I have had the pleasure,' said Prince Andrey, 'not only of taking part in 
the retreat, but also of losing everything I valued— not to speak of my 
property and the home of my birth . . . my father, who died of grief. I 
am a Smolensk man.' 

'Ah! . . . Are you Prince Bolkonsky? Very glad to make your acquaint- 
ance. Lieutenant-colonel Denisov, better known by the name of Vaska,' 
said Denisov, pressing Prince Andrey's hand and looking into his face with 
a particularly kindly expression. 'Yes, I had heard about it,' he said sympa- 
thetically, and after a brief pause he added: 'Yes, this is Scythian warfare, 
it's all right, but not for those who have to pay the piper.' 

Denisov passed at once to what he was just now interested in, a plan of 
campaign he had formed while on duty at the outposts during the retreat. 
The plan. was based on the fact that the line of the French operations was 
too extended, and on the suggestion that, instead of or along with a frontal 
attack, barring the advance of the French, attacks should be made on their 
communications. 

'They are not able to defend all that line; it's impossible. I'll undertake to 
break through them. Give me five hundred men and I would cut their com- 
munications, that's certain! The one system to adopt is partisan warfare.' 



350 WAR AND PEACE 

Denisov got up and began with gesticulations to explain his plans to 
Bolkonsky. In the middle of his exposition they heard cheers and the tramp 
of horses' hoofs. 

'Himself is coming,' shouted the Cossack who stood at the gate; 'he's 
coming!' 

Bolkonsky and Denisov moved up to the gate, and saw Kutuzov coming 
down the street mounted on a low bay horse. 

Since Prince Andrey had seen him last Kutuzov had grown stouter and 
more corpulent than ever; he seemed swimming in fat. But the familiar 
scar, and the white eye, and the expression of weariness in his face and 
figure were unchanged. 

'Fugh! . . . fugh! . . . fugh! . . .' he whistled, hardly audibly, as he 
rode into the courtyard. His face expressed the relief of a man who looks 
forward to resting after a performance. He drew his left foot out of the 
stirrup, and with a lurch of his whole person, frowning with the effort, 
brought it up to the saddle, leaned on his knee, and with a groan let himself 
drop into the arms of the Cossacks and adjutants, who stood ready to sup- 
port him. 

He pulled himself together, looked round with half-shut eyes, glanced at 
Prince Andrey, and evidently not recognising him, moved with his 
shambling gait towards the steps. 

'Ah, how are you, how are you, my dear boy, come along . . .' he said 
wearily, and walked heavily up the steps that creaked under his weight. 
He unbuttoned his coat and sat down on the seat in the porch. 

'Well, how's your father?' 

'The news of his death reached me yesterday,' said Prince Andrey briefly. 

Kutuzov looked at him with eyes opened wide with dismay, then he took 
off his cap, and crossed himself. 'The peace of heaven be with him! And 
may God's will be done with all of us!' He heaved a heavy sigh and paused. 
'I loved him deeply and respected him, and I feel for you with all my heart.' 
He embraced Prince Andrey, pressed him to his fat breast, and for some 
time did not let him go. When he released him, Prince Andrey saw that 
Kutuzov's thick lips were quivering and there were tears in his eyes. He 
sighed and pressed his hands on the seat to help himself in rising from it. 

'Come in, come in, we'll have a chat,' he said; but at that moment Denisov, 
who stood as little in dread of the authorities as he did of the enemy, walked 
boldly up, his spurs clanking on the steps, regardless of the indignant 
whispers of the adjutants, who tried to prevent him. Kutuzov, his hands still 
pressed on the seat to help him up, looked ruefully at Denisov. Denisov, 
mentioning his name, announced that he had to communicate to his highness 
a matter of great importance for the welfare of Russia. Kutuzov bent his 
weary eyes on Denisov, and, lifting his hands with a gesture of annoyance, 
folded them across his stomach, and repeated, 'For the welfare of Russia? 
Well, what is it? Speak.' 

Denisov blushed like a girl (it was strange to see the colour come on that 
hirsute, time-worn, hard-drinking face), and began boldly explaining his 



WAR AND PEACE 351 

plan for cutting the enemy's line between Smolensk and Vyazma. Denisov's 
home was in that region, and he knew the country well. His plan seemed 
unquestionably a good one, especially with the energy of conviction that 
was in his words. Kutuzov stared at his own feet, and occasionally looked 
round towards the yard of the next cottage, as though he were expecting 
something unpleasant to come from it. From the cottage there did in fact 
emerge, during Denisov's speech, a general with a portfolio under his arm. 

'Eh?' Kutuzov inquired in the middle of Denisov's exposition, 'are you 
ready now?' 

'Yes, your highness,' said the general. Kutuzov shook his head with an air 
that seemed to say, 'How is one man to get through it all?' and gave his 
attention again to Denisov. 

'I give you my word of honour as a Russian officer,' Denisov was saying, 
'that I will cut Napoleon's communications.' 

'Is Kirill Andreevitch Denisov, the ober-intendant, any relation of yours?' 
Kutuzov interposed. 

'My uncle, your highness.' 

'Oh! we used to be friends,' said Kutuzov, more cheerily. 'Very good, 
very good, my dear boy; you stay here on the staff; we'll have a talk to- 
morrow.' Nodding to Denisov, he turned away and put out his hand for 
papers brought him. 'Don't you go away,' he added, addressing Prince An- 
drey. 

While the latter was presenting his report Prince Andrey heard the 
whisper of a woman's voice and the rustle of a woman's silk dress at the 
door. Several times glancing in that direction he noticed behind the door 
a plump, rosy-faced, good-looking woman in a pink dress with a lilac silk 
kerchief on her head. She had a dish in her hand, and was apparently wait- 
ing for the commander-in-chief to enter. Kutuzov's adjutant explained to 
Prince Andrey in a whisper that this was the priest's wife, the mistress of 
the house, who intended to offer his highness bread and salt, the emblems of 
welcome, on his entrance. Her husband had met his highess with the cross 
in church, and she intended to welcome him to the house. . . . 'She's very 
pretty,' added the adjutant with a smile. 

Prince Andrey watched the commander-in-chief's face attentively, and 
the only expression he could detect in it was an expression of boredom, of 
curiosity to know the meaning of the feminine whispering at the door, and 
of a desire to observe the proprieties. It was obvious that Kutuzov despised 
intellect and learning, and even the patriotic feeling Denisov had shown; 
but he did not despise them through intellect, nor through sentiment, nor 
through learning (for he made no effort to display anything of the kind), 
he despised them through something else— through his old age, through his 
experience of life. The only instruction of his own that Kutuzov inserted 
in the report related to acts of marauding by Russian troops. The general, 
at the end of the report, presented his highness a document for signature 
relating to a petition for damages from a landowner for the cutting of his 
oats by certain officers. 



352 WAR AND PEACE 

Kutuzov smacked his lips together and shook his head, as he listened to 
the matter. 

'Into the stove . . . into the fire with it! And I tell you once for all, my 
dear fellow,' he said, 'all such things put into the fire. Let them cut the corn 
and burn the wood to their heart's content. It's not by my orders and it's 
not with my permission, but it can't be helped. You can't hew down trees 
without the chips flying.' He glanced once more at the paper. 'Oh, this 
German preciseness,' he commented, shaking his head. 

'Well, now, that's all,' said Kutuzov, as he signed the last paper, and rising 
clumsily, and straightening his fat, white neck, he went to the door with a 
more cheerful countenance. 

The priest's wife, with the colour rushing to her face, snatched up the 
dish, and though she had been so long preparing, she did not succeed in 
presenting it at the right moment. With a low bow she offered it to Kutu- 
zov. Kutuzov screwed up his eyes. He smiled, chucked her under the chin, 
and said: 

'And what a pretty face! Thank you, my dear!' 

He took some gold coins out of his trouser pocket, and put them on the 
dish. 'Well, and how are we getting on?' he said, going towards the room 
that had been assigned him. The priest's wife, with smiling dimples on her 
rosy face, followed to show him the room. The adjutant came out to Prince 
Andrey in the porch, and invited him to lunch. 

Half an hour later Kutuzov sent for Prince Andrey. He was reclining in 
a low chair, still in the same unbuttoned military coat. He had a French 
novel in his hand, and at Prince Andrey 's entrance laid a paper-knife in k 
and put it aside. 

'Well, sit down; sit down here. Let us have a little talk,' said Kutuzov. 
'It's sad; very sad. But remember, think of me as a father, another father, 
to you . . . !' 

Prince Andrey told Kutuzov all he knew about his father's end, and what 
he had seen at Bleak Hills. 

'To think what we have been brought to!' Kutuzov cried suddenly, in a 
voice full of feeling, Prince Andrey's story evidently bringing vividly before 
him the position of Russia. 

'Wait a bit; wait a bit!' he added, with a vindictive look in his face, and 
apparently unwilling to continue a conversation that stirred him too deeply, 
he said: 

'I sent for you to keep you with me.' 

'I thank your highness!' answered Prince Andrey, 'but I am afraid I am 
no more good for staff work,' he said, with a smile, which Kutuzov noticed. 
He looked at him inquiringly. 'And the great thing is,' added Prince An- 
drey, 'I am used to my regiment. I like the officers; and I think the men 
have come to like me. I should be sorry to leave the regiment. If I decline 
the honour of being in attendance on you, believe me . . .' 

Kutuzov's podgy face beamed with a shrewd, good-natured, and yet 
subtly ironical expression. He cut Bolkonsky short. 



WAR AND PEACE 353 

'I'm sure you would have been of use to me. But you're right; you're 
right. It's not here that we want men. There are always a multitude of 
counsellors; but men are scarce. The regiments wouldn't be what they are 
if all the would-be counsellors would serve in them like you. I remember 
you at Austerlitz. I remember, I remember you with the flag!' said Kutuzov, 
and a flush of pleasure came into Prince Andrey's face at this reminiscence. 

And changing the subject, Kutuzov began talking of the Turkish war, 
and of the peace that had been concluded. 'Yes, I have been roundly abused,' 
he said, 'both for the war and the peace ... but it all happened in the nick 
of time. If we had listened to all of them, we should be in Turkey now. 
Storms and attacks are not what's wanted, but time and patience. I trusted 
to them alone— time and patience— and I made the Turks eat horseflesh!' He 
shook his head. 'And the French shall, too. Take my word for it,' cried 
Kutuzov, growing warmer and slapping himself on the chest, Til make 
them eat horseflesh!' And again his eyes were dim with tears. 

'We shall have to give battle, though, shan't we?' said Prince Andrey. 

'We must, if every one wants to; there is no help for it. . . . But, mark 
my words, my dear boy! The strongest of all warriors are these two— time 
and patience. 

'Well, good-bye. Remember, with all my heart, I feel for your sorrow, 
and that for you I'm not his highness, nor prince, nor commander-in-chief, 
but simply a father to you. If you want anything, come straight to me. 
Good-bye, my dear boy!' 

And before Prince Andrey had closed the door, Kutuzov settled himself 
comfortably with a sigh, and renewed the unfinished novel. 

How, and why it was, Prince Andrey could not explain, but after this 
interview with Kutuzov, he went back to his regiment feeling reassured as 
to the future course of the war, and as to the man to whom its guidance was 
intrusted. 

'He will put in nothing of himself. He will contrive nothing^ will under- 
take nothing,' thought Prince Andrey; 'but he knows that there is something 
stronger and more important than his will. 

'And the chief reason,' thought Prince Andrey, 'why one believes in him 
is that he's Russian, in spite of the French novel, that his voice shook when 
he said, "What we have been brought to!" and that he choked when he 
said "he would make them eat horseflesh!" ' 

After the Tsar had left Moscow, the life of that city flowed on in its old 
accustomed channel, and it was hard to believe that Russia actually was in 
danger. The one thing that recalled the general patriotic fervour of the days 
of the Tsar's presence in Moscow was the call for contributions of men and 
money. 

As the enemy drew nearer to Moscow the attitude taken by its inhabitants 
in regard to their position did not become more serious, but, on the con- 
trary, more frivolous, as is always the case with people who see a great 
danger approaching. 



354 WAR AND PEACE 

It was evident to Pierre that the menacing storm cloud was coming closei, 

'Shall I enter the service and join the army or wait here?' Pierre thought, 
a question he had put to himself a hundred times already. He took up a pack 
of cards that lay on the table to deal them for a game of patience. 

if I succeed in this game of patience,' he said to himself, shuffling the pack 
as he held it in his hand and looked upwards; 'if I succeed, it means . . . 
what does it mean?' . . . He had not time to decide this question when he 
heard at the door of his study the voice of the eldest princess, asking 
whether she might come in. 'Then it will mean that I must set off to join the 
army,' Pierre told himself. 'Come, come in,' he said to the princess. 

The eldest of his cousins, the one with the long waist and the stony face, 
was the only one still living in Pierre's house; the two younger sisters had 
both married. 

'Excuse my coming to you, cousin,' she said in a tone of reproach and 
excitement. 'Some decision really must be come to, you know. What is 
going to happen? Every one has left Moscow, and the populace are becom- 
ing insolent. If it goes on like this, they will soon begin killing us. One can't 
walk about the streets. And the worst of it is, in another day or two the 
French will be here. Why are we waiting for them? One favour I beg of 
you, mon cousin] said the princess, 'give orders for me to be taken to Peters- 
burg; whatever I may be, any way I can't live under Bonaparte's rule.' 

'But w T hat nonsense, via cousine! where do you get your information 
from? On the contrary . . .' 

i'm not going to submit to your Napoleon. Other people may do as they 
like. ... If you won't do this for me . . .' 

'But I will, I'll give orders for it at once.' 

The princess was obviously annoyed at having no one to be angry with. 
Muttering something, she sat down on the edge of the chair. 

'But you have been incorrectly informed,' said Pierre. 'All's quiet in the 
town, and there's no sort of danger. See I have just read . . .' 

'Varvara Ivanovna told me the mob almost killed her for speaking 
French.' 

'Oh, well, well . . . You take everything too much to heart,' said Pierre, 
and he began dealing out the patience. 

Although he did succeed in the game, Pierre did not set off to join the 
army, but stayed on in Moscow, now rapidly emptying, and was still in the 
same agitation, uncertainty and alarm, and, at the same time, joyful expecta- 
tion of something awful. 

Scarcely any of Pierre's acquaintances were left in the town. Princess 
Marya had gone. Of his more intimate acquaintances the Rostovs were the 
only people left; but Pierre did not go to see them. 

To divert his mind that day, Pierre drove out to the village of Voron- 
tsovo, to look at a great air balloon which was being constructed by Leppich 
to use against the enemy, and the test balloon which was to be sent up the 
following day. The balloon was not yet ready; but as Pierre learned, it was 
being constructed by the Tsar's desire. 



WAR AND PEACE 355, 

On his way home Pierre drove through Bolotny Square, and seeing a 
crowd stopped and got out of his chaise. The crowd were watching the 
flogging of a French cook, accused of being a spy. The flogging was just 
over, and the man who had administered it was untying from the whipping- 
post a stout, red-whiskered man in blue stockings and a green tunic, who 
was groaning piteously. Another victim, a thin, pale man, was standing by. 
Both, to judge by their faces, were Frenchmen. With a face of sick dread 
like that of the thin Frenchman, Pierre pushed his way in among the crowd. 

'What is it? Who are they? What for?' he kept asking. But the attention 
of the crowd— clerks, artisans, shopkeepers, peasants, women in pelisses and 
jackets— was so intently riveted on what was taking place that no one an- 
swered. The stout man got up, shrugged his shoulders frowning, and 
evidently trying to show fortitude, without looking about him. But all at 
once his lips quivered and to his own rage he began to cry, as grown-up men 
of sanguine temperament do cry. The crowd began talking loudly, to 
drown a feeling of pity in themselves, as it seemed to Pierre. 

'Some prince's cook. . . .' 

'Eh, monsieur, Russian sauce is a bit strong for a French stomach . . . 
sets the teeth on edge,' said a wrinkled clerk standing near Pierre, just when 
the Frenchman burst into tears. 

Pierre choked, scowled, and turning quickly, went back to his chaise, 
muttering to himself as he went. On reaching home Pierre told his head- 
coachman, that he was going to drive that night to Mozhaisk to the army, 
and gave orders for his saddle horses to be sent on there. 

From Mozhaisk onwards troops were halting or marching everywhere. 
Cossacks, foot soldiers, horse soldiers, waggons, gun-carriages, and cannons 
were everywhere. 

Pierre pushed on as fast as possible, and the further he got and the more 
deeply he plunged into this ocean of soldiers, the stronger became the 
thrill of uneasiness and of a new pleasurable sensation. It was a feeling akin 
to what he had felt at the Slobodsky Palace on the Tsar's visit, a sense of 
the urgent necessity of taking some step and making some sacrifice. He was 
conscious now of a glad sense that all that constitutes the happiness of life, 
comfort, wealth, even life itself, were all dust and ashes, which it was «* 
joy to fling away in comparison with something else. . . . What that some^ 
thing else was Pierre could not have said. 

On the 26th was fought the battle of Borodino. 

Why was the battle of Borodino fought? There was not the slightest sens*, 
in it, either for the French or for the Russians. The immediate result of if 
was, and was bound to be, for the Russians, that we were brought nearer to 
the destruction of Moscow (the very thing we dreaded above everything 
in the world); and for the French, that they were brought nearer to the 
destruction of their army (which they, too, dreaded above everything in 
the world). That result was at the time perfectly obvious, and yet Napoleon 
offered battle, and Kutuzov accepted it. 



356 WAR AND PEACE 

If military leaders were guided by reasonable considerations only, ie 
would seem that it must have been clear to Napoleon that in advancing two 
thousand versts into the heart of the country and giving battle, with the 
probable contingency of losing a quarter of his men, he was going to certain 
destruction; and that it must have been equally clear to Kutuzov that in 
accepting that battle and risking the loss of a fourth of his army, he would 
infallibly lose Moscow. 

Up to the battle of Borodino our forces were approximately five-sixths of 
the French, but after that battle they were only one-half— that is, before the 
battle a hundred thousand against a hundred and twenty thousand, and after 
the battle fifty thousand against a hundred thousand. And yet the shrewd 
and experienced Kutuzov fought the battle. Napoleon, a military genius, 
as he is called, gave battle, losing a fourth of his army and drawing his line 
of communications out further than ever. 

On the morning of the 25th Pierre drove out of Mozhaisk. On the slope 
of an immense, steep, and winding hill, leading out of the town, Pierre got 
out of the carriage, and walked by a cathedral on the right of the hill, 
where a service was being performed. A cavalry regiment followed him 
down the hill, the singers of the regiment in front. 

A train of carts came up the hill towards them, filled with wounded from 
the previous day's engagement. The peasant drivers kept running from 
side to side, shouting and whipping the horses. The carts, in each of which 
three or four wounded soldiers were lying or sitting, jolted up and down on 
the stones that had been thrown on the steep ascent to mend the road. The 
wounded men, pale and bandaged up, with compressed lips and knitted 
brows, clung to the sides, as they were shaken and jolted in the carts. 
Almost all of them stared with naive and childlike curiosity at Pierre's white 
hat and green coat. 

The cavalry regiment, coming down the hill in time to their song, over- 
took Pierre's chaise and blocked the road. One cart full of wounded men 
came to a standstill at the edge of the road quite close to Pierre. The driver, 
in bast shoes, ran panting up to his cart, thrust a stone under the hind 
wheels, which were without tires, and began setting straight the breech on 
his horse. 

An old wounded soldier, with his arm in a sling, walking behind the 
cart, caught hold of it with his uninjured arm, and looked round at Pierre. 

'Well, fellow-countryman, are we to be put down here or taken on to 
Moscow?' he said. 

Pierre was so lost in thought that he did not hear the question. He looked 
from the cavalry regiment, which was now meeting the train of wounded, 
to the cart by which he stood, with the two wounded men sitting, and one 
lying down in it. One of the soldiers sitting in the cart had probably been 
wounded in the cheek. His whole head was done up in bandages, and one 
cheek was swollen as large as a baby's head. All his mouth and nose were 
on one side. This soldier was looking at the cathedral and crossing himself. 
Another, a young fellow, a light-haired recruit, as white as though there 



WAR AND PEACE 357 

were not a drop of blood in his thin face, gazed with a fixed, good-natured 
smile at Pierre. The third lay so that his face could not be seen. 

'It's not soldiers only, but peasants, too, I have seen to-day! Peasants, too, 
they are hunting up,' said the soldier standing by the cart, addressing himself 
to Pierre, with a melancholy smile. 'They can't pick and choose now. . . . 
They want to mass all the people together— it's a matter of Moscow, you 
see. There is only one thing to do now.' 

The road was clear once more. After driving four versts, for the first 
time Pierre met an acquaintance, and greeted him joyfully. This was a doc- 
tor, one of the heads of the medical staff. 

'Count, your excellency, how do you come here?' asked the doctor. 

'Oh, I wanted to have a look . . .' 

The doctor advised Bezuhov to go straight to his highness. 

'Why, you would be God knows where during the battle,' he said. 'I 
would have shown you the way, but by God, I'm racing to the commander 
of the corps. We're in such a fix, you see . . . you know, count, there's to 
be a battle to-morrow; with a hundred thousand troops, we must reckon 
on twenty thousand wounded at least; and we haven't the stretchers, nor 
beds, nor attendants, nor doctors for six thousand.' 

The strange idea that of those thousands of men, alive and well, young 
and old, who had been staring with such light-hearted amusement at his 
hat, twenty thousand were inevitably doomed to wounds and death (per- 
haps the very men whom he had seen) made a great impression on Pierre. 

'They will die, perhaps, to-morrow; how can they think of anything but 
death?' And suddenly, by some latent connection of ideas, he saw a vivid 
picture of the hillside of Mozhaisk, the carts of wounded men, the chimes, 
the slanting sunshine, and the singing of the cavalry regiment. 

'They were going into battle, and meeting wounded soldiers, and never 
for a minute paused to think what was in store for them, but went by and 
winked at their wounded comrades. And of all those, twenty thousand are 
doomed to death, and they can wonder at my hat!' thought Pierre. 

Pierre pushed on ahead to Gorky; and driving uphill into a little village 
street, saw for the first time the peasants of the militia in white shirts, with 
crosses on their caps. With loud talk and laughter, eager and perspiring, 
they were working on the right of the road at a huge mound overgrown 
with grass. Some of them were digging out the earth, others were carrying 
the earth away in wheelbarrows, while a third lot stood doing nothing. 

There were two officers on the knoll giving them instructions. Seeing 
these peasants, who were unmistakably enjoying the novelty of their posi- 
tion as soldiers, Pierre thought again of the wounded soldiers at Mozhaisk, 
and he understood what the soldier had tried to express by the words 'they 
want to mass all the people together.' The sight of these bearded peasants 
toiling on the field of battle with their queer, clumsy boots, with their 
perspiring necks, and here and there with shirts unbuttoned showing their 
sun-burnt collar-bones, impressed Pierre more strongly than anything he 
had yet seen and heard with the solemnity and gravity of the moment. 



358 WAR AND PEACE 

Pierre got out of his carriage, and passing by the toiling peasants, clam- 
bered up the knoll. 

It was eleven o'clock in the morning. The sun was behind Pierre, and in 
the pure, clear air, the huge panorama that stretched in an amphitheatre 
before him from the rising ground lay bathed in brilliant sunshine. 

The Smolensk high-road ran winding through that amphitheatre, in- 
tersecting it towards the left at the top, and passing through a village with 
a white church, which lay some five hundred paces before and below the 
knoll. This was Borodino. The road passed below the village, crossed a 
bridge, and ran winding uphill and downhill, mounting up and up to the 
hamlet of Valuev, visible six versts away, where Napoleon now was. Behind 
Valuev the road disappeared into a copse turning yellow on the horizon. 
In this copse of birch- and pine-trees, on the right of the road, could be 
seen far away the shining cross and belfry of the Kolotsky monastery. 

Here and there in the blue distance, to right and to left of the copse and 
the road, could be seen smoking camp-fires and indistinct masses of our 
troops and the enemy's. On the right, along the course of the rivers Kolotcha 
and Moskva, the country was broken and hilly. On the left the ground was 
more level; there were fields of corn and a smoking village that had been 
set on fire. 

Everything Pierre saw was so indefinite, that in no part of the scene 
before him could he find anything fully corresponding to his preconcep- 
tions. There was nowhere a field of battle such as he had expected to see s 
nothing but fields, dells, troops, woods, camp-fires, villages, mounds, and 
streams. With all Pierre's efforts, he could not discover in the living land- 
scape a military position. He could not even distinguish between our troops 
and the enemy's. 

'I must ask some one who understands it/ he thought, and he addressed 
the officer, who w r as looking with curiosity at his huge, unmilitary figure. 

'Allow me to ask,' Pierre said, 'what village is that before us?' 

'Burdino, isn't it called?' said the officer, turning inquiringly to his 
comrade. 

'Borodino,' the other corrected. 

The officer, obviously pleased at an opportunity for conversation, went 
nearer to Pierre. 

'Are these our men there?' asked Pierre. 

'Yes, and away further, those are the French,' said the officer. 'There 
they are, there you can see them.' 

'Where? where?' asked Pierre. 

'One can see them with the naked eye. Look!' The officer pointed to 
smoke rising on the left beyond the river, and the same stern and grave 
expression came into his face that Pierre had noticed in many of the faces 
he had met. 

'Ah, that's the French! And there? . . .' Pierre pointed to a knoll on the 
left about which troops could be seen. 

'Those are our men/ 



WAR AND PEACE 359 

'Oh, indeed! And there? . . .' Pierre pointed to another mound in the 
distance, with a big tree on it, near a village that could be seen in a gap 
between the hills, where there was a dark patch and the smoke of campfires. 

'Ah! that's he again!' said the officer. 'Yesterday that was ours, but now 
it's his' 

'So what is our position, then?' 

'Our position?' said the officer. 'I can describe it very clearly, because I 
have had to do with the making of almost all our fortifications. There, 
our centre, do you see, is here at Borodino.' He pointed to the village with 
the white church, in front of them. 'There's the ford across the Kolotcha. 
Here, do you see, where the rows of mown hay are still lying in the low 
ground, there's the bridge. That's our centre. Our right flank is away 
yonder' (he pointed to the right, far away to the hollows among the hills), 
'there is the river Moskva, and there we have thrown up three very strong 
redoubts. The left flank . . .' there the officer paused. 'It's hard to explain, 
you see. . . . Yesterday our left flank was over there, at Shevardino, do 
you see, where the oak is. But now we have drawn back our left wing, 
now it's over there,— you see the village and the smoke— that's Semyonov- 
skoye, and here— look,' he pointed to Raevsky's redoubt. 'Only the battle 
won't be there, most likely. He has moved his troops here, but that's a blind; 
he will probably try to get round on the right. Well, but however it may 
be, there'll be a lot of men missing at roll-call to-morrow!' said the officer. 

The old sergeant, who came up during the officer's speech, had waited 
in silence for his superior officer to finish speaking. But at this point he 
interrupted him in undisguised annoyance at his last words. 

'We have to send for gabions,' he said severely. 

The officer seemed abashed, as though he were fully aware that though 
he might think how many men would be missing next day, he ought not 
to talk about it. 

'Well, send the third company again,' he said hurriedly. 'And who are 
you, not one of the doctors?' 

'No, I am nothing in particular,' answered Pierre. And he went downhill 
again, passing the peasant militiamen. 

'Here they come! . . . They are bringing her, they are coming. . . . 
Here she is . . . they'll be here in a minute,' cried voices suddenly, and 
officers, soldiers, and peasants ran forward along the road. 

A church procession was coming up the hill from Borodino. In front of 
it a regiment of infantry marched smartly along the dusty road, with 
their shakos off and their muskets lowered. Behind the infantry came the 
sounds of church singing. 

Soldiers and peasants came running down bareheaded, overtaking Pierre. 

'They are bringing the Holy Mother! Our defender . . . the Holy 
Mother of Iversky! . . .' 

'The Holy Mother of Smolensk . . .' another corrected. 

The militiamen who had been in the village and those who had been 
working at the battery, flinging down their spades, ran to meet the pro- 



360 WAR AND PEACE 

cession. The battalion marching along the dusty road was followed by- 
priests in church robes, a little old man in a hood with attendant deacons 
and choristers. Behind them came soldiers and officers bearing a huge holy- 
picture, with tarnished face in a setting of silver. This was the holy ikon 
that had been brought away from Smolensk, and had accompanied the 
army ever since. Behind, before, and all around it, walked or ran crowds 
of soldiers with bared heads, bowing to the earth. 

Staggering from the crush of the crowd that carried him along with it, 
Pierre looked about him. 

'Count! Pyotr Kirillovitch! How did you come here?' said a voice. Pierre 
looked round. 

Boris Drubetskoy, brushing his knee with his hand (he had probably 
made it dusty in his devotions before the holy picture) came up to Pierre 
smiling. Boris was elegantly dressed, though his get-up was of a style appro- 
priate to active service. 

The procession was moving on further, accompanied by the crowd. 
Pierre stood still, talking to Boris. He explained his desire to take part in 
the battle and to inspect the position. 'And where is Prince Bolkonsky's 
regiment? can you point it out to me?' asked Pierre. 

'Andrey Nikolaevitch's? We shall pass it. I will take you to him.' 

Although Kutuzov had made a clearance of the superfluous persons on 
the staff, Boris had succeeded in retaining a post at headquarters. 

Others of Pierre's acquaintances joined him; and he had not time to 
answer all the questions about Moscow that were showered upon him. 
Every face wore a look of excitement and agitation. But it seemed to Pierre 
that the cause of the excitement that was betrayed by some of those faces 
was to be found in questions of personal success, and he could not forget 
that other look of excitement he had seen in the other faces, that suggested 
problems, not of personal success, but the universal questions of life and 
death. 

Boris, continuing his previous conversation, said to Pierre: 

'The peasant militiamen have simply put on clean, white shirts to be 
ready to die.' 

Prince andrey was on that bright August evening lying propped on his 
elbow in a broken-down barn in the village of Knyazkovo, at the further 
end of the encampment of his regiment. Through a gap in the broken wall 
he was looking at the line of thirty-year-old pollard birches in the hedge, 
at the field with sheaves of oats lying about it, and at the bushes where 
he saw the smoke of camp-fires, at which the soldiers were doing their 
cooking. 

Cramped and useless and burdensome as his life seemed now to Prince 
Andrey, he felt nervously excited and irritable on the eve of battle, just as 
he had felt seven years earlier before Austerlitz. 

He gazed at the row of birch-trees with their white bark shining in the 
sun. 'To die then, let them kill me to-morrow, let me be no more . . <> 



WAR AND PEACE 361 

let it all go on, and let me be at an end.' He vividly pictured his own 
absence from that life. And those birch-trees, with their light and shade, 
and the curling clouds and the smoke of the fires, everything around seemed 
suddenly transformed into something weird and menacing. A shiver ran 
down his back. Rising quickly to his feet, he went out of the barn, and 
began to walk about. 

He heard voices behind the barn. 

'Who's there?' called Prince Andrey. 

''Que diableT said the voice of some one stumbling over something. 

Prince Andrey, peeping out of the barn, saw Pierre, who had just hit 
against a post lying on the ground, and had almost fallen over. 

'Well!' he cried. 'What fate has brought you? I didn't expect to see you.' 

While he said this there was in his eyes and his whole face more than 
coldness, positive hostility, which Pierre noticed at once. Prince Andrey 
always disliked seeing people from his own circle, especially Pierre, who 
reminded him of all the painful moments he had passed through on his 
last stay at Moscow. 

'I have come . . . you know . . . simply ... I have come . . . it's 
interesting,' said Pierre, who had so many times already that day repeated 
that word 'interesting' without meaning it. 'I wanted to see the battle!' 

'Yes, yes; but your mason brethren, what do they say of war? How would 
they avert it?' said Prince Andrey sarcastically. 'Well, tell me about Mos- 
cow. And my people? Have they reached Moscow at last?' he asked 
seriously. 

'Yes. I went to call, but missed them. They had started for your Moscow 
estate.' 

Benches were set, and tea was brought. With some astonishment the 
officers stared at Pierre's huge, bulky figure, and heard his talk of Moscow, 
and of the position of our troops. 

'So you understand the whole disposition of the troops?' Prince Andrey 
put in. 

'Yes. At least, how do you mean?' said Pierre. 'As I am not a military 
man, I can't say I do fully; but still I understand the general arrangement.' 

'Well, then, you know more than anybody else,' said Prince Andrey. 

Prince Andrey could not refrain from expressing the ideas that suddenly 
rose to his mind. 'The battle is won by the side that has firmly resolved 
to win. Why did we lose the battle of Austerlitz? Our losses were almost 
equalled by the French losses; but we said to ourselves very early in the 
day that we were losing the battle, and we lost it. "We are defeated; so 
let us run!" and we did run. The fact is that these people with whom you 
have been inspecting the positions do nothing towards the progress of 
things; they are a positive hindrance. They are entirely taken up with their 
own petty interests.' 

'At such a moment?' said Pierre reproachfully. 

l At such a moment ,' repeated Prince Andrey. 'To them this is simply a 
moment on which one may score off a rival and win a cross or ribbon the 



362 WAR AND PEACE 

more. To my mind what is before us to-morrow is this: a hundred thousand 
Russian and a hundred thousand French troops have met to fight, and the 
side that fights most desperately and spares itself least will conquer. And if 
you like, I'll tell you that whatever happens, and whatever mess they make 
up yonder, we shall win the victory.' 

'Your excellency, that's the truth of it, the holy truth. The soldiers in my 
battalion, would you believe it, wouldn't drink their vodka; this isn't 
an ordinary day, they say.' 

The officers rose. Prince Andrey went with them out of the barn, giving 
the last instructions to the adjutant. 

'So you think the battle to-morrow will be a victory,' said Pierre. 

'Yes, yes,' said Prince Andrey absently. 'There's one thing I would do 
if I were in power,' he began again. 'I wouldn't take prisoners. What sense 
is there in taking prisoners? That's chivalry. The French have destroyed 
my home and are coining to destroy Moscow; they have outraged and are 
outraging me at every second. They are my enemies, they are all criminals 
to my way of thinking. They must be put to death.' 

'Yes, yes,' said Pierre, 'I entirely agree with you!' 

'We ought not to take prisoners,' said Prince Andrey. 'That change alone 
would transform the whole aspect of war and would make it less cruel. 
But playing at war, that's what's vile; and playing at magnanimity and all 
the rest of it. That magnanimity and sensibility is like the magnanimity 
and sensibility of the lady who turns sick at the sight of a slaughtered calf— 
she is so kindhearted she can't see blood— but eats fricasseed veal with a very 
good appetite. They talk of the laws of warfare, of chivalry, of flags of 
truce, and humanity to the wounded, and so on. That's all rubbish. I saw 
enough in 1805 of chivalry and flags of truce: they duped us, and we duped 
them. They plunder other people's homes, issue false money, and, worse 
than all, kill my children, my father, and then talk of the laws of warfare, 
and generosity to a fallen foe. No prisoners; and go to give and to meet 
death! Any one who has come to think this as I have, through the same 
sufferings . . .' 

Prince Andrey, who had thought that he did not care whether they took 
Moscow as they had taken Smolensk, was suddenly pulled up in his speech 
by a nervous catch in his throat. He walked to and fro several times in 
silence, but his eyes blazed with feverish brilliance and his lip quivered, as 
he began to speak again. 

'If there were none of this playing at generosity in warfare, we should 
never go to war, except for something worth facing certain death for, as 
now. But if there is war as now, let it be really war. And then the intensity 
of warfare would be something quite different. War is not a polite recrea- 
tion, but the vilest thing in life, and we ought to understand that and not 
play at war. It all comes to this: have done with lying, and if it's war, then 
it's war and not a game, or else warfare is simply the favourite pastime of 
the idle and frivolous. . . . 

'The military is the most honoured calling. And what is war, what is 



WAR AND PEACE 363 

needed for success in war, what are the morals of the military world? The 
object of warfare is murder; the means employed in warfare— spying, 
treachery, and the encouragement of it, the ruin of a country, the plunder- 
ing of its inhabitants and robbery for the maintenance of the army, trickery 
and lying, which are called military strategy; the morals of the military 
class— absence of all independence, that is, discipline, idleness, ignorance, 
cruelty, debauchery, and drunkenness. And in spite of all that, it is the 
highest class, respected by every one. All sovereigns, except the Chinese, 
wear a military uniform, and give the greatest rewards to the man who 
succeeds in killing most people. . . . They meet together to murder one 
another, as we shall do to-morrow; they slaughter and mutilate tens of 
thousands of men, and then offer up thanksgiving services for the number 
of men they have killed (and even add to it in the telling), and glorify the 
victory, supposing that the more men have been slaughtered the greater the 
achievement. How God can look down from above and hear them! 

'But you are getting sleepy and it's time I was in bed too. Go back to 
Gorky,' said Prince Andrey suddenly. 

'Oh no!' answered Pierre, gazing v/ith eyes full of scared sympathy at 
Prince Andrey. 

'You must be off; before a battle one needs to get a good sleep,' repeated 
Prince Andrey. 'Good-bye, be off,' he cried, 'whether we see each other 
again or not . . .' and turning hurriedly, he went off into the barn. 

It was already dark, and Pierre could not distinguish whether the ex- 
pression of his face was exasperated or affectionate. 

Pierre stood for some time in silence, hesitating whether to go after him 
or to return to Gorky. 'No; he does not want me!' Pierre made up his 
mind, 'and I know this is our last meeting!' He heaved a deep sigh and rode 
back to Gorky. 

On the 25th of August, on the eve of the battle of Borodino, the prefect 
of the French Emperor's palace, M. de Beausset, and Colonel Fabvier, 
arrived, the former from Paris, and the latter from Madrid, at Napoleon's 
encampment at Valuev. 

After changing into a court uniform M. de Beausset ordered the package 
he had brought for the Emperor to be carried before him, and walked 
into the first compartment of Napoleon's tent, where he busied himself 
while conversing with the aides-de-camp in unpacking the box. 

The Emperor Napoleon had not yet left his bedroom, he was finishing 
his toilet. With snorts and grunts of satisfaction, he was turning first his 
stout back and then his plump, hirsute chest towards the flesh-brush with 
which a valet was rubbing him down. Another valet, holding a bottle with 
one finger on it, was sprinkling eau de cologne on the Emperor's pampered 
person with an expression which seemed to say that he alone knew where 
and how much eau de cologne must be sprinkled. Napoleon's short hair 
was wet and matted on his brow. But his face, though puffy and yellow, 
expressed physical satisfaction. 



364 WAR AND PEACE 

'Go on, hard, go on . . .' he said, shrugging and clearing his throat, to 
the valet brushing him. An adjutant, who had come into the bedroom to 
report to the Emperor the number of prisoners taken in the last engage- 
ment, was standing at the door, after giving his message, awaiting per- 
mission to withdraw. Napoleon, frowning, glanced up from under his 
brows at the adjutant. 'No prisoners,' he repeated the adjutant's words. 
'They are working their own destruction. So much the worse for the 
Russian army,' said he. 'Harder, brush harder,' he said, hunching his fat 
shoulders before the valet. 'Good. Let Beausset come in and Fabvier too,' 
he said to the adjutant, nodding. 

'I obey, sire,' and the adjutant disappeared. 

The two valets rapidly dressed his majesty, and in the blue uniform of 
the guards he walked into the reception-room with firm, rapid steps. 

Beausset meanwhile was in great haste setting up the present he had 
brought from the Empress on two chairs just before the Emperor as he 
entered. 

Napoleon at once noticed what they were about, and did not want to 
deprive them of the pleasure of preparing an agreeable surprise for him. He 
pretended not to see M. de Beausset, and beckoned Fabvier to him. Napo- 
leon, frowning sternly, listened in silence to what Fabvier was saying of 
the gallantry and devotion of his army, fighting before Salamanca, at the 
other end of Europe; they had, he said, but one dream— to be worthy of 
their Emperor, and one fear— to displease him. The result of the battle had 
been disastrous. 

'I must make up for it at Moscow,' said Napoleon. l A tantot? he added, 
and summoned Beausset, who had by this time succeeded in preparing 
his effect, had stood something on the chairs and thrown a cover over it. 

Beausset made a courtier's low bow, such as onlv the old retainers of 
the Bourbons knew how to make, and approached him, handing him a letter. 

Napoleon addressed him gaily and pinched him by the ear. 

'You have been quick, delighted to see you. Well, what is Paris saying?' 
he said, his look of sternness suddenly changing to the most cordial ex- 
pression. 

'Sire, all Paris is regretting your absence,' answered Beausset, as in duty 
bound. But though Napoleon knew Beausset was bound to say this or some- 
thing like it, though at his lucid moments he knew it was all false, he was 
glad to hear this from him. He condescended to pinch his ear again. 

'I am very sorry to have made you to travel so far,' he said. 

'Sire, I expected to find you at least at the gates of Moscow,' said 
Beausset. 

Napoleon smiled, and lifting his head absently looked round to the 
right. An adjutant approached obsequiously with a gold snuff-box and 
offered it. Napoleon took it. 

'Yes, it's a happy chance for you,' he said, putting the open snuff-box 
to his nose. 'You are fond of travelling, and in three days you will see 



WAR AND PEACE 365 

Moscow. You probably did not expect to see the Asiatic capital. You will 
have a delightful journey.' 

Beausset bowed with gratitude. 

'Ah! what's this?' said Napoleon, observing that all the courtiers were 
gazing at something concealed under a covering. Beausset with courtier- 
like agility retired two steps with a half turn, and at the same moment 
twitched off the covering, saying: 'A present to your majesty from the 
Empress.' 

It was a portrait, painted in brilliant colours by Gerard, of the child of 
Napoleon and the daughter of the Austrian Emperor, the little boy whom 
every one for some unknown reason called the King of Rome. 

The very pretty, curly-headed child, with eyes like the Christ with the 
Sistine Madonna, had been portrayed playing cup and ball. The ball repre- 
sented the terrestrial globe and the cup in the other hand was a sceptre. 

Though it was not altogether clear what the painter had intended to 
express by representing the so-called King of Rome tossing the terrestrial 
globe on a sceptre, the allegory apparently seemed to Napoleon, as it had 
to every one who had seen it in Paris, quite clear and extremely pleasing. 

'The King of Rome!' he said, pointing with a graceful gesture to the 
portrait. 'Admirable!' With the characteristic Italian facility for changing 
his expression at will, he went up to the portrait and assumed an air of 
pensive tenderness. He felt that what he might say or do at that moment 
would be historical. And it struck him that the best line he could take at 
that moment, at the height of his grandeur— so great that his child was 
playing cup and ball with the earth— would be to display, in contrast with 
that grandeur, the simplest, fatherly tenderness. His eyes were veiled by 
emotion; he moved up, looked round for a chair (a chair seemed to spring 
up under him), sat down, facing the portrait. At a single gesture from him 
all withdrew on tip-toe, leaving the great man to himself and his feelings. 

After sitting there a little while and passing his fingers over the rough 
surface of the painting, he got up and again sent for Beausset and the 
officer on duty. He gave orders for the portrait to be carried out in front 
of his tent, so that the Old Guard, standing about his tent, might not be 
deprived of the happiness of seeing the King of Rome, the son and heir of 
their adored Emperor. 

After breakfast, in Beausset's presence, Napoleon dictated his proclama- 
tion to the army. It was as follows: 

'Soldiers! This is the battle you have so greatly desired. Victory is in 
your hands. It is essential for us; it will give us everything we need: 
comfortable quarters and a speedy return to our own country. Behave as 
you behaved at Austerlitz, Friedland, Vitebsk, and Smolensk. May pos- 
terity recall with pride your achievement on this day! And may they say 
of each of you: he was at the great battle before Moscow! 

'Before Moscow,' repeated Napoleon. 

Many historians assert that the French failed at Borodino because Napo- 
leon had a cold in his head; that if he had not had a cold the orders given 



366 WAR AND PEACE 

by him before and during the battle would have been even more remark- 
able for their genius, and Russia would have been lost and the face of the 
world would have been changed. 

Had it depended on Napoleon's will to fight, or not to fight, at Borodino, 
or had it depended on his will whether he gave this order or that, it is 
evident that a cold, affecting the manifestation of his will, might be the 
saving of Russia, and consequently the valet, w T ho forgot to put on Napo- 
leon's waterproof boots on the 24th, would be the saviour of Russia. But 
for minds that cannot admit that Russia was transformed at the will of 
one man— Peter the Great— and that the French empire was created, and 
the war with Russia begun, at the will of one man— Napoleon— such a con- 
tention will seem not merely unsound and irrational, but contrary to the 
whole nature of humanity. The question, What constitutes the cause of 
historical events? will suggest to them another answer, resting on the idea 
that the course of earthly events depends on the combination of all the wills 
of the men taking part in those events, and that the predominant influence 
of Napoleon in those events is purely external and fictitious. Human 
dignity, that tells us that every one of us is neither more nor less a man 
than Napoleon, bids us admit that solution of the question, and historical 
researches abundantly confirm the proposition. 

At the battle of Borodino Napoleon did not fire at any one, nor kill 
any one. All that was done by his soldiers. Therefore it was not he who 
killed those men. The soldiers of the French army went out to slay their 
fellow-men at Borodino, not owing to Napoleon's commands, but through 
their own desire to do so. The manner in which these men slaughtered one 
another did not depend on Napoleon's will, but proceeded independently 
of him, from the wills of the hundreds of thousands of men who took 
part in the affair. It only seemed to Napoleon that all this was due to his 
will. And therefore the question whether Napoleon had or had not a cold 
in his head is of no more interest to history than the cold of the lowest 
soldier of the commissariat. 

On returning from a second careful inspection of the lines, Napoleon 
said: 

'The pieces are on the board, the game will begin to-morrow. Do you 
remember, Kutuzov was in command at Braunau, and never once in three 
weeks mounted a horse to inspect his entrenchments. We shall see!' 

Sending for Beausset, he chatted carelessly, as some renowned, skilful and 
confident surgeon will often chat playfully while he tucks up his sleeves 
and puts on his apron, and the patient is being bound down on the operat- 
ing-table. 'I have the whole business at my finger-tips, and it's all clear 
and definite in my head. When I have set to work, I will do it as no one else 
could, but now I can jest, and the more serenely I jest the more calm and 
confidence and admiration for my genius you ought to feel.' 

After emptying a second glass of punch, Napoleon went to seek repose 
before the grave business which, as he imagined, lay before him next day. 

He was so preoccupied with what lay before him that he could not 



WAR AND PEACE 367 

sleep, and in spite of his cold, which got worse with the damp of evening, 
he got up at three o'clock, sneezing violently. 

The adjutant on duty came into the tent. 

'Well, Rapp, do you think we shall do good business to-day?' he said 
to him. 

'Without doubt, sire!' answered Rapp. 

Napoleon took a lozenge, put it in his mouth, and looked at his watch. 
'I have neither taste nor smell,' he said. 'I am sick of this cold. They talk 
about medicine. What is medicine, when they can't cure a cold?' 

Napoleon frowned, and sat for a long while in silence, his head in his 
hand. 

'This poor army, it has greatly diminished since Smolensk. La fortune est 
une franche courtisane, Rapp. I have always said so, and I begin to feel it; 
but the Guard, Rapp, the Guard is intact?' he said inquiringly. 

'Yes, sire,' replied Rapp. 

'Do you know, Rapp, what the military art consists in? It is the art of 
being stronger than the enemy at a given moment. That is all.' 

At half-past five Napoleon rode to the village of Shevardino. 

It began to get light; the sky cleared, only a single storm cloud lay on the 
eastern horizon. The deserted camp-fires burned down in the pale light 
of morning. 

A solitary, deep cannon shot boomed out on the right, hovered in the 
air, and died away in the stillness. Several minutes passed. A second and a 
third shot was heard, the air was full of vibration; a fourth and a fifth 
boomed out majestically, closely on the right. 

The first shots had not died away, when others rang out, and more and 
more, their notes blending and overtaking one another. 

Napoleon rode with his suite to the Shevardino redoubt, and dismounted 
there. The game had begun. 

When Pierre was fully awake the panes were rattling in the little windows. 
The postillion was at his side, shaking him. 'Your excellency, your excel- 
lency, your excellency . . .' 

'Eh, has it begun? Is it time?' said Pierre, waking up. 

'Listen to the firing, your excellency,' said the postillion, an old soldier; 
'all the gentlemen are gone already; his highness set off long ago.' 

Pierre dressed in haste, and ran out into the porch. It was a bright, fresh, 
dewy, cheerful morning. The sun had just broken through the cloud that 
had screened it, and its rays filtered through the rent clouds, and over the 
roofs of the street opposite on to the dew-drenched dust of the road, on to 
the fences and the windows of the houses, and Pierre's horses standing by 
the cottage. The roar of the cannon could be heard more distinctly in 
the open air. An adjutant galloped down the street, followed by a Cossack. 

'It's time, count, it's time!' cried the adjutant. Pierre gave orders that he 
should be followed with a horse, and walked along the street to the knoll 
from which he had viewed the field of battle the day before. On this knoll 



368 WAR AND PEACE 

was a crowd of officers, and Pierre heard the French chatter of the staff, 
and saw Kutuzov's grey head sunk in his shoulders, and his white cap, with 
red braiding on it. Kutuzov was looking through a field-glass along the 
high-road before him. 

Pierre longed to be in the midst of the smoke, the glittering bayonets, 
the movement, and the noise. He looked round at Kutuzov and his suite 
to compare his own impression with that of others. 

'Go, my dear fellow, go, and Christ be with you!' said Kutuzov, never 
taking his eyes off the field, to a general standing beside him. The general 
ran by Pierre down the descent from the mound. 

'And I too, I too,' thought Pierre, and he went in the same direction. 

The general mounted a horse, led up to him by a Cossack. Pierre went 
up to the groom, who was holding his horses. Asking him which was the 
quietest, Pierre got on it, clutched at the horse's mane, pressed his heels 
into the beast's stomach, and feeling that his spectacles were slipping off, 
and that he was incapable of letting go of the mane and the reins, he 
galloped after the general, followed by smiles from the staff officers. 

The general after whom Pierre galloped trotted downhill, turned off 
sharply to the left, and Pierre, losing sight of him, galloped into the mid- 
dle of a battalion of infantry marching ahead of him. He tried to get away 
from them, turning to left and to right; but there were soldiers everywhere, 
all with the same anxious faces, preoccupied with some unseen, but evi- 
dently serious, business. They all looked with the same expression of 
annoyed inquiry at the stout man in the white hat, who was, for some 
unknown reason, trampling them under his horse's feet. 

'What does he want to ride into the middle of a battalion for?' one 
man shouted at him. Another gave his horse a shove with the butt-end 
of his gun; and Pierre, leaning over on the saddle-bow, and scarcely able 
to hold in his rearing horse, galloped out to where there was open space 
in front of the soldiers. 

Ahead of him he saw a bridge, and at the bridge stood soldiers, firing. 
Pierre rode towards them. Though he did not know it, he rode up to the 
bridge over the Kolotcha, between Gorky and Borodino, which was 
attacked by the French in one of the first actions. But in spite of the unceas- 
ing fire going on there, he had no notion that this was the very centre 
of the battle. He did not notice the bullets whizzing on all sides, and the 
shells flying over him; he did not see the enemy on the other side of the 
river, and it was a long time before he saw the killed and wounded, 
though many fell close to him. 

'What's that fellow doing in front of the line?' some one shouted at him 
again. 

Pierre turned to the right, and unwittingly rode up to an adjutant of 
General Raevsky's, with whom he was acquainted. The adjutant glanced 
wrathfully at Pierre; and he, too, was apparently about to shout at him, but 
recognising him, he nodded. 



WAR AND PEACE 369 

'How did vou come here?' he said, and galloped on. Pierre, afraid of 
getting in some one's way again, galloped after him. 

'What is it, here? Can I go with you?' he asked. 

'Here it's all right,' said the adjutant; 'but come along with me to the 
mound; we can get a view from there.' 

It was then for the first time that Pierre saw wounded men, staggering 
along and some borne on stretchers. In the meadow with the rows of sweet- 
scented hay, through which he had ridden the day before, there lay motion- 
less across the rows one soldier with his shako off, and his head thrown 
awkwardly back. 'And why haven't they taken that one?' Pierre was begin- 
ning, but seeing the adjutant's set face looking in the same direction, he 
was silent. 

'You are not used to riding, count, I fancy?' asked the adjutant. 

'Oh no, it's all right; but it does seem to be hopping along somehow,' 
said Pierre, with a puzzled look. 

'Ay! . . . but he's wounded,' said the adjutant, 'the right fore-leg above 
the knee. A bullet, it must have been. I congratulate you, count,' he said, 
'you have had your baptism of fire now.' 

Pierre and the adjutant got off their horses and walked on foot up the 
hill. 

The adjutant looked round at Pierre, as though he did not know what 
to do with him. 

'Don't trouble about me,' said Pierre. 'I'll go up on to the mound; may I?' 

Pierre went up to the battery, and the adjutant rode away. They did 
not see each other again, and only much later Pierre learned that that ad- 
jutant had lost an arm on that day. 

When Pierre ascended this mound, he had no notion that this place, 
encircled by small trenches and protected by a few cannons, was the most 
important spot in the field. 

He fancied, indeed (simply because he happened to be there), that it 
was a place of no importance whatever. 

Pierre sat down on the end of the earthwork surrounding the battery 
and gazed at what was passing around him with an unconscious smile of 
pleasure. At intervals Pierre got up and walked about the battery, trying 
not to get in the way of the soldiers, who were loading and discharging 
the cannons and were continually running by him with bags and ammu- 
nition. 

A boyish, round-faced, little officer, a child just out of the cadets' 
school, and very conscientious in looking after the two cannons put in his 
charge, addressed Pierre severely. 

'Permit me to ask you to move out of the way, sir,' he said. 'You can't 
stay here.' 

The soldiers shook their heads disapprovingly as they looked at Pierre. 
But as the conviction gained ground among them that the man in the 
white hat was doing no harm, and either sat quietly on the slope of the 



370 WAR AND PEACE 

earthwork, or, making way with a shy and courteous smile for the sol- 
diers to pass, walked about the battery under fire as calmly as though he 
were strolling on a boulevard, their feeling of suspicious ill-will began 
to give way to a playful and kindly cordiality akin to the feeling soldiers 
always have for the dogs, cocks, goats, and other animals who share the 
fortunes of the regiment. The soldiers soon accepted Pierre in their own 
minds as one of their little circle, made him one of themselves, and gave 
him a name: 'our gentleman' they called him, and laughed good-humouredly 
about him among themselves. 

A cannon ball tore up the earth a couple of paces from Pierre. Brush- 
ing the earth off his clothes, he looked about him with a smile. 

'And how is it you're not afraid, sir, upon my word?' said a broad, red- 
faced soldier, showing his strong, white teeth in a grin. 

'Why, are you afraid then?' asked Pierre. 

'Why, to be sure!' answered the soldier. 'Why, she has no mercy on 
you. She smashes into you, and your guts are sent flying. Nobody could 
help being afraid,' he said laughing. 

Several soldiers stood still near Pierre with amused and kindly faces. 

'It's our business— we're soldiers. But for a gentleman— it's surprising. It's 
queer in a gentleman!' 

By ten o'clock some twenty men had been carried away from the bat- 
tery; two cannons had been disabled, and more and more frequently shells 
fell on the battery, and cannon balls came with a hiss and whir, flying out 
of the distance. But the men on the battery did not seem to notice this: 
merry chatter and jokes were to be heard on all sides. 

'Not this way, my pretty,' shouted a soldier to a grenade that came 
whistling towards them. 

'Give the infantry a turn!' another added with a chuckle, as the grenade 
flew across and fell among the ranks of the infantry. 

At ten o'clock the infantry, who had been in advance of the battery in 
the bushes and about the stream, retreated. From the battery they could 
see them running back, bearing their wounded on their guns. A general 
with a suite came on to the redoubt, and after talking to the colonel and 
looking angrily at Pierre, went away again. 

The soldiers bustled more busily and briskly than ever about the cannons. 
No one took any notice of Pierre now. Twice he was shouted at angrily 
for being in the way. 

The little officer-boy ran up, his hand to his shako, saluting his superior 
officer. 

'I have the honour to inform you, colonel, only eight charges are left; 
do you command to continue firing?' he asked. 

'Grapeshot!' the senior officer shouted, looking away over the earth- 
work. 

Suddenly something happened; the boy-officer groaned, and whirling 
round sat down on the ground, like a bird shot on the wing. 

One after another the cannon balls came whistling, striking the breast- 



WAR AND PEACE 371 

work, the soldiers, the cannons. Pierre, who had scarcely heard those 
sounds before, now could hear nothing else. On the right side of the bat- 
tery, soldiers, with shouts of 'hurrah,' were running, not forward, it seemed 
to Pierre, but back. 

A cannon ball struck the very edge of the earthwork, before which 
Pierre was sitting, and sent the earth flying; a dark, round mass flashed 
just before his eyes, and at the same instant flew with a thud into some- 
thing. The militiamen, who had been coming into the battery, ran back. 

'All with grapeshot!' shouted the officer. 

The sergeant ran up to the officer, and in a frightened whisper (just 
as at a dinner the butler will sometimes tell the host that there is no more 
of some wine asked for) said that there were no more charges. 

'The scoundrels, what are they about?' shouted the officer, turning to 
Pierre. The senior officer's face was red and perspiring, his piercing 
eyes glittered. 'Run to the reserves, bring the ammunition-boxes!' he 
shouted angrily, avoiding Pierre with his eyes, and addressing the soldier. 

'I'll go,' said Pierre. The officer, making no reply, strode across to the 
other side. 

'Cease firing . . . Wait!' he shouted. 

The soldier who had been commanded to go for the ammunition ran 
against Pierre. 

'Ah, sir, it's no place for you here,' he said, as he ran away. 

Pierre ran after the soldier, avoiding the spot where the boy-officer was 
sitting. 

One cannon ball, a second and a third flew over him, hitting the ground 
in front, on each side, behind Pierre as he ran down. 'Where am I going?' 
he suddenly wondered, just as he ran up to the green ammunition-boxes. 
He stopped short in uncertainty whether to go back or forward. Sud- 
denly a fearful shock sent him flying backwards on to the ground. At the 
same instant a flash of flame dazed his eyes, and a roar, a hiss, and a crash 
set his ears ringing. 

When he recovered his senses, Pierre found himself sitting on the ground 
leaning on his hands. The ammunition-box, near which he had been, had 
gone; there were a few charred green boards and rags lying scattered about 
on the scorched grass. A horse was galloping away with broken fragments 
of the shafts clattering after it; while another horse lay, like Pierre, on the 
ground, uttering a prolonged, piercing scream. 

Pierre, beside himself with terror, jumped up and ran back to the battery 
as the one refuge from the horrors encompassing him. 

Just as Pierre ran up to the redoubt, he noticed that there was no sound 
of firing from the battery, but that there were men there doing something 
or other. He had not time to make out what men they were. He caught 
sight of the senior officer lying with his back towards him on the earth 
wall, as though gazing intently at something below; and he noticed one 
soldier, who, tearing himself away from the men who were holding him, 
shouted 'Mates!' and he saw something else that was strange. 



372 WAR AND PEACE 

But before he had time to grasp that the colonel had been killed, that 
the soldier shouting 'Mates!' was a prisoner, another soldier was stabbed 
in the back by a bayonet before his eyes. A thin man with a yellow, 
perspiring face, in a blue uniform ran up to him with a sword in his hand, 
shouting something. Pierre, instinctively defending himself as they came 
full tilt against each other, put out his hands and clutched the man (it was 
a French officer) by the shoulder and the throat. The officer, dropping his 
sword, seized Pierre by the collar. 

For several seconds both gazed with frightened eyes at each other's 
unfamiliar-looking faces, and both were bewildered, not knowing what 
they were doing or what they were to do. 'Am I taken prisoner or am I 
taking him prisoner?' each of them was wondering. But the French officer 
was undoubtedly more disposed to believe he was taken prisoner, because 
Pierre's powerful hand, moved by instinctive terror, was tightening its 
grip on his throat. The Frenchman tried to speak, when suddenly a cannon 
ball flew with a fearful whiz close over their heads, and it seemed to 
Pierre that the Frenchman's head had been carried off by it, so swiftly had 
he ducked it. 

Pierre, too, ducked and let go with his hands. Giving no more thought 
to the question which was taken prisoner, the Frenchman ran back to the 
battery, while Pierre dashed downhill, stumbling over the dead and 
wounded, who seemed to him to be clutching at his feet. 

'Oh, now they will stop it, now they will be horrified at what they have 
done!' thought Pierre, aimlessly following the crowds of stretchers mov- 
ing off the battlefield. 

But the sun still stood high behind the veil of smoke, and the roar of 
cannon and musketry, far from slackening, grew louder and more desperate, 
like a man putting all his force into one deafening outcry as a last despair- 
ing effort. 

In the middle of the day Murat sent his adjutant to Napoleon with the 
message that the Russians would be routed if his majesty would let them 
have another division. 

'Reinforcements?' said Napoleon, with stern astonishment, staring, as 
though failing to comprehend his words, at the handsome, boyish adjutant. 
'Reinforcements!' thought Napoleon. 'How can they want reinforcements 
when they have half the army already, concentrated against one weak, 
unsupported flank of the Russians!' 

'Tell the King of Naples,' said Napoleon sternly, 'that it is not midday, 
and I don't yet see clearly over my chess-board. You can go.' 

A general was galloping on a steaming horse to the redoubt, followed 
by his suite. It was Beliard. Dismounting from his horse, he walked rapidly 
up to the Emperor, and, in a loud voice, began boldly explaining the 
absolute necessity of reinforcements. He swore on his honour that the 
Russians would be annihilated if the Emperor would let them have another 
division. 



WAR AND PEACE 373 

Napoleon shrugged his shoulders, and continued walking up and down, 
without answering. 

Another messenger came galloping up. 

'Well, what is it now?' said Napoleon, in the tone of a man irritated 
by repeated interruptions. 

'Sire, the prince . . .' began the adjutant. 

'Asks for reinforcements?' said Napoleon, with a wrathful gesture. The 
adjutant bent his head affirmatively and was proceeding to give his mes- 
sage, but the Emperor turned and walked a couple of steps away. 

The soldiers were the same, the generals the same, there had been the 
same preparations, the same disposition, the same proclamation. He was 
himself the same,— he knew that; he knew that he was more experienced 
and skilful indeed now than he had been of old. The enemy even was the 
same as at Austerlitz and Friedland. But the irresistible wave of his hand 
seemed robbed of its might by magic. 

All the old manoeuvres that had invariably been crowned with success: 
the concentration of the battery on one point, and the advance of the re- 
serves to break the line, the cavalry attack of 'men of iron,' all these 
resources had been employed; and far from victory being secure, from all 
sides the same tidings kept pouring in of killed or wounded generals, of 
reinforcements needed, of the troops being in disorder, and the Russians 
impossible to move. 

When he went over in his own mind all this strange Russian campaign, 
in which not a single victory had been gained, in which not a flag, nor a 
cannon, nor a corps had been taken in two months, when he looked at the 
concealed gloom in the faces round him, and heard reports that the Rus- 
sians still held their ground— a terrible feeling, such as is experienced in a 
nightmare, came over him, and all the unlucky contingencies occurred to 
him that might be his ruin. The Russians might fall upon his left wing, 
might break through his centre; a stray ball might even kill himself. AH 
that was possible. In his former battles he had only considered the pos- 
sibilities of success, now an immense number of unlucky chances presented 
themselves, and he expected them all. Yes, it was like a nightmare, when 
a man dreams that an assailant is attacking him, and in his dream he lifts 
up his arm and deals a blow with a force at his assailant that he knows must 
crush him, and feels that his arm falls limp and powerless as a rag, and the 
horror of inevitable death comes upon him in his helplessness. 

The news that the Russians were attacking the left flank of the French 
army aroused that horror in Napoleon. He sat in silence on a camp-stool 
under the redoubt, his elbows on his knees, and his head sunk in his hands. 

Berthier came up to him and suggested that they should inspect the lines. 

'What? What do you say?' said Napoleon. 'Yes, tell them to bring my 
horse.' 

In the slowly parting smoke, over the whole plain through which Na- 
poleon rode, men and horses, singly and in heaps, were lying in pools of 
blood. Such a fearful spectacle, so great a mass of killed in so small a 



374 WAR AND PEACE 

space, had never been seen by Napoleon nor any of his generals. The roar 
of the cannon, that had not ceased for ten hours, exhausted the ear. Na- 
poleon rode up to the height, and through the smoke he saw ranks of 
soldiers in uniforms of unfamiliar hues. They were the Russians. The 
Russians stood in serried ranks, and their guns kept up an incessant roar. 

It was not a battle. It was a prolonged massacre, which could be of no 
avail either to French or Russians. Napoleon pulled up his horse, and 
sank again into the brooding reverie from which Berthier had roused him. 

One of the generals, riding up, ventured to suggest that the Old Guards 
should advance into action. Ney and Berthier, standing close by, exchanged 
glances and smiled contemptuously at the wild suggestion. 

Napoleon sat with downcast head. 

'Eight hundred leagues from France, I am not going to let my Guard 
be destroyed,' he said, and turning his horse, he rode back. 

Kutuzov, with his grey head hanging, and his heavy, corpulent frame sunk 
into a heap, was sitting on a bench covered with a rug, in the same place 
in which Pierre had seen him in the morning. He issued no orders, and 
simply gave or withheld his assent to what was proposed to him. 

'Yes, yes, do so,' he would say in reply to various suggestions. 'Yes, 
yes, go across, my dear boy, and see,' he would cry first to one and then 
to another of the adjutants near him; or, 'No, better not; we'd better wait 
a bit,' he would say. 

At three o'clock the attacks of the French ceased. On the faces of all 
who came from the battlefield, as well as of those standing round him, 
Kutuzov read an expression of effort, strained to the utmost tension. He 
was himself satisfied with the success of the day beyond his expectations. 
But the old man's physical force was failing him. Several times his head 
sank, as though he were falling, and he dropped asleep. Dinner was 
brought him. 

The adjutant-general, Woltzogen, rode up to Kutuzov while he was at 
dinner. Woltzogen had come from Barclay to report on the progress of 
the fight on the left flank. The sagacious Barclay de Tolly, seeing crowds 
of wounded men running back, and the ranks in disorder, and weighing 
all the circumstances of the case, made up his mind that the battle was 
lost, and sent his favourite adjutant to the commander-in-chief to tell him so. 

Kutuzov was with difficulty chewing roast chicken, and his eyes were 
screwed up with a more cheerful expression as he glanced at Woltzogen. 

With a half-contemptuous smile Woltzogen walked carelessly up to 
Kutuzov. 'The "old gentleman" '—this was how Kutuzov was always spoken 
of in Woltzogen's German circle— 'is making himself quite comfortable,' 
he thought; and glancing severely at the dishes before Kutuzov, he began 
reporting to the old gentleman Barclay's message and his own impressions 
and views. 'Every point of our position is in the enemy's hands, and they 
cannot be driven back, because there are not the troops to do it; the men 
run away and there's no possibility of stopping them,' he submitted. 



WAR AND PEACE 375 

Kutuzov, stopping short in his munching, stared at Woltzogen in amaze- 
ment, as though not understanding what was said to him. Woltzogen, 
noticing the old gentleman's excitement, said with a smile: 

'I did not consider I had a right to conceal from your highness what I 
saw. . . . The troops are completely routed. . . .' 

'You saw? You saw? . . .' cried Kutuzov, getting up quickly, and 
stepping up to Woltzogen. 'How . . . how dare you! . . .' making a men- 
acing gesture with his trembling hands, he cried, with a catch in his breath: 
'How dare you, sir, tell me that? You know nothing about it. Tell General 
Barclay frorn me that his information is incorrect, and that I, the com- 
mander-in-chief, know more of the course of the battle than he does.' 

Woltzogen would have made some protest, but Kutuzov interrupted him. 

'The enemy has been repulsed on the left and defeated on the right 
flank. If you have seen amiss, sir, do not permit yourself to speak of what 
you do not understand. Kindly return to General Barclay and inform 
him of my unhesitating intention to attack the French to-morrow' said 
Kutuzov sternly. 

All were silent, and nothing was to be heard but the heavy breathina of 
the gasping, old general. 'Repulsed at all points, for which I thank God 
and our brave men. The enemy is defeated, and to-morrow we will drive 
him out of the holy land of Russia!' said Kutuzov, crossing himself. 

'Kaisarov,' Kutuzov called to his adjutant, 'ride along the line and an- 
nounce that to-morrow we attack.' 

Woltzogen came back from Barclay and announced that General Barclay 
de Tolly would be glad to have a written confirmation of the order given 
by the field-marshal. Kutuzov, without looking at Woltzogen, ordered an 
adjutant to make out this written order. And through the undefinable, 
mysterious link that maintains through a whole army the same temper, 
called the spirit of the army, and constituting the chief sinew of war, 
Kutuzov's words, his order for the battle next day, were transmitted in- 
stantaneously from one end of the army to the other. 

The words and the phrases of the order were by no means the same 
when they reached the furthest links in the chain. There was, indeed, not 
a word in the stories men were repeating to one another from one end of 
the army to the other, that resembled what Kutuzov had actually said; 
but the drift of his words spread everywhere, because what Kutuzov had 
said was not the result of shrewd considerations, but the outflow of a feel- 
ing that lay deep in the heart of the commander-in-chief, and deep in the 
heart of every Russian. 

And learning that to-morrow we were to attack the enemy, hearing 
from the higher spheres of the army the confirmation of what they wanted 
to believe, the worn-out, wavering men took comfort and courage again. 

Prince andrey's regiment was in the reserves, stationed in complete in- 
action, under a hot artillery fire. Before two o'clock the regiment, which 
had already lost over two hundred men, was moved forward into the 



376 WAR AND PEACE 

trampled oat-field in which thousands of men were killed that day, and on 
which, about two o'clock, there was directed the concentrated fire of 
several hundreds of the enemy's cannons. 

Not leaving that spot, nor discharging a single round of ammunition, 
the regiment lost here another third of its men. In front, and especially on 
the right side, the cannons kept booming in the smoke that never lifted, 
and from the mysterious region of the smoke that hid all the country in 
front, there came flying swiftly hissing cannon balls and slowly whizzing 
grenades. Sometimes, as though to give them a breathing space, for a 
whole quarter of an hour all the cannon balls and grenades flew over 
them, but at other times, in the course of a single minute, several men out 
of the regiment would be swept off, and they were busy the whole time 
dragging away the dead and carrying off the wounded. 

With every fresh stroke the chances of life grew less and less for those 
who were not yet killed. The regiment was divided into battalions three 
hundred paces apart; but in spite of that, all the regiment was under the 
influence of the same mood. All the men of the regiment were alike gloomy 
and silent. At rare intervals there was the sound of talk in the ranks, but 
that sound was hushed every time the falling thud and the cry of 'stretch- 
ers! ' was heard. For the greater part of the time, by command of the offi- 
cers, the men sat on the ground. One, taking off his shako, carefully loos- 
ened and then drew up the folds of it; another, crumbling the dry clay in 
his hands, rubbed up his bayonet with it; another shifted and fastened 
the buckle of his shoulder straps; while another carefully undid, and did 
up again, his leg bandages, and changed his boots. Some built little houses 
of clods of the ploughed field, or plaited straws of stubble. All of them 
appeared entirely engrossed in these pursuits. But quite extraneous incidents 
that had nothing to do with the battle were what attracted most notice. 
Some batteries of artillery passed in front of their line. In one of the 
ammunition carriages a horse had put its leg through the traces. 

'Hey! look at the trace-horse! . . . Take her leg out! She'll fall! . . . 
Hey! they don't see! . . .' Shouts rose from the ranks all through the 
regiment. 

Another time the attention of all was attracted by a little brown dog, 
with its tail in the air, who had come no one knew from where, and was 
running about fussily in front of the ranks. All at once a cannon ball fell 
near it, and it squealed and dashed away with its tail between its legs! 
Roars and shrieks of laughter rang out from the whole regiment. But dis- 
tractions of this kind did not last more than a minute, and the men had 
been eight hours without food or occupation, with the terror of death 
never relaxing for an instant. 

Prince Andrey, pale and haggard like every one else in the regiment, 
walked to and fro in the meadow next to the, oat-field from one boundary- 
line to the other, with his hands clasped behind his back, and his eyes fixed 
on the ground. There was no need for him to give orders, and nothing for 
him to do. He thought of nothing at all. He waited. 'Here it comes . . • 



WAR AND PEACE 377 

this one's for us again!' he thought, listening to the whiz of something flying 
out of the region of smoke. 

'Look out!' rang out a frightened cry from a soldier, and like a bird, 
with swift, whirring wings alighting on the earth, a grenade dropped with 
a dull thud a couple of paces from Prince Andrey, near the major's horse. 
The horse, with no question of whether it were right or wrong to show 
fear, snorted, reared, almost throwing the major, and galloped away. The 
horse's terror infected the men. 

'Lie down!' shouted the adjutant, throwing himself on the ground. 
Prince Andrey stood in uncertainty. The shell was smoking and rotating 
like a top between him and the recumbent adjutant, near a bush of worm- 
wood in the rut between the meadow and the field. 

'Can this be death?' Prince Andrey wondered, with an utterly new, 
wistful feeling, looking at the grass, at the wormwood and at the thread 
of smoke coiling from the rotating top. 'I can't die, I don't want to die, I 
love life, I love this grass and earth and air . . .' 

He "thought this, and yet at the same time he did not forget that people 
were looking at him. 

'For shame, M. raide-de-ccrmpP he said to the adjutant; 'what sort 
of . . .' He did not finish. Simultaneously there was a tearing, crashing 
sound, like the smash of broken crockery, a puff of stifling fumes, and 
Prince Andrey was sent spinning over, and flinging up one arm, fell on his 
face. 

Several officers ran up to him. A great stain of blood was spreading over 
the grass from the right side of his stomach. 

The militiamen stood with the stretchers behind the officers. Prince 
Andrey lay on his chest, with his face sunk in the grass; he was still breath- 
ing in hard, hoarse gasps. 

The peasants went up and took him by the shoulders and legs, but he 
moaned piteously, and they looked at one another, and laid him down 
again. 

'Pick him up, lay him on, it's all the same!' shouted some one. They 
lifted him by the shoulders again and laid him on the stretcher. 

'Ah, my God! my God! what is it? . . . The stomach! It's all over then! 
Ah, my God!' could be heard among the officers. 'It almost grazed my 
ear,' the adjutant was saying. The peasants, with the stretcher across their 
shoulders, hurried along the path. 

The militiamen carried Prince Andrey to the copse, where there were 
vans and an ambulance station. The ambulance station consisted of three 
tents, pitched at the edge of a birch copse. In the wood stood the ambu- 
lance waggons and horses. The horses in nose-bags were munching oats, 
and the sparrows flew up to them and picked up the grains they dropped. 
For more than five acres round the tents there were sitting or lying men 
stained with blood, and variously attired. From the tents came the sound 
of loud, angry wailing, and piteous moans. At intervals a doctor's assistant 
ran out for water, or to point out those who were to be taken in next. The 



37* WAR AND PEACE 

wounded awaiting their turn at the tent uttered hoarse groans and moans, 
wept, shouted, swore, or begged for vodka. Several were raving in delirium. 

Prince Andrey, as a colonel, was carried through the crowd of wounded 
not yet treated, and brought close up to one of the tents, where his bearers 
halted aw r aiting instructions. 

One of the doctors came out of the tent with a blood-stained apron, and 
small, blood-stained hands, in one of which he had a cigar, carefully held 
between his thumb and little finger, that it might not be stained too. This 
doctor threw his head up, and looked about him, but over the level of 
the wounded crowd. After turning his head from right to left for a few 
minutes, he sighed and dropped his eyes again. 

'All right, immediately,' he said in reply to an assistant, who pointed 
him out Prince Andrey, and he bade the bearers carry him into the tent. 

A murmur rose in the crowd of wounded men waiting. 

'Even in the next world it's only the gentry who will have a good 
time,' said one. 

Prince Andrey was carried in, and laid on a table that had just been 
cleared, and was being rinsed over by an assistant. He could not make 
out distinctly what was in the tent. The pitiful groans on all sides, and the 
excruciating pain in his thigh, his stomach, and his back distracted his 
attention. Everything he saw around melted for him into a single general 
impression of naked, blood-stained, human flesh, which seemed to fill up 
the whole low-pitched tent, as, a few weeks before, on that hot August 
day, the bare human flesh had filled up the dirty pond along the Smolensk 
road. 

There were three tables in the tent. Two were occupied; on the third 
they laid Prince Andrey. For some time he was left alone, an involuntary 
witness of what was being done at the other tables. On the table nearest 
sat a Tatar, probably of a Cossack regiment, judging from the uniform 
that had been thrown down close by. Four soldiers were holding him. A 
doctor in spectacles was cutting something in his brown, muscular back. 
'Ooh! ooh! ooh! . . .' the Tatar grunted, and all of a sudden, throwing up 
his broad, swarthy, sun-burned face, and showing his white teeth, he 
began wriggling, twitching, and shrieking a piercingly shrill, prolonged 
scream. 

On the other table, round which a number of persons were standing, 
a big, stout man lay on his back, with his head flung back. The colour and 
curliness of the hair and the shape seemed strangely familiar to Prince 
Andrey. Several assistants were holding him, and weighing on his chest, 
One white, plump leg was incessantly moving with a rapid, spasmodic 
twitching. This man was sobbing and choking convulsively. Two doctors- 
one was pale and trembling— were mutely engaged in doing something with 
the other red, gory leg. Having finished with the Tatar, over whom a cloak 
was thrown, the doctor in spectacles came up to Prince Andrey, wiping 
his hands. 



WAR AND PEACE 379 

'Undress him! Why are you dawdling?' he shouted angrily to the as- 
sistant. 

His earliest, remotest childhood came back to Prince Andrey, when 
the assistant, with tucked-up sleeves, hurriedly unbuttoned his buttons, and 
took off his clothes. The doctor bent close down over the wound, felt it, 
and sighed deeply. Then he made a sign to some one. And the excruciating 
pain made Prince Andrey lose consciousness. When he regained conscious- 
ness, the broken splinters of his thigh-bone had been removed, the bits 
of ragged flesh had been cut off, and the wound bound up. Water was 
sprinkled on his face. As soon as Prince Andrey opened his eyes, the doctor 
hurried away. 

After the agony he had passed through, Prince Andrey felt a blissful 
peace, such as he had not known for very long. All the best and happiest 
moments of his life, especially his earliest childhood, when he had been 
undressed and put to bed, when his nurse had sung lullabies over him, 
when, burying his head in the pillows, he had felt happy in the mere 
consciousness of life, rose before his imagination, not like the past even, 
but as though it were the actual present. 

The doctors were busily engaged with the wounded man, whose head 
had seemed somehow familiar to Prince Andrey: they were lifting him up 
and trying to soothe him. 

'Show it to me . . . ooo! o! ooo!' he could hear his frightened, abjectly 
suffering moans. 

They showed the wounded man the leg that had been amputated, wear- 
ing a boot, and covered with dry gore. 'O! oooo!' he sobbed. 

'My God! How's this? Why is he here?' Prince Andrey wondered. 

In the miserable, sobbing, abject creature whose leg had just been cut 
off, he recognised Anatole Kuragin. 

Some tens of thousands of men lay sacrificed in various postures and uni- 
forms on the fields and meadows belonging to the Davidov family and the 
Crown serfs, on those fields and meadows where for hundreds of years the 
peasants of Borodino, Gorky, Shevardino, and Semyonovskoye had har- 
vested their crops and grazed their cattle. At the ambulance stations the 
grass and earth were soaked with blood for acres round. 

Over all the plain, at first so bright and gay with its glittering bayonets 
and puffs of smoke in the morning sunshine, there hung now a dark cloud 
of damp mist and smoke, and a strange, sour smell of saltpetre and blood. 
Storm clouds had gathered, and a drizzling rain began to fall on the dead, 
on the wounded, on the panic-stricken, and exhausted, and hesitating sol- 
diers. It seemed to say: 'Enough, enough; cease. . . . Consider. What are 
you doing?' 

To the men on both sides, alike exhausted from want of food and rest, 
the doubt began to come whether they should still persist in slaughtering 
one another; and in every face could be seen hesitation, and in every heart 



380 WAR AND PEACE 

alike there rose the question: 'For what, for whom am I to slay and be 
slain? Slay whom you will, do what you will, but I have had enough!' 
This thought took shape towards evening in every heart alike. 

The fearful spectacle of the battlefield, in conjunction with the heaviness 
of his head, the news that some twenty generals he knew well were among 
the killed or wounded, and the sense of the impotence of his once mighty 
army, made an unexpected impression on Napoleon, who was usually fond 
of looking over the dead and wounded. On that day, the awful spectacle of 
the battlefield overcame this dauntless spirit, which he looked upon as a 
merit and a proof of greatness. The heaviness of his head and chest re- 
minded him of the possibility for him too of agony and death. At that 
minute he felt no longing for Moscow, for victory or for glory. 

But when he was on the height above Semyonovskoye, the officer in 
command of the artillery proposed to him to bring several batteries up 
on to that height to increase the fire on the Russian troops before Knyaz- 
kovo. Napoleon assented, and gave orders that word should be brought 
him of the effect produced by this battery. 

An adjutant came to say that by the Emperor's orders two hundred 
guns had been directed upon the Russians, but that they were still holding 
their ground. t 

'Our fire is mowing them down in whole rows, but they stand firm, 

said the adjutant. 

'They want more of it!' said Napoleon in his husky voice. 

'Sire?' repeated the adjutant, who had not caught the words. 

'They want even more!' Napoleon croaked hoarsely, frowning. 'Well, 
let them have it then.' 

Already, without orders from him, what he did not really want was 
being done, and he gave the order to do it simply because he thought 
the order was expected of him. And he passed back again into his old 
artificial world, peopled by the phantoms of some unreal greatness. 

Not on that day only, as he rode about the battlefield, piled with corpses 
and mutilated men (the work, as he supposed, of his will) he reckoned as 
he gazed at them how many Russians lay there for each Frenchman, and 
cheated himself into finding matter for rejoicing in the belief that there 
were five Russians for every Frenchman. Not on that day only he wrote 
to Paris that He champ de bataille a ete superbej because there were fifty 
thousand corpses on it. Even in St. Helena, in the peaceful solitude where 
he said he intended to devote his leisure to an account of the great deeds 
he had done, he wrote: 

'The Russian war ought to have been the most popular of modern times: 
it was the war of good sense and real interests, of the repose and security 
of all: it was purely pacific and conservative. 

'It was for the great cause, the end of uncertainties and the beginning 
of security. A new horizon, new labours were unfolding, all full of wel- 
fare and prosperity for all. The European system was established; all that 
remained was to organise it. 



WAR AND PEACE 381 

'Satisfied on these great points and tranquil everywhere, I too should 
have had my congress and my holy alliance. These are ideas stolen from 
me. In this assembly of great sovereigns, we could have treated of our 
interests like one family and have reckoned, as clerk with master, with the 
peoples. 

'Europe would soon in that way have made in fact but one people, 
and every one, travelling all over it, would always have found himself in 
the common fatherland. I should have required all the rivers to be open 
for the navigation of all; the seas to be common to all; and the great stand- 
ing armies to be reduced henceforth simply to the bodyguard of the 
sovereigns. 

'Returning to France, to the bosom of the great, strong, magnificent, 
tranquil, and glorious fatherland, I should have proclaimed its frontiers 
immutable, all future war purely defensive, all fresh aggrandisement anti- 
national. I should have associated my son in the empire; my dictatorship 
would have been over, and his constitutional reign would have begun . . . 

'Paris would have been the capital of the world, and the French the envy 
of the nations! . . . 

'My leisure then and my old age would have been consecrated, in com- 
pany with the Empress, and during the royal apprenticeship of my son, 
to visiting in leisurely fashion with our own horses, like a genuine country 
couple, every corner of the empire, receiving complaints, redressing wrongs, 
scattering monuments and benefits on all sides.' 

The battle of Borodino with the occupation of Moscow and the flight of 
the French, that followed without any more battles, is one of the most 
instructive phenomena in history. 

All historians are agreed that the political power of states and peoples 
is increased or diminished as the immediate result of success or defeat in 
war. All the facts of history as we know it confirm the truth of the state- 
ment, that the successes or defeats of a nation's army are the causes or, 
at least, the invariable symptoms of the increase or diminution of the 
power of a nation. 

But suddenly, in 1812, the French gained a victory before Moscow. 
Moscow was taken, and in consequence of that, with no subsequent bat- 
tles, not Russia, but the French army of six hundred thousand, and then 
Napoleonic France itself ceased to exist. To strain the facts to fit the 
rules of history, to maintain that the field of Borodino was left in the 
hands of the Russians, or that after the evacuation of Moscow, there were 
battles that destroyed Napoleon's army— is impossible. 

After the victory of the French at Borodino, there was no general en- 
gagement, nor even a skirmish of any great importance, yet the French 
army ceased to exist. What is the meaning of it? 

The sequel of the campaign of 181 2— from Borodino to the final expul- 
sion of the French— has proved that victories are not always a cause nor 
even an invariable sign of conquest; it has proved that the force that 



382 WAR AND PEACE 

decides the fate of peoples does not lie in military leaders, nor even in 
armies and battles, but in something else. 

The first fifteen years of the nineteenth century present the spectacle 
of an extraordinary movement of millions of men. Alen leave their habitual 
pursuits; rush from one side of Europe to the other; plunder, slaughter 
one another, triumph and despair; and the whole current of life is trans- 
formed and presents a quickened activity, first moving at a growing speed, 
and then slowly slackening again. What was the cause of that activity, or 
from what laws did it arise? asks the human intellect. 

The historians, in reply to that inquiry, lay before us the sayings and 
doings of some dozens of men in one of the buildings of the city of Paris, 
summing up those doings and sayings by one word— revolution. Then 
they give us a detailed biography of Napoleon, and of certain persons 
favourably or hostilely disposed to him; talk of the influence of some of 
these persons upon others; and then say that this it is to which that activity 
is due, and these are its laws. 

But the human intellect not only refuses to believe in that explanation, 
but flatly declares that the method of explanation is not a correct one, 
because in this explanation a smaller phenomenon is taken as the cause of 
a greater phenomenon. The sum of men's individual wills produced both 
the revolution and Napoleon; and only the sum of those wills endured 
them and then destroyed them. 

'But whenever there have been wars, there have been great military 
leaders; whenever there have been revolutions in states, there have been 
great men,' says history. 'Whenever there have been great military leaders 
there have, indeed, been wars,' replies the human reason; 'but that does 
not prove that the generals were the cause of the wars, and that the 
factors leading to warfare can be found in the personal activity of one 
man.' 

Whenever, looking at my watch, I see the hand has reached the figure 
x, I hear the bells beginning to ring in the church close by. But from 
the fact that the watch hand points to ten whenever the bells begin to 
ring, I have not the right to infer that the position of the hands of my 
watch is the cause of the vibration of the bells. 

For the investigation of the laws of history, we must completely change 
the subject of observations, must let kings and ministers and generals 
alone, and study the homogeneous, infinitesimal elements by which masses 
are led. 

The armed forces of twelve different nationalities of Europe invade 
Russia. The Russian army and population fall back, avoiding a battle, to 
Smolensk, and from Smolensk to Borodino. The French move on to Mos- 
cow, behind them thousands of versts of famine-stricken, hostile country; 
before them some dozens of versts between them and their goal. 

In every town and village on Russian soil, from Smolensk onwards, the 
people awaited the coming of the enemy without disturbance; did not 
display excitement; tore nobody to pieces, but calmly awaited their fate, 



WAR AND PEACE 383 

feeling in themselves the power to find what they must do in the moment 
of difficulty. And as soon as the enemy came near, the wealthier elements 
of the population went away, leaving their property behind; the poorer 
remained, and burnt and destroyed all that was left. 

The sense that this would be so, and always would be so, lay, and lies, 
at the bottom of every Russian's heart. And a sense of this, and more, 
a foreboding that Moscow would be taken by the enemy, lay in the Rus- 
sian society of Moscow in 1812. Those who had begun leaving Moscow 
in July and the beginning of August had shown that they expected it. 

'It's a disgrace to fly from danger; only the cowards are flying from 
Moscow,' they were told. Why did they go away? It cannot be supposed 
that they were scared with tales of the atrocities perpetrated by Napoleon 
in the countries he conquered. The first to leave were the wealthy, edu- 
cated people, who knew very well that Vienna and Berlin remained un- 
injured, and that the inhabitants of those cities, when Napoleon was in 
occupation of them, had spent their time gaily with the fascinating French- 
men, of whom all Russians, and especially the ladies, had at that period 
been so fond. 

They went away because to Russians the question whether they would 
be comfortable or not under the government of the French in Moscow 
could never occur. To be under the government of the French was out 
of the question; it was worse than anything. 

Any one looking at the disorder in the rear of the Russian army would 
have said that the French had but to make one slight effort more and 
the Russian army would have been annihilated; and any one seeing the 
rear of the French army would have said that the Russians need but make 
a slight effort more and the French would be overthrown. But neither 
French nor Russians made that effort, and the flame of the battle burnt 
slowly out. 

The Russians did not make this effort, because they were not attacking 
the French. At the beginning of the battle they merely stood on the road 
to Moscow, barring it to the French; and they still stood at the end of 
the battle as they had at the beginning. But even if it had been the aim 
of the Russians to drive back the French, they could not have made this 
final effort, because all the Russian troops had been routed; there was not 
a single part of the army that had not suffered in the battle, and the Rus- 
sians, without being driven from their position, lost one half of their army. 

For the French, with the memory of fifteen years of victories, with 
confidence in Napoleon's all-vanquishing genius, with the consciousness 
of having taken a part of the battlefield, of having only lost a fourth of 
their men, and of having a body of twenty thousand— the Guards— intact- 
it would have been an easy matter to make this effort. Some historians 
assert that if Napoleon had only let his Old Guard advance, the battle 
would have been gained. To talk of what might have happened if Na- 
poleon had let his Guard advance is much the same as to talk of what 
would happen if spring came in autumn. Napoleon did not do so, not 



384 WAR AND PEACE 

because he did not want to, but because it was impossible to do so. All 
the generals, officers, and soldiers of the French army knew that it was 
impossible to make this final effort, because the flagging spirit of the 
troops did not allow of it. 

It was not Napoleon alone who had that nightmare feeling that the 
mighty arm was stricken powerless: all the generals, all the soldiers of the 
French army, after all their experiences of previous battles (when after 
one-tenth of the effort the enemy had always run), showed the feeling 
of horror before this foe, who, after losing one half of the army, still stood 
its ground as dauntless at the end as at the beginning of the battle. The 
moral force of the French, the attacking army, was exhausted. Not the 
victory, signalised by the capture of rags on the end of sticks, called flags, 
or of the ground on which the troops were standing, but a moral victory, 
that which compels the enemy to recognise the moral superiority of his 
opponent, and his own impotence, was won by the Russians at Borodino. 

The French invading army, like a ravening beast that has received its 
death-wound in its onslaught, felt its end near. But it could not stop, no 
more than the Russian army— of half its strength— could help retreating. 
After that check, the French army could still drag on to Moscow, but 
there, without fresh effort on the part of the Russian army, its ruin was 
inevitable, as its life-blood ebbed away from the deadly wound dealt it at 
Borodino. The direct consequence of the battle of Borodino was Napoleon's 
causeless flight from Moscow, his return by the old Smolensk road, the 
ruin of the invading army of five hundred thousand men, and the downfall 
of the Napoleonic rule, on which, for the first time at Borodino, was laid 
the hand of a foe of stronger spirit. 



PART XI 



The Russian army, retreating from Borodino, halted at Fili. Yermolov, 
who had been inspecting the position, rode up to the commander-in-chief. 

'There is no possibility of fighting in this position,' he said. 

Kutuzov looked at him in wonder, and made him repeat the words he 
had just uttered. When he had done so, he put out his hand to him. 

'Give me your hand,' he said; and turning it so as to feel his pulse, he 
said: 'You are not well, my dear boy. Think what you are saying.' 

Kutuzov could not yet take in the idea of its being possible to retreat, 
abandoning Moscow without a battle. 

Kutuzov's face grew more and more careworn and gloomy. One terrible 
question absorbed him. And to that question he heard no reply from any 
one. The question for him now was this: 'Can it be that I have let Napoleon 
get to Moscow, and when did I do it? When did it happen? Was it yester- 
day, when I sent word to Platov to retreat, or the evening before when 
[ had a nap and bade Bennigsen give instructions? Or earlier still? . . . 
When, when was it this fearful thing happened? Moscow must be aban- 
doned. The army must retire, and I must give the order for it.' 

Bennigsen was warmly manifesting his Russian patriotism (Kutuzov 
could not listen to him without wincing), by insisting on the defence of 
Moscow. To Kutuzov, his object was as clear as daylight: in case of the 
defence being unsuccessful, to throw the blame on Kutuzov; in case of its 
being successful, to claim the credit; in case of it not being attempted, to 
clear himself of the crime of abandoning Moscow. 

In the large best room of the peasant Andrey Savostyanov's cottage, at 
two o'clock, a council met. The men and women and children of the 
peasants big family all crowded together in the room on the other side 
of the passage. Only Audrey's little grandchild, Malasha, a child of six, 
whom his highness had petted, giving her sugar while he drank his tea, 
stayed behind by the big stove in the best room. Malasha peeped out 
from on the stove with shy delight at the faces, the uniforms, and the 
crosses of the generals sitting in a row on the broad benches in the best 
corner under the holy images. 'Grandad' himself, as Malasha in her own 
mind called Kutuzov, was sitting apart from the rest in the dark corner 
behind the stove. He sat sunk all of a heap in a folding armchair, and was 
continually clearing his throat and straightening the collar of his coat, 
which, though it was unbuttoned, still seemed to gall his neck. 



385 



386 WAR AND PEACE 

Bcnnigsen opened the council by the question: Whether to abandon the 
holy and ancient capital of Russia, or to defend it? 

A prolonged silence followed. Every face was knitted, and in the still- 
ness Kutuzov could be heard angrily coughing and clearing his throat. 
All eyes were fixed on him. Malasha too gazed at 'Grandad.' She was 
nearest of all to him, and saw that his face was working; he seemed to be 
going to cry. But that did not last long. 

'The holy and ancient capital of Russia! 1 he cried suddenly, in a wrath- 
ful voice, repeating Bennigsen's words, and thereby underlining the false 
note in them. 'Allow me to tell your excellency that that question has no 
meaning to a Russian.' (He lurched his unwieldy figure forward.) 'Such a 
question cannot be put; there is no sense in such a question. The question 
I have asked these gentlemen to meet to discuss is the question of the war. 
The question is: The safety of Russia lies in her army. Is it better to risk 
the loss of the army and of Moscow by giving battle, or to abandon Mos- 
cow without a battle? That is the question on which I desire to learn your 
opinion.' He lurched back into his low chair again. 

Opinions were divided. Led by a feeling that a sacrifice was called for 
before abandoning the city, and by other personal considerations, the 
generals seemed unable to grasp that the council then sitting could not 
affect the inevitable course of events, and that Moscow was already in 
effect abandoned. 

Kutuzov heaved a heavy sigh; all looked round at him. 

'Well, gentlemen, I see that it is I who will have to pay for the broken 
pots,' he said. And slowly rising from his seat, he walked up to the table. 
'Gentlemen, I have heard your opinions. Some of you will not agree with 
me. But I' (he stopped), 'by the authority intrusted me by my Tsar and 
my country, give the order to retire.' 

After that the generals began to disperse with the solemnity and circum- 
spect taciturnity with which people separate after a funeral. 

Malasha dropped backwards down from the stove, her bare toes clinging 
to the projections, and slipping between the generals' legs, she darted out 
at the door. 

After dismissing the generals, Kutuzov sat a long while with his elbows 
on the table, pondering that terrible question: When, when had it become 
inevitable that Moscow should be abandoned? When was the thinsr done 
that made it inevitable, and who is to blame for it? 

'This I did not expect!' he said to the adjutant, Schneider, who came 
in to him late at night; 'this I did not expect! This I never thought of!' 

'You must rest, your highness,' said Schneider. 

'Yes; but they shall eat horse-flesh like the Turks!' Kutuzov cried, not 
heeding him, as he brought his podgy fist down on the table. 'They, too, 
shall eat it!' 

Ellen had accompanied the court on its return from Vilna to Petersburg, 
and there found herself in a difficult position. 



WAR AND PEACE 38? 

In Petersburg Ellen had enjoyed the special patronage of a great person- 
age, who occupied one of the highest positions in the government. In 
Vilna she had formed a liaison with a young foreign prince. 

When she returned to Petersburg the prince and the great dignitary were 
both in that town; both claimed their rights, and Ellen was confronted 
with a problem that had not previously arisen in her career— the preserva- 
tion of the closest relations with both, without giving offence to either. 

What might have seemed to any other woman a difficult or impossible 
task never cost a moment's thought to Countess Bezuhov, who plainly 
deserved the reputation she enjoyed of being a most intelligent woman. 
Ellen at*once assumed the rectitude of her own position, of which she was 
indeed genuinely convinced. The first time the young foreign prince 
ventured to reproach her, she lifted her beautiful head, and, with a haughty 
tone towards him, said firmly: 

'This is the egoism and the cruelty of men. I expected nothing else. 
Woman sacrifices herself for you; she suffers, and this is her reward. What 
right have you, your highness, to call me to account for my friendships, 
my affections? He is a man who has been more than a father to me!' 

The prince would have said something. Ellen interrupted him. 

'Well, yes, perhaps he has sentiments for me other than those of a 
father, but that is not a reason I should shut my door on him. I am not 
a man to be ungrateful. Know, your highness, that in all that relates to 
my private sentiments I will account only to God and to my conscience! 5 
she concluded, laying her hand on her beautiful, heaving bosom, and 
looking up to heaven. 

'But listen to me, in God's name! . . .' 

'Marry me, and I will be your slave!' 

'But it is impossible.' 

'You do not deign to stoop to me, you . . .' Ellen burst into tears. 

The prince attempted to console her. Ellen, as though utterly distraught, 
declared through her tears that there was nothing to prevent her marry- 
ing; that there were precedents (they were but few at that time, but 
Ellen quoted the case of Napoleon and some other persons of exalted 
rank); that she had never been a real wife to her husband; that she had 
been dragged an unwilling victim into the marriage. 

'But the law, religion . . .' murmured the prince, on the point of yield- 
ing. 

'Religion, laws . . . what can they have been invented for, if they arc 
unable to manage that?' said Ellen. 

The prince was astonished that so simple a reflection had never oc- 
curred to him, and applied to the council of the brotherhood of the 
Society of Jesus, with which he was in close relations. 

A few days later, at one of the fascinating fetes Ellen used to give at 
her summer villa, a certain fascinating M. Jobert was presented to her; a 
man no longer young, with snow-white hair and brilliant black eyes, u% 
Jesuite a robe courte, who walked for a long while with Ellen among the 



388 WAR AND PEACE 

illuminations in the garden to the strains of music, conversing with her of 
the love of God, of Christ, of the heart of the Holy Mother, and of the 
consolations afforded in this life and the next by the one true Catholic 
faith. 

One day he took the countess into a Catholic church, where she fell 
on her knees before the altar. 

Several days later Ellen learned to her satisfaction that she had now been 
admitted into the true Catholic Church, and that in a few days the Pope 
himself would hear of her case, and send her a document of some sort. 

All that was done with her and round her at this period, the attention 
paid her by so many clever men, and expressed in such agreeable and 
subtle forms, and her dovelike purity during her conversion (she wore 
nothing but white dresses and white ribbons all the time)— all afforded her 
gratification. But this gratification never led her for one instant to lose 
sight of her object. And, as always happens in contests of cunning, the 
stupid person gains more than the cleverer; Ellen, fully grasping that the 
motive of all these words and all this manoeuvring was by her conversion 
to Catholicism to get a round sum from her for the benefit of the Jesuit 
order (this was hinted at, indeed), held back the money, while insisting 
steadily on the various operations that would set her free from her con- 
jugal bonds. To her notions, the real object of every religion was to 
provide recognised forms of propriety for the satisfaction of human de- 
sires. And with this end in view, she insisted, in one of her conversations 
with her spiritual adviser, on demanding an answer to the question how 
far her marriage was binding. 

'In ignorance,' said he, 'of the significance of your promise, you took 
a vow of conjugal fidelity to a man who, on his side, was guilty of sacrilege 
in entering on the sacrament of matrimony with no faith in its religious 
significance. That marriage had not the dual binding force it should have 
had. But in spite of that, your vow was binding upon you. You broke it. 
What did you commit? Venial sin or mortal sin? A venial sin, because 
you committed it with no intention of acting wrongly. If now, with the 
object of bearing children, you should enter into a new marriage, your 
sin might be forgiven. But the question again falls into two divisions. 
First . . .' 

'But, I imagine,' Ellen, who was getting bored, said suddenly, with her 
fascinating smile, 'that after being converted to the true religion, I cannot 
be bound by any obligations laid upon me by a false religion.' 

Her spiritual adviser was astounded at the simplicity of this solution, 
as simple as the solution of Columbus's egg, He was enchanted at the 
unexpected rapidity of his pupil's progress, but could not abandon the 
edifice of subtle argument that had cost him mental effort. 

'Let us understand each other,' he said, with a smile; and began to find 
arguments to refute his spiritual daughter's contention. 

Ellen perceived that the matter was very simple and easy from the 
ecclesiastical point of view, but that her spiritual counsellors raised diffi- 



WAR AND PEACE 389 

culties simply because they were apprehensive of the way in which it might 
be looked at by the temporal authorities. 

And, consequently, Ellen decided in her own mind that the way must 
be paved for society to look at the matter in the true light. She excited 
the jealousy of the old dignitary, and said the same thing to him as she 
had to her other suitor— that is, gave him to understand that the sole 
means of obtaining exclusive rights over her was to marry her. The elderly 
dignitary was, like the young foreign prince, for the first moment taken 
aback at this proposal of marriage from a wife whose husband was living. 
But Ellen's unfaltering confidence in asserting that it was a matter as 
simple and natural as the marriage of an unmarried girl had its effect on 
him too. Had the slightest traces of hesitation, shame, or reserve been 
perceptible in Ellen herself, her case would have been undoubtedly lost. 
But far from it; with perfect directness and simple-hearted naivete, she 
told her intimate friends (and that term included all Petersburg), that 
both the prince and the dignitary had made her proposals of marriage, and 
that she loved both, and was afraid of grieving either. 

The rumour was immediately all over Petersburg— not that Ellen wanted 
a divorce from her husband (had such a rumour been discussed very 
many persons would have set themselves against any such illegal pro- 
ceeding)— but that the unhappy, interesting Ellen was in hesitation which 
of her two suitors to marry. 

Prince Vassily had of late dropped into very frequently forgetting what 
he had said, and repeating the same phrase a hundred times; and every time 
he happened to see his daughter he used to say: 

'Ellen, I have a word to say to you,' he would say, drawing her aside, 
and pulling her arm downwards. 'I have got wind of certain projects 
relative to . . . you know. Well, my dear child, you know how my father's 
heart rejoices to know you are . . . You have suffered so much. But, my 
dear child, consult only your heart. That's all I tell you.' 

Bilibin, who had not lost his reputation as a wit, was a disinterested 
friend of Ellen's. l Ecoutez y Bilibin' (Ellen always called friends of the 
category to which Bilibin belonged by their surnames), and she touched 
his coat-sleeve with her white, beringed fingers. 'Tell me, as you would 
a sister, what ought I to do? Which of the two?' 

Bilibin wrinkled up the skin over his eyebrows, and pondered with a 
smile on his lips. 

'You do not take me unawares, you know,' he said. 'As a true friend, 
I have thought, and thought again of your affair. You see, if you marry 
the prince'— (the younger suitor) he crooked his finger— 'you lose for 
ever the chance of marrying the other, and then you displease the court. 
(There is a sort of relationship, you know.) But if you marry the old 
count, you make the happiness of his last days. And then as widow of the 
great . . . the prince will not be making a mesalliance in marrying you 
. . .' and Bilibin let the wrinkles run out of his face. 

'That's a real friend!' said Ellen beaming, and once more touching 



390 WAR AND PEACE 

Bilibin's sleeve. 'But the fact is I love them both, and I don't want to 
make them unhappy. I would give my life for the happiness of both,' she 
declared. 

Bilibin shrugged his shoulders to denote that for such a trouble even 
he could suggest no remedy. 

'But do tell me what is your husband's view of the question?' he said. 
T)oes he consent?' 

'Oh, he is so fond of me!' said Ellen, who, for some unknown reason, 
fancied that Pierre too adored her. 

At the beginning of August Ellen's affairs were settled, and she wrote to 
her husband of her conversion to the one true faith, and begged him to go 
through all the necessary formalities for obtaining a divorce, of which the 
bearer of the letter would give him further details. 'On which I pray God 
to have you in His holy and powerful keeping. Your friend, Ellen.' 

This letter was brought to Pierre's house when he was on the field of 
Borodino. 

At the end of the day of Borodino, the one thing Pierre desired with his 
whole soul was to get away from the terrible sensations in which he had 
passed that day. He felt that only in the ordinary conditions of life would he 
he fit to understand himself and all he had seen and felt. But the ordinary 
conditions of life were nowhere to be found. 

After walking about three versts along the Mozhaisk road, Pierre sat 
down by the roadside. Three soldiers, dragging branches after them, set- 
tled themselves near him and began making a fire. 

They set a pot on it, broke up their biscuits into it, and put in some lard. 
The pleasant odour of the savoury and greasy mess blended with the smell 
of smoke. Pierre raised himself and sighed. The soldiers (there w r ere three 
of them) were eating and talking among themselves, without taking any 
notice cf Pierre. 

'And what let will you be one of?' one of the soldiers suddenly asked 
Pierre, 'If you are hungry w r e'll give you some, only tell us whether you're 
a true man.' 

1?* . . . said Pierre. 'I am really a militia officer, but my company's no- 
where about.' 

'Well! Fancy that!' said one of the soldiers. 

Another soldier shook his head. 

"Well, you can have some of the mash, if you like!' said the first, and 
Ecktn.g a wooden spoon he gave it to Pierre. 

Pierre squatted by the fire, and fell to eating the mess in the pot, which 
seemed to him the most delicious dish he had ever tasted. While he was 
bending over the pot, helping himself to big spoonfuls and greedily munch- 
ing one after another, the soldiers stared at him in silence. 

'Where do you want to go? Tell us!' the first of them asked again. 

To Mozhaisk.' 



WAR AND PEACE 391 

'You're a gentleman, then?' 

'Yes.' 

'And what's vour name?' 

"Pyotr Kiriliovitch.' 

'Well, Pyotr Kiriliovitch, come along, we'll take you there.' 

In the pitch dark the soldiers and Pierre walked to Mozhaisk. 

The cocks were crowing when they reached Mozhaisk, and began ascend- 
ing the steep hill into the town. 

Pierre walked on with the soldiers, entirely forgetting that his inn was at 
the bottom of the hill and he had passed it. He would not have been aware 
of this-so preoccupied was he-if he had not chanced halfway up the hill 
to stumble across his groom, who recognised Pierre by his hat, white in 
the dark. 

'Your excellency!' he cried, 'whv, we had quite given you up. How is it 
you are on foot? And, mercy on us, where are you going?' 

The soldiers halted. 

'Well, found your own folks then?' said one of them. 

'Well, good-bye to you— Pyotr Kiriliovitch, wasn't it?' 

'Good-bye, Pyotr Kiriliovitch!' said the other voices. 

'Good-bye,' said Pierre, and with the groom he turned in the direction 
of the inn. 

'I ought to give them something!' thought Pierre, feeling for his pocket. 
'No, better not,' some inner voice prompted him. 

There was not a room at the inn: all were full. Pierre went out into the 
yard, and muffling his head up, lay down in his carriage. 

Pierre had hardly put his head on the pillow when he felt that he was 
dropping asleep. But all of a sudden he heard, almost with the distinctness 
of reality, the sound of the boom, boom, boom of the cannon, the groans 
and shrieks and dull thud of the falling shell, smelt the blood and powder; 
and the feeling of horror, the dread of death, came over him. He opened 
his eyes in a panic, and put his head out from the cloak. All was quiet in 
the yard. The only sound came from a servant of some sort talking with 
the porter at the gate, and splashing through the mud. Over Pierre's head, 
under the dark, wooden eaves, he heard pigeons fluttering, startled by the 
movement he had made in sitting up. The whole yard was pervaded by 
the strong smell of hay, of dung, and of tar. Between two dark sheds he 
caught a glimpse of the pure, starlit sky. 

'Thank God, that is all over!' thought Pierre, covering his head up again. 
J Oh, how awful terror is, and how shamefully I gave way to it! But they 
. . . they were firm and calm all the while up to the end . . .' he thought. 

They, in Pierre's mind, meant the soldiers, those who had been on the 
battery, and those who had given him food, and those who had prayed to 
the holy picture. They-those strange people, of whom he had known 
nothing hitherto— they stood out clearly and sharply in his mind apart from 
all other people. 

'To be a soldier, simply a soldier!' thought Pierre as he fell asleep. 'To 



392 WAR AND PEACE 

enter with one's whole nature into that common life, to be filled with what 
makes them what they are. They are simple; they do not talk, but act. But 
how is one to cast off all that is superfluous, devilish in one's self, all the 
burden of the outer man? 

'No one can be master of anything while he fears death. And all things 
belong to him who fears it not. The hardest thing' (Pierre thought or heard 
in his dream) 'is to know how to unite in one's soul the significance of the 
whole. To unite the whole?' Pierre said to himself. 'No, not to unite. One 
cannot unite one's thoughts, but to harness together all those ideas, that's 
what's wanted. Yes, one must harness together, harness together,' Pierre re- 
peated to himself with a thrill of ecstasy, feeling that those words, and only 
those words, expressed what he wanted to express, and solved the whole 
problem fretting him. 

'Yes, one must harness together; it's time to harness . . .' 

'We want to harness the horses; it's time to harness the horses, your ex- 
cellency! Your excellency,' some voice was repeating, 'we want to harness 
the horses; it's time . . .' 

Pierre got up. 'Another second and I should have understood it all. But 
what am I to do? To harness, but how harness all together?' 

The troops were marching out, leaving tens of thousands of wounded 
behind. The wounded could be seen at the windows of the houses, and 
were crowding the yards and streets. Screams, oaths, and blows could be 
heard in the streets about the carts which were to carry away the wounded. 
Pierre put his carriage at the service of a wounded general of his acquaint- 
ance, and drove with him to Moscow. On the wav he was told of the death 
of his brother-in-law, Anatole, and of the death of Prince Andrey. 

On the 30th Pierre returned to Moscow. Almost at the city gates he was 
met by an adjutant and summoned to the governor. Though the news was 
being concealed from the citizens, the heads of various departments and 
officials of different kinds knew that Moscow would soon be in the hands 
of the enemy, just as Count Rastoptchin knew it. And all of them to escape 
personal responsibility had come to the governor to inquire how to act in 
regard to the offices in their charge. 

At the moment when Pierre went into the waiting-room, a courier from 
the army was just coming out. Pierre watched with weary eyes the various 
officials— young, old, military, and civilian, important and insignificant— who 
were gathered together in the room. 

'But look here, what he writes,' said one, pointing to a printed paper he 
I eld in his hand. 

'That's a different matter. That's necessary for the common people.' 

'What is it?' asked Pierre. 

'The new proclamation.' 

Pierre took it and began to read. 

'His highness the prince has passed Mozhaisk, so as to unite with the 
troops that are going to join him, and has taken up a strong position, where 
\fte enemy cannot attack him suddenly. Forty-eight cannon with shells have 



WAR AND PEACE 393 

been sent him from here, and his highness declares that he will defend Mos- 
cow to the last drop of blood, and is ready even to fight in the streets.' 

'Why, I was told by military men,' said Pierre, 'that there could be no 
fighting in the town itself, and the position . . .' 

In the middle of this Pierre was summoned to the governor. 

He went into Count Rastoptchin's study. Rastoptchin, frowning, passed 
his hand across his forehead and eyes as Pierre entered. A short man was 
saying something, but as soon as Pierre walked in he stopped, and went out. 

'Ah! greetings to you, valiant warrior. We have been hearing about your 
prouesses! But that's not the point. Mon cher, entre nous, are you a mason? ' 
said Count Rastoptchin in a severe tone, that suggested that it was a crime 
to be so, but that he intended to pardon it. 'I know that there are masons 
and masons, and I hope you don't belong to those among them who, by 
way of regenerating the human race, are trying to ruin Russia.' 

'Yes, I am a mason,' answered Pierre. 

'Well then, look here, my dear boy. You are not unaware, I dare say, of 
the fact that Speransky and Magnitsky have been sent— to their proper 
place— and the same has been done with Klutcharyov and the others who, 
under the guise of building up the temple of Solomon, have been trying to 
destroy the temple of their fatherland. You may take it for granted there 
are good reasons for it, and that I could not have banished the director of 
the post-office here if he had not been a dangerous person. Now, it has 
reached my ears that you sent him your carriage to get out of the town, 
and that you have even taken charge of his papers. I like you, and wish you 
no harm, and as you are half my age, I advise you, as a father might, to 
break off all connection with people of that sort, and to get away from here 
yourself as quickly as you can.' 

'But what was Klutcharyov's crime?' asked Pierre. 

'That's my business; and it's not yours to question me,' cried Rastoptchin. 

'If he is accused of having circulated Napoleon's proclamation, the charge 
has not been proved,' said Pierre. 

Rastoptchin suddenly broke in, scowling and shouting, 'I did not send for 
you to criticise my actions, but in order to give you advice or a command, 
if you will have it so. I beg you to break off all connection with Klut- 
charyov and his set, and to leave the town. And I'll knock the nonsense out 
of them, wherever I may find it.' 

And, probably becoming conscious that he was taking a heated tone with 
Bezuhov, who was as yet guilty of no offence, he added, taking Pierre's 
hand cordially: 'We are on the eve of a public disaster, and I haven't time 
to say civil things to every one who has business with me. Well, what are 
you going to do?' 

'Oh, nothing,' answered Pierre, with no change in the expression of his 
dreamy face. 

The count frowned. 

l Un conseil (Vami, mon cher. Decamp, and as soon as may be, that's my 
advice. A bon entendeur, salutl Good-bye, my dear boy. Oh, by the way,' 



394 WAR AND PEACE 

he called after him at the door, 'is it true the countess has fallen into the 
clutches of the holy fathers of the Society of Jesus?' 

Pierre made no answer. He walked out from Rastoptchin's room, scowl- 
ins - and wrathful as he had never been seen before. 

By the time he reached home it was getting dark. Eight persons of dif- 
ferent kinds were waiting on him that evening. All of them had business 
matters which he had to settle. At last he was left alone, and he broke open 
and read his wife's letter. 

''They— the soldiers on the battery, Prince Andrey killed . . . my wife 
is going to be married . . . one must harness all together. . . . One must 
understand . . .' And, without undressing, he threw himself on his bed and 
at once fell asleep. 

When he waked up next morning his steward came in to announce that 
a police official was below, sent expressly by Count Rastoptchin to find out 
whether Count Bezuhov had gone, or was going away. Pierre dressed in 
haste, and instead of going to see his callers, he ran down the back stair- 
case and out by the back entry to the gates. 

From that moment till the occupation of Moscow was over, no one of 
Bezuhov's household saw him again, nor could discover his whereabouts, in 
spite of every effort to track him. 

The rostovs remained in Moscow till the ist of September, the day before 
the enemy entered the city. 

After Petya had joined Obolensky's regiment of Cossacks, the countess 
fell into a panic of terror. The idea that both her sons were at the war, that 
they had both escaped from under her wing, that any day either of them— 
and possibly even both at once, like the three sons of a lady of her acquaint- 
ance—might be killed, seemed for the first time that summer to strike her 
imagination with cruel vividness. She tried to get Nikolay back, wanted to 
go herself after Petya, or to obtain some post for him in Petersburg; but 
all these seemed equally impossible. Petya could not be brought back ex- 
cept by the return of his regiment, or through being transferred to another 
regiment on active service. Nikolay was somewhere at the front, and noth- 
ing had been heard from him since the letter in which he had given a 
detailed account of his meeting with Princess Marya. 

The countess could not sleep at nights, and when she did sleep, she 
dreamed that her sons had been killed. After much talking the matter over, 
and many consultations of friends, the count at last hit on a means for 
soothing the countess. He got Petya transferred from Obolensky's regiment 
to Bezuhov's, which was in formation near Moscow. Though, even so, Petya 
remained in the army, by this exchange the countess had the consolation of 
seeing one son at least again under her wing; and she hoped to manage not 
to let her Petya escape her again, but to succeed in getting him always 
appointed to places where there would be no risk of his being in battle. 

While Nikolay had been the only one in danger, the countess had fancied 
(and had suffered some pricks of conscience on the subject) that she loved 



WAR AND PEACE 395 

her elder son better than the other children. But now that her younger boy, 
the scapegrace Petya, always idle at his lessons, always in mischief, and 
teasing every one, her little Petya, with his snub-nose, his merry black eyes, 
his fresh colour, and the soft down just showing on his cheeks, had slipped 
away into the company of those big, dreadful, cruel men, who were fighting 
away somewhere about something, and finding a sort of pleasure in it— 
now it seemed to the mother that she loved him more, far more, than all the 
rest. 

Although by the 20th of August almost all the Rostovs' acquaintances had 
left Moscow; although everybody was trying to persuade the countess to 
get away as quickly as possible, she would not hear of leaving till her treas- 
ure, her idolised Petya, had come back. On the 28th of August Petya 
arrived. The morbidly passionate tenderness with which his mother received 
him was by no means gratifying to the sixteen-year-old officer. Though his 
mother concealed her intention of never letting him escape from under her 
wing again, Petya divined her plans, and instinctively afraid of his mother's 
making him too soft, of her 'making a ninny' of him (as he expressed it in 
his own mind), he treated her rather coolly, avoided being with her, and 
during his stay in Moscow devoted himself exclusively to Natasha. 

The count, with his characteristic carelessness, had by the 28th made no 
preparations for leaving, and the waggons that were to come from their 
Moscow and Ryazan estate to remove all their property out of the house 
only arrived on the 30th. 

From the 28th to the 31st, Moscow was all bustle and movement. Every 
day thousands of wounded from the field of Borodino were brought in at 
the Dorogomilov gate and conveyed across Moscow, and thousands of 
vehicles, full of residents and their belongings, were driving out at the gates 
on the opposite side of the city. The strangest and most contradictory 
rumours were circulating about the town. Some said that every one was 
forbidden to leave the city; others asserted that all the holy pictures had 
been taken from the churches, and every one was to be driven out of 
Moscow by force. Some said there had been another battle after Borodino, 
in which the French had been utterly defeated; others declared that the 
whole Russian army had been annihilated. 

On Saturday, the 31st of August, the whole household of the Rostovs 
seemed turned upside down. All the doors stood wide open, all the furniture 
had been moved about or carried out, looking-glasses and pictures had been 
taken down. The rooms were littered up with boxes, with hay and packing 
paper and cord. Peasants and house-serfs were tramping about the parquet 
floors carrying out the baggage. The courtyard was crowded with peasants' 
carts, some piled high with goods and corded up, others still standing 
empty. 

The count had been out since early morning. The countess had a head- 
ache from the noise and bustle, and was lying down in the new divan-room 
with compresses steeped in vinegar on her head. Petya had gone off to see 
a comrade, with whom he was planning to get transferred from the militia 



396 WAR AND PEACE 

to a regiment at the front. Sonya was in the great hall, superintending the 
packing of the china and glass. Natasha was sitting on the floor in her dis- 
mantled room among heaps of dresses, ribbons, and scarfs. She sat gazing 
immovably at the floor, holding in her hands an old ball-dress, the very 
dress, now out of fashion, in which she had been to her first Petersburg ball. 

From the reverie she had fallen into, Natasha was aroused by the talk cf 
the maids in the next room and their hurried footsteps from their room to 
the backstairs. Natasha got up and looked out of the window. A huge train 
of carts full of wounded men had stopped in the street. 

The maids, the footmen, the housekeeper, the old nurse, the cooks, the 
coachmen, the grooms, and the scullion-boys were all at the gates, staring 
at the wounded men. Natasha flung a white pocket-handkerchief over her 
hair, and holding the corners in both hands, went out into the street. 

The old housekeeper, Mavra Kuzminishna, had gone up to a cart with a 
tilt of bast-mats thrown over it. She was talking to a pale young officer who 
was lying in this cart. Natasha took a few steps forward and stood still 
timidly, holding her kerchief on and listening to what the housekeeper was 
saying. 

'So you have no one then in Moscow?' Mavra Kuzminishna was saving. 
'You'd be more comfortable in some apartment. ... In our house even. 
The masters are all leaving.' 

'I don't know if it would be allowed,' said the officer in a feeble voice. 
'There's our chief officer . . . ask him,' and he pointed to a stout major who 
had turned back and was walking along the row of carts down the street. 

Natasha at once went to meet the major. 

'May the wounded men stay in our house?' she asked. 

The major with a smile put his hand to his cap. 

'What is your pleasure, ma'mselle?' he said, screwing up his eyes and 
smiling. 

Natasha quietly repeated her question, and her face and her whole man- 
ner, though she still kept hold of the corners of the pocket-handkerchief, 
was so serious, that the major left off smiling, and after a moment's ponder- 
ing—as though asking himself how far it were possible— he gave her an 
affirmative answer. 

'Oh yes, why not, they may,' he said. 

The officer in the covered cart turned into the Rostovs' courtyard, and 
dozens of carts of wounded men began at the invitation of the inhabitants 
to drive up to the entries of the houses in Povarskv Street. Natasha was 
delighted at having to do with new people in conditions quite outside the 
ordinary routine of life. She joined Mavra Kuzminishna in trying to get as 
many as possible driven into their yard. 

'We must ask your papa though,' said Mavra Kuzminishna. 

'Nonsense, nonsense. What does it matter? For one day, we'll move into 
the drawing-room. We can give them all our half of the house.' 

'What an idea! what next? The lodge, may be, the men's room, and old 
nurse's room; and you must ask leave for that.' 



WAR AND PEACE 397 

'Well, I will ask.' 

Natasha ran indoors, and went on tiptoe to the half-open door of the 
divan-room, where there was a strong smell of vinegar and Hoffmann's 
drops. 

'Are you asleep, mamma?' 

'Oh, what chance is there of sleep!' said the countess, who had just 
dropped into a doze. 

'Mamma, darling!' said Natasha, kneeling before her mother and leaning 
her face against her mother's. 'I am sorry, forgive me, I'll never do it again, 
I waked you. Mavra Kuzminishna sent me; they have brought some 
wounded men in, officers, will you allow it? They have nowhere to go; 
I know you will allow it, . . .' she said rapidly, not taking breath. 

'Officers? Who have been brought in? I don't understand,' said the 
countess. 

Natasha laughed, the countess too smiled faintly. 

'I knew you would let me ... so I will tell them so.' And Natasha, kissing 
her mother, got up and went to the door. 

In the hall she met her father, who had come home with bad news. 

'We have lingered on too long!' said the count, with unconscious anger 
in his voice; 'the club's shut up and the police are leaving.' 

'Papa, you don't mind my having invited some of the wounded into the 
house?' said Natasha. 

'Of course not,' said the count absently. 'But that's not to the point. 
I beg you now not to let yourself be taken up with any nonsense, but to 
help to pack and get off— to get off to-morrow . . .' 

And the count gave his butler and servants the same orders. Petya came 
back at dinner-time, and he too had news to tell them. He said that the mob 
was taking up arms to-day in the Kremlin; that a great battle was to be 
fought. 

The countess looked in timid horror at her son's eager, excited face, as 
he told them this. She knew that if she said a word to try and dissuade 
Petya from going to battle (she knew how he was enjoying the prospect 
of it), he would say something about the duty of a man, about honour, and 
the fatherland— something irrational, masculine, and perverse— which it 
would be useless to oppose, and all hope of preventing him would be gone. 

And, therefore, hoping to set off before this battle, taking Petya with her, 
to guard and protect them on the road, she said nothing to her son, but 
after dinner called her husband aside, and with tears besought him to take 
her away as soon as could be, that night if possible. Though she had till 
then shown not the slightest sign of alarm, she declared she should die of 
terror if they did not get away that very night. She was indeed without 
feigning afraid now of everything. 

After dinner all the Rostov household set to work packing and preparing 
for their departure with eager haste. The old count, suddenly rousing him- 
self to the task, spent the rest of the day continually trotting from the court- 
yard into the house and back again, shouting confused instructions to the 



398 WAR AND PEACE 

hurrying servants, and trying to spur them on to even greater haste. Petva 
looked after things in the yard. Sonya was quite bewildered by the count's 
contradictory orders, and did not know what to do. The servants raced 
about the rooms, shouting, quarrelling, and making a noise. 

Natasha, too, suddenly set to work with the ardour that w T as characteristic 
of her in all she did. At first no one expected anything serious from her or 
would obey her instructions. But with heat and perseverance, she did at 
last succeed in impressing them. Her first achievement, which cost her 
immense effort, and established her authority, was the packing of the rugs. 
There were a number of costly Gobelin tapestries and Persian rugs in the 
house. When Natasha set to work, she found two boxes standing open in 
the hall: one packed almost full of china, the other full of rugs. There was 
a great deal more china left standing on the tables and there was more still 
to come from the storeroom. Another third box was needed, and the men 
had gone to get one. 

'Sonya, wait a little, and we'll pack it all without that,' said Natasha. 

'You cannot, miss; we have tried already,' said the footman. 

But Natasha would not give in. She pulled everything out, and began 
rapidly packing them again, deciding that the commoner rugs and crockery 
should not be taken at all. When she had taken everything out, she began 
repacking what was to go; and by sorting out almost all the cheaper goods 
which were not worth taking, all that was of value was got into two boxes. 
Only the lid of the box full of rugs would not shut. A few things might have 
been taken out, but Natasha wanted to manage it in her own way. She un- 
packed, repacked, squeezed the things in, made the footman and Petya, 
whom she had drawn into assisting in the work, press on the lid, and herself 
tried desperately to do the same. 

'That will do, Natasha,' Sonya said to her. 'I see you are quite right, but 
take out just the top one.' 

'I won't,' cried Natasha, with one hand holding her disordered hair off 
her perspiring face, while with the other she squeezed down the rugs. 
'Press it, Petya, press it! Vassilitch, press hard!' she cried. The rugs yielded, 
and the lid closed. Natasha set to work at once on a fresh job; and now the 
servants put complete faith in her, and came to ask whether a cart was 
packed full enough and whether the loads were to be tied on. 

But with all their exertions, even late at night everything was not ready. 
The countess had fallen asleep, and the count put off their departure till 
morning and went to bed. 

Sonya and Natasha slept in the divan-room, without undressing. 

That night another wounded officer was driven along Povarsky Street, 
and Mavra Kuzminishna had him brought into the Rostovs' yard. The 
wounded officer must, Mavra Kuzminishna thought, be a man of very 
great consequence. He was in a coach with the hood let down and a carriage 
apron completely covering it. An old man, a most respectable-looking valet, 
was sitting on the box with the driver. A doctor and two soldiers followed 
the carriage in another conveyance. 






WAR AND PEACE 399 

'Come into our house, come in. The masters are going away, the whole 
house is empty,' said the old woman, addressing the old servant. 

'Well,' answered the valet, sighing, 'and indeed we have no hope of get- 
ting him home alive! We have a house of our own in Moscow, but it is a 
long way further, and there's no one living in it either.' 

is the gentleman very bad, then?' 

'There's no hope!' 

They had to avoid lifting him up steps, and so they carried the wounded 
man to the lodge. This wounded officer was Prince Andrey Bolkonsky. 

The last day of Moscow had come. It was a bright, clear autumn day. It 
was Sunday. The bells were ringing for service in all the churches, just as 
on all other Sundays. 

There were only two indications in the condition of society that betrayed 
the position of Moscow; those were the rabble, that is, the poorer class, and 
the prices of different objects. Factory hands, house-serfs, and peasants came 
out early that morning in immense crowds, which were swelled by clerks 
divinity students, and gentlemen. Prices, too, on that day indicated the 
position of affairs. The prices of weapons, of carts and horses, and the value 
of gold rose higher and higher, while the value of paper-money and the 
prices of things useful in town were continually falling, so that by the mid- 
dle of the day, while five hundred roubles was paid for a peasant's horse, 
furniture, mirrors, and bronzes were given away for nothing. 

In the old-fashioned and decorous house of the Rostovs the collapse of 
all the usual conditions of life was very slightly perceptible. In the night 
three out of the immense retinue of servants did indeed disappear; but 
nothing was stolen, and the Rostovs were only aware of the change in the 
relative value of things from finding that the thirty carts from the country 
were of enormous value, for which they were envied by many, and offered 
enormous sums. Besides these would-be purchasers, all the previous evening 
and early in the morning of the 1st of September orderlies and servants were 
being continually sent into the Rostovs' courtyard from wounded officers, 
and wounded men were constantly dragging themselves there from the 
Rostovs' and neighbouring houses, to beseech the servants to try and o- et 
them a lift out of Moscow. The butler, to whom these requests were re- 
ferred, resolutely refused, though he felt for the wounded men, and de- 
clared that he would never even dare to hint at such a thing to the count. 
Pitiable as the position of these wounded men was, it was obvious that if 
one gave up one cart to them, one might as well give all-and would even 
have to put the carriages too at their service. Thirty waggons could not 
save all the wounded, and in the general catastrophe one must think of 
oneself and one's family first. So the butler reasoned on his master's behalf. 

On waking up that morning Count Ilya Andreivitch slipped quietly out 
of his bedroom, so as not to wake his wife, who had been awake till morn- 
ing, and in his lilac silk dressing-gown he came out on to the steps. The 
loaded waggons were standing in the courtyard. The carriages were drawn 
up at the steps. The butler was standing in the entrance talking with an old 



400 WAR AND PEACE 

orderly and a pale young officer with his arm in a sling. The butler, seeing 
his master, made a significant and peremptory sign to them both to retire. 

'Well, is everything ready, Vassilitch?' said the count, rubbing his bald 
head; and looking benignly at the officer and the orderly, he nodded to 
them. (The count was always attracted by new faces.) 

'Ready to put the horses in immediately, your excellency.' 

'Well, that's capital; the countess will soon be awake, and, please God, 
we set off! What can I do for you, sir?' he said, addressing the officer. 'You 
are staying in my house?' 

The officer came closer. His pale face suddenly flushed crimson. 

'Count, do me a great favour, allow me . . . for God's sake ... to get 
into one of your waggons. I have nothing here with me ... I can go quite 
well with the luggage . . .' 

Before the officer finished speaking, the orderly came up to make the 
same request for his master. 

'Oh! yes, yes, yes,' said the count hurriedly. 'I shall be very glad indeed. 
Vassilitch, you see to it; you have a waggon or two cleared, well . .' . well 
. . . what's needed . . . ?' The count murmured some vague orders. But 
the glowing look of gratitude on the officer's face instantly put the seal on 
the order. The count looked about him; everywhere— in the yard, at the 
gates, at the windows of the lodge— he saw wounded men and orderlies. 
They were all gazing at him and moving up towards the steps. 

'Will you please walk into the gallery, your excellency; what are your 
orders about the pictures there?' said the butler. And the count went into 
the house with him, repeating his instructions that they were not to refuse 
the wounded men who begged to go with them. 

'You can take something out of the loads, you know,' he added, in a 
subdued and mysterious voice, as though he were afraid of being overheard. 

At nine o'clock the countess woke up, and her maid came in to report 
that the young ladies' summer dresses could not possibly be left behind. 
On the countess inquiring the cause of Madame Schoss's resentment, it 
appeared that that lady's trunk had been taken out of the waggon, and 
that all the waggons were being unloaded, and that the luggage was being 
taken out, as the waggons were to be given up to the wounded men, whom 
the count, with his usual readiness to be imposed upon, had consented to 
take away with them. The countess sent for her husband to come to her. 

'What's this, my dear? I hear the luggage is being unloaded.' 

'Do you know, ma chere, I wanted to speak to you about it . . . dear 
little countess ... an officer came up to me— they are imploring us to let 
them have a few waggons for the wounded. It's all a question of money 
loss to us, of course, but to be left behind . . . think what it means to them! 
. . . Here they are in our very yard; we asked them in ourselves; here are 
officers. . . . You know, I really think, ma chere . . . well, let them take 
them. We are in no hurry.' 

The count spoke timidly, as he always did when the subject was in any 
way connected with money. The countess was used to that tone, which 



WAR AND PEACE 401 

always ushered in some matter prejudicial to her children's interests, such as 
the building of a new gallery, or conservatory, or a new theatre in the 
house, or the training of an orchestra; and she made it a habit, and regarded 
it as a duty, to oppose everything that was communicated in that tone. 

She assumed her air of tearful resignation, and said to her husband: 

'Listen, count, you have mismanaged things so, that we are getting noth- 
ing for the house, and now you want to throw away all our— all the chil- 
dren^— property. Why, you told me yourself that we have a hundred 
thousand roubles' worth of valuables in the house. I protest, and protest, my 
love. What would you have! It's for the Government to look after the 
wounded. They know that. Only think, the Lopuhins opposite cleared 
everything to the last stick out of their house the day before yesterday. 
That's how other people manage. It's only we who are such fools. If you 
have no consideration for me, do at least think of your children.' 

The count waved his hands in despair, and went out of the room without 
a word. 

'Papa! why do you do that?' said Natasha, who had followed him into 
her mother's room. 

'Nothing! It's no business of yours!' the count said angrily. 

'But I heard,' said Natasha. 'Why won't mamma have it?' 

'It's no business of yours!' cried the count. 

Natasha walked away to the window. 

The count was walking about the room with a pipe in his hand, when, 
with a face distorted by passion, Natasha burst like a tempest into the room, 
and ran with rapid steps up to her mother. 

'It's vile! It's loathsome!' she screamed. 'It can't be true that it's your 
order.' 

'Mamma, it's impossible; look what's being done in the yard!' she cried; 
'they are being left . . .' 

'What's the matter? Who are they?' 

'The wounded! It's impossible, mamma, it's outrageous. Are we a lot of 
low Germans? . . .' Her throat was quivering with sobs. 'Mamma, darling, 
it's all wrong; forgive me, please, darling . . . Mamma, what is it to us what 
we take away? You only look out into the yard. . . . Mamma!' 

The count stood in the window, and listened to Natasha without turning 
his head. All at once he gave a sort of gulp, and put his face closer to the 
window. 

The countess glanced at her daughter, saw her face full of shame for 
her mother, felt why her husband would not look at her now, and looked 
about her with a distracted air. 

'Oh, do as you please. Am I doing anything to hinder any one?' she 
said, not giving way all at once. 

'Mamma, darling, forgive me.' 

But the countess pushed away her daughter, and went up to the count. 

'My dear, you order what is right. ... I don't understand about it, you 
know,' she said, dropping her eyes with a guilty air. 



402 WAR AND PEACE 

'Papa, mamma! may I give the order? May I? . . .' asked Natasha, 
'We'll take all that's quite necessary all the same,' she added. 

The count nodded; and Natasha, with the same swiftness with which she 
used to run at 'catch-catch,' flew across the hall into the vestibule, and 
down the steps into the yard. 

The servants gathered round Natasha, and could hardly believe the 
strange order she gave them, till the count himself in his wife's name 
confirmed the order that all the waggons were to be placed at the disposal 
of the wounded, and the boxes were to be taken down to the storerooms. 

The wounded soldiers came creeping out of their rooms, and crowded 
round the waggons, with pale, delighted faces. The news spread to the 
neighbouring houses, and wounded men began to come into the yard 
from other houses too. Many of the wounded soldiers begged them not 
to take out the boxes, but only to let them sit on the top of them. But when 
once the work of unloading had begun there was no stopping it; it seemed 
of little consequence w T hether all were left or half. The cases of china, of 
bronzes, of pictures and looking-glasses, which had been so carefully 
packed during the previous night, lay in the yard, and still they sought and 
found possibilities of taking out more and more, and leaving more and 
more for the wounded. 

'We can take four more,' said the steward. 'I'll leave my luggage, or else 
what is to become of them?' 

'Oh, let them have our wardrobe cart,' said the countess; 'Dunyasha will 
go with me in the carriage.' 

The waggon packed with the ladies' wardrobe was unloaded, and sent 
to fetch wounded men from two doors off. All the family and the servants 
too were eager and merry. Natasha was in a state of ecstatic happiness, 
such as she had not known for a very long while. 

'Where are w r e to fasten this on?' said the servant, trying to lay a trunk 
on the narrow footboard behind in the carriage. 'We must keep just one 
cart for it.' 

'What is it?' asked Natasha. 

'The count's books.' 

'Leave it. Vassilitch will put it away. That's not necessary.' 

The covered gig was full of people; they were only in doubt where Pyotr 
Ilyitch was to sit. 

'He'll go on the box. You'll go on the box, won't you, Petya?' cried 
Natasha. 

Sonya, too, worked with unflagging zeal; but the aim of her exertions 
wa^ the opposite of Natasha's. She saw to the storing away of all that was 
left behind, made a list of them at the countess's desire, and tried to get 
as much as possible taken with them. 

By two o'clock the Rostovs' four carriages, packed and ready to start, 
stood in the approach. The waggon-loads of wounded were filing one 
after another out of the yard. 

The coach in which Prince Andrey was being taken drove by the front 



WAR AND PEACE 403 

door, and attracted the attention of Sonya, who was helping a maid to 
arrange the countess's seat comfortably in her huge, high carriage. 

'Whose carriage is that?' asked Sonya, popping her head out of the 
carriage window. 

'Why, haven't you heard, miss?' answered the maid. 'The wounded 
prince; he stayed the night in the house, and is going on with us.' 

'Oh, who is he? what's his name?' 

'Our betrothed that was . . . Prince Bolkonsky himself!' answered the 
maid, sighing. 'They say he is dying.' 

Sonya jumped out of the carriage and ran in to the countess. The count- 
ess, dressed for the journey, in her hat and shawl, was walking wearily 
about the drawing-room, waiting for the rest of the household to come 
in and sit down with closed doors, for the usual silent prayer before setting 
out. Natasha was not in the room. 

'Mamma,' said Sonya. 'Prince Andrey is here, wounded and dying.' 

The countess opened her eyes in dismay. 

'Natasha,' she said. 

Both Sonya and the countess knew their Natasha, and alarm at the 
thought of the effect the news might have on her outweighed all sympathy 
for the man, though they both liked him. 

'Natasha does not know yet, but he is going with us,' said Sonya. 

'You say he is dying?' 

Sonya nodded. 

'Well, mamma, it's ail ready. What is it? . . .' asked Natasha, running 
with her eager face into the room. 'What has happened? Something very 
bad, concerning me?' 

'Nothing,' said the countess. 'If we're ready, then do let us start.' 

As is invariably the case at starting on a journey, a great many things 
were found to have been forgotten, or packed in the wrong place; and 
two grooms were kept a long while standing, one each side of the open 
carriage door, ready to help the countess up the carriage steps, while 
maids were flying with pillows and bags from the house to the carriages, 
the coach, and the covered gig, and back again. 

The old coachman Efim, the only one whom the countess could trust to 
drive her, sat perched up on the box, and did not even look round at what 
was passing behind him. His thirty years' experience had taught him that 
it would be some time yet before they would say, 'Now, in God's name, 
start!' and that when they had said it, they would stop him at least twice 
again to send back for things that had been forgotten; and after that he 
would have to pull up once more for the counters herself to put her head 
out of the window and beg him, for Christ's sake, to drive carefully 
downhill. At last all were seated; the carriage steps were pulled up, and 
the door slammed, and the forgotten travelling-case had been sent for, 
and the countess had popped her head out and given the usual injunc- 
tions. Then Efim deliberately took his hat off and began crossing himself. 
The postillion and all the servants did the same. 



404 WAR AND PEACE 

'With God's blessing!' said Efim, putting his hat on. 'Off!' The postil- 
lion started his horse. The right-shaft horse began to pull, the high springs 
creaked, and the carriage swayed. The footman jumped up on the box 
while it was moving. The carriage jolted as it drove out of the yard on 
to the uneven pavement; the other vehicles jolted in the same way as they 
followed in a procession up the street. All the occupants of the carriages, 
the coach and the covered gig, crossed themselves on seeing the church 
opposite. The servants, who w T ere staying in Moscow, walked along on 
both sides of the carriages to see them off. 

Natasha had rarely felt such a joyful sensation as she experienced at 
that moment sitting in the carriage by the countess and watching, as they 
slowly moved by her, the walls of forsaken, agitated Moscow. Now and 
then she put her head out of the carriage window and looked back, and 
then in front of the long train of waggons full of wounded soldiers preced- 
ing them. Foremost of them ail she could see Prince Andrey's closed 
carriage. She did not know who was in it. 

As they turned round Suharev Tower, Natasha, who was quickly and 
inquisitively scrutinising the crowd driving and walking by, uttered a 
cry of delight and surprise: 

'Good Heavens! Mamma, Sonya, look; it's he!' 

'Who? who?' 

'Look, do look! Bezuhov,' said Natasha, putting her head out of the 
carriage window and staring at a tall, stout man in a coachman's long 
coat, obviously a gentleman disguised, from his carriage and gait. He 
was passing under the arch of the Suharev Tower beside a yellow-looking, 
beardless, little old man in a frieze cloak. 

'Only fancy! Bezuhov in a coachman's coat, with a queer sort of old- 
looking boy,' said Natasha. 'Do look; do look!' 

'No, it's not he. How can you be so absurd!' 

'Mamma,' cried Natasha. 'On my word of honour, I assure you, it is 
he. Stop, stop,' she shouted to the coachman; but the coachman could not 
stop, because more carts and carriages were coming out of Myeshtchansky 
Street, and people were shouting at the Rostovs to move on, and not to 
keep the rest of the traffic waiting. 

All the Rostovs did, however, though now at a much greater distance, 
see Pierre, or a man extraordinarily like him, wearing a coachman's coat, 
and walking along the street with bent head and a serious face beside a 
little, beardless old man, who looked like a footman. This old man noticed 
a face poked out of the carriage window staring at them, and respectfully 
touching Pierre's elbow, he said something to him, pointing towards the 
carriage. It was some time before Pierre understood what he was saying; 
he was evidently deeply absorbed in his own thoughts. At last he looked 
in the direction indicated, and recognising Natasha, he moved instantly 
towards the carriage, as though yielding to the first impulse. But after 
taking a dozen steps towards it, he stopped short, apparently recollecting 



WAR AND PEACE 405 

something. Natasha's head beamed out of the carriage window with friendly 
mockery. 

'Pyotr Kirillovitch, come here! We recognised you, you see! It's a wonder!' 
she cried, stretching out a hand to him. 'How is it? Why are you like this?' 

Pierre took her outstretched hand, and awkwardly kissed it as he ran 
beside the still moving carriage. 

'What has happened, count?' the countess asked him, in a surprised and 
commiserating tone. 

'Eh? Why? Don't ask me,' said Pierre, and he looked up at Natasha, 
the charm of whose radiant, joyous eyes he felt upon him without looking 
at her. 

'What are you doing, or are you staying in Moscow?' 

Pierre was silent. 

'In Moscow?' he queried. 'Yes, in Moscow. Good-bye.' 

'Oh- how I wish I were a man, I would stay with you. Ah, how splendid 
that is!' said Natasha. 'Mamma, do let me stay.' 

Pierre looked absently at Natasha, and was about to say something, 
but the countess interrupted him. 

'You were at the battle, we have been told.' 

'Yes, I was there,' answered Pierre. 'To-morrow there will be a battle 
again . . .' he was beginning, but Natasha interposed: 

'But what is the matter, count? You are not like yourself . . .' 

'Oh, don't ask me, don't ask me, I don't know myself. To-morrow . . . 
No! Good-bye; good-bye,' he said; 'it's an awful time!' And he left the 
carriage and walked away to the pavement. 

For a long while Natasha's head was still thrust out of the carriage 
window, and she beamed at him with a kindly and rather mocking, joyous 
smile. 

From the time of his disappearance, two days before, Pierre had been 
living in the empty abode of his dead benefactor, Osip Bazdyev. On the 
morning after his return to Moscow they had sent from the widow of 
Osip Alexyevitch Bazdyev to ask him to take charge of some books, as 
Madame Bazdyev was going away into the country, and of all the business 
awaiting Pierre that morning, the task of sorting the books and papers of 
Osip Alexyevitch seemed to him the most urgent. 

Watching the loaded vehicles moving out of Moscow, Pierre had the 
happy sensation of a runaway schoolboy. On reaching Bazdyev's house, 
he went up to a little garden gate. Gerasim, the yellow, beardless old man 
Pierre had seen five years before at Torzhok with Osip Alexyevitch, came 
out on hearing him knock. 

'At home?' asked Pierre. 

'Owing to present circumstances, Sofya Danilovna and her children 
have gone away into the country, your excellency.' 

'I'll come in, all the same; I want to look through the books,' said Pierre. 

'Pray do, you are very welcome; the brother of my late master— the 



406 WAR AND PEACE 

heavenly kingdom be his!— Makar Alexyevitch has remained, but your 
honour is aware he is in feeble health,' said the old servant. 

Makar Alexyevitch was, as Pierre knew, a brother of Osip Alexyevitch, 
a half-mad creature, besotted by drink. 

'Yes, yes, I know. Let us go in,' said Pierre, and he went into the house. 
A tall, bald old man in a dressing-gown, with a red nose and goloshes 
on his bare feet, was standing in the vestibule; seeing Pierre, he muttered 
something angrily, and walked away into the corridor. 

'He was a great intellect, but now, as your honour can see, he has grown 
feeble,' said Gerasim. 'Will you like to go into the study?' Pierre nodded. 
'As it was sealed up, so it has remained. Sofya Danilovna gave orders 
that if you sent for the books they were to be handed over.' 

Gerasim opened one blind, and went out of the room on tiptoe. Pierre 
walked round the study, went up to the bookcase, where the manuscripts 
were kept, and took one of the most important, at one time a sacred relic 
of the order. This consisted of the long Scottish acts of the order, with 
Bazdyev's notes and commentaries. He sat down to the dusty writing- 
table and laid the manuscripts down before him, opened and closed them, 
and at last, pushing them away, sank into thought, with his elbow on the 
table and his head in his hand. 

More than two hours passed by. Gerasim ventured to make a slight 
noise at the door to attract Pierre's attention. 'Would your honour like 
something to eat?' 

'No, but I want something else. I want a peasant dress and a pistol.' said 
Pierre. 

'Certainly, sir,' said Gerasim, after a moment's thought. 

'And I beg you not to tell any one who I am.' 

'Certainly, sir.' 

Gerasim accepted Pierre with the imperturbability of a servant who had 
seen many queer things in his time. Without even permitting himself to 
wonder with what object it was wanted, he obtained for Pierre that eve- 
ning a coachman's coat and cap, and promised next day to procure the 
pistol he required. Makar Alexyevitch twice that evening approached the 
door, shuffling in his goloshes, and stood there, gazing with an ingratiating 
air at Pierre. But as soon as Pierre turned to him, he wrapped his dressing- 
gown round him with a shame-faced and wrathful look, and hastily re- 
treated. Pierre put on the coachman's coat, procured and carefully fumi- 
gated for him by Gerasim, and went out with the latter to buy a pistol 
at the Suharev Tower. It was there he had met the Rostovs. 

At ten o'clock in the morning of the 2nd of September, Napoleon was 
standing in the midst of his troops on Poklonny Hill, gazing at the spectacle 
that lay before him. 

'This Asiatic city with the innumerable churches, Moscow the holy. Here 
it is at last, the famous city! It was high time,' said Napoleon. 

'A city occupied by the enemy is like a girl who has lost her honour,' he 



WAR AND PEACE 407 

thought (it was the phrase he had uttered to Tutchkov at Smolensk). And 
from that point of view he gazed at the Oriental beauty who lay for the 
first time before his eyes. He felt it strange himself that the desire so long 
cherished, and thought so impossible, had at last come to pass. 

'But how could it be otherwise?' he thought. 'Here is this capital, she 
lies at my feet awaiting her fate. Where is Alexander now, and what is 
he thinking? A strange, beautiful, and grand city! And a strange and grand 
moment is this! In what light must I appear to them?' he mused, thinking 
of his soldiers. 'Here is the city— the reward for all those of little faith,' 
he thought, looking round at his suite and the approaching troops, forming 

into ranks. , , 

'One word of mine, one wave of my arm, and the ancient capital of the 
Tsar is no more. But my clemency is ever prompt to stoop to the van- 
quished. I must be magnanimous and truly great. Moscow lies at my feet, 
her golden domes and crosses flashing and twinkling in the sun, but I will 
spare her. On the ancient monuments of barbarism and despotism I will 
inscribe the great words of justice and mercy . . . Alexander will feel that 
more bitterly than anything; I know him.' (It seemed to Napoleon that the 
chief import of what had happened lay in his personal contest with Alex- 
ander.) 'From the heights of the Kremlin-yes, that's the Kremlin, yes- 
I will dictate to them the laws of justice, I will teach them the meaning of 
true civilisation, I will make the generations of boyards to enshrine their 
conqueror's name in love. I will tell the deputation that I have not sought, 
and do not seek, war; but I have been waging war only with the deceitful 
policy of their court; that I love and respect Alexander, and that in Mos- 
cow I will accept terms of peace worthy of myself and my peoples. I have 
no wish to take advantage of the fortune of war to humiliate their honoured 
Emperor. "Boyards," I will say to them, "I do not seek war; I seek the 
peace and welfare of all my subjects." But I know their presence will 
inspire me, and I shall speak to them as I always do, clearly, impressively, 
and greatly. But can it be true that I am in Moscow! Yes, there she is!' 

'Let the boyards be brought to me,' he said, addressing his suite. A gen- 
eral, with a brilliant suite of adjutants, galloped off at once to fetch tho 

boyards. 

Two hours passed. Napoleon had lunched, and was again standing on 
the same spot on the Poklonny Hill, waking for the deputation. His speech 
to the boyards had by now taken definite shape in his mind. The speech 
was full of dignity and greatness, as Napoleon understood it. Napoleon 
was himself carried away by the magnanimity with which he intended co 
act in Moscow. In imagination he had already fixed the days for a reunion 
dans le palais des Czars; at which the great Russian nobles were to mingle 
with the courtiers of the French Emperor. In thought he had appointed 
a governor capable of winning the hearts of the people. Having heard 
that Moscow was full of religious institutions, he had mentally decided that 
his bounty was to be showered on these institutions. He imagined that as 
in Africa he had had to sit in a mosque wearing a burnous, in Moscow he 



408 WAR AND PEACE 

must be gracious and bountiful as the Tsars. And being, like every French- 
man, unable to imagine anything moving without a reference to sa chere, 
sa tendre, sa pauvre mere, he decided finally, to touch the Russian heart, 
that he would have inscribed on all these charitable foundations in large 
letters: 'Dedicated to my beloved mother.' Or simply, l Maison de ma mere,'' 
he decided. 'But am I really in Moscow? Yes, there she lies before me; but 
why is the deputation from the city so long in coming?' he wondered. 

Meanwhile a whispered and agitated consultation was being held among 
his generals and marshals in the rear of the suite. The adjutants sent to 
bring the deputation had come back with the news that Moscow was 
empty, that every one had left or was leaving the city. The faces of all 
the suite were pale and perturbed. It was not that Moscow had been aban- 
doned by its inhabitants (grave as that fact appeared) that alarmed them. 
They were in alarm at the idea of making the fact known to the Emperor; 
they could not see how, without putting his majesty into the terrible 
position, called by the French ridicule, to inform him that he had been 
waiting so long for the boyards in vain, that there was a drunken mob, 
but no one else in Moscow. Some of the suite maintained that come what 
may, they must anyway scrape up a deputation of some sort. 

The position was the more difficult as the Emperor, pondering on his 
magnanimous plans, was walking patiently up and down before the map 
of the city, shading his eyes to look from time to time along the road to 
Moscow, with a proud and happy smile. 

'We shall have to tell him all the same,' said some gentleman of the suite. 
'But it's awkward . . .' the gentlemen-in-waiting kept repeating, shrugging 
their shoulders and unable to bring themselves to settle the terrible word 
in their minds: He ridicule, . . .' 

Meanwhile the Emperor, weary of waiting in vain, and with his actor's 
instinct feeling that the great moment, being too long deferred, was be- 
ginning to lose its grandeur, made a sign with his hand. A solitary cannon 
shot gave the signal, and the invading army marched into Moscow— at 
the Tver, the Kaluga, and the Dorogomilov gates. More and more rapidly, 
vying with one another, at a quick run and a trot, the troops marched in, 
concealed in the clouds of dust they raised, and making the air ring with 
their deafening shouts. 

Tempted on by the advance of the army, Napoleon too rode as far as 
the Dorogomilov gate, but there he halted again, and dismounting walked 
about the Kamerkolezhsky wall for a long time, waiting for the deputation. 

So was Moscow deserted, as Napoleon, weary, uneasy and frowning, 
paced up and down at the Kamerkolezhsky wall awaiting that merely ex- 
ternal, but still to his mind essential observance of the proprieties— a deputa- 
tion. 

Some few men were still astir in odd corners of Moscow, aimlessly. 

When, with due circumspectness, Napoleon was informed that Moscow 
was deserted, he looked wrathfully at his informant, and turning his back 
on him, went on pacing up and down in silence. 



WAR AND PEACE 409 

'My carriage,' he said. He sat down in his carriage beside the adjutant 
on duty, and drove into the suburbs. 

'Moscow deserted! What an incredible event!' he said to himself. 

He did not drive right into the town, but put up for the night at an inn 
in the Dorogomilov suburb. The dramatic scene had not come off. 

At four o'clock in the afternoon, Murat's troops entered Moscow. In 
front rode a detachment of Wurtemberg hussars, behind, with an immense 
suite, rode the King of Naples himself. 

The interpreter accosted one old porter, and asked him if it were far 
to the Kremlin. The porter, listening with surprise to the unfamiliar Polish 
accent, and not recognising the interpreter's words for Russian, had no 
notion what was being said to him, and took refuge behind the others. 

Murat approached the interpreter, and told him to ask where were the 
Russian troops. One of the Russians understood this question, and several 
voices began answering the interpreter simultaneously. A French officer 
from the detachment in advance rode up to Murat and reported that the 
gates into the citadel were blocked up, and that probably there was an 
ambush there. 

'Good,' said Murat, and turning to one of the gentlemen of his suite, 
he commanded four light cannons to be moved forward, and the gates to 
be shelled. 

A bell was ringing in the Kremlin for evening service, and the French 
supposed it was the call to arms. Several infantry soldiers ran to the 
Kutafyev gateway. A barricade of beams and planks lay across the gateway. 
Two musket shots rang out from the gates, just as an officer with some 
men were running up to them. The general standing by the cannons 
shouted some words of command to the officer, and the officer and the 
soldiers ran back. 

Three more shots were heard from the gate. One shot grazed the leg 
of a French soldier, and a strange shout of several voices rose from be- 
hind the barricade. Instantaneously, as though at the word of command, 
the expression of good humour and serenity on the faces of the French 
general, officers, and men was replaced by a stubborn, concentrated ex- 
pression of readiness for conflict and suffering. The cannons were moved 
forward. The artillerymen quenched the burning linstocks. An officer 
shouted 'Fire!' and two whistling sounds of clinking tin rang out one after 
another. The grapeshot fell rattling on the stone of the gateway, on the 
beams and screens of planks, and two clouds of smoke rolled over the 
square. 

Some instants after the echoes of the shots had died away over the stone 
Kremlin, a strange sound was heard over the heads of the French. An 
immense flock of jackdaws rose above the walls and swept round in the 
air with loud caws, and the whir of thousands of wings. Together with 
this sound, there rose a solitary human cry at the gate, and the figure of 
a man bareheaded, in a long peasant's coat, came into sight through the 
smoke. Holding a gun up, he took aim at the French. 'Fire!' repeated the 



410 WAR AND PEACE 

artillery officer, and at the same instant one rifle shot and two cannon shots 
were heard. The gate was again hidden in smoke. 

Nothing more stirred behind the barricade, and the French infantry 
soldiers with their officers passed in at the gate. In the gateway lay three 
men wounded and four dead. Two men in long peasant-coats had run away 
along the walls. 

'Clear this away,' said the officer, pointing to the beams and the corpses; 
and the French soldiers finished off the wounded, and flung the corpses 
over the fence below. Who these men were nobody knew. 'Clear this away!' 
was all that was said of them, and they were flung away that they might not 
stink. 

Murat was informed that the way had been cleared. The French entered 
the gates, and began pitching their camp on Senate-house Square. The 
soldiers flung the chairs out of the windows of the Senate-house into the 
square, and began making fires. 

Tattered, hungry, and exhausted, as they were, and dwindled to one- 
third their original numbers, the French soldiers yet entered Moscow in 
good discipline. It was a harassed and exhausted, yet still active and 
menacing army. But as soon as the soldiers began to disperse about the 
wealthy, deserted houses, the army was lost for ever, and in its place was 
a multitude of men, neither citizens nor soldiers, but something nondescript 
between, known as marauders. 

When five weeks later these same men set out from Moscow, they no 
longer made up an army. They were a mob of marauders, each of whom 
carried or dragged along with him a mass of objects he regarded as precious 
and useful. The aim of each of these men on leaving Moscow was not, as 
it had been, to fight as a soldier, but simply to keep the booty he had 
obtained. Like the ape, who slipping his hand into the narrow neck of a 
pitcher, and snatching up a handful of nuts inside it, will not open his 
fist for fear of losing his prize, even to his own ruin, the French on leaving 
Moscow were inevitably bound to come to ruin, because they dragged 
their plunder along w T ith them, and it seemed as impossible to them to 
fling away their booty as it seems to the ape to let go of the nuts. 

That day one order after another was issued by the French commanders 
forbidding the troops to disperse about the town, sternly forbidding 
violence to the inhabitants, and pillaging, and proclaiming that a general 
roll-call was to take place that evening. But at the windows of the houses 
men could be seen in military coats and Hessian boots, laughing and stroll- 
ing through the rooms. In the cellars, in the storerooms similar men were 
busily looking after the provisions; in the courtyards they were unlocking 
or breaking open the doors of sheds and stables; in the kitchens they were 
making up fires, and with bare arms mixing, kneading, and baking, and 
frightening, or trying to coax and amuse, women and children. 

Moscow was without its inhabitants, and the soldiers were sucked up 
in her, like water into sand, as they flowed away irresistibly in all direc- 
tions from the Kremlin, which they had entered first. Cavalry soldiers, who 



WAR AND PEACE 411 

had entered a merchant's house abandoned with all its belongings, and 
finding stabling for their horses and to spare, yet went on to take the 
house next door, which seemed to them better. Many took several houses, 
chalking their names on them, and quarrelled and even fought with other 
companies for their possession. Soldiers had no sooner succeeded in securing 
quarters than they ran along the street to look at the town, and on hearing 
that everything had been abandoned, hurried off where objects of value 
could be carried off for nothing. The officers followed to check the soldiers, 
and were involuntarily lured into doing the same. In Carriage Row shops 
had been abandoned stocked with carriages, and the generals flocked thither 
to choose coaches and carriages for themselves. 

The few inhabitants who had stayed on invited the officers into their 
houses, hoping thereby to secure themselves against being robbed. Wealth 
there was in abundance: there seemed no end to it. Everywhere all round 
the parts occupied by the French there were unexplored regions unoccupied 
beyond, in which the French fancied there were even more riches to be 
found. And Moscow absorbed them further and further into herself. Just 
as when water flows over dry land, water and dry land alike disappear and 
are lost in mud, so when the hungry army entered the wealthy, deserted 
city, the army and the wealth of the city both perished; and fires and 
marauding bands sprang up where they had been. 

The French ascribed the burning of Moscow au patriotisme jeroce, the 
Russians to the savagery of the French. In reality, explanations of the 
fire of Moscow, in the sense of the conflagration being brought home to 
the door of any one person or group of persons, there have never been, 
and never could be. Moscow was burned because she was placed in con- 
ditions in which any town built of wood was bound to be burned, quite 
apart from the question whether there were or were not one hundred and 
thirty inefficient fire-engines in the town. Moscow was sure to be burned, 
because her inhabitants had gone away, as inevitably as a heap of straw is 
sure to be burned where sparks are scattered on it for several days in suc- 
cession. A town of wooden houses in which, when the police and the 
inhabitants owning the houses are in possession of it, fires are of daily 
occurrence, cannot escape being burned when its inhabitants are gone and 
it is filled with soldiers smoking pipes, making fires in Senate-house Square 
of the Senate-house chairs, and cooking themselves meals twice a day. In 
times of peace, whenever troops are quartered on villages in any district, 
the number of fires in the district at once increases. How greatly must the 
likelihood of fires be increased in an abandoned town, built of wood, and 
occupied by foreign soldiers! Moscow was burned through the pipes, the 
kitchen stoves, and camp-fires, through the recklessness of the enemy's 
soldiers, who lived in the houses without the care of householders. 

Soothing as it was to the vanity of the French to throw the blame on the 
ferocity of Rastoptchin, and to that of the Russians to throw the blame 
on the miscreant Bonaparte, or later on to place the heroic torch in the 
hand of its patriot peasantry, we cannot disguise from ourselves that there 



412 WAR AND PEACE 

could be no such direct cause of the fire. Moscow was as certain to be 
burned as any village, factory, or house forsaken by its owners, and used 
as a temporary shelter and cooking-place by strangers. Moscow was burned 
by her inhabitants, it is true; but not by the inhabitants who had lingered 
on, but by the inhabitants who had abandoned her. Moscow did not, like 
Berlin, Vienna, and other towns, escape harm while in the occupation of 
the enemy, simply because her inhabitants did not receive the French with 
the keys, and the bread and salt of welcome, but abandoned her. 

The process of the absorption of the French into Moscow did not, till the 
evening of the 2nd of September, reach the quarter of the town in which 
Pierre was staying. 

Pierre had left his own house simply to escape from the complicated 
tangle woven about him by the demands of daily life, which in his con- 
dition at that time he was incapable of unravelling. He had gone to Osip 
Alexyevitch's house on the pretext of sorting out the books and papers 
of the deceased. Simply he was in search of a quiet refuge, and he cer- 
tainly found it in Osip Alexyevitch's study. 

In the deathlike stillness of the study, there passed in calm and significant 
succession before his mental vision the impressions of the last few days, 
especially of the battle of Borodino, and of that overwhelming sense of 
his own pettiness and falsity in comparison with the truth and simplicity 
and force of that class of men, who were mentally referred to by him as 
'they.' When Gerasim roused him from his reverie, the idea occurred to 
Pierre that he would take part in the defence of Moscow by the people, 
which was, he knew, expected. 

Then during the first day of solitude and idleness (Pierre tried several 
times in vain to fix his attention on the masonic manuscripts) there rose 
several times vaguely to his mind the idea that had occurred to him in the 
past of the cabalistic significance of his name in connection with the name 
of Bonaparte. But the idea that he, VRnsse Besuhov, was destined to put 
an end to the power of the Beast, had as yet only come to him as one of 
those dreams that flit idly through the brain, leaving no trace behind. 

When Pierre had met the Rostovs, and Natasha said to him, 'You 
are staying? Ah, how splendid that is!' the idea had flashed into his mind 
that it really might be splendid, even if they did take Moscow, for him 
to remain, and to do what had been foretold for him to do. 

Next day with the simple aim of not doing less than they would do, he 
had gone out to the Three Hills barrier. But when he came back, con- 
vinced that Moscow would not be defended, he suddenly felt that what 
had only occurred to him before as a possibility, had now become some- 
thing necessary and inevitable. He must remain in Moscow, concealing his 
name, must meet Napoleon, and kill him, so as either to perish or to put 
an end to the misery of all Europe, which was in Pierre's opinion entirely 
due to Napoleon alone. 

Pierre knew all the details of the German student's attempt on Napoleon's 



WAR AND PEACE 413 

life at Vienna in 1809, and knew that that student had been shot. And the 
danger to which he would be exposing his own life in carrying out his 
design excited him even more violently. 

Two equally powerful feelings drew Pierre irresistibly to his design. 
The first was the craving for sacrifice and suffering through the sense of 
the common calamity, the feeling that had impelled him to go to Mozhaisk 
on the 25th, and to place himself in the very thick of the battle, and now 
to run away from his own house, to give up his accustomed luxury and 
comfort, to sleep without undressing on a hard sofa, and to eat the same 
food as Gerasim. The other was that vague and exclusively Russian feeling 
of contempt for everything conventional, artificial, human, for everything 
that is regarded by the majority of men as the highest good in the world. 
Moreover at the present moment Pierre was supported in his design, and 
prevented from abandoning it, by the steps he had already taken. His 
flight from his own house, and his disguise, and his pistol, and his state- 
ment to the Rostovs that he should remain in Moscow,— all would have 
been devoid of meaning, would have been indeed absurd and laughable (a 
point to which Pierre was sensitive) if after all that he had simply gone 
out of Moscow like other people. 

Pierre's physical state, as is always the case, corresponded with his moral 
condition. The coarse fare to which he was unused, the vodka he drank 
during those days, the lack of wine and cigars, his dirty, unchanged linen, 
and two half-sleepless nights, spent on a short sofa without bedding, all re- 
duced Pierre to a state of nervous irritability bordering on madness. 

It was two o'clock in the afternoon. The French had already entered 
Moscow. Pierre knew this, but instead of acting, he only brooded over his 
enterprise, going over all the minutest details of it. In his dreams Pierre 
never clearly pictured the very act of striking the blow, nor the death of 
Napoleon, but with extraordinary vividness and mournful enjoyment dwelt 
on his own end and his heroic fortitude. 

'Yes, one man for all, I must act or perish!' he thought. 'Yes, I will ap- 
proach . . . and then all at once . . . with a pistol or a dagger!' thought 
Pierre. 'But that doesn't matter. It's not I but the Hand of Providence 
punishes you. ... I shall say' (Pierre pondered over the words he would 
utter as he killed Napoleon). 'Well, take me, execute me!' Pierre would 
murmur to himself, bowing his head with a sad but firm expression on 
his face. 

While Pierre was standing in the middle of the room, musing in this 
fashion, the door of the study opened, and Makar Alexyevitch— always 
hitherto so timid— appeared in the doorway, completely transformed. 

His dressing-gown was hanging open. His face was red and distorted. 
He was unmistakably drunk. On seeing Pierre he was for the first minute 
disconcerted, but observing discomfiture in Pierre's face too, he was at 
once emboldened by it; and with his thin, tottering legs walked into the 
middle of the room. 

'They have grown fearful,' he said, in a husky and confidential voice. 



414 WAR AND PEACE 

'I sav: I will not surrender, I say . . . eh, sir?' He paused and suddenly- 
catching sight of the pistol on the table, snatched it with surprising rapidity 
and ran out into the corridor. 

Gerasim and the porter, who had followed Makar Alexyevitch, stopped 
him in the vestibule, and tried to get the pistol away from him. Pierre 
coming out of the study looked with repugnance and compassion at the 
half-insane old man. Makar Alexyevitch, frowning with effort, succeeded 
in keeping the pistol, and was shouting in a husky voice, evidently imagin- 
ing some heroic scene. 

'To arms! Board them! You shan't get it!' he was shouting. 

'Give over, please, give over. Do me the favour, sir, please be quiet. 
There now, if you please, sir, . . .' Gerasim was saying, cautiously trying 
to steer Makar Alexyevitch by his elbows towards the door. 

'Who are you? Bonaparte! . . .' yelled Makar Alexyevitch. 

'That's not the thing, sir. You come into your room and rest a little. 
Let me have the pistol now.' 

'Away, base slave! Don't touch me! Do you see?' screamed Makar 
Alexyevitch, brandishing the pistol. 'Run them down!' 

'Take hold!' Gerasim whispered to the porter. 

They seized Makar Alexyevitch by the arms and dragged him towards 
the door. 

The vestibule was filled with the unseemly sounds of scuffling and 
drunken, husky gasping. 

Suddenly a new sound, a shrill, feminine shriek, was heard from the 
porch, and the cook ran into the vestibule. 

'They! Merciful heavens! . . . My goodness, here they are! Four of 
them, horsemen!' she screamed. 

Gerasim and the porter let Makar Alexyevitch go, and in the hush that 
followed in the corridor they could distinctly hear several hands knocking 
at the front door. 

Having inwardly resolved that until the execution of his design, he ought 
to disguise his station and his knowledge of French, Pierre stood at the 
half-open door into the corridor, intending to conceal himself as soon 
as the French entered. But the French entered, and Pierre did not leave 
the door; an irresistible curiosity kept him there. 

There were two of them. One— an officer, a tall, handsome man of gallant 
bearing; the other, obviously a soldier or officer's servant, a squat, thin, 
sunburnt man, with hollow cheeks and a dull expression. The officer walked 
first, limping and leaning on a stick. After advancing a few steps, the officer, 
apparently making up his mind that these would be good quarters, stopped, 
turned round and shouted in a loud, peremptory voice to the soldiers 
standing in the doorway to put up the horses. Having done this the officer, 
with a jaunty gesture, crooking his elbow high in the air, stroked his 
moustaches and put his hand to his hat. 

'Bonjourj la compagnieP he said gaily, smiling and looking about him. 



WAR AND PEACE 415 

No one made any reply. 

l Vons etes le bourgeois?' the officer asked, addressing Gerasim. 

Gerasim looked back with scared inquiry at the officer. 

l Qaartire, qzuwtire, logevientj said the officer, looking down with a 
condescending and good-humoured smile at the little man. 'The French 
are good lads. Don't let us be cross, old fellow,' he went on in French, 
clapping the scared and mute Gerasim on the shoulder. 'I say, does no one 
speak French in this establishment?' he added, looking round and meeting 
Pierre's eyes. Pierre withdrew from the door. 

The officer turned again to Gerasim. He asked him to show him over 
the house. 

'Master not here— no understand . . . me you . . .' said Gerasim, trying 
to make his words more comprehensible by saying them in reverse order. 

The French officer, smiling, waved his hands in front of Gerasim's nose, 
to give him to understand that he too failed to understand him. and walked 
with a limp towards the door where Pierre was standing. Pierre was about 
to retreat to conceal himself from him, but at that very second he caught 
sight of Makar Alexyevitch peeping out of the open kitchen door with 
a pistol in his hand. With a madman's cunning, Makar Alexyevitch eyed 
the Frenchmen, and lifting the pistol, took aim. 'Run them down!!!' yelled 
the drunkard, pressing the trigger. 

The French officer turned round at the scream, and at the same instant 
Pierre dashed at the drunken man. Just as Pierre snatched at the pistol and 
jerked it up, Makar Alexyevitch succeeded at last in pressing the trigger, 
and a deafening shot rang out, wrapping every one in a cloud of smoke. 
The Frenchman turned pale and rushed, back to the door. 

Forgetting his intention of concealing his knowledge of French, Pierre 
pulled away the pistol, and throwing it on the ground, ran to the officer 
and addressed him in French. 'You are not wounded?' he said. 

'I think not,' answered the officer, feeling himself; 'but I have had a 
narrow escape this time,' he added, pointing to the broken plaster in the 
wall. 

'Who is this man?' he asked, looking sternly at Pierre. 

'Oh, I am really in despair at what has happened,' said Pierre quickly, 
quite forgetting his part. 'It is a madman, an unhappy creature, who did 
not know what he was doing.' 

The officer went up to Makar Alexyevitch and took him by the collar. 

Makar Alexyevitch, pouting out his lips, nodded, as he leaned against the 
wall, as though dropping asleep. 

'Brigand, you shall pay for it,' said the Frenchman, letting go of him 
'We are clement after victory, but we do not pardon traitors,' he added, 
with gloomy dignity in his face, and a fine, vigorous gesture. 

Pierre tried in French to persuade the officer not to be severe with this 
drunken imbecile. The Frenchman listened in silence, with the same gloomy 
air, and then suddenly turned with a smile to Pierre. For several seconds 



416 WAR AND PEACE 

he gazed at him mutely. His handsome face assumed an expression of 
melodramatic feeling, and he held out his hand. 

'You have saved my life. You are French,' he said. For a Frenchman, the 
deduction followed indubitably. An heroic action could only be performed 
by a Frenchman, and to save the life of him, M. Ramballe, captain of the 
13th Light Brigade, was undoubtedly a most heroic action. 

But however indubitable this logic, and well grounded the conviction 
the officer based on it, Pierre thought well to disillusion him on the subject. 

'I am Russian,' he said quickly. 

'Tell that to others,' said the Frenchman, smiling and waving his finger 
before his nose. 'You shall tell me all about it directly,' he said. 'Charmed 
to meet a compatriot. Well, what are we to do with this man?' he added, 
applying to Pierre now as though to a comrade. 

To his last question Pierre explained once more who Makar Alexyevitch 
was. He explained that just before his arrival the drunken imbecile had 
carried off a loaded pistol, which they had not succeeded in getting from 
him, and he begged him to let his action go unpunished. The Frenchman 
arched his chest, and made a majestic gesture with his hand. 

'You have saved my life! You are a Frenchman. You ask me to pardon 
him. I grant you his pardon. Let this man be released,' the French officer 
pronounced with rapidity and energy, and taking the arm of Pierre he 
was walking with him into the room. 

The soldiers in the yard, hearing the shot, had come into the vestibule 
to ask what had happened, and to offer their services in punishing the of- 
fender; but the officer sternly checked them. 

'You will be sent for when you are wanted,' he said. The soldiers with- 
drew. The orderly, who had meanwhile been in the kitchen, came in to 
the officer. 

'Captain, they have soup and a leg of mutton in the kitchen,' he said. 
'Shall I bring it up?' 

'Yes, and the wine,' said the captain. 

Pierre thought it his duty to assure the captain again that he was not a 
Frenchman, and would have withdrawn, but the French officer would not 
hear of it. He was so courteous, polite, good-humoured, and genuinely 
grateful to him for saving his life that Pierre had not the heart to refuse. 

'Frenchman or Russian prince incognito,' said the Frenchman, looking at 
Pierre's fine, though dirty linen, and the ring on his finger; 'I owe my life 
to you, and I offer you my friendship. A Frenchman never forgets an in- 
sult or a service. I offer you my friendship. That's all I say.' 

In the tones of the voice, the expression of the face, and the gestures 
of the officer, there was so much naive good nature and good breeding (in 
the French sense) that Pierre unconsciously responded with a smile to his 
smile, as he took his outstretched hand. 

'Captain Ramballe of the 13th Light Brigade, decorated for the affair of 
the 7th September,' he introduced himself, an irrepressible smile of com- 
placency lurking under his moustache. 'Will you tell me now to whom 



WAR AND PEACE 417 

I have the honour of speaking so agreeably, instead of remaining in the 
ambulance with that madman's ball in my body?' 

Pierre answered that he would not tell him his name, and was beginning 
with a blush, while trying to invent a name, to speak of the reasons for 
which he was unable to do so, but the Frenchman hurriedly interrupted 
him. 

'Enough!' he said. 'I understand your reasons; you are an officer ... a 
staff officer, perhaps. You have borne arms against us. That's not my busi- 
ness. I owe you my life. That's enough for me. I am at your disposal. You 
are a nobleman?' he added, with an intonation of inquiry. Pierre bowed. 

'Your baptismal name, if you please? I ask nothing more. M. Pierre, you 
say? Perfect! That's all I want to know.' 

When they had brought in the mutton, an omelette, a samovar, vodka, 
and wine from a Russian cellar brought with them by the French, Ram- 
balle begged Pierre to share his dinner; and at once with the haste and 
greediness of a healthy, hungry man, set to work on the viands himself, 
munching vigorously with his strong teeth, and continually smacking his 
lips and exclaiming, ''Excellent! exquisP His face became flushed and per- 
spiring. Pierre was hungry, and pleased to share the repast. 

'Yes, my dear M. Pierre, I owe you a fine votive candle for saving me 
from that maniac. I have bullets enough in my body, you know. Here is 
one from Wagram' (he pointed to his side), 'and two from Smolensk' (he 
showed the scar on his cheek). 'And this leg which won't walk, as you see. 
It was at the great battle of la Moskowa on the 7th that I got that. Sacre 
Dieu, it was fine! You ought to have seen that; it was a deluge of fire. You 
cut us out a tough job; you can boast of that, my word on it!' 

'I was there,' said Pierre. 

'Really!' pursued the Frenchman. 'Well, so much the better. You are fine 
enemies, though. Your grenadiers were superb, God's thunder. Fine fellows, 
soldiers like ourselves. Terrible in war . . . gallant, with the fair' (he 
winked with a smile)— 'there you have the French, M. Pierre, eh?' 

The captain was so naively self-satisfied that Pierre almost winked in 
response. 

'By the way, tell me, is it true that all the women have left Moscow? 
What a queer idea! What had they to fear?' 

'Would not the French ladies quit Paris, if the Russians were to enter 
tt?' said Pierre. 

'Ha— ha— ha! . . .' The Frenchman gave vent to a gav, sanguine chuckle, 
slapping Pierre on the shoulder. 'That's a good one, that is,' he went on. 
'Paris . . . But Paris . . .' 

'Paris is the capital of the world,' said Pierre, finishing the sentence for 
him. 

'Well, if you had not told me you are a Russian, I would have wagered 
you were a Parisian. You have that indescribable something . . .' and utter- 
ing this compliment, he again gazed at him mutely. 

'I have been in Paris. I spent years there,' said Pierre. 



418 WAR AND PEACE 

'One can see that! Paris! A man who does not know Paris is a savage 
... A Parisian can be told two leagues off. Paris— it is Talma, la Dusche- 
nois, Potier, the Sorbonne, the boulevards.' Perceiving that the conclusion 
of his phrase was somewhat of an anticlimax, he added hurriedly, 'We have 
taken Vienna, Berlin, Madrid, Naples, Rome, Warsaw— all the capitals in 
the world. We are feared, but we are loved. We are worth knowing. And 
then the Emperor . . .' he was beginning, but Pierre interrupted him. 

'The Emperor,' repeated Pierre, and his face suddenly wore a mournful 
and embarrassed look. 'What of the Emperor?' 

'The Emperor? He is generosity, mercy, justice, order, genius— that is 
the Emperor. It is I, Ramballe, who tell you that. I was his enemy eight 
years ago. My father was an emigrant count. But he has conquered me, that 
man. He has taken hold of me. I could not resist the spectacle of the great- 
ness and glory with which he was covering France. When I understood 
what he wanted, when I saw he was preparing a bed of laurels for us, I 
said to myself: "That is a monarch." And I gave myself up to him. Oh yes, 
he is the greatest man of the centuries, past and to come.' 

'And is he in Moscow?' Pierre asked, hesitating and looking guilty. 

The Frenchman gazed at Pierre's guilty face, and grinned. 

'No, he will make his entry to-morrow,' he said and went on with his 
talk. 

Their conversation was interrupted by several voices shouting at the 
gates, and Morel coming in to tell the captain that some Wiirtemberg hus- 
sars had come and wanted to put up their horses in the yard in which the 
captain's had been put up. The difficulty arose chiefly from the hussars not 
understanding what was said to them. Pierre, who knew German, translated 
the German's words to the captain, and translated the captain's answer back 
for the Wiirtemberg hussar. 

The captain went out to the entrance and gave some loud commands. 

When he came back into the room, Pierre was sitting where he had been 
sitting before, with his head in his hands. His face expressed suffering. He 
really was at that moment suffering. As soon as the captain had gone out, 
and Pierre had been left alone, he suddenly came to himself, and recognised 
the position he was in. It was not that Moscow had been taken, not that 
these lucky conquerors were making themselves at home there and patronis- 
ing him, bitterly as Pierre felt it, that tortured him at that moment. He was 
tortured by the consciousness of his own weakness. The few glasses of wine 
he had drunk, the chat with this good-natured fellow, had dissipated that 
mood of concentrated gloom, which he had been living in for the last few 
days, and which was essential for carrying out his design. The pistol and 
the dagger and the peasant's coat were ready, Napoleon was making his 
entry on the morrow. Pierre felt it as praiseworthv and as beneficial as ever 
to slay the miscreant; but he felt now that he would not do it. 

'I'll go away at once, I won't say another word to him,' thought Pierre. 
He thought this, yet went on sitting in the same place. 

The captain, on the contrarv, seemed in exceedingly good spirits. 



WAR AND PEACE 419 

'Charming fellow the colonel of these Wiirtembergers,' he said all at 
once. 'He's a German, but a good fellow if ever there was one. But a 
German.' 

'Well, another bottle of this Moscow claret, eh? Morel, warm us another 
bottle!' the captain shouted gaily. 

Morel brought candles and a bottle of wine. The captain looked at Pierre 
in the candle-light, and was obviously struck by the troubled face of his 
companion. 

'Eh, we are sad!' he said, touching Pierre on the hand. 'Can I have hurt 
you? No, really, have you anything against me?' he questioned. 'Perhaps it 
is owing to the situation of affairs?' 

Pierre made no reply, but looked cordially into the Frenchman's eyes. 

'My word of honour, to say nothing of what I owe you, I have a liking 
for you. Can I do anything for you? Dispose of me. It is for life and death. 
With my hand and my heart, I say so,' he said, slapping himself on the 
chest. 

'Thank you,' said Pierre. 

'Ah, in that case, I drink to our friendship.' 

And with the easy and naive unreserve of a Frenchman, the captain told 
Pierre the history of his forefathers, his childhood, boyhood, and manhood, 
and all his relations, his fortunes, and domestic affairs. 

'But all that is only the setting of life; the real thing is love. Love! Eh, 
M. Pierre?' he said, warming up. 'Another glass.' 

As men often do at a late hour at night, and under the influence of wine, 
Pierre listened to the captain's stories, and while he followed and understood 
all he told him, he was also following a train of personal reminiscences 
which had risen to his imagination. 

With faltering lips and with a far-away look in his moist eye, he told all 
his story; told too, what he had at first concealed— his position in society— 
and even disclosed his name. 

What impressed the captain more than anything else in Pierre's story 
was the fact that Pierre was very wealthy, that he had two palatial houses 
in Moscow, and that he had abandoned everything, and yet had not left 
Moscow, but was staying in the town concealing his name and station. 

Late in the night they went out together into the street. Gazing at the 
lofty, starlit sky, at the moon, at the comet and the glow of the fire, Pierre 
felt a thrill of joyous and tender emotion. 'How fair it all is! what more 
does one want?' he thought. And all at once, when he recalled his design, 
his head seemed going round; he felt so giddy that he leaned against the 
fence so as not to fall. On the left there was the glow of the first fire that 
broke out in Moscow, in Petrovka. 

There was nothing alarming in a small remote fire in the immense city. 

The Rostovs' party stopped for that night twenty versa from Moscow. 
One of the servants noticed in the dark night sky, above the high carriage 
standing at the entry, a small glow of fire. 



420 WAR AND PEACE 

'I say, mates, there's another fire,' said the man. All of them looked 
towards the glow. 

'Why, they told us Mamonov's Cossacks had fired Little Mytishtchy.' 
'Nay! that's not Mytishtchy, it's further.' 'Look 'ee, it's in Moscow 
seemingly.' 

Several more men joined the first group. 

'I say it is flaring,' said one; 'that's a fire in Moscow, my friends.' 

No one answered this remark. And for a good while all these men gazed 
in silence at the flames of this new conflagration glowing far away. 

The glow spread wider. 

'God have mercy! ... a w T ind and the drought . . .' said a voice. 

'Look 'ee, how it's spreading. Lord, have mercy on us poor sinners!' 

'They'll put it out, never fear.' 

'Who's to put it out? ' 

Informed that Moscow was on fire, the count put on his dressing-gown 
and went out to look. With him went Sonya, who had not yet undressed. 

'Oh! how awful!' cried Sonya, coming in chilled and frightened from 
the yard. 'I do believe all Moscow is burning; there's an awful fire! Natasha, 
do look; you can see now from the window here,' she said, obviously trying 
to distract her friend's mind. But Natasha stared at her, as though she did 
not understand what was asked of her. Natasha had been in this petrified 
condition ever since the morning, when Sonya, to the amazement and 
anger of the countess, had for some incomprehensible reason thought fit 
to inform Natasha of Prince Andrey's wound, and his presence among their 
train. 

'Look, Natasha, how frightfully it's burning,' said Sonya. 

'What's burning?' asked Natasha. 'Oh yes, Moscow.' 

When Natasha had been told that morning that Prince Andrey was 
seriously wounded, and was travelling with them, she had at the first 
moment asked a great many questions, how and why and where was he 
going; whether he were dangerously w r ounded, and whether she could see 
him. But after she had been told that she could not see him, that his wound 
was a serious one, but that his life was not in danger, though she plainly did 
not believe what was told her, she saw that she would get the same answer 
whatever she said, and gave up asking questions and speaking at all. 

'Go to bed, darling, go to bed, my pet,' said the countess, lightly touching 
Natasha's shoulder. 'Come, go to bed.' 

'Oh yes, at once,' said Natasha, hurriedly undressing, and breaking the 
strings of her petticoats. Dropping off her dress, and putting on a dressing- 
jacket, she sat down on the bed made up on the floor, tucking her feet under 
her, and flinging her short, fine hair over her shoulder, began plaiting it. 
Her thin, long, practised fingers rapidly and deftly divided and plaited. 
When her toilet for the night was over, Natasha sank softly down on to the 
sheet laid on the hay nearest the door. 

'Natasha, you lie in the middle,' said Sonva. 



WAR AND PEACE 421 

Til stay here,' said Natasha. 'And do go to bed,' she added in a tone of 
annoyance. And she buried her face in the pillow. 

The countess and Sonya hurriedly undressed and went to bed. The lamp 
before the holy images was the only light left in the room. 

A cricket chirped in a crack, as though celebrating a victory over all the 
world. A cock crowed far away, and another answered close by. Natasha 
sat up. 

'Sonya! Are you asleep? Mamma!' she whispered. No one answered. 
Slowly and cautiously Natasha got up, crossed herself, and stepped 
cautiously with her slender, supple, bare feet on to the dirty, cold floor. 
The boards creaked. With nimble feet she ran like a kitten a few steps, and 
took hold of the cold door-handle. 

She opened the door, stepped over the lintel, and on to the damp, cold 
earth of the passage outside. The cold all about her refreshed her. Her bare 
foot felt a man asleep; she stepped over him, and opened the door of the hut 
in which Prince Andrey was lying. 

In that hut it was dark. A tallow candle with a great, smouldering wick 
stood on a bench in the further corner, by a bed. 

Ever since she had been told in the morning of Prince Andrey's wound 
and his presence there, Natasha had resolved that she must see him. She 
could not have said why this must be, but she knew their meeting would 
be anguish to her, and that made her the more certain that it must be 
inevitable. 

All day long she had lived in the hope that at night she would see him. 
But now when the moment had come, a terror came over her of what she 
would see. How had he been disfigured? What was left of him? When 
she caught sight of an undefined mass in the corner, and took his raised 
knees under the quilt for his shoulders, she pictured some fearful body 
there, and stood still in terror. But an irresistible force drew her forward. 
She made one cautious step, another, and found herself in the middle of the 
small hut, cumbered up with baggage. On the bench, under the holy images, 
lay another man. 

The valet's sleepy and frightened words 'What is it? What do you want?' 
only made Natasha hasten towards the figure lying in the corner. Plow- 
ever fearfully unlike a human shape that figure might be now, she must see 
him. She passed by the valet, the smouldering candle flickered up, and she 
saw clearly Prince Andrey, lying with his arms stretched out on the quilt, 
looking just as she had always seen him. 

He was just the same as ever; but the flush on his face, his shining eyes, 
gazing passionately at her, and especially the soft, childlike neck, showing 
above the lay-down collar of the nightshirt, gave him a peculiarly innocent, 
childlike look, such as she had never seen in him before. She ran up to him 
and with a swift, supple, youthful movement dropped on her knees. 

He smiled, and held out his hand to her. 

Seven days had passed since Prince Andrey had found himself in the 
ambulance station on the field of Borodino. All that time he had been in a 



422 WAR AND PEACE 

state of almost continual unconsciousness. The fever and inflammation were, 
in the opinion of the doctor accompanying the wounded, certain to carry 
him off. But on the seventh day he ate with relish a piece of bread with 
some tea, and the doctor obcerved that the fever w T as going down. 

Prince Andrey had regained consciousness in the morning. The doctor, 
to his surprise and dissatisfaction, found that the pulse was stronger. The 
doctor's dissatisfaction was due to the fact that he felt certain from his 
experience that Prince Andrey could not live. The doctor made some 
changes, turning the wounded man over so that he groaned again, and 
again lost consciousness from the pain when they turned him over. He 
began to be delirious. 

It w T as only in the complete stillness of the night that he came to himself 
again. Every one was asleep around him. A cricket was chirping across the 
passage; some one was shouting and singing in the street; cockroaches were 
rustling over the table, the holy images and the walls; a big fly flopped on 
his pillow and about the tallow candle that stood with a great, smouldering 
wick beside him. 

All at once thought and feeling floated to the surface again with extraor- 
dinary clearness and force, and he vividly pictured Natasha. 'If it were only 
possible for me to see her once more . . .' 

Piti-piti-piti iti-ti, ipiti-piti— boom, the fly flapped . . . And his attention 
passed all at once into another w T orld of reality and delirium, in which some- 
thing peculiar was taking place. In that place the candle was still burning, 
with a red ring round it; the same shirt still lay by the door. Eat besides all 
this, something creaked, there w r as a whiff of fresh air, and before the door- 
way appeared the white face and shining eyes of that very Natasha he had 
been dreaming of just now. 

'Oh, how wearisome this everlasting delirium is!' thought Prince xVndrey, 
trying to dispel that face from his vision. But that face stood before him 
with the face of reality, and that face was coming closer. Prince Andrev 
thought he was drawn back into the realm of delirium. The soft murmuring 
voice kept up its rhythmic whisper, something was oppressing him, and 
rising up, and the strange face stood before him. Prince Andrey rallied all 
his forces to regain his senses; he stirred a little, and suddenly there was a 
ringing in his ears and a dimness before his eyes, and like a man sinking 
under water, he lost consciousness. 

When he came to himself, Natasha was on her knees before him. He knew 
that it was the real, living Natasha, and did not wonder, but quietly rejoiced. 
Natasha, on her knees, in terror, but without moving gazed at him. Her face 
Was white and rigid. 

Prince Andrey smiled, and held out his hand. 

'You?' he said. 

Natasha came nearer. 

'Forgive me!' she said in a whisper. 

'I love you,' said Prince Andrey. 

'Forgive . . ,' 



WAR AND PEACE 423. 

'Forgive what?' asked Prince Andrey. 

Natasha's thin, pale face, with its swollen lips, was more than ugly— it 
looked terrible. But Prince Andrey did not see her face, he saw the shining 
eyes, which were beautiful. 

They heard talk behind them. Pyotr, the valet, by now wide awake, had 
waked up the doctor. 

'Why, what's this?' said the doctor. 'Kindly retire, madam.' 

At that moment there was a knock at the door; a maid had been sent by 
the countess in search of her daughter. 

Like a sleep-walker awakened in the midst of her trance, Natasha walked 
out of the room. 

From that day at all the halts and resting-places on the remainder of the 
Rostovs' journey, Natasha never left Bolkonsky's side, and the doctor was 
forced to admit that he had not expected from a young girl so much 
fortitude, nor skill in nursing a wounded man. 

Terrible as it was to the countess to think that Prince Andrey might (and 
very probably, too, from what the doctor said) die on the road in her 
daughter's arms, she could not resist Natasha. Although with the renewal of 
affectionate relations between Prince Andrey and Natasha the idea did 
occur that in case he recovered their old engagement would be renewed, 
no one— least of all Natasha and Prince Andrey— spoke of this. The unsettled 
question of life and death hanging, not only over Prince Andrey, but over 
all Russia, shut off all other considerations. 

Pierre waked up late on the 3rd of September. His head ached, the clothes 
in which he had slept without undressing fretted his body, and he had a 
vague sense in his heart of something shameful he had done the evening 
before. That something shameful was his talk with Captain Ramballe. 

His- watch told him it was eleven, but it seemed a particularly dull day. 
Pierre stood up, rubbed his eyes, and seeing the pistol with its engraved 
stock— Gerasim had put it back on the writing-table— Pierre remembered 
where he was and what was in store for him that day. 

'Am I not too late already?' Pierre wondered. 

No, probably he would not make his entry into Moscow before twelve 
o'clock. Pierre did not allow himself to reflect on what lay before him, but 
made haste to act. 

Setting his clothes to rights, Pierre took up the pistol and was about to 
set off. But then for the first time it occurred to him to wonder how, if not 
in his hand, he was to carry the weapon in the street. Even under his full 
coat it would be hard to conceal a big pistol. It amid not be put under his 
arm without being noticeable. Moreover, the pistol was now unloaded, and 
Pierre could not succeed in reloading it. 

'The dagger will do as well,' Pierre said to himself; though, in considering 
how he should carry out his design, he had more than once decided that 
the great mistake made by the student in 1809 was that he had tried to kill 
Napoleon with a dagger. But Pierre's chief aim seemed to be, not so much 



424 WAR AND PEACE 

to succeed in his project, as to prove to himself that he was not renouncing 
his design, but was doing everything to carry it out. Pierre hurriedly took 
the blunt, notched dagger in a green scabbard, which he had bought with 
the pistol, and hid it under his waistcoat. 

Tying the sash round his peasant's coat, and pulling his cap forward, 
Pierre walked along the corridor, trying to avoid making a noise and meet- 
ing the captain, and slipped out into the street. 

The fire, at which he had gazed so indifferently the evening before, had 
sensibly increased during the night. Moscow was on fire at various points, 
and the barges in the river Moskva were in a blaze. 

Most of the houses had their gates and shutters closed. The streets and 
lanes were deserted; there was a smell of burning and smoke in the air. Now 
and then he met Russians with uneasy and timid faces, and Frenchmen with 
a look of the camp about them, walking in the middle of the road. Both 
looked at Pierre with surprise. Apart from his great height and stoutness, 
and the look of gloomy concentration and suffering in his face and whole 
figure, Russians stared at Pierre because they could not make out to what 
class he belonged. Frenchmen looked after him with surprise, because, 
while all other Russians stared timidly and inquisitively at them, Pierre 
walked by without noticing them. 

With haste and horror he bore within him his intention as something 
strange and fearful to him, fearing— from the experience of the previous 
night— to lose it. But Pierre was not destined to carry his design in safety 
to the spot to which he was bending his steps. Moreover, if he had not been 
detained on the road, his design could not have been carried out, because 
Napoleon had four hours earlier left the Dorogomilov suburb, and crossed 
Arbaty to the Kremlin; and he was by then sitting in the royal study in 
the Kremlin palace in the gloomiest temper, giving circumstantial orders 
for immediately extinguishing the fires, preventing pillage, and reassuring 
the inhabitants. 

But Pierre knew nothing of that; entirely engrossed in what lay before 
him, he was suffering the anguish men suffer when they persist in under- 
taking a task impossible for them— not from its inherent difficulties, but 
from its incompatibility with their own nature. 

As Pierre got nearer to Povarsky Street, the smoke grew thicker and 
thicker, and the air was positively warm from the heat of the conflagration. 
Tongues of flame shot up here and there behind the house-tops. He met 
more people in the streets, and these people were in great excitement. But 
though Pierre felt that something unusual was happening around him, he 
did not grasp the fact that he was getting near the fire. As he walked along 
a path, across the large open space adjoining on one side Povarsky Street, 
and on the other side the gardens of Prince Gruzinsky, Pierre suddenly 
heard close by him the sound of a woman, crying desperately. He stood 
still, as though awakened from a dream, and raised his head. 

On the dried-up, dusty grass on one side of the path lay heaps of house- 
hold belongings piled up: feather-beds, a samovar, holy images, and boxes. 



WAR AND PEACE 425 

On the ground, near the boxes, sat a thin woman, no longer young, with 
long, projecting front teeth, dressed in a black cloak and cap. This woman 
was weeping violently, swaying to and fro, and muttering something. Two 
little girls, from ten to twelve years old, dressed in dirty, short frocks and 
cloaks, were gazing at their mother, with an expression of stupefaction on 
their pale, frightened faces. A little boy of seven, in a coat and a huge cap, 
obviously not his own, was crying in an old nurse's arms. A bare-legged, 
dirty servant-girl was sitting on a chest; she had let down her flaxen hair, 
and was pulling out the singed hairs, sniffing at them. The husband, a short, 
stooping man, in a uniform, with little, wheel-shaped whiskers, and smooth 
locks of hair, peeping out from under his cap, which was stuck erect on 
his head, was moving the chests from under one another with an immova- 
ble face, dragging garments of some sort from under them. 

The woman almost flung herself at Pierre's feet as soon as she saw him. 

'Merciful heavens, good Christian folk, save me, help me, kind sir! . . . 
somebody, help me,' she articulated through her sobs. 'My little girl! . . . 
My daughter! . . . My youngest girl left behind! . . . She's burnt! Oo 
. . . er! What a fate I have nursed thee for . . . Ooo!' 

'Hush, Marya Nikolaevna,' the husband said in a low voice to his wife, 
evidently only to justify himself before an outsider. 

'Sister must have taken her, nothing else can have happened to her!' he 
added. 

'Monster, miscreant!' the woman screeched furiously, her tears suddenly 
ceasing. 'There is no heart in you, you have no feeling for your own child. 
Anv other man would have rescued her from the fire. But he is a monster, 
not a man, not a father. You are a noble man,' the woman turned to Pierre 
sobbing and talking rapidly. 'The row was on fire— they rushed in to tell 
us. The girl screamed: Fire! We rushed to get our things out. Just as we 
were, we escaped. . . . This is all we could snatch up . . . the blessed 
images, we look at the children, and the bed that was my dowry, and all the 
rest is lost. Katitchka's missing. Ooo! O Lord! . . .' and again she broke 
into sobs. 'My darling! burnt! burnt!' 

'But where, where was she left?' said Pierre. 

From the expression of his interested face, the woman saw that this man 
might help her. 

'Good, kind sir!' she screamed, clutching at his legs. 'Benefactor, set my 
heart at rest anyway . . . Aniska, go, you slut, show the way,' she bawled 
to the servant-girl, opening her mouth wide in her anger, and displaying 
her long teeth more than ever. 

'Show the way, show me, I . . . I . . . I'll do something,' Pierre gasped 
hurriedly. 

The dirty servant-girl came out from behind the box, put up her hair, 
and sighing, walked on in front along the path with her coarse, bare feet. 

Pierre felt as though he had suddenly come back to life after a heavy 
swoon. He drew his head up, his eyes began to shine with the light of life, 
and with rapid steps he followed the girl, overtook her, and wenc into 



426 WAR AND PEACE 

Povarsky Street. The whole street was full of clouds of black smoke. 
Tongues of flame shot up here and there out of these clouds. A great crowd 
had gathered in front of the fire. In the middle of the street stood a French 
general, saying something to those about him. Pierre, accompanied by the 
servant-girl, was approaching the place where the French general stood; 
but the French soldiers stopped him. 

'Can't pass,' a voice shouted to him. 

'This way, master,' bawled the girl. 'We'll cut across Nikoliny by the 
lane.' 

Pierre turned back, breaking into a run now and then to keep pace with 
her. The girl ran across the street, turned into a lane on the left, and passing 
three houses, turned in at a gate on the right. 

'It's just here,' she said, and running across a yard, she opened a little gate 
in a paling-fence, and stopping short, pointed out to Pierre a small wooden 
lodge, which was blazing away brightly. One side of it had fallen in, the 
other was on fire, and flames peeped out at the window-holes and under the 
roof. 

As Pierre went in at the little gate, he felt the rush of heat, and 
involuntarily stopped short. 

'Which is your house?' he asked. 

'Oooh!' wailed the servant-girl, pointing to the lodge. 'That's it, that 
same was our lodging. Sure, you're burnt to death, our treasure, Katitchka, 
my precious little missy, ooh!' wailed Aniska, at the sight of the fire feeling 
the necessity of giving expression to her feelings too. 

Pierre darted up to the lodge, but the heat was so great that he could not 
help describing a curve round it, and found himself close to a big house, 
which was as yet only on fire on one side, at the roof. A group of French 
soldiers were swarming round it. Pierre could not at first make out what 
these Frenchmen were about, dragging something out of the house. But 
seeing a French soldier in front of him beating a peasant with a blunt 
cutlass, and taking from him a fur-lined coat, Pierre became vaguely aware 
that pillaging was going en here— but he had no time to dwell on the idea. 

The sound of the rumble and crash of falling walls and ceilings; the roar 
and hiss of the flames, and the excited shouts of the crowd; the sight of the 
hovering clouds of smoke— here folding over into black masses, there draw- 
ing out and lighted up by gleaming sparks; and the flames— here like a thick 
red sheaf, and there creeping like golden fish-scales over the walls; the sense 
of the heat and smoke and rapidity of movement, all produced on Pierre 
the usual stimulating effect of a conflagration. That effect was particularly 
strong on Pierre, because all at once, at the sight of the fire, he felt himself 
set free from the ideas weighing upon him. He felt young, gay, ready, and 
resolute. Fie ran round the lodge on the side of the house, and was about to 
run into that part which was still standing, when he heard several voices 
shouting immediately above his head, followed by the crash and bang of 
something heavy falling close by. 

Pierre looked round, and saw at the windows of the house some French 



WAR AND PEACE 427 

soldiers, who had just dropped out a drawer of a chest, filled with some 
metallic objects. Some more French soldiers standing below went up to 
the drawer. 

'Well, what does that fellow want?' one of the French soldiers shouted, 
referring to Pierre. 

'A child in the house. Haven't you seen a child?' said Pierre. 

'What's the fellow singing? Get along, do!' shouted voices; and one of 
the soldiers, evidently afraid Pierre might take it into his head to snatch the 
silver and bronzes from them, pounced on him in a menacing fashion. 

'A child?' shouted a Frenchman from above. 'I did hear something crying 
in the garden. Perhaps it's the fellow's brat. Must be humane, you know.' 

'Where is it?' asked Pierre. 

'This way!' the French soldier shouted to him from the window pointing 
to the garden behind the house. 'Wait, I'll come down.' 

And in a minute the Frenchman, a black-eyed fellow, with a patch on 
his cheek, in his shirt-sleeves, did in fact jump out of a window on the 
ground floor, and slapping Pierre on the shoulder, he ran with him to the 
garden. 'Make haste, you fellows,' he shouted to his comrades, 'it's beginning 
to get hot.' Running behind the house to a sanded path, the Frenchman 
pulled Pierre by the arm, and pointed out to him a circular space. Under 
a garden seat lay a girl of three years old, in a pink frock. 

'Here's your brat. Ah, a little girl. So much the better,' said the French- 
man. 'Good-bye. Must be humane, we are all mortal, you know'; and the 
Frenchman, with the patch on his cheek, ran back to his comrades. 

Pierre, breathless with joy, ran up to the child, and would have taken her 
in his arms. But seeing a stranger, the little girl— a scrofulous-looking, 
unattractive child, very like her mother— screamed and ran away. Pierre 
caught her, however, and lifted her up in his arms; she squealed in desperate 
fury, and tried to tear herself out of Pierre's arms with her little hands, and 
to bite him with her dirty, dribbling mouth. Pierre had a sense of horror and 
disgust, such as he had felt at contact with some little beast. But he made 
an effort to overcome it, and not to drop the child, and ran with it back to 
the big house. 

By now, however, it was impossible to get back by the same way; the 
servant-girl, Aniska, was nowhere to be seen, and with a feeling of pity and 
loathing, Pierre held close to him, as tenderly as he could, the piteously 
howling, and sopping v/et baby, and ran across the garden to seek some 
other way cut. 

When Pierre, after running across courtyards and by -lanes, got back with 
his burden to Prince Gruzinsky's garden, at the corner of Povarsky, he did 
not for the first moment recognise the place from which he had set out to 
look for the baby: it was so packed with people and goods, dragged out of 
the houses. Besides the Russian families with their belongings saved from 
the fire, there were a good many French soldiers here too in various 
uniforms. Pierre took no notice of them. He was in haste to find the family, 
and to restore the child to its mother, so as to be able to go back and save 



428 WAR AND PEACE 

some one else. It seemed to Pierre that he had a great deal more to do, and 
to do quickly. 

The child was quiet now, and clinging to Pierre's coat like a little wild 
beast. Pierre fancied he saw something tcuchingly innocent in the fright- 
ened, sickly little face. 

Neither the official nor his wife were in the place where he had left them. 
With rapid steps, Pierre walked about among the crowd, scanning the 
different faces he came across. He could not help noticing a Georgian or 
Armenian family, consisting of a very old man, of a handsome Oriental 
cast of face, dressed in a new cloth-faced sheepskin and new boots; an old 
woman of a similar type; and a young woman. The latter— a very young 
woman— struck Pierre as a perfect example of Oriental beauty, with her 
sharply marked, arched, black eyebrows, her extraordinarily soft, bright 
colour and beautiful, expressionless, oval face. Among the goods flung 
down in the crowd in the grass space, in her rich satin mantle, and the 
bright lilac kerchief on her head, she suggested a tender, tropical plant, 
thrown down in the snow. She was sitting on the baggage a little behind the 
old woman, and her big, black, long-shaped eyes, with their long lashes, 
were fixed immovably on the ground. Evidently she was aware of her 
beauty, and fearful because of it. Her face struck Pierre, and in his haste he 
looked round at her several times as he passed along by the fence. Reaching 
the fence, and still failing to find the people he was looking for, Pierre 
stood still and looked round. 

Pierre's figure was more remarkable than ever now with the baby in his 
arms, and several Russians, both men and women, gathered about him. 

'Have you lost some one, good sir? Are you a gentleman yourself, or 
what? Whose baby is it?' they asked him. 

Pierre answered that the baby belonged to a woman in a black mantle, 
who had been sitting at this spot with her children; and asked whether 
any one knew her, and where she had gone. 

'Why, it must be the Anferovs,' said an old deacon addressing a pock- 
marked peasant woman. 'Lord, have mercy on us! Lord, have mercy on 
us!' he added, in his professional bass. 

'The Anferovs,' said the woman. 'Why, the Anferovs have been gone 
since early this morning. It will either be Marya Nikolaevna's or Ivanova's.' 

'He says a woman, and Marya Nikolaevna's a lady,' said a house-serf. 

'You know her, then; a thin woman— long teeth,' said Pierre. 

'To be sure, Marya Nikolaevna. They moved off into the garden as soon 
as these wolves pounced down on us,' said the v/oman, indicating the 
French soldiers. 

'O Lord, have mercy on us!' the deacon added again. 

'You go on yonder, they are there. It's she, for sure. She was quite beside 
herself with crying,' said the woman again. 'It's she. Here this way.' 

But Pierre was not heeding the woman. For several seconds he had been 
gazing intently at what was passing a few paces from him. He was looking 
at the Armenian family and two French soldiers, who had approached them. 



WAR AND PEACE 429 

One of these soldiers, a nimble, little man, was dressed in a blue coat, with 
a cord tied round for a belt. He had a nightcap on his head, and his feet 
were bare. Another, whose appearance struck Pierre particularly, was a 
long, round-shouldered, fair-haired, thin man, with ponderous movements 
and an idiotic expression of face. He was dressed in a frieze tunic, blue 
trousers and big, torn, high boots. The little bare-footed Frenchman in the 
blue coat, on going up to the Armenians, said something, and at once took 
hold of the old man's legs, and the old man began immediately in haste 
pulling off his boots. The other soldier in the tunic stopped facing the 
beautiful Armenian girl, with his hands in his pockets, and stared at her 
without speaking or moving. 

'Take it, take the child,' said Pierre, handing the child to the peasant 
woman, and speaking with peremptory haste. 'You give her to them, you 
take her,' he almost shouted to the woman, setting the screaming child on 
the ground, and looking round again at the Frenchmen and the Armenian 
family. 

The old man was by now sitting barefoot. The little Frenchman had 
just taken the second boot from him, and was slapping the boots together. 
The old man was saving something with a sob, but all that Pierre only 
saw in a passing glimpse. His whole attention was absorbed by the French- 
man in the tunic, who had meanwhile, with a deliberate, swinging gait, 
moved up to the young woman, and taking his hands out of his pockets, 
caught hold of her neck. 

The beautiful Armenian still sat in the same immobile pose, with her 
long lashes drooping, and seemed not to see and not to feel what the soldier 
was doing to her. 

While Pierre ran the few steps that separated him from the Frenchman, 
the long soldier in the tunic had already torn the necklace from the 
Armenian beauty's neck, and the young woman, clutching at her neck with 
both hands, screamed shrilly. 

'Let that woman alone!' Pierre roared in a voice hoarse with rage, and 
seizing the long, stooping soldier by the shoulders he shoved him away. 
The soldier fell down, got up, and ran away. His comrade, dropping the 
boots, pulled out his sword, and moved up to Pierre in a menacing attitude. 

'Voyous, pas de betisesP he shouted. 

Pierre was in that transport of frenzy in which he remembered nothing, 
and his strength was increased tenfold. He dashed at the barefoot French- 
man, and before he had time to draw his cutlass, he knocked him down, 
and was pommelling him with his fists. Shouts of approval were heard from 
the crowd around, and at the same moment a patrol of French Uhlans came 
riding round the corner. The Uhlans trotted up to Pierre, and the French 
soldiers surrounded him. 

Pierre had no recollection of what followed. He remembered that he beat 
somebody, and was beaten, and that in the end he found that his hands were 
tied, that a group of French soldiers were standing round him, ransacking 
his clothes. 



430 WAR AND PEACE 

'Lieutenant, he has a dagger,' were the first words Pierre grasped the 
meaning of. 

'Ah, a weapon,' said the officer, and he turned to the barefoot soldier, who 
had been taken with Pierre. 'Very good, very good; you can tell all your 
story at the court-martial,' said the officer. And then he turned to Pierre: 
'Do you know French?' 

Pierre looked about him with bloodshot eyes, and made no reply. Prob- 
ably his face looked very terrible; for the officer said something in a 
whisper, and four more Uhlans left the rest, and stationed themselves both 
sides of Pierre. 

'Do you speak French?' the officer, keeping his distance, repeated the 
question. 'Call the interpreter.' From the ranks a little man came forward, 
in a Russian civilian dress. Pierre, from his dress and speech, at once recog- 
nised in him a French shopman from some Moscow shop. 

'He doesn't look like a common man,' said the interpreter, scanning 
Pierre. 

'Oh, oh, he looks very like an incendiary,' said the officer. 'Ask him who 
he is,' he added. 

'Who are you?' asked the interpreter in his Frenchified Russian. 'You 
must answer the officer.' 

'I will not say who I am. I am your prisoner. Take me away,' Pierre said 
suddenly in French. 

'Ah! ah!' commented the officer, knitting his brows; 'well, march then!' 

A crowd had gathered around the Uhlans. Nearest of all to Pierre stood 
the pock-marked peasant woman with the child. WTien the patrol was 
moving, she stepped forward: 

'Why, where are they taking you, my good soul?' she said. 'The child-' 
what am I to do with the child if it's not theirs?' she cried. 

'What does she want, this woman?' asked the officer. 

Pierre was like a drunken man. His excitement was increased at the sight 
of the little girl he had saved. 

'What does she want?' he said. 'She is carrying my daughter, whom I 
have just saved from the flames,' he declared. 'Good-bye!' and utterly at a 
loss to explain to himself the aimless lie he had just blurted out, he strode 
along with a resolute and solemn step between the Frenchmen. 

The patrol of Uhlans was one of those that had been sent out through 
various streets of Moscow to put a stop to pillage, and still more to capture 
the incendiaries who, in the general opinion of the French officers, were 
causing the fires. Patrolling several streets, the Uhlans arrested five more 
suspicious characters, a shopkeeper, two divinity students, a peasant, and a 
house-serf— all Russians— besides several French soldiers engaged in pillage. 
But of all these suspicious characters Pierre seemed to them the most 
suspicious of all. 

When they had all been brought for the night to a big house on Zubovsky 
rampart, which had been fixed upon as a guardhouse, Pierre was put apart 
from the rest under strict guard. 



PART XII 



In the higher circles in Petersburg the intricate conflict between parties, the 
easy, luxurious life, went on, and made it a difficult task to believe in the 
danger and the difficult position of the Russian people. There were the same 
levees and balls, the same French theatre, the same court interests, the same 
interests and intrigues in the government service. 

On the 26th of August, the very day of the battle of Borodino, there was 
a soiree at Anna Pavlovna's, the" chief attraction of which was to be the 
reading of the Metropolitan's letter, written on the occasion of his sending 
to the & Tsar the holy picture of Saint Sergey. This letter was looked upon 
as a model of patriotic ecclesiastical eloquence. It was to be read by Prince 
Vassily himself, who was famed for his fine elocution. (He used even to 
read aloud in the Empress's drawing-room.) The beauty of his elocution 
was supposed to lie in the loud, resonant voice, varying between a despair- 
ing howl and a tender whine, in which he rolled off the words quite inde- 
pendently of the sense, so that a howl fell on one word and a whine on 
others quite at random. This reading, as was always the case with Anna 
Pavlovna's entertainments, had a political significance. 

The news of the day in Petersburg was the illness of Countess Bezuhov. 
The countess had been taken ill a few days previously; she had missed 
several entertainments, and it was said that she was seeing no one, and that 
instead of the celebrated Petersburg physicians, who usually attended her, 
she had put herself into the hands of some Italian doctor. 

Everybody was very well aware that the charming countess's illness was 
due to 'inconveniences arising from marrying two husbands at once. But in 
the presence of Anna Pavlovna' no one ventured to think about that view 
of the question, or even, as it were, to know what they did know about it. 

'They say the poor countess is very ill. The doctor says it is angina 

* I am told the old count is touching. He cried like a child when the doctor 
told him there was danger.' % 

'Oh, it would be a terrible loss. She is a fascinating woman. 
'You speak of the poor countess,' said Anna Pavlovna, coming up. 'I sent 
to inquire after her. I was told she was going on better. Oh, no doubt of it, 
she is the most charming woman in the world,' said Anna Pavlovna. 

Supposing that by these last words Anna Pavlovna had slightly lifted the 
veil of mystery that hung over the countess's illness, one unwary young 

431 



432 WAR AND PEACE 

man permitted himself to express surprise that no well-known doctor had 
been called in, and that the countess should be treated by a charlatan, who 
might make use of dangerous remedies. 

'Your information may be better than mine,' cried Anna Pavlovna, falling 
upon the inexperienced youth with sudden viciousness, 'but I have it on 
good authority that this doctor is a very learned and skilful man. He is 
the private physician of the Queen of Spain.' 

However, on the evening of that day everything seemed to conspire to 
throw the Petersburg world into agitation and uneasiness. Countess Elena 
Bezuhov died quite suddenly of the terrible illness which had been so 
amusing to talk about. At larger gatherings every one repeated the official 
story that Countess Bezuhov had died of a terrible attack of angina pectoris, 
but in intimate circles people told in detail how the Queen of Spain's own 
medical attendant had prescribed to Ellen small doses of a certain drug to 
bring about certain desired results; but that Ellen, tortured by the old 
count's suspecting her, and by her husband's not having answered her letter 
(that unfortunate, dissipated Pierre), had suddenly taken an enormous dose 
of the drug prescribed, and had died in agonies before assistance could be 
given. The story ran that Prince Vassily and the old count had been going 
to take proceedings against the Italian; but the latter had produced notes 
in his possession from the unhappy deceased of such a character that they 
had promptly let him go. 

On the third day after, a country gentleman arrived in Petersburg from 
Moscow, and the news of the surrender of Moscow to the French was aii 
over the town. This was awful! Think of the position of the Emperor! 

Nine days after the abandonment of Moscow, a courier from Kutuzov 
reached Petersburg with the official news of the surrender of Moscow, with 
the news of the burning, whose flames illumined his route. 

'Can they have surrendered my ancient capital without a battle?' the Tsar 
asked. 

The colonel respectfully gave the message he had been commanded to 
give from Kutuzov, that is, that there was no possibility of fighting before 
Moscow, and that seeing there was no chance but either to lose the army 
and Moscow or to lose Moscow alone, the commander-in-chief had been 
obliged to choose the latter. 

The Tsar listened without a word. 

'Has the enemy entered the city?' he asked. 

'Yes, sire, and by now the city is in ashes. I left it all in flames.' 

The Tsar frowned. 

'I see, colonel, from all that is happening to us that Providence requires 
great sacrifices of us. I am ready to submit to His will in everything; but tell 
me, how did you leave the army, seeing my ancient capital thus abandoned 
without striking a blow? Did you not perceive discouragement?' 

'Sire, will you permit me to speak frankly, as a loval soldier?' 

'Colonel, I always expect it,' said the Tsar. 'Hide nothing from me; I 
want to know absolutely how it is.' 



WAR AND PEACE 433 

'Sire! I left the whole army, from the commanders to the lowest soldier 
without exception, in extreme, in desperate terror.' 

'Flow so?' the Tsar interrupted, frowning sternly. 'My Russians let them- 
selves be cast down by misfortune? . . . Never . . .' 

'Sire,' he said, with a respectful playfulness of expression, 'they fear only 
that your Majesty through goodness of heart may let yourself be persuaded 
to make peace. They burn to fight,' said the plenipotentiary of the Russian 
people, 'and to prove to your Majesty by the sacrifice of their lives how 
devoted they are . . .' 

'Ah!' said the Tsar, reassured, with a friendly light in his eyes. 'You 
tranquillise me, colonel . . .' 

The Tsar looked down, and for some time he was silent. 'Well, go back 
to the army,' he said, drawing himself up to his full height, 'and tell our 
brave fellows, tell all my good subjects v/herever you go, that when I have 
not a soldier left, I will put myself at the head of my dear nobility, of my 
good peasants, and so use the last resources of my empire. It offers me still 
more than my enemies suppose,' said the Tsar, more and more stirred. 'But if 
it should be written in the decrees of divine Providence,' he said, and his 
fine, mild eyes, shining with emotion, were raised towards heaven, 'that my 
ctynasty should cease to reign on the throne of my ancestors, then after 
exhausting every means in my power, I would let my beard grow to here' 
(the Tsar put his hand halfway down his breast), 'and go and eat potatoes 
with the meanest of my peasants rather than sign the shame of my country 
and my dear people, whose sacrifice I know how to appreciate.' 

'Sire!' said the messenger, 'your majesty is signing at this moment the 
glory of the nation and the salvation of Europe!' 

While half of Russia was conquered, and the inhabitants of Moscow were 
fleeing to remote provinces, and one levy of militia after another was being 
raised for the defence of the country, we, not living at the time, cannot 
help imagining that all the people in Russia, great and small alike, were 
engaged in doing nothing else but making sacrifices, saving their country, or 
weeping over its downfall. The tales and descriptions of that period without 
exception tell us of nothing but the self-sacrifice, the patriotism, the despair, 
the grief, and the heroism of the Russians. In reality, it was not at all like 
that. It seems so to us, because we see out of the past only the general 
historical interest of that period, and we do not see all the personal human 
interests of the men of that time. 

Nikolay Rostov, simply because the war had happened to break out 
before he left the service, took an immediate and continuous part in the 
defence of his country, and consequently he looked upon what was happen- 
ing in Russia without despair or gloomy prognostications. If he had been 
asked what he thought of the present position of Russia, he would have said 
that it was not his business to think about it, that that was what Kutuzov 
and the rest of them were for, but that he had heard that the regiments were 
being filled up to their full complements, and that they must therefore be 



434 WAR AND PEACE 

going to fight for a good time longer, and that under the present circum- 
stances he might pretty easily obtain the command of a regiment within 
a couple of years. 

Since this was his point of view, it was with no regret at taking no part 
in the approaching battle, but with the greatest satisfaction— which he did 
not conceal, and his comrades fully understood— that he received the news 
of his appointment to go to Voronezh to purchase remounts for his division. 

A few days before the battle of Borodino, Nikolay received the sums of 
money and official warrants required, and, sending some hussars on before 
him, he drove with posting-horses to Voronezh. 

Only one who has spent several months in the atmosphere of an armv 
in the field can imagine the delight Nikolay felt when he got out of the 
region overspread by the troops with their foraging parties, trains of 
provisions, and hospitals; when he saw no more soldiers, army waggons, 
and filthy traces of the camp, but villages of peasants and peasant women, 
gentlemen's country houses, fields with grazing oxen, and station-houses and 
sleepy overseers. What in particular remained for a long while a wonder 
and a joy to him was the sight of women, young and healthy, without 
dozens of officers hanging about every one of them; and women, too, who 
were pleased and flattered at an officer's cracking jokes with them. » 

In the happiest frame of mind, Nikolay reached the hotel at Voronezh 
at night, ordered everything of which he had so long been deprived in the 
army, and next dav, after shaving with special care and putting on the full- 
dress uniform he had not worn for so long past, he drove of! to present 
himself to the authorities. 

The governor was a brisk little man, very affable and unpretentious. He 
mentioned to Nikolay the farms where he might obtain horses, recom- 
mended him to a horse-dealer in the town, and promised him every 
assistance. 

'You are Count Ilya Andreivitch's son? My wife was a great friend of your 
mamma's. We receive on Thursdays: to-day is Thursday, pray come in, 
quite without ceremony,' said the governor, as he took leave of him. 

Provincial life in the year 1812 went on exactly the same as always, the 
only difference being that the provincial towns were livelier owing to the 
presence of many wealthy families from Moscow, that, as in everything 
going on at that time in Russia, there was perceptible in the gaiety a certain 
devil-may-care, desperate recklessness, and also that the small talk indispen- 
sable between people was now not about the weather and common ac- 
quaintances, but about Moscow and the army and Napoleon. 

The gathering at the governor's consisted of the best society in Voronezh. 

There were a great many ladies, among them several Moscow acquaint- 
ances of Nikolay 's; but among the men there was no one who could be 
compared with the cavalier of St. George the gallant hussar, and good- 
natured, well-bred Count Rostov. As soon as Nikolav came in in his full- 
dress uniform of an officer of hussars, diffusing a fragrance of scent and 
wine about him, people clustered round him. The ladies and the young girls 



WAR AND PEACE 435 

flirted with him, and the old people began even from this first evening 
bestirring themselves to try and get this gallant young rake of an hussar 
married and settled down. Among the latter was the governor's wife herself, 
who received Rostov as though he were a near kinsman, and called him 
'Nikolay.' 

All the evening Nikolay paid the most marked attention to a blue-eyed, 
Dlump, and pleasing little blonde, the wife of one of the provincial officials. 
With the naive conviction of young men who are enjoying themselves that 
other men's wives are created for their special benefit, Rostov never left this 
lady's side, and treated her husband in a friendly way, almost as though 
there were a private understanding between them. 

Jauntily shifting the posture of his legs in his tight riding-breeches, 
diffusing a scent of perfume, and admiring his fair companion and himself 
and the fine lines of his legs in the tight breeches, Nikolay told the blonde 
lady that he wanted to elope with a lady here, in Voronezh. 

'What is she like?' 

'Charming, divine. Her eyes' (Nikolay gazed at his companion) -'are blue, 
her lips are coral, her whiteness . . .' he gazed at her shoulders, 'the shape 

of Diana . . .' ... 

The good-natured governor's wife came up to them with a disapproving 

air. 

'Anna Ignatyevna wants to see you, Nikolay,' she said, pronouncing the 
name in such a way that Rostov was at once aware that Anna Ignatyevna 
was a very great lady. 'Come, Nikolay. You let me call you so, don't you?' 

'Oh, yes, ma temte. Who is she?' 

'Anna Ignatyevna Malvintsev. She has heard about you from her niece, 
how you rescued her ... Do you guess? . . .' 

'Oh, I rescued so many!' cried Nikolay. 

'Her niece, Princess Bolkonsky. She is here in Voronezh with her aunt. 
Oho! how he blushes! Eh?' 

The governor's wife led him up to a tall and very stout lady in blue, who 
had just finished a game of cards with the personages of greatest con- 
sequence in the town. This was Madame Malvintsev, Princess Marya's aunt 
on her mother's side, a wealthy, childless widow, who always lived in 
Voronezh. She was standing up, reckoning her losses, when Rostov came 

up to her. . 

'Delighted, my dear boy,' she said, holding out her hand to him. Fray 

come and see me.' 



Mad 



After saying a few words about Princess Marya and her late father, whom 
^adame Malvintsev had evidently disliked, and inquiring what Nikolay 
knew about Prince Andrey, who was apparently also not in her good graces 
the dignified old lady dismissed him, repeating her invitation to come and 

see her. 

Nikolay promised to do so and blushed again as he took leave. At the 
mention of Princess Marya's name, Rostov experienced a sensation of 
shyness, even of terror, which he could not have explained to himself. 



436 WAR AND PEACE 

On leaving Madame Malvintsev, Rostov would have gone back to the 
dance, but the little governor's wife laid her plump little hand on his sleeve. 

'Do vou know, mon cher] said the governor's wife with a serious expres- 
sion on her good-natured, little face, 'this is really the match for you; if you 
like, I will try and arrange it.' 

'Whom do you mean, ?na tante?'' asked Nikolay. 

'1 will make a match for you with the princess. Do you wish it? I am 
sure vour mamma will be grateful. Really, she is such a splendid girl, 
charming! And she is by no means so very plain.' 

'Not at all so,' said Nikolay, as though offended at the idea. 'As for me, 
ma tante, as a soldier should, I don't force myself on any one, nor refuse 
anything that turns up,' said Rostov, before he had time to consider what 
he was saying. 

'What a stupid thing I said to the governor's wife though!' suddenly came 
into Nikolay's mind at supper. 'She really will begin to arrange a match, and 
Sonya? . . .' 

And on taking leave of the governor's wife, as she said to him once more 
with a smile, 'Well, remember then,' he drew her aside. 

'But there is something . . . To tell you the truth, ma tante . . .' 

'What is it, what is it, my dear? Come, let us sit down here.' 

Nikolay had a sudden desire, an irresistible impulse to talk of all his most 
secret feelings (such as he would never have spoken of to his mother, to his 
sister, to an intimate friend) to this woman, who was almost a stranger. 
Whenever Nikolay thought afterwards of this uncalled-for outburst of in- 
explicable frankness— though it had most important consequences for him— 
it seemed to him (as it always seems to people in such cases) that it had 
happened by chance, through a sudden fit of folly. But at the same time 
this outburst of frankness, together with other insignificant events, had 
consequences of immense importance to him and to all his family. 

'It's like this, via tante. It has long been mamarts wish to marry me to an 
heiress; but the mere idea of it— marrying for money— is revolting to me.' 

'Oh yes, I can understand that,' said the governor's wife. 

'But Princess Bolkonsky, that's a different matter. In the first place, I'll 
tell you the truth, I like her very much, I feel drawn to her, and then, ever 
since I came across her in such a position, so strangely, it has often struck 
me, that it was fate. Only think: mamma has long been dreaming of it, but 
I had never happened to meet her before— it always so happened that we 
didn't meet. And then when my sister, Natasha, was engaged to her brother, 
of course it was impossible to think of a match between us then. It seems 
it was to happen that I met her first just when Natasha's engagement had 
been broken off; and well, everything afterwards ... So vou see how it is. 
I have never said all this to any one, and I never shall. I only say it to you.' 

The governor's wife pressed his elbow gratefully. 

'Do you know Sophie, my cousin? I love her; I have promised to marry 
her, and I am going to marry her ... So you see it's no use talking of 
such a thing,' Nikolay concluded lamely, flushing crimson. 



WAR AND PEACE 437 

'My dearest boy, how can you talk so? Why, Sophie hasn't a farthing, and 
you told me yourself that your papa's affairs are terribly straitened. And 
your merman? It would kill her-for one thing. Then Sophie, if she is a girl 
of any heart, what a life it would be for her! Your mother in despair, your 
position ruined . . . No, my dear, Sophie and you ought to realise that.' 

Nikolay did not speak. It was comforting to him to hear these arguments. 

'All the same, ma tante, it cannot be,' he said, with a sigh, after a brief 
silence. 'And besides would the princess accept me? And again she is in 
mourning; can such a thing be thought of?' 

'Why, do you suppose I am going to marry you out of hand on the spot? 
There are ways of doing everything,' said the governor's wife. 

'What a match-maker you are, ma tante . . .' said Nikolay, kissing her 
plump little hand. 

On reaching Moscow, Princess Marya had found her nephew there with 
his tutor, and a letter from Prince Audrey, directing her what route to take 
to her aunt, Madame Malvintsev's at Voronezh. The arrangements for the 
journey, anxiety about her brother, the organisation of her life in a new- 
house, new people, the education of her nephew— all of this smothered in 
Princess Marya's heart that feeling as it were of temptation, which had 
tormented her during her father's illness and after his death, especially since 
her meeting with Rostov. 

Now after a month had passed in quiet, undisturbed conditions, she felt 
more and more deeply the loss of her father, which was connected in her 
heart with the downfall of Russia. She was anxious: the thought of the 
dangers to which her brother— the one creature near to her now left— was 
being exposed was a continual torture to her. She was worried too by the 
education of her nephew, which she was constantly feeling herself unfitted 
to control. But at the bottom of her heart there was an inward harmony, 
that arose from the sense that she had conquered in herself those dreams and 
hopes of personal happiness, that had sprung up in connection with Rostov. 

When the governor's wife called on Madame Malvintsev the day after 
her soiree, and, talking over her plans with her, explaining that though 
under present circumstances a formal betrothal was of course not to be 
thought of, yet they might bring the young people together, and let them 
get to know one another, and having received the aunt's approval, began 
to speak of Rostov in Princess Marya's presence, singing his praises, and 
describing how he had blushed on hearing the princess's name, her emotion 
was not one of joy, but of pain. Her inner harmony was destroyed, and 
desires, doubts, self-reproach, and hope sprang up again. 

In the course of the two days that followed before Rostov called, Princess 
Marya was continually considering what her behaviour ought to be in 
regard to Rostov. At one time, she made up her mind that she would not 
come down into the drawing-room when he came to see her aunt, that it 
was not suitable for her in her deep mourning to receive visitors. Then she 
thought this would be rude after what he had done for her. 



438 WAR AND PEACE 

Then the idea struck her that her aunt and the governor's wife had views 
of some sort upon her and Rostov; their words and glances had seemed at 
times to confirm this suspicion. Then she told herself that it was only her 
own depravity that could make her think this of them: could they possiblv 
fail to realise that in her position, still wearing the heaviest mourning, such 
match-making would be an insult both to her and to her father's memory? 

On the supposition that she would go down to see him, Princess Marya 
imagined the words he would say to her, and she would say to him; and at 
one moment, those words seemed to her undeservedly frigid, at the next, 
they struck her as carrying too much meaning. Above all she dreaded the 
embarrassment, which she felt would be sure to overcome her, and betray 
her, as soon as she saw him. 

But when, on Sunday after matins, the footman came into the drawing- 
room to announce that Count Rostov had called, the princess showed no 
sign of embarrassment, only a faint flush came into her cheeks, and her 
eyes shone with a new, radiant light. 

'You have seen him, aunt?' said Princess Marya, in a composed voice, not 
knowing herself how she could be externally so calm and natural. 

When Rostov came into the room, the princess dropped her head for an 
instant, as though to give time for their visitor to greet her aunt; and then 
at the very moment when Nikolay turned to her, she raised her head and 
met his gaze with shining eyes. With a movement full of dignity and 
grace, she rose with a joyous smile, held out her delicate, soft hand to him, 
and spoke in a voice in which for the first time there was the thrill of deep, 
womanly notes. Mademoiselle Bourienne, who was in the drawing-room, 
gazed at Princess Marya with bewildered surprise. The most accomplished 
coquette herself, she could not have manoeuvred better on meeting a man 
whom she wanted to attract. 

'Either black suits her wonderfully, or she really has grown better looking 
without my noticing it. And above all, such tact and grace!' thought 
Mademoiselle Bourienne. 

Had Princess Marya been capable of reflection at that moment, she would 
have been even more astonished than Mademoiselle Bourienne at the 
change that had taken place in her. Just as when a light is kindled within a 
carved and painted lantern, the delicate, intricate, artistic tracery comes out in 
unexpected and impressive beauty, so was Princess Marya's face transformed. 

Rostov saw all this as clearly as though he had known her whole life. He 
felt that he was in the presence of a creature utterly different from and 
better than all those he had met up to that moment, and, above all, far 
better than he was himself. 

The conversation was of the simplest and most insignificant kind. They 
talked of the war, unconsciously, like every one else, exaggerating their 
sadness on that subject; they talked of their last meeting— and Nikolay then 
tried to turn the subject; they talked of the kind-hearted governor's wife, 
of Nikolay's relations, and of Princess Marya's. 

Princess Marya did not talk of her brother, but turned the conversation, 



WAR AND PEACE 439 

as soon as her aunt mentioned Prince Andrey. It was evident that of the 
troubles of Russia she could speak artificially, but her brother was a subject 
too near her heart, and she neither would nor could speak lightly of him. 
Nikolay noticed this, as indeed with a keenness of observation not usual 
with him, he noticed every shade of Princess Marya's character, and every- 
thing confirmed him in the conviction that she was an altogether rare and 
original being. 

Nikolay, like Princess Marya, had blushed and been embarrassed, when 
he heard the princess spoken of, and even when he thought of her; but in 
her presence he felt perfectly at ease, and he said to her not at all what he 
had prepared beforehand to say to her, but what came into his mind at that 
moment, and always quite appropriately. 

As visitors always do where there are children, Nikolay, in a momentary 
silence during his brief visit, had recourse to Prince Andrey's little son, 
caressing him, and asking him if he would like to be an hussar. He took 
the little boy in his arms, began gaily whirling him round, and glanced at 
Princess Marya. With softened, happy, shy eyes, she was watching the child 
she loved in the arms of the man she loved. Nikolay caught that look too, 
and as though he divined its significance, flushed with delight. 

Princess Marya was not going into society at all on account of her mourn- 
ing, and Nikolay did not think it the proper thing to call on them again. 
But the governor's wife still persisted in her match-making, and repeating 
to Nikolay something flattering Princess Marya had said of him, and vice 
versa, kept urging that Rostov should declare himself to Princess Marya. 
With this object, she arranged that the young people should meet at the 
reverend father's before Mass. 

Though Rostov did not tell the governor's wife that he should make no 
sort of declaration to Princess Marya, he promised to be there. 

Just as at Tilsit Rostov had not allowed himself to doubt whether what 
was accepted by every one as right were really right, so now after a brief 
but sincere struggle between the effort to order his life in accordance with 
his own sense of right, and humble submission to circumstances, he chose 
the latter, and yielded himself to the power, which, he felt, was irresistibly 
carrying him away. He knew that to declare his feelings to Princess Marya 
after his promise to Sonya would be what he called base. And he knew 
that he would never do a base thing. But he knew too (it was not what he 
knew, but what he felt at the bottom of his heart), that in giving way now 
to the force of circumstances and of the people guiding him, he was not 
only doing nothing wrong, but was doing something very, very grave, some- 
thing of more gravity than anything he had done in his life. 

After seeing Princess Marya, though his manner of life remained exter- 
nally the same, all his former pleasures lost their charm for him, and he often 
'.Thought of her. But he never thought of her as he had thought of all the 
young girls he had met in society, nor as he had long, and sometimes with 
enthusiasm, thought of Sonya. Like almost every honest-hearted young man, 
he had thought of every young girl as of a possible future wife, had adapted 



440 WAR AND PEACE 

to them in his imagination all the pictures of domestic felicity: the white 
morning wrapper, the wife behind the samovar, the wife's carriage, the little 
ones, mamma and papa, their attitude to one another, and so on, and so on. 
And these pictures of the future afforded him gratification. But when he 
thought of Princess Marya, to whom the match-makers were trying to be- 
troth him, he could never form any picture of his future married life with 
her. Even if he tried to do so, it all seemed incoherent and false. And it only 
filled him with dread. 

The terrible news of the battle of Borodino, of our losses in killed and 
wounded, and the even more terrible news of the loss of Moscow reached 
Voronezh in the middle of September. Princess Marya, learning of her 
brother's wound only from the newspapers, and having no definite infor- 
mation about him, was preparing (so Nikolay heard, though he had not 
seen her) to set off to try and reach Prince Andrey. 

On hearing the news of the battle and the abandonment of Moscow, 
Rostov felt, not despair, rage, revenge, nor any such feeling, but a sudden 
weariness and vexation with everything at Voronezh, and a sense of awk- 
wardness and uneasy conscience. All the conversations he listened to seemed 
to him insincere; he did not know what to think of it all, and felt that only 
in the regiment would all become clear to him again. He made haste to 
conclude the purchase of horses. 

Several days before Rostov's departure there was a thanksgiving service 
in the cathedral for the victory gained by the Russian troops. When the 
service was concluding, the governor's wife beckoned him to her. 

'Did you see the princess?' she said, w r ith a motion of her hand towards 
a lady in black standing behind the choir. 

Princess Marya, obviously buried in her own thoughts, was making the 
last signs of the cross before leaving the church. 

Without waiting for the governor's wife to urge him, without asking 
himself whether it were right, whether it were proper for him to address 
her here in church, Nikolay went up to her, and said he had heard of her 
trouble and grieved with his whole heart to hear of it. 

'One thing I wanted to tell you, princess,' said Rostov, 'that is, that if 
Prince Andrey Nikolaevitch were not living, since he is a colonel, it would 
be announced immediately in the gazettes.' 

The princess looked at him, not comprehending his words, but comforted 
by the expression of sympathetic suffering in his face. 

That evening Nikolay did not go out anywhere, but stayed at home to 
finish some accounts with the horse-vendors. By the time he had finished 
his work it was rather late to go out anywhere, but still early to go to bed, 
and Nikolay spent a long while walking up and down the room, thinking 
over his life, a thing that he rarely did. 

His meeting with Princess Marya that morning in church had, Nikolay 
felt, gone more deeply to his heart than he had anticipated and more deeply 
than he desired for his peace of mind. That pale, delicate, melancholy face, 
those luminous eyes, those soft, gracious gestures, and, above all, the deep 



WAR AND PEACE 441 

and tender melancholy expressed in all her features, agitated him and drew 
his sympathy. In men Rostov could not bear an appearance of higher, 
spiritual life (it was why he did not like Prince Andrey), he spoke of it 
contemptuously as philosophy, idealism; but in Princess Mary a it was just 
in that melancholy, showing all the depth of a spiritual world, strange and 
remote to Nikolay, that he found an irresistible attraction. 

'She must be a marvellous girl! An angel, really!' he said to himself. 'Why 
am I not free? Why was I in such a hurry with Sonya?' But with Princess 
Marya he could not picture his future life, because he did not understand 
her— he simply loved her. 

'How she was praying!' he thought. 'One could see that her whole soul 
was in her prayer. Yes, it was that prayer that moves mountains, and I am 
convinced that her prayer will be answered. Why don't I pray for what I 
want?' he bethought himself. 'What do I want? Freedom, release from 
Sonya. She was right,' he thought of what the governor's wife had said, 
'nothing but misery can come of my marrying her. Muddle, mamma's grief 
. . . our position ... a muddle, a fearful muddle! Besides, I don't even 
love her. No, I don't love her in the right way. My God! take me out of 
this awful, hopeless position!' he began praying all at once, putting his pipe 
down and standing with clasped hands before the holy picture. He had 
tears in his eyes and a lump in his throat when Lavrushka came in at the 
door with papers. 

'Blockhead! bursting in when you're not wanted!' said Nikolay, quickly 
changing his attitude. 

'A courier has come,' said Lavrushka in a sleepy voice, 'from the gover- 
nor, with letters for you..' 

Nikolay took the two letters. One was from his mother, the other from 
Sonya. He knew them from the handwriting, and broke open Sonya's letter 
first. He had hardly read a few lines when his face turned white and his 
eyes opened wide in dismay and joy. 'No, it's not possible!' he said aloud. 
Unable to sit still, he began walking to and fro in the room, holding the 
letter in both hands as he read it. He skimmed through the letter, then read 
it through once and again, and shrugging his shoulders and flinging up his 
hands, he stood still in the middle of the room with wide-open mouth and 
staring eyes. What he had just been praying for with the assurance that 
God would answer his prayer had come to pass; but Nikolay was astounded 
at it as though it were something extraordinary, and as though he had not 
expected it, and as though the very fact of its coming to pass so quickly 
proved that it had not come from God, to whom he had been praying, but 
was some ordinary coincidence. 

The knot fastening his freedom, that had seemed so impossible to disen- 
tangle, had been undone by this unexpected and, as it seemed to Nikolay, 
uncalled-for letter from Sonya. She wrote that their late misfortunes, the 
loss of almost the whole of the Rostovs' property in Moscow, and the 
countess's frequently expressed desire that Nikolay should marry Princess 
Bolkonsky, and his silence and coldness of late, all taken together led her 



442 WAR AND PEACE 

to decide to set him free from his promise, and to give him back complete 
liberty. 

'It would be too painful to me to think that I could be a cause of sorrow 
and discord in the family which has overwhelmed me with benefits,' she 
wrote; 'and the one aim of my love is the happiness of those I love, and 
therefore I beseech you, Nicolas, to consider yourself free, and to know 
that in spite of everything, no one can love you more truly than your— 
Sonya.' 

The other letter v/as from the countess. It described the last days in 
Moscow, the departure, the fire and the loss of the whole of their property. 
The countess wrote too that Prince Andrey had been among the train of 
wounded soldiers who had travelled with them. He was still in a very 
critical condition, but that the doctor said now that there was more hope. 
Sonya and Natasha were nursing him. 

With this letter Nikolay went next day to call on Princess Marya. Neither 
Nikolay nor Princess Marya said a word as to all that was implied by the 
words: 'Natasha is nursing him'; but thanks to this letter, Nikolay was 
brought suddenly into intimate relations, almost those of a kinsman, with 
the princess. 

Next day Rostov escorted Princess Marya as far as Yaroslavl, and a few 
days later he set off himself to join his regiment. 

Sonya's letter to Nikolay, that had come as an answer to his prayer, had 
been called forth in the following way. The idea of marrying Nikolay to a 
wealthy heiress had taken more and more complete possession of the old 
countess's mind. She knew that Sonya was the great obstacle in the way of 
this. And Sonya's life had of late, and especially after the letter in which 
Nikolay described his meeting with Princess Marya at Bogutcharovo, be- 
come more and more difficult in the countess's house. The countess never 
let slip an opportunity for making some cruel or humiliating allusion to 
Sonya. But a few days before they set out from Moscow the countess, dis- 
tressed and overwrought by all that was happening, sent for Sonya, and 
instead of insistence and upbraiding, besought her with tears and entreaties 
to repay all that had been done for her by sacrificing herself, and breaking 
off her engagement to Nikolay. 'I shall have no peace of mind till you make 
me this promise,' she said. 

Sonya sobbed hysterically, answered through her sobs that she would do 
anything, that she was ready for anything; but she did not give a direct 
promise, and in her heart she could not bring herself to what was demanded 
of her. She had to sacrifice herself for the happiness of the family that had 
brought her up and provided for her. To sacrifice herself for others was 
Sonya's habit. Her position in the house was such that only by way of 
sacrifice could she show her virtues, and she was used to sacrificing herself 
and liked it. But in every self-sacrificing action hitherto she had been hap- 
pily conscious that by her very self-sacrifice she was heightening her value 
in the eyes of herself and others, and becoming worthier of Nikolay, whom 
she loved beyond everything in life. But now her sacrifice would consist 



WAR AND PEACE 443 

in the renunciation of what constituted for her the whole reward of sacri- 
fice, and the whole meaning of life. And for the first time in her life she 
felt bitterness against the people who had befriended her only to torment 
her more poignantly: she felt envy of Natasha, who had never had any 
experience of the kind, who had never been required to make sacrifices, 
and made other people sacrifice themselves for her, and was yet loved by 
every one. 

And for the first time Sonya felt that there was beginning to grow up 
out of her quiet, pure love for Nikolay a passionate feeling, which stood 
above all principles, and virtue, and religion. Under the influence of that 
passion, Sonya, whose life of dependence had unconsciously trained her to 
reserve, gave the countess vague, indefinite answers, avoided talking with 
her, and resolved to wait for a personal interview with Nikolay, not to set 
him free, but, on the contrary, to bind him to her for ever. 

The fuss and the horror of the Rostovs' last days in Moscow had smoth- 
ered the gloomy thoughts that were weighing on Sonya. She was glad to 
find an escape from them in practical work. But when she heard of Prince 
Andrey's presence in their house, in spite of all the genuine compassion 
she felt for him, and for Natasha, a joyful and superstitious feeling that it 
was God's will that she should not be parted from Nikolay took possession 
of her. She knew Natasha loved no one but Prince Andrey, and had never 
ceased to love him. She knew that brought together now, under such ter- 
rible circumstances, they would love one another again; and that then, 
owing to the relationship that would (in accordance with the laws of the 
Orthodox Church) exist between them, Nikolay could not be married to 
Princess Marya. In spite of all the awfulness of what was happening during 
the last day or two in Moscow and the first days of the journey, that feel- 
ing, that consciousness of the intervention of Providence in her personal 
affairs, was a source of joy to Sonya. 

At the Troitsa monastery the Rostovs made the first break in their jour- 
ney. The wounded man was by this time a great deal better. Natasha was 
sitting with him, Sonya was in the next room. The door of Prince Andrey's 
room opened; Natasha came out with an excited face, went up to Sonya 
and took her by the arm. 

'Sonya, yes, he will live,' she said. 'Sonya, how happy I am, and how 
wretched! Sonya, darling, everything is just as it used to be.' And Natasha 
burst into tears. 

'Yes! I knew it would be! Thank God,' said Sonya. 'He will live.' 

Sonya was no less excited than her friend, both by the latter's grief and 
fears, and by her own personal reflections. After weeping a little, and 
wiping their tears, the two friends went towards Prince Andrey's door. 
Natasha, cautiously opening the door, glanced into the room. Sonya stood 
beside her at the half-open door. 

Prince Andrey was lying raised high on three pillows. His pale face 
looked peaceful, his eyes were closed, and they could see his quiet, regular 
breathing. 



444 WAR AND PEACE 

'Ah, Natasha!' Sonya almost shrieked all of a sudden, clutching at her 
cousin's arm, and moving back away from the door. 

'What! what is it?' asked Natasha. 

'It's the same, the same, you know . . .' said Sonya, with a white face and 
quivering lips. 

Natasha softly closed the door and walked away with Sonya to the win- 
dow, not yet understanding what she was talking of. 

'Do you remember,' said Sonya, with a scared and solemn face, 'do you 
remember when I looked into the mirror for you ... at Otradnoe at 
Christmas time . . . Do you remember what I saw?' . . . 

'Yes, yes,' said Natasha, opening her eyes wide, and vaguely recalling that 
Sonya had said something then about seeing Prince Andrey lying down. 

'Do you remember?' Sonya went on. 'I saw him then, and told you all so 
at the time, you and Dunyasha. I saw him lying on a bed,' she said, at each 
detail making a gesture with her lifted finger, 'and that he had his eyes shut, 
and that he was covered with a pink quilt, and that he had his hands folded,' 
said Sonya, convinced as she described the details she had just seen that 
they were the very details she had seen then. At the time she had seen noth- 
ing, but had said she was seeing the first thing that came into her head. But 
what she had invented then seemed to her now as real a memory as anv 
other. She not only remembered that she had said at the time that he looked 
round at her and smiled, and was covered with something red, but was 
firmly convinced that she had seen and said at the time, that he was covered 
with a pink quilt— yes, pink— and that his eyes had been closed. 

'Yes, yes, pink it was,' said Natasha, w T ho began now to fancy too that 
she remembered her saying it was a pink quilt, and saw in that detail the 
most striking and mysterious point in the prediction. 

'But what does it mean?' said Natasha dreamily. 

'Ah, I don't know, how extraordinary it all is!' said Sonya, clutching at 
her head. 

A few minutes later, Prince Andrey rang his bell, and Natasha went 
in to him; while Sonya, in a state of excitement and emotion such as she 
had rarely experienced, remained in the window, pondering over all the 
strangeness of what was happening. 

That day there was an opportunity of sending letters to the army, and 
the countess wrote a letter to her son. 

'Sonya,' said the countess, raising her head from her letter, as her niece 
passed by her. 'Sonya, won't you write to Nikolenka?' said the countess, 
in a soft and trembling voice; and in the tired eyes, that looked at her 
over the spectacles, Sonya read all that the countess meant by those words. 
Those eyes expressed entreaty and dread of a refusal and shame at having 
to beg, and readiness for unforgiving hatred in case of refusal. 

'I will write, mamma,' she said. 

Sonya was softened, excited, and moved by all that had passed that day, 
especially by the mysterious fulfilment of her divination, which she had 
just seen. Now, when she knew that in case of the renewal of Natasha's 



WAR AND PEACE 445 

engagement to Prince Andrey, Nikolay could not be married to Princess 
Marya, she felt with delight a return of that self-sacrificing spirit in which 
she was accustomed and liked to live. And with tears in her eyes, and a 
glad sense of performing a magnanimous action, she sat down, and wrote 
the touching letter the reception of which had so impressed Nikolay. 

In the guard-room to which Pierre had been taken, the officer and soldiers 
in charge treated him with hostility, but at the same time with respect. 
Their attitude to him betrayed both doubt who he might be— perhaps a 
person of great importance— and hostility, in consequence of the personal 
conflict they had so recently had with him. 

But when on the morning of the next day the guard was relieved, Pierre 
felt that for his new guard he was no longer an object of the same interest 
as he had been to those who had taken him prisoner. Pierre was put that 
day with the other suspicious characters who had been apprehended, since 
the room he had occupied was wanted for an officer. 

All the Russians detained with Pierre were persons of the lowest class. 
And all of them, recognising Pierre as a gentleman, held aloof from him 
all the more for his speaking French. 

On the following evening, Pierre learned that all the prisoners (and him- 
self probably in the number) were to be tried for incendiarism. The day 
after, Pierre was taken with the rest to a house where were sitting a French 
general with white moustaches, two colonels, and other Frenchmen with 
scarfs on their shoulders. They put questions to Pierre and the others, aimed 
only at directing the channel along which the examining officials desired 
the prisoner's answers to flow, that is, to conviction. Pierre felt, as the 
accused always do feel at all trials, a puzzled wonder why all these ques- 
tions were asked him. He knew he was in the power of these men, that the 
whole aim of the proceeding was to convict him. And, therefore, since they 
had superior force, and they had the desire to convict him, there seemed 
no need of the network of questions and the trial. 

To the inquiry what he was doing when he was apprehended, Pierre 
replied with a certain tragic dignity that he was carrying back to its parents 
a child he had 'rescued from the flames.' Why was he fighting with the 
soldiers? Pierre replied that he was defending a woman, that the defence 
of an insulted woman was the duty of every man, and so on . . . He was 
pulled up; this was irrelevant. 

With what object had he been in the courtyard of a burning house where 
he had been seen by several witnesses? He answered that he was going out 
to see what was going on in Moscow. He was puiled up again. He had not 
been asked, he was told, where he was going, but with what object he was 
near the fire. Who was he? The first question was repeated, to which he 
had said he did not want to answer. Again he replied that lie could not 
answer that. 

'Write that down, that's bad. Very bad,' the general with the white 
whiskers and the red, flushed face said to him sternly. 



446 WAR AND PEACE 

On the fourth day, fire broke out on the Zubovsky rampart. 

Pierre was moved with thirteen of the others to a coach-house belonging 
to a merchant's house on the Crimean Ford. As he passed through the street, 
Pierre could hardly breathe for the smoke, which seemed hanging over the 
whole city. Fires could be seen in various directions. Pierre did not at that 
time grasp what was implied by the burning of Moscow, and he gazed with 
horrcr at the fires. 

In a coach-house behind a house in the Crimean Ford, Pierre spent another 
four days, and in the course of those four days he learned, from the con- 
versation of the French soldiers, that all the prisoners in detention here 
were every day awaiting the decision of their fate by a marshal. Of what 
marshal, Pierre could not ascertain from the soldiers. For the soldiers, this 
marshal was evidently the highest and somewhat mysterious symbol of 
power. 

On the 8th of September, there came into the prisoners' coach-house an 
officer of very great consequence, judging by the respectfulness with which 
he was addressed by the soldiers on guard. This officer, probably some one 
on the staff, held a memorandum in his hand, and called over all the Rus- 
sians' names, giving Pierre the title of 'the one w T ho will not give his name.' 
And with an indolent and indifferent glance at all the prisoners, he gave 
the officer on guard orders to have them decently dressed and in good 
order before bringing them before the marshal. 

In an hour a company of soldiers arrived, and Pierre with the thirteen 
others was taken to the Virgin's Meadow. It was a fine day, sunny after 
rain, and the smoke did not hang low over the town as on the day when 
Pierre had been taken from the guard-room of the Zubovsky rampart; the 
smoke rose up in columns into the pure air. Flames were nowhere to be 
seen; but columns of smoke were rising up on all sides, and all Moscow, 
all that Pierre could see, was one conflagration. On all sides he saw places 
laid waste, with stoves and pipes left standing in them, and now and then 
the charred walls of a stone house. 

Pierre stared at the fires, and did not recognise parts of the town that he 
knew well. Here and there could be seen churches that had not been 
touched by the fire. The Kremlin, uninjured, rose white in the distance. 
Close at hand, the cupola of the ?^onastery of the New Virgin shone 
brightly, and the bells for service rang out gaily from it. Those bells re- 
minded Pierre that it was Sunday and the festival of the birth of the Virgin 
Mother. But there seemed to be no one to keep this holiday; on all sides 
they saw the ruin wrought by the fires, and the only Russians they met were 
a few tattered and frightened-looking people, who hid themselves on seeing 
the French. 

With this annihilation of the old Russian order of life, Pierre was uncon- 
sciously aware that the French had raised up an utterly different but 
strong order of their own. He felt this at the sight of the regular ranks of 
the soldiers escorting him and the other prisoners, at the gay sounds of 
regimental music, which floated across from the left of the meadow; and 



WAR AND PEACE 447 

he had felt it from the memorandum the French officer had read in the 
morning when he called over the prisoners' names. Pierre was taken by one 
set of soldiers, led off to one place, and thence to another, with dozens of 
different people. It seemed to him that they might have forgotten him, 
have mixed him up with other people. But no; his answers given at the 
examination came back to him in the form of the designation, 'the one who 
will not give his name.' 

And under this designation, which filled Pierre with dread, they led him 
away somewhere, with unhesitating conviction written on their faces that 
he and the other prisoners with him were the right ones, and that they were 
being taken to the proper place. Pierre felt himself an insignificant chip that 
had fallen under the wheel of a machine that worked without a hitch, 
though he did not understand it. 

Pierre was led with the other prisoners to a big, white house with an 
immense garden. Pierre had often been inside it in former days to see its 
owner. Now, as he learnt from the talk of the soldiers, it was occupied by 
the marshal, the Duke of Eckmiihl. 

Pierre was the sixth to be led in. Through a glass-roofed gallery, a vesti- 
bule, and a hall, all familiar to Pierre, he was led to the long, low-pitched 
study, at the door of which stood an adjutant. 

Davoust was sitting at a table at the end of the room, his spectacles on his 
nose. Pierre came close up to him. Davoust, without raising his eyes, was 
apparently engaged in looking up something in a document that lay before 
him. Without raising his eyes, he asked softly: 'Who are you?' 

Pierre was mute because he was incapable of articulating a word. Davoust 
was not to Pierre simply a French general; to Pierre, Davoust was a man 
notorious for his cruelty. Looking at the cold face of Davoust, which, like 
a stern teacher, seemed to consent for a time to have patience and await a 
reply, Pierre felt that every second of delay might cost him his life. But he 
did not know what to say. To say the same as he said at the first examina- 
tion he did not dare; to disclose his name and his position would be both 
dangerous and shameful. Pierre stood mute. But before he had time to come 
to any decision, Davoust raised his head, thrust his spectacles up on his 
forehead, screwed up his eyes, and looked intently at Pierre. 

'I know this man,' he said, in a frigid, measured tone, obviously reckoning 
on frightening Pierre. The chill that had been runing down Pierre's back 
seemed to clutch his head in a vice. 

'General, you cannot know me, I have never seen you. 

'It is a Russian spy,' Davoust interrupted, addressing another general in 
the room, whom Pierre had not noticed. And Davoust turned away. With 
an unexpected thrill in his voice, Pierre began speaking with sudden 
rapidity. 

'Non, monseigneur? he said, suddenly recalling that Davoust was a duke, 
'you could not know me. I am a militia officer, and I have not quitted 
Moscow.' 

'Your name?' repeated Davoust. 



448 WAR AND PEACE 

'Bezuhov.' 

'What proof is there that you are not lying?' 

'MonseigneurF cried Pierre in a voice not of offence but of supplication. 

Davoust lifted his eyes and looked intently at Pierre. For several seconds 
they looked at one another, and that look saved Pierre. In that glance, apart 
from all circumstances of warfare and of judgment, human relations arose 
between these two men. Both of them in that one instant were vaguely 
aware of an immense number of different things, and knew that they were 
both children of humanity, that they were brothers. 

At the first glance when Davoust raised his head from his memorandum, 
where men's lives and doings were marked off by numbers, Pierre was only 
a circumstance, and Davoust could have shot him with no sense of an evil 
deed on his conscience; but now he saw in him a man. He pondered an 
instant. 

'How will you prove to me the truth of what you say?' 

Pierre thought of Ramballe, and mentioned his name and regiment and 
the street and house where he could be found. But at that moment an 
adjutant came in and said something to Davoust. 

Davoust beamed at the news the adjutant brought him, and began button- 
ing up his uniform. Apparently he had completely forgotten about Pierre. 
When an adjutant reminded him of the prisoner, he nodded in Pierre's 
direction with a frown, and told them to take him away. 

There was one idea all this time in Pierre's head. It was the question: 
Who, who was it really that was condemning him to death? It was not the 
men who had questioned him at the first examination; of them not one 
would or obviously could do so. It was not Davoust, who had looked at him 
in such a human fashion. In another minute Davoust would have understood 
that they were doing wrong, but the adjutant who had come in at that 
moment had prevented it. And that adjutant had obviously had no evil 
intent, but he might have stayed away. Who was it, after all, who was pun- 
ishing him, taking his life— his, Pierre's, with all his memories, his strivings, 
his hopes, and his ideas? Who was doing it? And Pierre felt that it was no 
one's doing. It was discipline. Some sort of discipline was killing him, Pierre, 
robbing him of all, annihilating him. 

The prisoners were taken straight downhill to a kitchen garden, in which 
there stood a post. A big pit had been dug out near the post, and the freshly 
turned-up earth was heaped up by it. A great crowd of people formed a 
semicircle about the pit. To the right and left of the post stood rows of 
French soldiers, in blue uniforms, with red epaulettes, in Hessians and shako. 

The prisoners were stood in a certain order, in accordance with a written 
list (Pierre was sixth) and led up to the post. Several drums suddenly began 
beating on both sides of them, and Pierre lost all power of thought and 
reflection. He could only see and hear. 

The two men at the end were shaven convicts; one tall and thin, the other 
a swarthy, hirsute, muscular fellow with a flattened nose. The third was a 
house-serf, a man of five-and-forty, with grey hair and a plump, well-fed 



WAR AND PEACE 449 

figure. The fourth was a peasant, a very handsome fellow with a full, flaxen 
beard and black eyes. The fifth was a factory hand, a thin, sallow lad of 
eighteen, in a dressing-gown. 

Pierre heard the Frenchmen deliberating how they were to be shot, 
singly, or two at a time. 'Two at a time,' a senior officer answered coldly. 
There was a stir in the ranks of the soldiers, and it was evident that every 
one was in haste and not making haste, as men hasten to get something 
done that is inevitable, but is disagreeable and incomprehensible. 

A French official wearing a scarf came up to the right side of the file of 
prisoners, and read aloud the sentence in Russian and in French. 

Then two couples of French soldiers came up to the prisoners by the 
instruction of an officer, and took the two convicts who stood at the head. 
The convicts went up to the post, stopped there, and while the sacks were 
being brought, they looked dumbly about them, as a wild beast at bay looks 
at the approaching hunter. One of them kept on crossing himself, the other 
scratched his back and worked his lips into the semblance of a smile. The 
soldiers with hurrying fingers bandaged their eyes, put the sacks over their 
heads and bound them to the post. 

A dozen sharpshooters, with muskets, stepped out of the ranks with a 
fine, regular tread, and halted eight paces from the post. Pierre turned 
away not to see what was coming. There was a sudden bang and rattle 
that seemed to Pierre louder than the most terrific clap of thunder, and he 
looked round. There was a cloud of smoke, and the French soldiers, with 
trembling hands and pale faces, were doing something in it by the pit. 

The neyt two were led up. Those two, too, looked at every one in the 
same way, with the same eyes, dumbly, and in vain, with their eyes only 
begging for protection, and plainly unable to understand or believe in what 
was coming. 

Pierre tried not to look, and again turned away; but again a sort of awful 
crash smote his hearing, and with the sound he saw smoke, blood, and the 
pale and frightened faces of the Frenchmen, again doing something at the 
post, and balking each other with their trembling hands. 

On all the faces of the Russians, on the faces of the French soldiers and 
officers, all without exception, he read the same dismay, horror, and conflict 
as he felt in his own heart. 'But who is it doing it there really? They are 
all suffering as I am! Who is it? who?' flashed for one second through 
Pierre's mind. 

'Sharpshooters of the eighty-sixth, forward!' some one shouted. The fifth 
prisoner standing beside Pierre was led forward— alone. Pierre did not 
understand that he was saved; that he and all the rest had been brought 
here simply to be present at the execution. With growing horror, with no 
sense of joy or relief, he gazed at what was being done. The fifth was the 
factory lad in the loose gown. The factory lad could not walk. He was 
held up under the arms and dragged along, and he screamed all the while. 
When they had brought him to the post he was suddenly quiet. Whether 
he grasped that it was no use to scream, or that it was impossible for men 



450 WAR AND PEACE 

to kill him, he stood at the post, waiting to be bound like the others, and 
like a wild beast under fire looked about him with glittering eyes. 

Pierre could not make himself turn away and close his eyes. The curiosity 
and emotion he felt, and all the crowd with him, at this fifth murder reached 
its highest pitch. Like the rest, this fifth man seemed calm. He wrapped his 
dressing-gown round him, and scratched one bare foot with the other. 

When they bound up his eyes, of himself he straightened the knot, which 
hurt the back of his head; then, when they propped him against the blood- 
stained post, he staggered back, and as he was uncomfortable in that posi- 
tion, he shifted his attitude, and leaned back quietly, with his feet put down 
symmetrically. 

The word of command must have sounded, and after it the shots of the 
eight muskets. But Pierre, however earnestly he tried to recollect it after- 
wards, had not heard the slightest sound from the shots. He only saw the 
factory lad suddenly fall back on the cords, saw blood oozing in two places, 
and saw the cords themselves work loose from the weight of the hanging 
body, and the factory lad sit down, his head falling unnaturally, and one 
leg bent under him. Pierre ran up to the post. No one hindered him. Men 
with pale and frightened faces were doing something. There was one old 
whiskered Frenchman, whose lower jaw twitched all the while as he untied 
the cords. The body sank down. The soldiers, with clumsy haste, dragged 
it from the post and shoved it into the pit. 

All of them clearly knew, beyond all doubt, that they were criminals who 
must make haste to hide the traces of their crime. 

Pierre glanced into the pit and saw that the factory lad was lying there 
with his knees up close to his head, and one shoulder higher than the other. 
And that shoulder was convulsively, rhythmically rising and falling. But 
spadefuls of earth were already falling all over the body. One of the soldiers, 
in a voice of rage, exasperation, and pain, shouted to Pierre to stand aside. 
But Pierre did not understand him, and still stood at the post, and no one 
drove him away. 

When the pit was quite filled up, the word of command was heard. 
Pierre was taken back to his place, and the French troops, standing in ranks 
on both sides of the post, faced about, and began marching with a measured 
step past the post. The sharpshooters ran back to their places except one, 
a young soldier, with a face of deathly pallor, who still stood facing the pit 
on the spot upon which he had shot. He staggered like a drunken man. 
An old under-officer ran out of the ranks, and, seizing the young soldier by 
the shoulder, dragged him to his company. The crowd of Frenchmen and 
Russians began to disperse. All walked in silence, with downcast eyes. 

'That will teach them to set fire to the places,' said some one among the 
French. Pierre looked round at the speaker, and saw that it was a soldier 
who was trying to console himself somehow for what had been done, but 
could not. 

After the execution Pierre was separated from the other prisoners and 
left alone in a small, despoiled, and filthy church. 



WAR AND PEACE 451 

Towards evening a patrol sergeant, with two soldiers, came into the 
church and informed Pierre that he was pardoned, and was now going to 
the barracks of the prisoners of war. Pierre got up and went with the 
soldiers to some sheds that had been rigged up in the upper part of the 
meadow out of charred boards. Some twenty persons of various kinds 
thronged round Pierre. He gazed at faces and figures, and all seemed to 
him equally meaningless. 

From the moment when Pierre saw that fearful murder committed by 
men who did not want to do it, it seemed as though the spring in his soul, 
by which everything was held together and given the semblance of life, 
had been wrenched out, and all seemed to have collapsed into a heap of 
meaningless refuse. It had annihilated in his soul all faith in the beneficent 
ordering of the universe, and in the soul of men, and in his own soul, and 
in God. 

Sitting in the straw against the wall, Pierre opened, and then closed, his 
eyes. As soon as he shut his eyes he saw the fearful face of the factory 
lad, fearful especially from its simplicity, and the faces of the involuntary 
murderers, still more fearful in their uneasiness. And he opened his eyes 
again and stared blankly about him in the darkness. 

Close by him a little man was sitting bent up, of whose presence Pierre 
was first aware from the strong smell of sweat that rose at every move- 
ment he made. This man was doing something with his feet in the dark- 
ness, and although Pierre did not see his face, he was aware that he was 
continually glancing at him. Pierre made out that the man was undoing his 
foot-gear. And the way he was doing it began to interest Pierre. 

Undoing the strings in which one foot was tied up, he wound them 
neatly off, and at once set to work on the other leg, glancing at Pierre. 
While one hand hung up the first leg-binder, the other was already be- 
ginning to untie the other leg. In this way, with rounded, effective move- 
ments following one another without delay, the man unrolled his leg- 
wrappers and hung them up on pegs driven in over-head, took out a knife, 
cut off something, shut the knife up, put it under his bolster, and settling 
himself more at his ease, clasped his arms round his knees, and stared 
straight at Pierre. Pierre was conscious of something pleasant in those deft 
movements. 

'And have you seen a lot of trouble, sir? Eh? ' said the little man suddenly. 
And there was a tone of such friendliness and simplicity in the sing-song 
voice that Pierre wanted to answer. At the same second, leaving no time 
for Pierre's embarrassment to appear, the little man spoke again, in the same 
pleasant voice: 

'Ay, darling, don't grieve,' he said, in that tender, caressing sing-song in 
which old Russian peasant women talk. 'Don't grieve, dearie; trouble lasts 
an hour, but life lasts for ever! Ay, ay, my dear. And we get on here finely, 
thank God; nothing to vex us. They're men, too, and bad and good among 
them,' he said; and, while still speaking, got with a supple movement on his 
knees to his feet, and clearing his throat walked away. 



452 WAR AND PEACE 

'Hey, the hussy, here she is!' Pierre heard at the end of the shed the same 
caressing voice. 'Here she is, the hussy; she remembers me! There, there, 
lie down!' And the soldier, pushing down a dog that was jumping up on 
him, came back to his place and sat down. In his hands he had something 
wrapped up in a cloth. 

'Here, you taste this, sir,' he said, returning to the respectful tone he 
had used at first, and untying and handing to Pierre several baked potatoes. 
'At dinner we had soup. But the potatoes are first-rate!' 

Pierre had eaten nothing the whole day, and the smell of the potatoes 
struck him as extraordinarily pleasant. He thanked the soldier and began 
eating. 

'But why so, eh?' said the soldier smiling, and he took one of the potatoes. 
'You try them like this.' He took out his clasp-knife again, cut the potato 
in his hand into two even halves, and sprinkled them with salt from the 
cloth, and offered them to Pierre. 

'The potatoes are first-rate,' he repeated. 'You taste them like that.' 

It seemed to Pierre that he had never eaten anything so good. 

'No, I am all right,' said Pierre; 'but why did they shoot those poor fel- 
lows? . . . The last was a lad of twenty.' 

'Tss . . . tss . . .' said the little man. 'Sin, indeed, . . . sin . . .' he added 
quickly, just as though the words were already in his mouth and flew out 
of it by accident; he went on: 'How was it, sir, you came to stay in Mos- 
cow like this?' 

'I didn't think they would come so soon. I stayed by accident,' said Pierre. 

'But how did they take you, darling; from your home?' 

'No, I went out to see the fire, and then they took me up and brought 
me to judgment as an incendiary.' 

'Where there's judgment, there there's falsehood,' put in the little man. 

'And have you been here long?' asked Pierre, as he munched the last 
potato. 

'I? On Sunday they took me out of the hospital in Moscow.' 

'Who are you, a soldier? ' 

'We are soldiers of the Apsheron regiment. I was dying of fever. We 
were never told anything. There were twenty of us lying sick. And w T e 
had never a thought, never a guess of how it was.' 

'Well, and are you miserable here?' asked Pierre. 

'Miserable, to be sure, darling. My name's Platon, surname Karataev,' he 
added, evidently to make it easier for Pierre to address him. 'In the regi- 
ment they called me "the little hawk." How can one help being sad, my 
dear? Moscow— she's the mother of cities. One must be sad to see it. Yes, 
the maggot gnaws the cabbage, but it dies before it's done; so the old folk 
used to say,' he added quickly. 

'What, what was that you said?' asked Pierre. 

'I?' said Karataev. 'I say it's not by our wit, but as God thinks fit,' said 
he, supposing that he was repeating what he had said. And at once he went 
on: 'Tell me, sir, and have you an estate from your fathers? And a house 



WAR AND PEACE 453 

of your own? To be sure, your cup was overflowing! And a wife, too? And 
are your old parents living?' he asked, and though Pierre could not see 
him in the dark, he felt that the soldier's lips were puckered in a restrained 
smile of kindliness while he asked these questions. He was evidently dis- 
appointed that Pierre had no parents, especially that he had not a mother. 

'Wife for good counsel, mother-in-law for kind welcome, but none dear 
as your own mother!' said he. 'And have you children?' he went on to ask. 
Pierre's negative reply seemed to disappoint him again, and he added him- 
self: 'Oh well, you are young folks; please God, there will be. Only live 
in peace and concord.' 

'But it makes no difference now,' Pierre could not help saying. 

'Ah, my dear man,' rejoined Platon, 'the beggar's bag and the prison 
walls none can be sure of escaping.' He settled himself more comfortably, 
and cleared his throat, evidently preparing himself for a long story. 'So it 
was like this, dear friend, when I used to be living at home,' he began, 'we 
have a rich heritage, a great deal of land, the peasants were well off, and 
our house— something to thank God for, indeed. Father used to go out to 
reap with six of us. We got along finely. Something like peasants we were. 
It came to pass . . .' and Platon Karataev told a long story of how he 
had gone into another man's copse for wood, and had been caught by the 
keeper, how he had been flogged, tried, and sent for a soldier. 

'And do you know, darling,' said he, his voice changing from the smile 
on his face, 'we thought it was a misfortune, while it was all for our hap- 
piness. My brother would have had to go if it hadn't been for my fault. And 
my younger brother had five little ones; while I, look you, I left no one 
behind but my wife. I had a little girl, but God had taken her before I 
went for a soldier. I went home on leave, I must tell you. I find them all 
better off than ever. The yard full of beasts, the womenfolk at home, two 
brothers out earning wages. Only Mihailo, the youngest, at home. Father 
says aF. his children are alike; whichever finger's pricked, it hurts the same. 
And if they hadn't shaved Platon for a soldier, then Mihailo would have 
had to go.' 

After a short pause, Platon got up. 

'Well, I dare say, you are sleepy?' he said, and he began rapidly crossing 
himself, murmuring: 

'Lord Jesus Christ, holy Saint Nikola, Frola and Lavra; Lord Jesus Christ, 
holy Saint Nikola, Frola and Lavra; Lord Jesus Christ— have mercy and 
save us!' he concluded, bowed down to the ground, got up, sighed, and 
sat down on his straw. 'That's right. Let me lie down like a stone, O God, 
and rise up like new bread!' he murmured, and lay down, pulling his mili- 
tary coat over him. 

'What prayer was that you recited?' asked Pierre. 

'Eh?' said Platon (he was already half asleep). 'Recited? I prayed to God. 
Don't you pray, too?' 

'Yes, I do,' said Pierre. 'But what was it you said-Frola and Lavra?' 

'Eh, to be sure,' Platon answered quickly. 'They're the horses' sainrs. 



454 WAR AND PEACE 

One must think of the poor beasts, too,' he said. 'Why, the little hussy, 
she's curled up. You're warm, child of a bitch!' he said, feeling the dog at 
his feet; and, turning over again, he fell asleep at once. 

Outside shouting and wailing could be heard somewhere far away, and 
through the cracks in the walls could be seen the glow of fire; but within 
the shed all was dark and hushed. For a long while Pierre did not sleep, 
and lay with open eyes in the darkness, listening to Platon snoring rhyth- 
mically as he lay beside him, and he felt that the world that had been 
shattered was rising up now in his soul, in new beauty, and on new founda- 
tions that could not be shaken. 

In this shed, where Pierre spent four weeks, there were twenty-three 
soldiers, three officers, and two civilian functionaries, all prisoners. 

They were all misty figures to Pierre afterwards, but Platon Karataev 
remained for ever in his mind the strongest and most precious memory, 
and the personification of everything Russian, kindly, and round. When 
next day at daw T n Pierre saw his neighbour, his first impression of some- 
thing round was fully confirmed; Platon's whole figure in his French mili- 
tary coat, girt round the waist with cord, in his forage-cap and bast shoes, 
was roundish, his head was perfectly round, his back, his chest, his shoulders, 
even his arms, which he always held as though he were about to embrace 
something, were round in their lines; his friendly smile and big, soft, brown 
eyes, too, were round. 

Platon Karataev must have been over fifty to judge by his stories of the 
campaigns in which he had taken part. He did not himself know and could 
not determine how old he was. But his strong, dazzlingly white teeth 
showed in two unbroken semicircles whenever he laughed, as he often did, 
and all were good and sound: there was not a grey hair in his beard or on 
his head, and his whole frame had a look of suppleness and of unusual 
hardiness and endurance. 

His face had an expression of innocence and youth in spite of the curving 
wrinkles on it; his voice had a pleasant sing-song note. But the great 
peculiarity of his talk was its spontaneity and readiness. It was evident that 
he never thought of what he was saying, or of what he w T as going to say. 

His physical powers and activity were such, during the first period of 
his imprisonment, that he seemed not to know what fatigue or sickness 
meant. Every evening as he lay down to sleep, he said: 'Let me lie down, 
Lord, like a stone; let me rise up like new bread'; and every morning on 
getting up, he would shake his shoulder in the same way, saying: 'Lie down 
and curl up, get up and shake yourself.' And he had, in fact, only to lie 
down in order to sleep at once like a stone, and he had but to shake himself 
to be ready at once, on waking, without a second's delay, to set to work 
of some sort; just as children, on waking, begin at once playing with 
their toys. 

He knew how to do everything, not particularly well, but not badly 
either. He baked, and cooked, and sewed, and planed, and cobbled boots. 
He was always busy, and only in the evenings allowed himself to indulge 



WAR AND PEACE 455 

in conversation, which he loved, and singing. He sang songs, not as singers 
do, who know they are listened to, but sang, as the birds sing, obviously, 
because it was necessary to him to utter those sounds, as it sometimes is 
to stretch or to walk about; and those sounds were always thin, tender, 
almost feminine, melancholy notes, and his face as he uttered them was 
very serious. 

Being in prison, and having let his beard grow, he had apparently cast 
off all the soldier's ways that had been forced upon him and were not 
natural to him, and had unconsciously relapsed into his old peasant habits. 

'A soldier discharged is the shirt outside the breeches again,' he used to 
say. He did not care to talk of his life as a soldier, though he never com- 
plained, and often repeated that he had never once been beaten since he 
had been in the service. When he told stories, it was always by preference 
of his old and evidently precious memories of his life as a 'Christian,' as 
he pronounced the word 'krestyan,' or peasant. The proverbial sayings, of 
which his talk was full, were not the bold, and mostly indecent, sayings 
common among soldiers, but those peasant saws, which seem of so little 
meaning looked at separately, and gain all at once a significance of pro- 
found wisdom when uttered appropriately. 

Often he would say something directly contrary to what he had said 
before, but both sayings were equally true. He liked talking, and talked 
well, adorning his speech with caressing epithets and proverbial sayings, 
which Pierre fancied he often invented himself. But the great charm of his 
talk was that the simplest incidents— sometimes the same that Pierre had 
himself seen without noticing them— in his account of them gained a char- 
acter of seemliness and solemn significance. He liked to listen to the fairy 
tales which one soldier used to tell— always the same ones over and over 
again— in the evenings, but most of all he liked to listen to stories of real 
life. He smiled gleefully as he listened to such stories, putting in words 
and asking questions, all aiming at bringing out clearly the moral beauty 7 of 
the action of which he was told. 

Attachments, friendships, love, as Pierre understood them, Karataev had 
none; but he loved and lived on affectionate terms with every creature 
with whom he was thrown in life, and especially so with man— not with 
any particular man, but with the men who happened to be before his eyes. 
He loved his dog, loved his comrades, loved the French, loved Pierre, who 
was his neighbour. But Pierre felt that in spite of Karataev's affectionate 
tenderness to him (in which he involuntarily paid tribute to Pierre's 
spiritual life), he would not suffer a moment's grief at parting from him. 
And Pierre began to have the same feeling towards Karataev. 

To all the other soldiers Platon Karataev was the most ordinary soldier; 
they called him 'little hawk,' or Platosha; made good-humoured jibes at 
his expense, sent him to fetch things. But to Pierre, such as he appeared 
on that first night— an unfathomable, rounded-off, and everlasting person- 
ification of the spirit of simplicity and truth— so lie remained to him for ever. 

Platon Karataev knew nothing by heart except his prayers. When he 



456 WAR AND PEACE 

talked, he did not know on beginning a sentence how he was going to end it. 
He did not understand, and could not grasp the significance of words 
taken apart from the sentence. Every word and every action of his was 
the expression of a force uncomprehended by him, which was his life. 
But his life, as he looked at it, had no meaning as a separate life. It had 
meaning only as a part of a whole, of which he was at all times conscious. 
He could not understand any value or significance in an act or a word taken 
separately. 

On hearing from Nikolay that her brother was at Yaroslavl with the 
Rostovs, Princess Marya prepared at once to go to him with her nephew. 
Whether this were difficult or not, whether it were possible or not, she 
did not inquire; it was her duty not only to be herself at the side of her 
brother, but to take his son to him. 

The latter part of her stay in Voronezh had been the happiest period in 
Princess Marya's life. Her love for Rostov was not then a source of tor- 
ment or agitation to her. That love had by then filled her whole soul and 
become an inseparable part of herself, and she no longer struggled against 
it. Of late Princess Marya was convinced— though she never clearly in so 
many words admitted it to herself— that she was beloved. She had been 
convinced of this by her last interview with Nikolay when he came to tell 
her that her brother was with the Rostovs. Nikolay did not by one word 
hint at the possibility now (in case of Prince Audrey's recovery) of his 
engagement to Natasha being renewed, but Princess Marya saw by his 
face that he knew and thought of it. And in spite of that, his attitude to her 
—solicitous, tender, and loving— was so far from being changed, that he 
seemed overjoyed indeed that now a sort of kinship between him and 
Princess Marya allowed him to give freer expression to his loving friend- 
ship. 

But on approaching Yaroslavl, her agitation reached its utmost limits. 
When the courier, whom she had sent on ahead to find out in Yaroslavl 
where the Rostovs were staying, and in what condition Prince Andrey was, 
met the great travelling coach at the city gate he was frightened at the 
terribly pale face that looked out at him from the window. 

'I have found out everything, your excellency: the Rostovs are staying 
not far off, right above the Volga,' said the courier. 'His excellency is 
staying in the same house with them.' 

'He is living, then,' thought the princess; and she softly asked, 'How is 
he?' 

'The servants say, "No change." ' 

What was meant by 'no change' the princess did not inquire, and with a 
passing, hardly perceptible, glance at little seven-year-old Nikolushka, 
sitting before her, delighted at the sight of the town, she bowed her head, 
and did not raise it again till the heavy carriage— rumbling, jolting, and 
swaying from side to side— came to a standstill. 



WAR AND PEACE 457 

The carriage-door was opened. On the left was water— a broad river; 
on the right, entrance steps. At the entrance were people, servants, and a 
rosy-faced girl with a thick coil of black hair, who smiled at her in an un- 
pleasantly affected way, as it seemed to Princess Mary a (it was Sonya). 
The princess ran up the steps; the girl, smiling affectedly, said, 'This way! 
this way!' and the princess found herself in the vestibule, facing an elderly 
woman of an Oriental type of face, who came rapidly to meet her, looking 
moved. It was the countess. 

'My child,' she said, 'I love you, and have known you a long while.' 

Princess Marya knew it was the countess, and that she must say some- 
thing to her. She uttered some polite French phrases in the tone in which 
she had been addressed, and asked, 'How is he?' 

'The doctor says there is no danger,' said the countess; but as she said it 
she sighed, and turned her eyes upwards, and this gesture contradicted her 
words. 

'Where is he? Can I see him; can I?" asked the princess. 

'In a minute; in a minute, my dear. Is this his son?' she said, turning to 
Nikolushka, who came in with Dessalle. 'Oh, what a charming boy!' 

The countess led the princess into the drawing-room. Sonya began to 
converse with Mademoiselle Bourienne. The countess caressed the child. 
The old count came into the room to welcome the princess. He was ex- 
traordinarily changed since Princess Marya had seen him last. Then he 
had been a jaunty, gay, self-confident old gentleman, now he seemed a 
pitiful, bewildered creature. As he talked to the princess, he was continually 
looking about him, as though asking every one if he were doing the right 
thing. After the destruction of Moscow and the loss of his property, 
driven out of his accustomed rut, he had visibly lost the sense of his own 
importance, and felt that there was no place for him in life. 

In spite of her one desire to see her brother without loss of time, and her 
vexation that they should entertain her conventionally, the princess knew 
that all this was inevitable. 

'Where is he?' she asked once more, addressing them all. 

'He is downstairs! Natasha is with him,' answered Sonya. 'We have sent 
to ask. You are tired, I expect, princess?' 

Tears of vexation came into Princess Marya's eyes. She turned away and 
was about to ask the countess again where she could see him, when she 
heard at the door light, eager steps that sounded to her full of gaiety. She 
looked round and saw, almost running in, that Natasha whom she had so 
disliked when they met long before in Moscow. 

Princess Marya had hardly glanced at Natasha's face before she under- 
stood that here was one who sincerely shared her grief, and was therefore 
her friend. She flew to meet her, and embracing her, burst into tears on her 
shoulder. 

'Come, let us go to him, Marie,' said Natasha, drawing her away into 

the next room. 



458 WAR AND PEACE 

Princess Marya dried her eyes. 'How . . .' she was beginning, but 
stopped short. Natasha's lip suddenly twitched, ugly creases came round 
her mouth, and she broke into sobs, hiding her face in her hands. 

Princess Marya knew everything. 

But still she could not give up hope, and asked in words, though she put 
no faith in them: 

'But how is his wound? What is his condition altogether?' 

'You . . . you will see that,' was all Natasha could say. 

'How has the whole illness gone? Has he been worse for long? When 
did this happen?' Princess Marya asked. 

Natasha told her that at first there had been danger from inflammation 
and the great pain, but that had passed away at Troitsa, and the doctor had 
only been afraid of one thing— gangrene. But the risk of that, too, was al- 
most over. When they reached Yaroslavl, fever had set in. The doctor had 
said this fever was not so serious. 

'But two days ago,' Natasha began, 'all of a sudden this change came . . .' 
She struggled with her sobs. 'I don't know why, but you will see the change 
in him.' 

'He is weaker? thinner? . . .' queried the princess. 

'No, not that, but worse. You will see. Oh Marie, he is too good, he can- 
not, he cannot live, because . . .' 

When Natasha opened the door with her practised hands, letting her 
pass in before her, Princess Marya felt the sobs rising in her throat. How- 
ever much she prepared herself, however much she tried to compose her- 
self, she knew that she would not be able to see him without tears. 

She understood what Natasha had meant by the words: two days ago 
this change ca?ne. She interpreted it as meaning that he had suddenly grown 
softer, and that that softening, that tenderness, was the sign of death. As 
she approached the door, she saw already in her imagination that face of 
the little Andryusha, as she had known it in childhood, tender, gentle, soft- 
ened, as it was so rarely, and as it affected her so strongly. She felt sure he 
would say soft, tender words to her like those her father had uttered on 
his deathbed, and that she would not be able to bear it, and would break 
into sobs at them. 

He was lying on a couch, propped up with cushions, in a squirrel- 
lined dressing-gown. He was thin and pale. One thin, transparently white 
hand held a handkerchief, with the other he was softly fingering the delicate 
moustache that had grown long. His eyes gazed at them as they came in. 

On seeing his face and meeting his eyes, Princess Marya at once slackened 
the rapidity of her step and felt the tears dried up and the sobs checked. 
In the profound, not outward- but inward-looking gaze chere was some- 
thing almost like hostility. 

'How are you, Marie; how did you manage to get here?' he said, in a 
voice as even and as aloof as the look in his eyes. 

'And you have brought Nikolushka?' he said, as evenly and deliberately, 
and with evident effort to recollect things. 



WAR AND PEACE 459 

'How are you now?' said Princess Marya, wondering herself at what 
she was saying. 

'That, my dear, you must ask the doctor,' he said, and evidently making 
another effort to be affectionate, he said with his lips only (it was obvious 
he was not thinking of what he was saying): 

'Thank you, my dear, for coming.' 

Princess Marya did not know what to say. She understood the change 
that had come over him two days ago. In his words, in his tone, above all 
in his eyes— those cold, almost antagonistic eyes— could be felt that aloofness 
from all things earthly that is so fearful to a living man. It was evidently 
with difficulty that he understood anything living; not because he had lost 
the power of understanding, but because he understood something else that 
the living did not and could not understand, and that entirely absorbed him. 

'Yes, see how strangely fate has brought us together again,' he said, 
breaking the silence, and pointing to Natasha. 'She is nursing me.' 

Princess Marya heard him, and could not understand what he was saying. 
He, Prince Andrey, with his delicate, tender intuition, how could he say 
that before the girl whom he loved, and who loved him! If he had any 
thought of living, he could not have said that in that slightingly cold tone. 
If he had not known he was going to die, how could he have failed to feel 
for her, how could he speak like that before her! 

'Marie came by Ryazan,' said Natasha. 'She was told that Moscow had 
been burnt to the ground, all of it, entirely. That it looks as though . . .' 

Natasha stopped. It was impossible to talk. He was obviously making 
an effort to listen, and yet he could not. 

'Yes; it's burnt, they say,' he said. 'That's a great pity.' 

'And so you met Count Nikolay, Marie?' said Prince Andrey, suddenly, 
evidently trying to say something to please them. 'He wrote here what a 
great liking he took to you,' he went on, simply and calmly, plainly unable 
to grasp all the complex significance his words had for living people. 'If 
you liked him, too, it would be a very good thing . . . for you to get 
married,' he added, rather more quickly. 

'Why talk of me?' she said calmly, and glanced at Natasha. Natasha, 
feeling her eyes on her, did not look at her. Again all of them were silent. 

'Andrey, would you . . .' Princess Marya said suddenly in a shaky 
voice, 'would you like to see Nikolushka? He is always talking of you.' 

For the first time Prince Andrey smiled a faintly perceptible smile, but 
Princess Marya, who knew his face so well, saw with horror that it was 
a smile not of joy, not of tenderness for his son, but of quiet, gentle irony 
at his sister's trying what she believed to be the last resource for rousing 
him to feeling. 

'Yes, I shall be very glad to see Nikolushka. Is he quite well?' 

When they brought in little Nikolushka, who gazed in dismay at his 
father, but did not cry, because nobody else was crying, Prince Andrey 
kissed him, and obviously did not know what to say to him. 

When Princess Marya left her brother's side, she fully understood all 



460 WAR AND PEACE 

that Natasha's face had told her. She spoke no more to Natasha of hope of 
saving his life. She took turns with her by his bedside. 

Prince Andrey did not only know that he would die, but felt indeed 
that he was dying; that he was already half-dead. He experienced a sense 
of aloofness from everything earthly, and a strange and joyous lightness. 

In the past he had dreaded the end. Twice he had experienced that ter- 
ribly agonising feeling of the dread of death. The first time he had ex- 
perienced that feeling when the grenade was rotating before him, and he 
looked at the stubble, at the bushes, at the sky, and knew that death was 
facing him. 

The last moral struggle between life and death had come upon him two 
days before Princess Marya's arrival. 

It happened in the evening. He was, as usually after dinner, in a slightly 
feverish condition, and he fell into a doze. He felt a sudden sense of hap- 
piness. 

'Ah, she has come in!' he thought. 

Natasha had, in fact, just come in with noiseless steps. 

Ever since she had been looking after him he had always felt this 
physical sense of her presence. She was in a low chair beside him, knitting 
a stocking, and sitting so as to screen the light of the candle from him. She 
had learned to knit since Prince Andrey had once said to her that no one 
made such a good sick-nurse as an old nurse who knitted stockings, and 
that there was something soothing about knitting. She made a slight move- 
ment; the ball rolled off her knee. She started, glanced round at him. 

'You are not asleep? ' 

'No; I have been looking at you for a long while. I felt when you came 
in. Natasha, I love you too much! More than everything in the world!' 

'And I?' She turned away for a second. 'Why too much?' she said. 

'Why too much? . . . Well, what do you think, what do you feel in 
your heart, am I going to live? What do you think?' 

'I am sure of it; sure of it!' Natasha almost cried out. 

'How good it would be!' And taking her hand, he kissed it. 

Natasha recollected at once that he must have quiet. 

'But you are not asleep. Try and sleep . . . please do/ 

She moved back to the candle, and sat down in the same position as be- 
fore. Twice she glanced round at him; his eyes were bright as she met them. 
She set herself a task on her stocking, and told herself she would not look 
round till she had finished it. 

He did, in fact, soon after shut his eyes and fall asleep. 

He dreamed that he was lying in the very room in which he was lying 
in reality, but that he was not ill, but quite well. Many people of various 
sorts, indifferent people of no importance, were present. He was talking 
and disputing with them about some trivial matter. They seemed to be 
preparing to set off somewhere. Prince Andrey had a dim feeling that all 
this was of no consequence, and that he had other matters of graver mo- 



WAR AND PEACE 461 

ment to think of, but still he went on uttering empty witticisms of some 
sort that surprised them. 

By degrees all these people began to disappear, and the one thing left 
was the question of closing the door. He got up and went towards the door 
to close it and bolt it. Everything depended on whether he were in time to 
shut it or not. He was going, he was hurrying, but his legs would not move, 
and he knew that he would not have time to shut the door, but still he was 
painfully straining every effort to do so. And an agonising terror came 
upon him. And that terror was the fear of death; behind the door stood 
It. But while he is helplessly and clumsily struggling towards the door, that 
something awful is already pressing against the other side of it, and forcing 
the door open. Something not human— death— is forcing the door open, and 
he must hold it to. He clutches at the door with a last straining effort— to 
shut it is impossible, at least to hold it— but his efforts are feeble and awk- 
ward; and, under the pressure of that awful thing, the door opens and shuts 
again. 

Once more It was pressing on the door from without. His last, super- 
natural efforts are vain, and both leaves of the door are noiselessly opened. 
It comes in, and it is death. And Prince Andrey died. 

But at the instant when in his dream he died, Prince Andrey recollected 
that he was asleep; and at the instant when he was dying, he made an effort 
and waked up. 

'Yes, that was death. I died and I waked up. Yes, death is an awakening,' 
flashed with sudden light into his soul, and the veil that had till then hidden 
the unknown was liftea before his spiritual vision. He felt, as it were, set 
free from some force that held him in bondage, and was aware of that 
strange lightness of being that had not left him since. 

When he waked up in a cold sweat and moved on the couch, Natasha 
went up and asked him what was the matter. He did not answer, and looked 
at her with strange eyes, not understanding her. 

That was the change that had come over him two days before Princess 
Marya's arrival. The doctor said that from that day the wasting fever had 
assumed a more serious aspect, but Natasha paid little heed to what the 
doctor said; she saw the terrible moral symptoms, that for her were far 
more convincing. With his awakening from sleep that day there began for 
Prince Andrey an awakening from life. 

His last days and hours passed in a simple and commonplace way. 
Princess Marya and Natasha both saw that he was slowly and quietly slip- 
ping further and further away from them, and both knew that this 
must be so, and that it was well. They did not weep nor shudder, and 
towards the last they both felt they were waiting not on him (he was no 
more; he had gone far away from them), but on the nearest memory of 
him— his body. 

When the body, deserted by the spirit, passed through its last struggles, 
Natasha hung over what was the nearest memory of him. 'Where has he 
gone? Where is he now? . . ' 



462 WAR AND PEACE 

When the body lay in the coffin every one cried. Nikolushka cried from 
the agonising bewilderment that was rending his heart. The countess and 
Sonya cried from pity for Natasha, and from grief that he was gone. The 
old count cried because he felt that he too must soon take the same terrible 
step. 

Natasha and Princess Marya wept too now. But they did not weep foi 
their personal sorrow; they wept from the emotion and awe that filled 
their souls before the simple and solemn mystery of death. 



PART XIII 



In historical events, where the actions of men form the subject of obser- 
vation, the most primitive conception of a cause was the will of the gods, 
succeeded later on by the will of those men who stand in the historical 
foreground— the heroes of history. But one had to look below the surface 
of any historical event, to look, that is, into the movement of the whole 
mass of men taking part in that event, to be convinced that the will of the 
hero of history, so far from controlling the actions of the multitude, is 
continually controlled by them. 

It may be thought that it is a matter of no importance whether historical 
events are interpreted in one way or in another. But betv/een the man who 
says that the peoples of the West marched into the East, because Napoleon 
willed they should do so, and the man who says that that movement came 
to pass because it was bound to come to pass, there exists the same difference 
as between the men who maintained that the earth was stationary and the 
planets revolved about it, and the men who said that they did not know 
what holds the earth in its place, but they did know that there were laws 
controlling its motions and the motions of the other planets. 

Causes of historical events— there are not and cannot be, save the one 
cause of all causes. But there are laws controlling these events; laws partly 
unknov/n, partly accessible to us. The discovery of these laws is only pos- 
sible when we entirely give up looking for a cause in the will of one man, 
just as the discovery of the laws of the motions of the planets has only be- 
come possible since men have given up the conception of the earth being 
stationary. 

A month spent by the French army in pillaging Moscow, and by the 
Russian army quietly encamped at Tarutino, brought about a change in 
the relative strength of the two armies, a change both in spirit and in num- 
bers, which was all to the advantage of the Russians. Although the position 
of the French army and its numbers were unknown to the Russians, as soon 
as their relative strength had changed, a great number of signs began to 
show that an attack would be inevitable. Among the causes that contributed 
to bring about this result were the reports that were conrinually coming 
in from all sides of the inactivity and lack of discipline in the French army, 
and the filling up of our regiments by recruits, and the fine weather, and 
the long rest enjoyed by the Russian soldiers, and the impatience to do 
the work for which they had been brought together, that always arises in 

46S 



464 WAR AND PEACE 

troops after repose, and curiosity to know what was going on in the 
French army, of which they had so long seen nothing, and the daring with 
which the Russian outposts dashed in among the French encamped at 
Tarutino, and the news of the easy victories gained by bands of peasants 
and free-lances over the French, and the envy aroused by them, and the 
desire of revenge, that every man cherished at heart so long as the French 
were in Moscow; and— stronger than all— the vague sense growing up in 
every soldier's heart that the relative strength of the armies had changed, 
and the preponderance was now on our side. The relative strength of the 
armies had really changed, and advance had become inevitable. 

On the 2nd of October, a Cossack, Shapovalov, out scouting, shot one 
hare and wounded a second. Shapovalov was led on in pursuit of the game 
far into the forest, and came across the left flank of Murat's army, which 
was encamped and quite off guard. The Cossack told his comrades with 
laughter the tale of how he had all but fallen into the hands of the French. 
The ensign, who heard the story, repeated it to his superior officer. The 
Cossack was sent for and questioned. The officers of the Cossacks wanted 
to take advantage of this to carry off some horses from the French, but 
one of them, who was intimate with some of the higher authorities in the 
army, mentioned the incident to a general on the staff. On the staff the 
position of late had been strained to the utmost. A few days previously, 
Yermolov had gone to Bennigsen and besought him to use his influence 
with the commander-in-chief to bring about an attack. 

The news brought by the Cossack, confirmed by scouts, proved con- 
clusively that the time was ripe. The strained string broke, and the wheels 
of the clock whirred, and the chimes began to strike. In spite of all hi? 
supposed power, his intellect, his experience, and his knowledge of men, 
Kutuzov could hold back the inevitable moment no longer, and gave or- 
ders for what he regarded as useless and mischievous— gave his assent, in 
fact, to the accomplished fact. 

It was arranged to advance to attack on the 5th of October. 

On the morning of the 4th, Kutuzov signed the disposition of the forces. 

Toll read it to Yermolov, proposing that he should superintend the fur- 
ther instructions for carrying it out. 

'Very good, very good, I haven't time just now,' said Yermolov, and he 
hurried out of the cottage. 

The arrangement of the troops as drawn up by Toll was an excellent 
one. The disposition had been written out, as at Austerlitz, though not in 
German: 

'The First Column marches here and there, the Second Column occupies 
this place,' and so on. 

On paper all these columns were in their proper place at a fixed time and 
annihilated the enemy. Everything had been, as in all such cases, carefully 
thought of, and as in all such cases not a single column did reach its right 
place at the right time. 

When a sufficient number of copies of the disposition were ready, an 



WAR AND PEACE 465 

officer was summoned and sent off to give them to Yermolov, that he 
might see that instructions were given in accordance with them. A young 
officer of the Horse Guards, in waiting on Kutuzov, set off for Yermolov's 
quarters. 

'Not at home,' Yermolov's servant told him. The officer of the Horse 
Guards set off to the quarters of the general, with whom Yermolov was 
often to be found. 

'Not here, nor the general either,' he was told. 

The officer mounted his horse again and rode off to another general's. 

'No, not at home.' 

'If only I don't get into trouble for the delay! How annoying!' thought 
the officer. 

He rode all over the camp. One man told him he had seen Yermolov 
riding away in company with some other generals; another said he was 
sure to be home again by now. The officer was hunting him till six o'clock 
in the evening without stopping for dinner. Yermolov was nowhere to be 
found, and no one knew where he was; but there was a ball at General 
Kikin's. 

'But where is that?' 

'That way,' said an officer of the Cossacks. 

'Out there! beyond our lines!' 

'Two regiments of our fellows have been sent out to the outposts, and 
there is a spree going on there now, fine doings! Two bands, three choruses 
of singers.' 

The officer rode out beyond our lines. While yet a long way off, he heard 
the gay sounds of a soldier's dance tune sung in chorus. 

It was by now nearly nine o'clock. He dismounted and walked up to the 
entrance of a big manor-house that had been left uninjured between the 
French and the Russian lines. Footmen were bustling about with wines 
and edibles in the vestibule and the buffet. Choruses were standing under 
the windows. The officer was led up to a door, and he saw all at once all 
the most important generals in the army, among them the big, impressive 
figure of Yermolov. All the generals were standing in a semicircle, laugh- 
ing loudly, their uniforms unbuttoned, and their faces flushed and ani- 
mated. In the middle of the room a handsome, short general with a red 
face was smartly and jauntily executing the steps of the trepak. 

'Ha, ha, ha! Bravo, Nikolay Ivanovitch! ha, ha! . . .' 

The officer felt doubly guilty in breaking in at such a moment with im- 
portant business, and he would have waited; but one of the generals caught 
sight of him, and hearing what he had come for, told Yermolov. The latter, 
with a frowning face, came out to the officer, and hearing his story, took 
the papers from him without a word. 

'Do you suppose it was by chance that he was not at home?' said a com- 
rade of the officer's who was on the staff, speaking of Yermolov that 
evening. 'That's all stuff and nonsense; it was all done on purpose. You see, 
there'll be a pretty kettle of fish to-morrow!' 



466 WAR AND PEACE 

The decrepit old man, Kutuzov, had bade them wake him early next 
day, and he said his prayers, dressed, and with a disagreeable consciousness 
that he had to command in a battle of which he did not approve, he got 
into his carriage and drove to the place where the attacking columns were 
to be gathered together. As he approached Tarutino, Kutuzov noticed 
cavalry soldiers leading their horses to a watercourse across the road along 
which he was riding. Kutuzov looked at them, stopped his carriage, and 
asked what regiment did they belong to. They belonged to a column which 
was to have been far away in front in ambush. 

'A mistake, perhaps,' thought the old commander-in-chief. But as he 
drove on further, Kutuzov saw infantry regiments with their arms stacked, 
and soldiers in their drawers busy cooking porridge and fetching wood. 
He sent for their officer. The officer submitted that no command to ad- 
vance had been given. 

'No command . . .' Kutuzov began, but he checked himself at once, and 
ordered the senior officer to be summoned to him. Getting out of the car- 
riage, with drooping head he walked to and fro in silence, breathing 
heavily. When the general staff officer arrived, Kutuzov turned purple with 
rage, not because that officer was to blame for the mistake, but because he 
was an object of sufficient importance for him to vent his wrath on. 

'What will the blackguards do next? Shoot them! The scoundrels!' he 
shouted hoarsely, shaking his fist and staggering. He was in a state of actual 
physical suffering. He, his highness the commander-in-chief, who was as- 
sured by every one that no one in Russia had ever had such power as he, 
he put into this position— made the laughing-stock to the whole army. 
'Worrying myself, praying over to-day, not sleeping all night, and think- 
ing about everything— all for nothing!' he thought. 

His wrath once spent, Kutuzov, blinking feebly, listened to explanations 
and self -justifications and to the earnest representation that the battle that 
had not come off should take place on the following day. And again 
Kutuzov had to acquiesce. 

Next day the troops were massed in their appointed places by the eve- 
ning, and were moving forward in the night. It was an autumn night with 
a sky overcast by purplish-black clouds, but free from rain. The earth 
was damp, but not muddy, and the troops advanced noiselessly, except for a 
hardly audible jingling now and then from the artillery. They were for- 
bidden to talk aloud, to smoke or to strike a light; the horses were kept 
from neighing. The secrecy of the enterprise increased its attractiveness. 
The men marched on gaily. Several columns halted, stacked their guns in 
piles, and lay down on the chilly ground, supposing they had reached 
their destination. Other columns (the majority) marched all night long, 
and arrived somewhere, unmistakably not where they were meant to be. 

Count Orlov-Denisov with his Cossacks (the detachment of least im- 
portance of the lot) was the only one that reached the right place at the 
right time. This detachment halted at the extreme edge of a forest, on a 
path from the village of Stromilovo to Dmitrovskoe. 



WAR AND PEACE 467 

Before dawn Count Orlov, who had fallen asleep, was waked up. A de- 
serter from the French camp was brought to him. A Polish underofficer 
explained that he had deserted because he had been insulted in the service; 
because he ought long ago to have been an officer, and was braver than 
any of them, and so he wanted to punish them. He said that Murat was 
camping for the night a verst from them, and that if they would give him 
a convoy of a hundred men he would take him alive. The proposition was 
too alluring to be refused. 

'Now, remember,' said Count Orlov-Denisov to the Polish deserter, 'if 
you have been lying, I will have you shot like a dog, but if it's true, a 
hundred crowns.' 

The deserter made no reply to these words, mounted his horse and with 
men hurriedly gathered together disappeared into the wood. Count Orlov, 
shivering from the freshness of the dawning morning, began scrutinising the 
enemy's camp, faintly visible now in the deceptive light of the approaching 
dawn. Count Orlov-Denisov fancied that they were beginning to move in 
the French camp. 

'Oh, of course it's too late,' said Count Orlov. As so often happens when 
the man in whom we are putting faith is no longer before our eyes, it all 
seemed at once perfectly clear and obvious to him that the deserter had 
been playing them false, that he had been telling them lies, and was only 
spoiling the whole attack by removing these two regiments, which he was 
leading away— God only knew where! As if it were possible to capture the 
general out of such a mass of troops. 

'No doubt he was lying, the scoundrel,' said the Count. 

'We can turn them back,' said one of the suite. 

'Ah! Yes . . . what do you think, or shall we leave them? Or not?' 

'Do you command them to return?' 

'To return, yes, to return!' Count Orlov said, with sudden decision, look- 
ing at his watch; 'it will be too late; it's quite light.' 

And an adjutant galloped into the wood. Count Orlov-Denisov, excited 
by giving up this enterprise, and by vainly waiting for the infantry 
columns, which still did not appear, and by the enemy's being so near 
(every man in his detachment was feeling the same), resolved to attack. 

In a whisper he gave the command: 'Mount!' 

The men got into their places, crossed themselves . . . 'In God's name, 
off!' 

'Hurrah!' rang out in the wood, and the Cossacks, with spears lowered, 
flew gaily, one hundred after another, across the stream into the camp, as 
though they were being shot out of a sack. 

One desperate, frightened scream from the first Frenchman who caught 
sight of the Cossacks, and every creature in the camp, undressed and half- 
asleep, was running away, abandoning cannons, muskets, and horses. 

If the Cossacks had pursued the French without regard to what they left 
all around and behind them, they could have captured Murat and all there 
was there. Their commanding officers tried to make them do so. But 



468 WAR AND PEACE 

there was no making the Cossacks budge when they had got booty and 
prisoners. No one heeded the word of command. They had taken fifteen 
hundred prisoners, thirty-eight cannons, flags, and, what was of most 
consequence in the eyes of the Cossacks, horses, saddles, coverings, and 
various other objects. All of this they wanted to see after, to secure the 
prisoners and the cannons, to divide the booty, to shout at and even fight 
with one another over the spoils; and all this absorbed the Cossacks' at- 
tention. The Frenchmen, finding themselves not pursued further, began to 
rally; they formed into companies and began firing. 

Meanwhile, in accordance with the disposition the infantry regiments 
of the belated columns had started off in due course, and had, in the 
usual way, arrived somewhere, but not where they were intended to arrive. 
In the usual way too, the soldiers who had set off gaily, began to halt; 
there were murmurs of dissatisfaction and a sense of muddle, and they 
were marched back to some point. 

Adjutants and generals galloped to and fro, shouting angrily, quarrelling, 
declaring they had come utterly wrong and were too late, upbraiding 
some one, and so on; and finally, all washed their hands of the business in 
despair, and marched on simply in order to get somewhere. 'We must ar- 
rive somewhere sooner or later!' And so they did, in fact, arrive some- 
where, but not where they were wanted. And some did even reach their 
destination, but reached it so late that their doing so was of no use at all, 
and only resulted in their being fired at for nothing. Disappointed and ex- 
cited at the failure, and supposing some one must be to blame for it, Toll 
galloped up to the general in command of the corps, and began sternly 
reprimanding him, declaring that he deserved to be shot. Bagovut, a sturdy 
old general of placid disposition, had been worried too by all the delays, 
and muddles, and the contradictory orders, and, to the amazement of 
everybody, he flew into a violent rage, quite out of keeping with his 
character. 

'I am not going to be taught my duty by anybody, but I can face death 
with my men as well as any one,' he said, and he marched with one division 
straight forward into the enemy's fire. Danger, shells, and bullets were just 
what he wanted in his fury. One of the first bullets killed him, the other 
bullets killed many of his men. And his division remained for some time 
under fire for no object whatever. 

Meanwhile another column was to have fallen upon the French in the 
centre, but of this column Kutuzov was in command. He knew very well 
that nothing but muddle would come of this battle, begun against his will, 
and, as far as it was in his power, he held his forces back. He did not move. 

The whole battle was confined to what had been done by the Cossacks 
of Orlov-Denisov; the rest of the troops simply lost a few hundreds of men 
for nothing. 

In consequence of this battle, Kutuzov received a diamond decoration; the 
other generals, too, received agreeable recognition according to their rank, 
and more changes were made on the staff. 



WAR AND PEACE 469 

'That's how things are always done among us, everything topsy- 
turvy!' the Russian officers and generals said after the battle of Tarutino; 
just as they say it nowadays. 

Napoleon enters Moscow after the brilliant victory de la Moskoiva: there 
can be no doubt of the victory, since the French are left in possession of 
the field of battle. The Russians retreat and leave Moscow— well stocked 
with provisions, arms, implements, and countless riches— in the hands of 
Napoleon. The Russian army, of one-half the strength of the French, 
during the course of a whole month makes no effort to attack. Napoleon's 
position is most brilliant. One would have supposed that no great genius 
was needed with an army of double the strength to fall upon the Russian 
forces and destroy them, to negotiate an advantageous peace; or, in case of 
negotiations being refused, to make a menacing march upon Petersburg, or 
even, in case of failure in this, to return to Smolensk or to Vilna, or to 
remain in Moscow, to retain, in short, the brilliant position in which the 
French army now found themselves. To do all this it was only necessary 
to take the simplest and easiest measures: to keep the soldiers from pillage, 
to prepare winter clothes (of which there was a supply in Moscow amply 
sufficient for the whole army), and regularly to collect the provisions, of 
which the supply in Moscow was, on the showing of the French his- 
torians, sufficient to feed the whole army for six months. Napoleon, the 
greatest of all military geniuses, with absolute power, as historians assert, 
over the army, did nothing of all this. 

Far from doing anything of the sort, he used his power to select out of 
all the various courses open to him the stupidest and most pernicious of 
all. Of all the different things Napoleon might have done-spending the 
winter in Moscow, going to Petersburg, going to Nizhni-Novgorod, going 
back a little more to the north or to the south, by the road Kutuzov after- 
wards took-no course one can imagine could have been more ruinous for 
his army (as the sequel proved) than the one Napoleon actually did adopt; 
that is, the course of staying in Moscow till October, letting the troops 
plunder the town, then in hesitation leaving a garrison behind, marching 
out of Moscow, going to meet Kutuzov and not giving battle, turning to the 
right and going as far as Maley Yaroslavets, again refusing to risk a battle, 
and finally retreating, not by the road Kutuzov had taken, but by Mozhaisk 
and the Smolensk route through devastated country. 

Let the most skilful tacticians, supposing that Napoleon's object was the 
destruction of his army, try and devise a series of actions which could, 
apart from any measures that might be taken by the Russian forces, have 
ensured with such certainty the complete destruction of the whole French 
army as the course taken by Napoleon. This the genius Na] oleon did. But 
to say that Napoleon ruined his army because he wanted to do so, or be- 
cause he was very stupid, would be just as unjust as to say that Napoleon 
got his troops to Moscow because he wanted to, and because he was very 
clever and a great genius. 



470 WAR AND PEACE 

In both cases his personal activity, having no more force than the per- 
sonal activity of every soldier, was merely coincidental with the laws by 
which the event was determined. 

Quite falsely (and simply because the sequel did not justify Napoleon's 
actions) do historians represent Napoleon's faculties as flagging at Mos- 
cow. Just as before, and afterwards in the year 1813, he used all his 
powers and faculties to do the best for himself and his army, Napoleon's 
activity at this time was no less marvellous than in Egypt, in Italy, in 
Austria, and in Prussia. We do not know with any certainty how real was 
the genius of Napoleon in Egypt, where forty centuries looked down upon 
his greatness, because all his great exploits there are recounted to us by 
none but Frenchmen. We cannot judge with certainty of his genius in 
Austria and Prussia, as the accounts of his doings there must be drawn 
from French and German sources. And the unaccountable surrender of 
corps of soldiers without a battle, and of fortresses without a siege, must 
dispose Germans to postulate Napoleon's genius as the unique explanation 
of the war as it was waged in Germany. But we have, thank God, no need 
to plead his genius to cloak our shame. We have paid for the right to 
look facts simply and squarely in the face, and that right we will not give 

U P' . . . . 

His activity in Moscow was as marvellous and as full of genius as any- 
where else. Command upon command and plan upon plan was continually 
being issued by him from the time he entered Moscow to the time he left 
it. The absence of the citizens and of a deputation, and even the burning of 
Moscow, did not daunt him. He did not lose sight of the welfare of his 
army, nor of the doings of the enemy, nor of the welfare of the people of 
Russia, nor the conduct of affairs at Paris, nor of diplomatic negotiations 
as to the terms, of peace. 

On the military side, immediately on entering Moscow, Napoleon gives 
General Sebastaini strict orders to keep a watch on the movements of the 
Russian army, sends detachments along the various roads, and charges 
Murat to find Kutuzov. Then he gives careful instructions for the forti- 
fication of the Kremlin; then he makes a plan of the coming campaign over 
the whole map of Russia; that was a work of genius, indeed. 

On the diplomatic side, Napoleon summons to his presence Captain 
Yakovlev, who had been robbed and reduced to rags and did not know how 
to get out of Moscow, expounds to him minutely his whole policy and his 
magnanimity; and after writing a letter to the Emperor Alexander, in which 
he considers it his duty to inform his friend and brother that Rastoptchin 
had performed his duties very badly in Moscow, he despatches Yakovlev 
with it to Petersburg. 

Expounding his views and his magnanimity with equal minuteness to 
Tutolmin, he despatches that old man too to Petersburg to open negotia- 
tions. 

On the judicial side, orders were issued, immediately after the fires 



WAR AND PEACE 471 

broke out, for the guilty persons to be found and executed. And the mis- 
creant Rastoptchin was punished by the order to set fire to his houses. 

On the administrative side, Moscow was presented with a constitution. A 
municipal council was instituted, and the following proclamation was is- 
sued:— 

'Citizens of Moscow! 

'Your misfortunes have been cruel, but his Majesty the Emperor and 
King wishes to put an end to them. Terrible examples have shown you 
how he punishes crime and breach of discipline. Stern measures have been 
taken to put an end to disorder and to restore public security. A paternal 
council, chosen from among yourselves, will compose your municipality 
or town council. It will care for you, for your needs and your interests. The 
members of it will be distinguished by a red ribbon, which they will wear 
across the shoulder, and the mayor will wear a white sash over it. But 
except when discharging their duties, they will wear only a red ribbon 
round the left arm. 

'The city police are established on their former footing, and they are 
already restoring order. The government has appointed two general com- 
missioners, or superintendents of police, and twenty commissioners, or 
police inspectors, stationed in the different quarters of the town. You will 
recognise them by the white ribbon they will wear round the left arm. Sev- 
eral churches of various denominations have been opened, and divine 
service is performed in them without hindrance. Your fellow-citizens are 
returning every day to their dwellings, and orders have been given that they 
should find in them the aid and protection due to misfortune. These are 
the measures which the government has adopted to restore order and 
alleviate your position; but to attain that end, it is necessary that you 
should unite your efforts with them; should forget, if possible, the misfor- 
tunes you have suffered; should look hopefully at a fate that is not so cruel; 
should believe that a shameful death inevitably awaits those guilty of 
violence against your persons or your deserted property, and consequently 
leaves no doubt that they will be preserved, since such is the will of the 
greatest and most just of monarchs. Soldiers and citizens of whatever na- 
tion you may be! Restore public confidence, the source of the prosperity of 
a state; live like brothers, give mutual aid and protection to one another; 
unite in confounding the projects of the evil-minded; obey the civil and 
military authorities, and your tears will soon cease to flow.' 

On the commissariat side, Napoleon issued orders for all the troops to 
enter Moscow in turn, a la maraude, to gather supplies for themselves; so 
that in that way the army was provided with supplies tor the future. 

On the religious side, Napoleon ordered the priests to be brought back, 
and services to be performed again in the churches. 



472 WAR AND PEACE 

With a view to encouraging commerce and providing supplies for the 
troops, the following notice was placarded everywhere: — 

'Proclamation. 

'You, peaceable inhabitants of Moscow, artisans, and working men, who 
have been driven out of the city by the disturbance, and you, scattered 
tillers of the soil, who are still kept in the fields by groundless terror, hear! 
Tranquillity is returning to this capital, and order is being restored in it. 
Your fellow-countrymen are coming boldly out of their hiding-places, 
seeing that they are treated with respect. Every act of violence against 
them or their property is promptly punished. His Majesty the Emperor 
and King protects them, and he reckons none among you his enemies but 
such as disobey his commands. He wishes to put an end to your trouble, and 
to bring you back to your homes and your families. Co-operate with his 
beneficent designs and come to us without apprehension. Citizens! Return 
with confidence to your habitations; you will soon find the means of satis- 
fying your needs! Artisans and industrious handicraftsmen! Return to your 
employment; houses, shops, and guards to protect them are awaiting you, 
and you will receive the payment due to you for your toil! And you, too, 
peasants, come out of the forests where you have been hiding in terror, 
return without fear to your huts in secure reliance on finding protection. 
Markets have been established in the city, where peasants can bring their 
spare stores and country produce. The government has taken the following 
measures to secure freedom of sale for them: (i) From this day forward, 
peasants, husbandmen, and inhabitants of the environs of Moscow can, 
without any danger, bring their goods of any kind to two appointed 
markets— namely, the Mohovaya and the Ohotny Ryad. (2) Goods shall 
be bought from them at such a price as seller and buyer shall agree upon 
together; but if the seller cannot get what he asks for as a fair price, he 
will be at liberty to take his goods back to his village, and no one can 
hinder his doing so on any pretext whatever. (3) Every Sunday and 
Wednesday are fixed for weekly market days: to that end a sufficient 
number of troops will be stationed on Tuesdays and Saturdays along all 
the high-roads at such a distance from the town as to protect the carts com- 
ing in. (4) Similar measures will be taken that the peasants w T ith their carts 
and horses may meet with no hindrance on their homeward way. (5) 
Steps will be immediately taken to re-establish the ordinary shops. 

'Inhabitants of the city and of the country, and you w T orkmen and 
handicraftsmen of whatever nationality you may be! You are called upon 
to carry out the paternal designs of his Majesty the Emperor and King, 
and to co-operate with him for the public welfare. Lay your respect and 
confidence at his feet, and do not delav to unite with us!' 

With a view to keeping up the spirits of the troops and the people, re- 
views were continually being held, and rewards were distributed. 



WAR AND PEACE 473 

The Emperor rode about the streets and entertained the inhabitants; and 
in spite of his preoccupation with affairs of state, visited in person the 
theatre set up by his orders. 

As regards philanthropy, too— the fairest jewel in the conqueror's crown 
—Napoleon did everything that lay within him. On the benevolent institu- 
tions he ordered the inscription to be put up, l Maison de ma mere? 
thereby combining a touching filial sentiment with a monarch's grandeur 
of virtue. He visited the Foundling Home. Then, he ordered his soldiers' 
pay to be distributed among them in the false Russian notes he had 
counterfeited:— 

'Reinforcing the use of these methods by an act worthy of him and of 
the French army, he had assistance distributed to those who had suffered 
loss from the fire. But as provisions were too precious to be given to 
strangers, mostly enemies, Napoleon preferred to furnish them with money 
for them to provide themselves from without, and ordered paper roubles 
to be distributed among them.' 

With a view to maintaining discipline in the army, orders were con- 
tinually being issued for severely punishing nonfulfllment of military duty 
and for putting an end to pillaging. 

But, strange to say, all these arrangements, these efforts and plans, which 
were no whit inferior to those that had been made on similar occasions 
before, never touched the root of the matter; like the hands on the face of a 
clock, when detached from the mechanism, they turned aimlessly and 
arbitrarily, without catching the wheels. 

The plan of campaign, that work of genius, never was and never could 
be put into execution, because it had nothing in common with the actual 
facts of the position. The fortification of the Kremlin, for which it was 
necessary to pull down la Mosquee (as Napoleon called the church of 
Vassily the Blessed) turned out to be perfectly useless. The pursuit of the 
Russian army, on which Napoleon laid so much stress, led to an unheard-of 
result: the French generals lost sight of the sixty thousand men of the 
Russian army. 

On the diplomatic side, all Napoleon's expositions of his magnanimity 
and justice turned out to be fruitless. Alexander would not receive these 
envoys, and made no reply to the message they brought. 

On the side of law, of order, after the execution of the supposed incen- 
diaries, the other half of Moscow was burned down. 

The establishment of a municipal council did not check pillage, and 
was no benefit to any one but the few persons, who were members of it, 
and were able on the pretext of preserving order iu plunder Moscow on 
their own account, or to save their own property from being plundered. 

On the religious side, the difficulty had so easily been settled by Na- 
poleon's visit to a mosque in Egypt, but here similar measures led to no 
results whatever. Two or three priests, picked up in Moscow, did attempt 
to carry out Napoleon's desire; but one of them was shipped in the face 
by a French soldier during the service, and in regard to the other, the 



474 WAR AND PEACE 

following report was made by a French official: 'The priest, whom I had 
discovered and invited to resume saying the Mass, cleaned and closed the 
church. In the night they came again to break in the doors, break the pad- 
locks, tear the books, and commit other disorders.' 

As for the encouragement of commerce, the proclamation to 'industrious 
artisans and peasants,' met with no response at all. Industrious artisans there 
were none in Moscow, and the peasants set upon the messengers who ven- 
tured too far from the town with this proclamation and killed them. 

The attempts to entertain the people and the troops with theatres were 
equally unsuccessful. The theatres set up in the Kremlin and Poznyakov's 
house were closed again immediately, because the actors and actresses 
were stripped of their belongings by the soldiers. 

Even philanthropy did not bring the desired results. Moscow was full 
of paper money, genuine and counterfeit, and the notes had no value. 
The French, accumulating booty, cared for nothing but gold. The coun- 
terfeit notes, which Napoleon so generously bestoyed on the unfortunate, 
were of no value, and even silver fell below its standard value in relation 
to gold. 

But the most striking example of the ineffectiveness of all efforts made by 
the authorities was Napoleon's vain endeavour to check plunder, and to 
maintain discipline. 

Here are reports sent in by the military authorities: 

'Nothing new, but that the soldiers give themselves up to robbery and 
plunder. October 9th. 

'The Emperor is exceedingly displeased that, in spite of the strict orders 
to stop pillage, bands of marauders from the guards are continually return- 
ing to the Kremlin. In the Old Guards, the disorder and pillaging have been 
more violent than ever last night and to-day. The Emperor sees, with re- 
gret, that the picked soldiers, appointed to guard his person, who should 
set an example to the rest, are losing discipline to such a degree as to break 
into the cellars and stores prepared for the army.' 

The army, like a herd of cattle run wild, and trampling underfoot the 
fodder that might have saved them from starvation, was falling to pieces, 
and getting nearer to its ruin with every day it remained in Moscow. 

But it did not move. 

It only started running when it was seized by panic fear at the capture 
of a transport on the Smolensk road and the battle of Tarutino. The news 
of the battle of Tarutino reached Napoleon unexpectedly in the middle 
of a review, and aroused in him— so Thiers tells us— a desire to punish the 
Russians, and he gave the order for departure that all the army was 
clamouring for. 

In their flight from Moscow, the soldiers carried with them all the 
plunder they had collected. Napoleon, too, carried off his own private 
tresor. Seeing the great train of waggons, loaded with the booty of the 
army, Napoleon did not order all unnecessary waggons of goods to be 
burnt, as he had done with a marshal's baggage on the way to Moscow. 



WAR AND PEACE 475 

He gazed at those carts and carriages, filled with soldiers, and said that it 
was very well, that those conveyances would come in useful for provisions, 
the sick, and the wounded. 

The plight of the army was like the plight of a wounded beast, that 
feels its death at hand, and knows not what it is doing. Studying the intri- 
cate manoeuvres and schemes of Napoleon and his army from the time of 
entering Moscow up to the time of the destruction of that army is much 
like watching the death struggles and convulsions of a beast. Very often 
the wounded creature rushes to meet the hunter's shot, runs forward and 
back again, and itself hastens its end. Napoleon under the pressure of his 
army did likewise. Panic-stricken at the rumour of the battle of Tarutino, 
like a wild beast, the army made a rush towards the shot, reached the 
hunter, and ran back again; and at last, like every wild creature took the 
old familiar track that was the worst and most disastrous way for it. 

Napoleon is represented to us as the leader in all this movement just 
as the figurehead in the prow of a ship to the savage seems the force that 
guides the ship on its course. Napoleon in his activity all this time was 
like a child, sitting in a carriage, pulling the straps within it, and fancying 
he is moving it along. 

Early in the morning of the 6th of October, Pierre came out of the shed, 
and when he went back, he stood in the doorway, playing with the long 
bandy-legged, purplish-grey dog that jumped about him. This dog lived 
in their shed, sleeping with Karataev, though it sometimes went of! on its 
own account into the town, and came back again. It had probably never 
belonged to any one, and now it had no master, and no name. The French 
called it Azor; the soldier who told stories called it Femgalka; Karataev 
called it 'Grey-coat,' and sometimes 'Floppy.' The lack of a master, of a 
name, of any particular breed, and even of a definite colour, by no means 
troubled the purplish-grey dog. Its fluffy tail stood up firm and round like 
a plume. 

Pierre's attire now consisted of a dirty, tattered shirt, the sole relic left 
of his previous wardrobe, a pair of soldier's drawers, tied with string 
round the ankles by Karataev's advice, for the sake of warmth, a full 
peasant's coat and a peasant's cap. Physically Pierre had changed greatly 
during this period. He no longer seemed stout, though he still had that 
look of solidity and strength that was characteristic of the Bezuhov family. 
The lower part of his face was overgrown with beard and moustaches; his 
long, tangled hair, swarming with lice, formed a mat of curls on his head. 
His eyes had a look of firmness, calm, and aleri readiness, such as had 
never been seen in Pierre's face before. All his old slackness, which had 
shown even in his eyes, was replaced now by a vigorous, alert look of 
readiness for action and for resistance. His feet were bare. 

Pierre looked over the meadow, across which waggons and men on horse- 
back were moving that morning, then far away beyond the river, then at 
the dog, who was pretending to be meaning to bite him in earnest, then 



476 WAR AND PEACE 

at his bare feet, which he shifted with pleasure from one position to an- 
other, moving the dirty, thick, big toes. And every time he looked at his 
bare feet, a smile of eager self-satisfaction flitted across his face. The sight of 
those bare feet reminded him of all he had passed through and learned 
during this time; and the thought of that was sweet to him. 

The weather had for several days been still and clear, with light frosts 
in the mornings— the so-called 'old granny's summer.' 

It was warm out of doors in the sunshine, and that warmth was par- 
ticularly pleasant, with the bracing freshness of the morning frost still in 
the air. 

Over everything, over all objects near and far, lay that magical, crystal- 
clear brightness, which is only seen at that time in the autumn. In the 
distance could be seen the Sparrow Hills, with the village, the church, and 
the great white house. And the leafless trees, and the sand and the stones 
and roofs of the houses, the green spire of the church, and the angles of the 
white house in the distance, all stood out in the most delicate outlines with 
unnatural distinctness in the limpid air. Close at hand stood the familiar 
ruins of a half -burnt mansion, occupied by French soldiers, with lilac bushes 
still dark-green by the fence. And even this charred and ruined house, 
which looked revoltingly hideous in bad weather, had a sort of soothing 
comeliness in the clear, still brightness. 

A French corporal, in a smoking-cap, with his coat comfortably un- 
buttoned, came round the corner of the shed, with a short pipe between 
his teeth, and with a friendly wink, approached Pierre. 

'What sunshine, hein, M. Kiril?' (This was what all the French soldiers 
called Pierre.) 'One would say it was spring.' And the corporal leaned 
against the door, and offered Pierre his pipe, though he was always offer- 
ing it, and Pierre always declined it. 

'If one were marching in weather like this,' he began. 

Pierre questioned him what he had heard of the departure of the French, 
and the corporal told him that almost all the troops were setting out, and 
that to-day instructions were expected in regard to the prisoners. In the 
shed in which Pierre was, one of the Russian soldiers, Sokolov, was dan- 
gerously ill, and Pierre told the corporal that something ought to be done 
about this soldier. The corporal said that Pierre might set his mind at rest, 
that they had both travelling and stationary hospitals for such cases, that 
instructions would be given in regard to the sick, and that in fact every 
possible contingency was provided for by the authorities. 

'And then, M. Kiril, you have only to say a word to the captain, you 
know. Oh, he is a man who never forgets anything. Speak to the captain 
when he makes his round; he will do anything for you.' 

The captain of whom the corporal spoke used often to have long con- 
versations with Pierre, and did him all kinds of favours. 

' "You see, St. Thomas," he said to me the other day, "Kiril is a man 
of education, who speaks French; he is a Russian lord who has had troubles, 
but he is a man. And he understands ... If he wants anything, let him 



WAR AND PEACE 477 

tell me, he shall not meet with a refusal. When one has studied, one likes 
education, you see, and well-bred people." It's for your own sake I tell 
you that, M. Kiril. In the affair that happened the other day, if it hadn't 
been for you, things would have ended badly.' 

(The corporal was alluding to a fight a few days before between the 
prisoners and the French soldiers, in which Pierre had succeeded in 
pacifying his companions.) After chatting a little time longer the corporal 
went away. 

Several of the prisoners had heard Pierre talking to the corporal, and 
they came up immediately to ask what the latter had said. While Pierre was 
telling his companions what the corporal had said about setting off from 
Moscow, a thin, sallow, ragged French soldier came up to the door of the 
shed. With a shy and rapid gesture he put his fingers to his forehead by 
way of a salute, and addressing Pierre, asked him if the soldier, Platoche, 
who was making a shirt for him, were in this shed. 

The French soldiers had been provided with linen and leather a week 
previously, and had given out the materials to the Russian prisoners to 
make them boots and shirts. 

'It's ready, darling, it's ready!' said Karataev, coming out with a care- 
fully folded shirt. On account of the heat and for greater convenience in 
working, Karataev was wearing nothing but a pair of drawers and a 
tattered shirt, as black as the earth. He had tied a wisp of bast round his 
hair, as workmen do, and his round face looked rounder and more pleas- 
ing than ever. 

'Punctuality is own brother to good business. I said Friday, and so I have 
done it,' said Platon, smiling and displaying the shirt he had made. 

The Frenchman looked about him uneasily, and as though overcoming 
some hesitation, rapidly slipped off his uniform and put on the shirt. Under 
his uniform he had no shirt, but a long, greasy, flowered silk waistcoat 
next his bare, yellow, thin body. The Frenchman was evidently afraid that 
the prisoners, who were looking at him, would laugh at him, and he made 
haste to put his head through the shirt. None of the prisoners said a word. 
'To be sure, it fits well,' Platon observed, pulling the shirt down. 

The Frenchman, after putting his head and arms through, looked down 
at the shirt, and examined the stitching without lifting his eyes. 

'Well, darling, this isn't a tailor's, you know, and I had no proper sew- 
ing materials, and there's a saying without the right tool you can't even kill 
a louse properly,' said Karataev, still admiring his own handiwork. 

'Very good, thanks; but you must have some stuff left . . .' said the 
Frenchman. 

'It will be more comfortable as it wears to your body,' said Karataev, 
still admiring his work. 'There, you'll be nice and comfortable. 1 

'Thanks, thanks, old fellow; but what is left . . . ?' repeated the 
Frenchman, giving Karataev a paper note. 'Give me the pieces that are 
over.' 

Pierre saw that Platon did not want to understand what the Frenchman 



478 WAR AND PEACE 

said, and he looked on without interfering. Karataev thanked him for the 
rouble and went on admiring his own work. The Frenchman persisted in 
asking for what was left, and asked Pierre to translate what he said. 

'What does he want with the pieces?' said Karataev. 'They would have 
made me capital leg wrappers. Oh well, God bless the man.' 

And, looking suddenly crestfallen and melancholy, Karataev took a bun- 
dle of remnants out of his bosom and gave it to the Frenchman without 
looking at him. 'Ach-ma!' he cried, and walked away. The Frenchman 
looked at the linen, he hesitated, glanced inquiringly at Pierre, and as 
though Pierre's eyes had told him something: 

'Here, Platoche!' he cried in a shrill voice, suddenly blushing. 'Keep 
them yourself,' he said, and giving him the remnants, he turned and went 
out. 

'There, look'ee now,' said Karataev, shaking his head. 'They say they're 
not Christians, but they have souls too. It's true what the old folks used to 
say: a sweating hand is an open hand, but a dry hand is closefisted. His 
own back's bare, and yet he has given me this.' Karataev paused for a 
while, smiling dreamily and gazing at the cuttings of linen. 'But first- 
rate leg binders they'll make me, my dear,' he added, as he went back into 
the shed. 

Four weeks had passed since Pierre had been taken prisoner. Although 
the French had offered to transfer him from the common prisoners' shed 
to the officers', he had remained in the same shed as at first. 

In Moscow, wasted by fire and pillage, Pierre passed through hardships 
almost up to the extreme limit of privation that a man can endure. But, 
owing to his vigorous health and constitution, of which he had hardly been 
aware till then; and still more, owing to the fact that these privations came 
upon him so gradually that it was impossible to say when they began, he 
was able to support his position, not only with ease, but with positive 
gladness. And it was just at this time that he attained that peace and con- 
tent with himself, for which he had always striven in vain before. 

For long years of his life he had been seeking in various directions for 
that peace, that harmony with himself, which had struck him so much in 
the soldiers at Borodino. He had sought for it in philanthropy, in free- 
masonry, in the dissipations of society, in wine, in heroic feats of self- 
sacrifice, in his romantic love for Natasha; he had sought it by the path of 
thought; and all his researches and all his efforts had failed him. And now 
without any thought of his own, he had gained that peace and that har- 
mony with himself simply through the horror of death, through hardships, 
through what he had seen in Karataev. 

Those fearful moments that he had lived through during the execution 
had, as it were, washed for ever from his imagination and his memory the 
disturbing ideas and feelings that had once seemed to him so important. 
No thought came to him of Russia, of the war, of politics, or of Napoleon. 
It seemed obvious to him that all that did not concern him, that he was not 
called upon and so was not able to judge of all that. 'Russia and summer 



WAR AND PEACE 479 

never do well together,' he repeated Karataev's words, and those words 
soothed him strangely. His project of killing Napoleon, and his calcula- 
tions of the cabalistic numbers, and of the beast of the Apocalypse struck 
him now as incomprehensible and positively ludicrous. His anger with his 
wife, and his dread of his name being disgraced by her, seemed to him 
trivial and amusing. What business of his was it, if that woman chose to 
lead somewhere away from him the life that suited her tastes? What did it 
matter to any one— least of all to him— whether they found out or not that 
their prisoner's name was Count Bezuhov? 

He often thought now of his conversation with Prince Andrey, and 
agreed fully with his friend, though he put a somewhat different con- 
struction on his meaning. Prince Andrey had said and thought that happi- 
ness is only negative, but he had said this with a shade of bitterness and 
irony. It was as though in saying this he had expressed another thought— 
that all the strivings towards positive happiness, that are innate in us, were 
only given us for our torment. But Pierre recognised the truth of the main 
idea with no such undercurrent of feeling. The absence of suffering, the 
satisfaction of needs, and following upon that, freedom in the choice of 
occupation, that is, of one's manner of life, seemed to Pierre the highest 
and most certain happiness of man. Only here and now for the first time 
in his life Pierre fully appreciated the enjoyment of eating when he was 
hungry, of drinking when he was thirsty, of sleep when he was sleepy, of 
warmth when he was cold, of talking to a fellow creature when he wanted 
to talk and to hear men's voices. The satisfaction of his needs— good food, 
cleanliness, freedom— seemed to Pierre now that he was deprived of them to 
be perfect happiness; and the choice of his occupation, that is, of his man- 
ner of life now that that choice was so limited, seemed to him such an easy 
matter that he forgot that a superfluity of the conveniences of life destroys 
all happiness in satisfying the physical needs, while a great freedom in 
the choice of occupation, that freedom which education, wealth, and po- 
sition in society had given him, makes the choice of occupations exceed- 
ingly difficult, and destroys the very desire and possibility of occupation. 

All Pierre's dreams now turned to the time when he would be free. And 
yet, in all his later life, Pierre thought and spoke with enthusiasm of that 
month of imprisonment, of those intense and joyful sensations that could 
never be recalled, and above all of that full, spiritual peace, of that perfect, 
inward freedom, of which he had only experience at that period. 

On the first day, when, getting up early in the morning, he came out of 
the shed into the dawn, and saw the cupolas and the crosses of the New 
Monastery of the Virgin, all still in darkness, saw the hoarfrost on the long 
grass, saw the slopes of the Sparrow Hills and the wood-clad banks of the 
encircling river vanishing into the purple distance, when h felt the contact 
of the fresh air and heard the sounds of the rooks flying out of .Moscow 
across the fields, and when flashes of light suddenly gleamed out of the 
east and the sun's rim floated triumphantly up from behind a cloud, and 
cupolas and crosses and hoarfrost and the horizon and the ri\er were all 



480 WAR AND PEACE 

sparkling in the glad light, Pierre felt a new feeling of joy and vigor in life 
such as he had never experienced before. 

And that feeling had not left him during the whole period of his im- 
prisonment, but on the contrary had gone on growing in him as the hard- 
ships of his position increased. 

That feeling— of being ready for anything, of moral alertness— was 
strengthened in Pierre by the high opinion in which he began to be held by 
his companions very soon after he entered the shed. His knowledge of 
languages, the respect shown him by the French, the good-nature with 
which he gave away anything he was asked for (he received the allowance 
of three roubles a week, given to officers among the prisoners), the strength 
he showed in driving nails into the wall, the gentleness of his behaviour 
to his companions, and his capacity— which seemed mysterious— of sitting 
stockstill doing nothing and plunged in thought, all made him seem to 
the soldiers a rather mysterious creature of a higher order. The very pe- 
culiarities that in the society he had previously lived in had been a source 
of embarrassment, if not of annoyance— his strength, his disdain for the 
comforts of life, his absent-mindedness, his good-nature— here among these 
men gave him the prestige almost of a hero. 

On the night of the 6th of October, the march of the retreating French 
army began: kitchens and shanties were broken up, waggons were packed, 
and troops and trains of baggage began moving. 

At seven o'clock in the morning an escort of French soldiers in marching 
order, in shakos, with guns, knapsacks, and huge sacks, stood before the 
sheds and a running fire of eager French talk, interspersed with oaths, 
was kept up all along the line. 

In the shed the prisoners were ready, only waiting for the word of com- 
mand to come out. Pierre was shod with a pair of slippers that Karataev 
had made for him out of the leather cover of a tea-chest, brought him by 
a Frenchman for soling his boots. 

The sick soldier, Sokolov, pale and thin, with blue rings round his eyes, 
sat alone in his place, without boots or out-of-door clothes on. His eyes, 
that looked prominent from the thinness of his face, gazed inquiringly at 
his companions, who took no notice of him, and he uttered low groans at 
regular intervals. It was evidently not so much his sufferings— he was ill with 
dysentery— as the dread and grief of being left alone that made him groan. 

'Come, Sokolov, they are not going away altogether, you know. They 
have a hospital here. Very likely you will be better off,' said Pierre. 

'O Lord! it will be the death of me! O Lord!' the soldier groaned. 

'Well, I will ask them again,' said Pierre. While Pierre was going to the 
door, the same corporal, who had on the previous day offered Pierre a 
pipe, came in from outside, accompanied by two soldiers. Both the corporal 
and the soldiers were in marching order, with knapsacks on and shakos, 
with straps buttoned, that changed their familiar faces. 

'Corporal, what is to be done with the sick man?' Pierre was begin- 
ning, but at the very moment that he spoke the words he doubted whether 



WAR AND PEACE 481 

it were the corporal he knew or some stranger— the corporal was so unlike 
himself at that moment. Moreover, at the moment Pierre was speaking, the 
roll of drums was suddenly heard on both sides. 

The corporal scowled at Pierre's words, and uttering a meaningless oath, 
he slammed the door. It was half-dark now in the shed; the drums beat a 
sharp tattoo on both sides, drowning the sick man's groans. 

'Here it is! ... Here it is again!' Pierre said to himself. In the changed 
face of the corporal, in the sound of his voice, in the stimulating and deafen- 
ing din of the drums, Pierre recognised that mysterious, unsympathetic 
force which drove men, against their will, to do their fellow-creatures to 
death; that force, the effect of which he had seen at the execution. 

When the doors of the shed were opened, and the prisoners, huddling 
against one another like a flock of sheep, crowded in the entry, Pierre 
pushed in front of them, and went up to the very captain who was, so 
the corporal had declared, ready to do anything for him. The captain was 
in marching trim, and from his face, too. there looked out the same 'it' 
Pierre had recognised in the corporal's words and in the roll of the drums. 

'Filez, filezP the captain was saying, frowning sternly, and looking at the 
prisoners crowding by him. 

Pierre knew his effort would be in vain, yet he went up to him. 

'Well, what is it?' said the officer, scanning him coldly, as though he did 
not recognise him. Pierre spoke of the sick prisoner. 

'He can walk, damn him!' said the captain. 

'Filez, filezP he went on, without looking at Pierre. 

'Well, no, he is in agony . . . !' Pierre was beginning. 

'Voulez-vous bien?'' . . . shouted the captain, scowling malignantly. 

'Dram-da-da-dam, dam-dam,' rattled the drums, and Pierre knew that the 
mysterious force had already complete possession of those men, and that 
to say anything more now was useless. 

The officers among the prisoners were separated from the soldiers and 
ordered to march in front. 

The officers, among whom was Pierre, were thirty in number; the sol- 
diers three hundred. 

These officers, who had come out of other sheds, were all strangers to 
Pierre, and much better dressed than he was. They looked at him in his 
queer foot-gear with aloof and mistrustful eyes. 

Not far from Pierre walked a stout major, with a fat, sallow, irascible 
countenance. This major, panting and puffing, grumbled angrily at every 
one for pushing against him and for hurrying when there was no need 
of hurry. Another, a thin little officer, addressed remarks to every one, 
making conjectures where they were being taken now, and how far they 
would go that day. 

An official in felt high boots and a commissariat uniform ran from side 
to side to get a good view of the results of the fire in Moscow, making 
loud observations on what was burnt, and saying what this or that district 
of the town was as it came into view. A third officer, of Polish extraction 



482 WAR AND PEACE 

by his accent, was arguing with the commissariat official, trying to prove 
to him that he was mistaken in his identification of the various quarters 
of Moscow. 

'Why dispute?' said the major angrily. 'Whether it's St. Nikola or St. 
Vlas, it's no matter. You see that it's all burnt, and that's all about it. . . . 
Why are you pushing, isn't the road wide enough?' he said, angrily ad- 
dressing a man who had passed behind him and had not pushed against 
him at all. 

'Aie, aie, aie, what have they been doing?' the voices of the prisoners 
could be heard crying on one side and on another as they looked at the 
burnt districts. . . . 'Look, there's not half left.' 

'Well, you know it is burnt, well, why argue about it?' said the major. 

The prisoners found themselves in the middle of a huge train of artillery, 
moving with difficulty, and mixed up with private baggage-waggons. 

At the bridge itself the whole mass halted, waiting for the foremost 
to get across. From the bridge the prisoners got a view of endless trains 
of baggage-waggons in front and behind. 

After crossing the Crimean Ford, the prisoners moved a few steps at 
a time and then halted, and again moved forward, and the crowd of 
vehicles and people grew greater and greater. On all sides there was an 
unceasing sound, like the roar of the sea, of rumbling wheels, and tramping 
troops, and incessant shouts of anger and loud abuse. Pierre stood squeezed 
against the wall of a charred house; several of the Russian officers clam- 
bered up on to the wall to get a better view. 

'The crowds! What crowds! . . . They have even loaded goods on the 
cannons! Look at the furs! . . .' they kept saying. 'I say, the vermin, they 
have been pillaging. . . . Look at what that one has got behind, on the cart. 
. . . Why, they are holy pictures, by God! . . . Those must be Germans. 
Heavens! . . . They have started fighting! . . . That's right; hit him in 
the face! We shan't get by before evening like this. Look, look! . . . Why, 
that must surely be Napoleon himself. Do you see the horses! with the 
monograms and a crown! He has dropped his sack, and doesn't see it. 
Fighting again. ... A woman with a baby, and good-looking, too! Yes, 
I dare say; that's the way they will let you pass. . . . Look; why, there's 
no end to it. Russian wenches, I do declare they are. See how comfortable 
they are in the carriages!' 

Pierre, thanks to his height, saw over the heads of the others what at- 
tracted the prisoners' curiosity. Three carriages were blocked between 
caissons, and in them a number of women with rouged faces, decked out 
in flaring colours, were sitting closely packed together, shouting something 
in shrill voices. 

The carriages of women drove by. They were followed again by carts, 
soldiers, waggons, soldiers, carriages, soldiers, caissons, and again soldiers, 
and at rare intervals women. 

All these men and horses seemed, as it were, driven along by some 
unseen force. During the hour in which Pierre watched them thev all 



WAR AND PEACE 483 

were swept out of the different streets with the same desire to get on as 
quickly as possible. All of them, alike hindered by the rest, began to get 
angry and to fight. The same oaths were bandied to and fro, and white 
teeth flashed, and every frowning face wore the same look of reckless 
determination and cold cruelty, which had struck Pierre in the morning 
in the corporal's face, while the drums were beating. 

It was almost evening when the officer in command of their escort ral- 
lied his men, and with shouts and oaths forced his way in among the 
baggage-trains; and the prisoners, surrounded on all sides, came out on 
the Kaluga road. 

They marched very quickly without pausing, and only halted when the 
sun was setting. The baggage-carts were moved up close to one another, 
and the men began to prepare for the night. Every one seemed ill- 
humoured and dissatisfied. Oaths, angry shouts, and fighting could be heard 
on all sides till a late hour. 

At this halting-place, the prisoners were even more roughly treated by 
their escort than at starting. They were for the first time given horse- 
flesh to eat. 

In every one of the escort, from the officers to the lowest soldier, could 
be seen a sort of personal spite against every one of the prisoners, in sur- 
prising contrast with the friendly relations that had existed between them 
before. 

Pierre felt that that fatal force which had crushed him at the execution, 
and had been imperceptible during his imprisonment, had now again the 
mastery of his existence. He was afraid; but he felt, too, that as that fatal 
force strove to crush him, there was growing up in his soul and gathering 
strength a force of life that was independent of it. Pierre supped on soup 
made of rye flour and horseflesh, and talked a little with his companions. 

Neither Pierre nor any of his companions talked of what they had seen 
in Moscow, nor of the harsh treatment they received from the French, 
nor of the orders to shoot them, which had been announced to them. As 
though in reaction against their more depressing position, all were par- 
ticularly gay and lively. They talked of personal reminiscences, of amus- 
ing incidents they had seen as they marched, and avoided touching on 
their present position. 

The sun had long ago set. Stars were shining brightly here and there 
in the sky; there was a red flush, as of a conflagration on the horizon, 
where the full moon was rising, and the vast, red ball seemed trembling 
strangely in the grey darkness. It became quite light. The evening was 
over, but the night had not yet begun. Pierre left his new companions 
and walked between the camp-fires to the other side of the road, where 
he had been told that the common prisoners were camping. He wanted to 
talk to them. On the road a French sentinel stopped him and bade him 
go back. 

Pierre did go back, but not to the camp-fire where his companions w ere, 
but to an unharnessed waggon where there was nobody. Tucking his 



484 WAR AND PEACE 

legs up under him, and dropping his head, he sat down on the cold ground 
against the waggon wheel, and sat there a long while motionless, thinking. 
More than an hour passed by. No one disturbed Pierre. Suddenly he burst 
into such a loud roar of his fat, good-humoured laughter, that men looked 
round on every side in astonishment at this strange and obviously solitary 
laughter. 'Ha, ha, ha!' laughed Pierre. And he talked aloud to himself. 
'The soldier did not let me pass. They have taken me— shut me up. They 
keep me prisoner. Who is "me"? Me? Me— my immortal soul! Ha, ha, ha! 
. . . Ha, ha, ha! . . .' he laughed, with the tears starting into his eyes. 

A man got up and came to see what this strange, big man was laugh- 
ing at all by himself. Pierre left off laughing, got up, walked away from 
the inquisitive intruder, and looked about him. 

The immense, endless bivouac, which had been full of the sound of 
crackling fires and men talking, had sunk to rest; the red camp-fires burnt 
low and dim. High overhead in the lucid sky stood the full moon. Forests 
and fields, that before could not be seen beyond the camp, came into view 
now in the distance. And beyond those fields and forests could be seen 
the bright, shifting, alluring, boundless distance. Pierre glanced at the sky, 
at the far-away, twinkling stars. 'And all that is mine, and all that is in me, 
and all that is I!' thought Pierre. 'And all this they caught and shut up in 
a shed closed in with boards!' He smiled and went to lie down to sleep be- 
side his companions. 

In October a messenger came to Kutuzov from Napoleon with overtures 
for peace and a letter falsely professing to come from Moscow, though 
Napoleon was in fact not far ahead of Kutuzov on the old Kaluga road. 
Kutuzov said that there could be no question of peace. 

On the evening of the nth of October, at Aristovo, a French pris- 
oner of the Guards said that the troops that had reached Fominskoe 
that day were the advance guard of the whole army; that Napoleon was 
with them; that the whole army had marched out of Moscow five days 
before. The same evening a house-serf coming from Borovsk brought word 
that he had seen an immense army entering that town. Dorohov's Cossacks 
reported that they had seen the French guards marching along the road to 
Borovsk. From all this it was evident that where they had expected to find 
one division there was now the whole army of the French, marching from 
Moscow in an unexpected direction— along the old Kaluga road. 

It was resolved to send a report to the staff. For this purpose a capable 
officer, Bolhovitinov, was to take a written report, and explain the whole 
matter verbally. 

Bolhovitinov galloped in an hour and a half thirty versts over a muddy, 
slippery road. Dismounting at a hut, on the hurdle fence of which was the 
inscription 'Headquarters of the Staff/ he walked into the dark entry. 

'The general on duty at once! Very important!' he cried to some one, 
who jumped up, wheezing in the darkness. 



WAR AND PEACE 485 

The orderly went in before him, and began waking some one up. 'Your 
honour, your honour, a courier.' 

'What? what? from whom?' said a sleepy voice. 

'From Dohturov and from Alexey Petrovitch. Napoleon is at Fomin- 
skoe,' said Bolhovitinov. 

The man who had been waked yawned and stretched. 'I don't want to 
wake him,' he said. 'Perhaps it's only a rumour.' 

'Here is the report,' said Bolhovitinov. 'My instructions are to give it 
at once to the general on duty.' 

'Wait a minute, I'll strike a light. What do you do with things, damn 
you!' said the sleepy voice addressing the orderly. 

When the tinder broke first into a blue and then into a red flame, cock- 
roaches that had been gnawing the tallow candle ran away in all directions. 

'The news is certain,' said Bolhovitinov. 'Prisoners and Cossacks and 
spies, all tell the same story.' 

Like all old people, Kutuzov slept little at night. He often dropped into 
sudden naps during the daytime, but at night he lay on his bed without 
undressing, and generally not asleep but thinking. 

'They ought to understand that we can but lose by taking the offensive. 
Time and patience, these are my champions!' thought Kutuzov. 

The unanswered question, whether the wound dealt at Borodino were 
mortal or not, had been for a whole month hanging over Kutuzov's head. 
On one side, the French had taken possession of Moscow. On the other 
side, in all his being, Kutuzov felt beyond all doubt that the terrible blow 
for which, together with all the Russians, he had strained all his strength 
must have been mortal. But in any case proofs were wanted, and he had 
been waiting for them now a month, and as time went on he grew more 
impatient. 

He imagined all sorts of movements of Napoleon's army, acting as a 
whole or in part, on Petersburg, against him, to out-flank him (that was 
what he was most afraid of), and also the possibility that Napoleon would 
fight against him with his own weapon, that he would stay on in Moscow 
waiting for him to move. But the one thing he could not foresee was what 
happened— the mad, convulsive stampede of Napoleon's army during the 
first eleven days of its march from Moscow— the stampede that made 
possible what Kutuzov did not yet dare to think about, the complete 
annihilation of the French. But the destruction of the French was the one 
absorbing desire of his heart. 

On the night of the nth of October he lay leaning on his arm and think- 
ing of that. 

There was a stir in the next room. 

'Hey, who is there? Come in, come in! Anything new?' the commander- 
in-chief called. 

Told the drift of the news, 'Who brought it?' asked Kutuzov. 'Call him, 

call him here!' 
Kutuzov sat with one leg out of bed and his unwieldly, corpulent body 



486 WAR AND PEACE 

propped on the other leg bent under him. He screwed up his one seeing 
eye to get a better view of the messenger. 

'Come here, come closer. Napoleon has marched out of Moscow? Is it 
truly so? Eh?' 

Bolhovitinov told him all and paused, awaiting instructions. 

Kutuzov tried to say something, but all at once his face began to pucker; 
he turned the other way to the corner of the hut, which looked black with 
the holy pictures. 'Lord, my Creator! Thou hast heard our prayer . . .' 
he said in a trembling voice, clasping his hands. 'Russia is saved. I thank 
Thee, O Lord.' 

From that time up to the end of the campaign, all Kutuzov's activity was 
limited to trying by the exercise of authority, by guile and by entreaties, 
to hold his army back from useless attacks, manoeuvres, and skirmishes with 
the perishing enemy. 

Napoleon's historians discuss what would have happened if Napoleon 
had succeeded in making his way to the wealthy provinces of the south. 
But to say nothing of the fact that nothing hindered Napoleon from march- 
ing into these southern provinces (since the Russian army left the road 
open), the historians forget that nothing could have saved Napoleon's 
army, because it carried within itself at that time the inevitable germs 
of ruin. Why should that army, which found abundant provisions in Mos- 
cow and could not keep them, but trampled them underfoot, that army 
which could not store supplies on entering Smolensk, but plundered at 
random, why should that army have mended its ways in the Kaluga prov- 
ince, where the inhabitants were of the same Russian race as in Moscow, 
and where fire had the same aptitude for destroying whatever they set 
fire to? 

The men of what had been an army fled with their leaders, not knowing 
whither they went, Napoleon and every soldier with him filled with one 
desire: to make his own escape as quickly as might be from the hopeless 
position of which all were dimly aware. 

At the council in Maley Yaroslavets, when the French generals, affecting 
to be deliberating, gave various opinions as to what was to be done, the 
opinion of the blunt soldier, Mouton, who said what all were thinking, 
that the only thing to do was to get away as quick as possible, closed every 
one's mouth; and no one, not even Napoleon, could say anything in op- 
position to this truth that all recognised. 

But though everybody knew that they must go, there was still a feel- 
ing of shame left at acknowledging they must fly. And some external shock 
was necessary to overcome that shame. And that shock came when it was 
needed. It was le Hourra de PEmpereur, as the French called it. 

On the day after the council, Napoleon, on the pretext of inspecting 
the troops and the field of a past and of a future battle, rode out early in 
the morning in the midst of the lines of his army with a suite of marshals 
and an escort. The Cossacks, who were in search of booty, swept down 
on the Emperor, and all but took him prisoner. What saved Napoleon 



WAR AND PEACE 487 

from the Cossacks that day was just what was the ruin of the French army, 
the booty, which here as well as at Tarutino tempted the Cossacks to let 
their prey slip. Without taking any notice of Napoleon, they dashed at 
the booty, and Napoleon succeeded in getting away. 

When les enfants du Don might postively capture the Emperor himself 
in the middle of his army, it was evident that there was nothing else to do 
but to fly with all possible haste by the nearest and the familiar road. Na- 
poleon, with his forty years and his corpulence, had not all his old re- 
sourcefulness and courage, and he quite took the hint; and under the in- 
fluence of the fright the Cossacks had given him, he gave, as the historians 
tell us, the order to retreat along the Smolensk road. 

For the French, marching back along the old Smolensk road, the final 
goal, their own country, was too remote, and the nearer goal on which all 
hopes and desires, enormously intensified by the influence of the crowd, 
were concentrated, was Smolensk. 

Every man among them longed for one thing only— to surrender and 
be taken prisoner, to escape from all the horrors and miseries of his actual 
position. But the momentum of the common impulse towards Smolensk 
drew each individual in the same direction. On the other hand, it was out 
of the question for a corps to surrender to a squadron; and although the 
French took advantage of every convenient opportunity to straggle away 
from one another, and on the smallest decent pretext to be taken prisoners, 
those opportunities did not always occur. 

All the generals and officers of the Russian army were eager to cut off 
the enemy's retreat, to overtake, to capture, to fall upon the French. 
Kutuzov alone used all his powers to resist this clamour for attack, when 
one-third of that army melted away of itself without a battle between 
Moscow and Vyazma. 

Napoleon's army was flying in disorder at its utmost possible speed out 
of Russia; that is to say, doing the very thing that every Russian most de- 
sired. What object was there in conducting all sorts of operations against 
the French when they were running away as fast as they could already? 
It would have been idle to stop men on the road, whose whole energies 
were bent on flight. Thirdly, it would have been absurd to lose men in 
destroying the French army when it was already, without external 
interference, perishing at such a rate that, without any obstruction of their 
road, not more than one hundredth of its original number succeeded in 
crossing the frontier in December. 

Fourthly, it was absurd to desire to take prisoners the Emperor, kings, 
and dukes, since the possession of such prisoners would have greatly en- 
hanced the difficulty of the Russian position, as was recognised by the most 
clear-sighted diplomatists of the time (J. Maistrc and others). Still more 
absurd would have been the desire to capture the French army when it 
had dwindled to one-half before reaching Krasnoe, and a division o\ 
convoys had to be given up to guard a corps of prisoners, while the Rus- 
sian soldiers themselves had not always full rations. 



488 WAR AND PEACE 

Any plan of cutting off and capturing Napoleon and his army, however 
carefully thought out, would have been like the action of a gardener who, 
after driving out a herd of cattle that had been trampling his beds, should 
run out to belabour the cattle about the head. The only thing that could 
be said in justification of his proceeding would be that he was greatly 
incensed. 

The people had a single aim: to clear their country of the invaders. 
That aim was effected primarily of itself, since the French were flying, 
and all that was necessary was not to check their flight. It was promoted, 
too, by the irregular warfare kept up by the people destroying the French 
army piecemeal; and thirdly, by the great Russian army following in the 
rear of the French, ready to use force in case there was any pause in 
their retreat. 

The Russian army had to act as a whip urging on a fleeing animal. 
And the experienced driver knew that it was better to keep the whip 
raised as a menace than to bring it down on the creature's back. 



PART XIV 



The French historians who describe the position of the French troops 
before they marched out of Moscow assert that everything was in good 
order in the Grande Armee, except the cavalry, the artillery, and the trans- 
port, and that there was no forage for the horses and cattle. There was no 
remedy for this defect, because the peasants of the surrounding country 
burned their hay rather than let the French have it. 

Victory did not bring forth its usual results, because the peasants, Karp 
and Vlas, by no means persons of heroic feelings (after the French evacu- 
ation, they hurried with their carts to pillage Moscow), and the immense 
multitude of others like them burnt their hay rather than bring it to Mos- 
cow, however high the prices offered them. 

From the time of the burning of Smolensk a war began which did not 
follow any of the old traditions of warfare. The burning of towns and 
villages, the retreat after every battle, the blow dealt at Borodino and fol- 
lowed by retreat, the burning of Moscow, the capture of marauders, the 
seizing of transports-the whole of the irregular warfare was a departure 
from the rules. 

Napoleon was aware of it, and from the time when he stood waiting in 
Moscow in the correct pose of the victorious fencer, he never ceased com- 
plaining to Kutuzov and to the Emperor Alexander that the war was being 
conducted contrary to all the rules of war. (As though any rules existed 
for the slaughter of men! ) 

In spite of the complaints of the French that they did not keep to the 
rules, in spite of the fact that the Russians in the highest positions felt it 
somehow shameful to be fighting with a cudgel, and wanted to take up the 
correct position en quarte or en tierce, to make a skilful thrust, en print* 
and so on, the cudgel of the people's war was raised in all its menacing and 
majestic power; and troubling itself about no question of any one's taMcs 
or rules, about no fine distinctions, with stupid simplicity, with perfect con- 
sistency, it rose and fell and belaboured the French till the whole invading 
army had been driven out. 

And happy the people that will not, as the French did in 1813, saluting 
according to the rules, gracefully and cautiously offer the sword hilt to the 
magnanimous conqueror. Happy the people who, in the moment oi trial, 
ask no questions how others would act by the recognised rules in such 
cases, but with ease and directness pick up the first cudgel that conies 

4*9 



490 WAR AND PEACE 

handy and deal blows with it, till resentment and revenge give way to 
contempt and pity. 

One of the most conspicuous and advantageous departures from the so- 
called rules of warfare is the independent action of men acting separately 
against men huddled together in a mass. Such independent activity is always 
seen in a war that assumes a national character. In this kind of warfare, 
instead of forming in a crowd to attack a crowd, men disperse in small 
groups, attack singly and at once fly, when attacked by superior forces, 
and then attack again, when an opportunity presents itself. Such were the 
methods of the guerillas in Spain; of the mountain tribes in the Caucasus, 
and of the Russians in 1812. 

War of this kind has been called partisan warfare on the supposition that 
this name defined its special significance. But this kind of warfare does not 
follow any rules of war, but is in direct contradiction to a well-known rule 
of tactics, regarded as infallible. That rule lays it down that the attacking 
party must concentrate his forces in order to be stronger than his opponent 
at the moment of conflict. 

Partisan warfare (always successful, as history testifies) acts in direct 
contradiction of this rule. 

Military science assumes that the relative strength of forces is identical 
with their numerical proportions. Military science maintains that the greater 
the number of soldiers, the greater their strength. Les gros bataillons ont 
toujours raison. 

To say this is as though one were in mechanics to say that forces were 
equal or unequal simply because the masses of the moving bodies were 
equal or unequal. 

Force (the volume of motion) is the product of the mass into the 
velocity. In warfare the force of armies is the product of the mass multi- 
plied by something else, an unknown x. 

Military science, seeing in history an immense number of examples in 
which the mass of an army does not correspond with its force, and in which 
small numbers conquer large ones, vaguely recognise the existence of this 
unknown factor, and try to find it sometimes in some geometrical disposi- 
tion of the troops, sometimes in the superiority of weapons, and most often 
in the genius of the leaders. But none of those factors yield results that agree 
with the historical facts. 

One has but to renounce the false view that glorifies the effect of the 
activity of the heroes of history in warfare in order to discover this un- 
known quantity, x. 

X is the spirit of the army, the greater or less desire to fight and to face 
dangers on the part of all the men composing the army, which is quite apart 
from the question whether they are fighting under leaders of genius or not, 
with cudgels or with guns that fire thirty times a minute. The men who 
have the greater desire to fight always put themselves, too, in the more 
advantageous position for fighting. The spirit of the army is the factor 
which multiplied by the mass gives the product of the force. To define and 



WAR AND PEACE 491 

express the significance of this unknown factor, the spirit of the army, is 
the problem of science. 

This problem can only be solved when we cease arbitrarily substituting 
for that unknown factor x the conditions under which the force is mani- 
fested, such as the plans of the general, the arming of the men and so on, 
and recognise this unknown factor in its entirety as the greater or less desire 
to fight and face danger. 

The strategic principle, that armies should act in masses on the offensive, 
and should break up into smaller groups for retreat, unconsciously confirms 
the truth that the force of an army depends on its spirit. To lead men for- 
ward under fire needs more discipline (which can only be attained by 
marching in masses) than is needed for self-defence when attacked. But 
this rule, which leaves out of sight the spirit of the army, is continually 
proving unsound, and is strikingly untrue in practice in all national wars, 
when there is a great rise or fall in the spirit of the armies. 

The French, on their retreat in 1812, though they should, by the laws of 
tactics, have defended themselves in detached groups, huddled together in a 
crowd, because the spirit of the men had sunk so low that it was only their 
number that kept them up. The Russians should, on the contrary, by the 
laws of tactics, have attacked them in a mass, but in fact attacked in scat- 
tered companies, because the spirit of the men ran so high that individual 
men killed the French without orders, and needed no compulsion to face 
hardships and dangers. 

The so-called 'partisan' warfare had begun with the enemy's entrance into 
Smolensk. Before the irregular warfare was officially recognised by our 
government many thousands of the enemy's soldiers— straggling, maraud- 
ing, or foraging parties— had been slain by Cossacks and peasants, who killed 
these men as instinctively as dogs set upon a stray mad dog. 

The first detachment of irregulars— Davy do v's— was formed on the 24th 
of August, and others soon followed. In the latter stages of the campaign 
these detachments became more and more numerous. 

The irregulars destroyed the Grande Armee piecemeal. They swept up 
the fallen leaves that were dropping of themselves from the withered tree, 
and sometimes they shook the tree itself. By October, when the French 
were fleeing to Smolensk, there were hundreds of these companies, differing 
widely from one another in number and in character. Some were detach- 
ments that followed all the usual routine of an army, with infantry, artillery, 
staff-officers, and all the conveniences of life. Some consisted only of I 
sacks, mounted men. Others were small bands F men, on foot and also 
mounted. Some consisted of peasants, or of landowners and their serfs, and 
remained unknown. There was a deacon at the head of such a band, who 
took several hundred prisoners in a month. There was the village cider's 
wife, Vassilisa, who killed hundreds of the French. 

The latter part of October was the time when this guerilla warfare 
reached its height. That period of this warfare, in which the irregulars 
were themselves amazed at their own audacity, were every moment in drc.ul 



492 WAR AND PEACE 

of being surrounded and captured by the French, and never unsaddling, 
hardly dismounting, hid in the woods, in momentary expectation of pur- 
suit, was already over. The irregular warfare had by now taken definite 
shape; it had become clear to all the irregulars what they could, and what 
they could not, accomplish with the French. By now it was only the com- 
manders of detachments marching with staff-officers according to the rules 
at a distance from the French who considered much impossible. The small 
bands of irregulars who had been at work a long while, and were at close 
quarters with the French, found it possible to attempt what the leaders of 
larger companies did not dare to think of doing. The Cossacks and the 
peasants, who crept in among the French, thought everything possible now. 

On the 22nd of October, Denisov, who was a leader of a band of irregu- 
lars, was eagerly engaged in a typical operation of this irregular warfare. 
From early morning he had been with his men moving about the woods 
that bordered the high road, watching a big convoy of cavalry baggage 
and Russian prisoners that had dropped behind the other French troops, 
and under strong escort— as he learned from his scouts and from prisoners 
—was making its way to Smolensk. Dolohov was also a leader of a small 
band acting in the same district. Denisov intended with Dolohov to attack 
and carry off this transport with his own small force. 

The transport was, on the 22nd of October, going from the village of 
Mikulino to the village of Shamshevo. On the left side of the road between 
Mikulino and Shamshevo there were great woods, which in places bordered 
on the road, and in places were a verst or more from the road. Denisov, 
with a small party of followers, had been the whole day riding about in 
these woods, sometimes plunging into their centre, and sometimes coming 
out at the edge, but never losing sight of the moving French. 

In the morning, where the wood ran close to the road, the Cossacks of 
Denisov's party had pounced on two French waggonloads of saddles, stuck 
in the mud, and had carried them off into the wood. From that time right on 
to evening, they had been watching the movements of the French without 
attacking them. They wanted to avoid frightening them, and then, joining 
Dolohov (who was to come that evening to a trysting-place in the wood) 
from two sides to fall at dawn like an avalanche of snow on their heads. 

Six Cossacks had been left behind, two versts from Mikulino, where the 
wood bordered the road. They were to bring word at once as soon as any 
fresh columns of French came into sight. 

In front of Shamshevo, Dolohov was to watch the road to know at what 
distance there were other French troops. With the transport there was sup- 
posed to be fifteen hundred men. Denisov had two hundred men, and 
Dolohov might have as many more. But superiority in numbers was no 
obstacle to Denisov. There was only one thing that he still needed to 
know, and that was what troops these were. 

Denisov. in a long cape and a high fur cap, both streaming with water. 



WAR AND PEACE 493 

was riding a thin, pinched-looking, thoroughbred horse. With his head 
aslant, and his ears pricked up, like his horse, he was frowning at the driving 
rain, and anxiously looking before him. 

A little ahead walked a peasant-guide, soaked through and through in his 
grey full coat and white cap. 

Along the narrow, muddy, cut-up forest-track there came hussars in 
knots of three and four at a time, and then Cossacks; some in capes, some 
in French cloaks; others with horse-cloths pulled over their heads. The 
horses, chestnut and bay, all looked black from the soaking rain. Clothes, 
saddles, and bridles, all were sticky and swollen with the wet, like the earth 
and the fallen leaves with which the track was strewn. Denisov was out 
of humour, both from the rain and hunger (no one had eaten anything since 
morning); and, most of all, from having no news of Dolohov, and from no 
French prisoner having been caught to give him information. 

'We shall never have such another chance to fall on the transport as to- 
day. To attack them alone would be risky, and to put it off to another day 
—some one of the bigger leaders will carry the booty off from under our 
noses,' thought Denisov, continually looking ahead. 

'There's some one coming,' he said. 

'There are two men coming— an officer and a Cossack.' 

The two figures, riding downhill, disappeared from sight, and came into 
view again a few minutes later. The foremost was an officer, dishevelled 
looking, and soaked through, with his trousers tucked up above his knees; 
he was lashing his horse into a weary gallop. Behind him a Cossack trotted 
along, standing up in his stirrups. This officer, a quite young boy, with a 
broad, rosy face and keen, merry eyes, galloped up to Denisov, and handed 
him a sopping packet. 

'From the general,' he said. 'I must apologise for its not being quite 
dry. . . .' 

'Rostov! Petya!' Denisov cried at that moment, running through the 
packet that had been given him. 'Why, how was it you didn't say who you 
were?' and Denisov, turning with a smile, held out his hand to the officer. 
This officer was Petya Rostov. 

Petya had been all the way preparing himself to behave with Denisov as 
a grown-up person and an officer should do, making no reference to their 
previous acquaintance. But as soon as Denisov smiled at him, Petya beamed 
at once, blushed with delight, and forgetting all the formal demeanour he 
had been intending to preserve, he began telling him how he had ridden 
by the French, and how glad he was he had been given this commission, 
and how he had already been in a battle at Vyazma, and how a certain 
hussar had distinguished himself in it. 

'Will your honour have any instructions to give me? Petya said to 
Denisov, putting his hand to the peak of his cap, and going back to the 
comedy of adjutant and general, which he had prepared himself to perform, 
'or should I remain with your honour?' 



494 WAR AND PEACE 

'Instructions? . . .' said Denisov absently. 'Well, can you stay till to- 
morrow? ' 

'May I stay with you?' cried Petya. 

Denisov and Petya followed the peasant in the pointed cap, who, stepping 
lightly and noiselessly in his bast shoes over roots and wet leaves, led them 
to the edge of the wood. 

Coming out on the road, the peasant paused, looked about him, and 
turned toward a thin screen of trees. He stood still at a big oak, still covered 
with leaves, and beckoned mysteriously to them. 

Denisov and Petya rode up to him. From the place where the peasant 
was standing the French could be seen. Just beyond the wood a field of 
spring corn ran sharply downhill. On the right, across a steep ravine, could 
be seen a little village and a manor-house with the roofs broken down. In 
that village and in the house and all over the high ground in the garden, 
by the wells and the pond, and all along the road uphill from the bridge 
to the village, not more than five hundred yards away, crowds of men 
could be seen in the shifting mist. They could distinctly hear their foreign 
cries at the horses pulling the baggage uphill and their calls to one another. 

'Whether Dolohov comes or not, we must take them. . . . Eh?' said 
Denisov, his eyes sparkling merrily. 

On leaving Moscow, Petya had parted from his parents to join his regi- 
ment, and shortly afterwards had been appointed an orderly in attendance 
on a general who was in command of a large detachment. From the time of 
securing his commission, and even more since joining a regiment in active 
service, and taking part in the battle of Vyazma, Petya had been in a con- 
tinual state of happy excitement at being grown-up, and of intense anxiety 
not to miss any opportunity of real heroism. 

On the 2 1 st of October, when his general expressed a desire to send some 
one to Denisov's company, Petya had so piteously besought him to send 
him, that the general could not refuse. But the general explicitly forbade 
Petya's taking part in any enterprise whatever that Denisov might be plan- 
ning. 

It was getting dark when Denisov, with Petya, reached the forester's hut. 
In the half-dark they could see saddled horses, Cossacks and hussars, rigging 
up shanties in the clearing, and building up a glowing fire in a hollow near, 
where the smoke would not be seen by the French. In the porch of the 
little hut there was a Cossack with his sleeves tucked up, cutting up a sheep. 
In the hut, three officers of Denisov's band were setting up a table made up 
of doors. Petya took off his wet clothes, gave them to be dried, and at once 
set to work to help the officers in fixing up a dining-table. 

In ten minutes the table was ready and covered with a napkin. On the 
table was set vodka, a flask of rum, white bread, and roast mutton, and salt. 

Sitting at the table with the officers, tearing the fat, savoury mutton with 
greasy fingers, Petya was in a childishly enthusiastic condition of tender 
love for all men and a consequent belief in the same feeling for himself in 
others. 



WAR AND PEACE 495 

'So what do you think, Vassily Fyodorovitch,' he said to Denisov, 'it 
won't matter my staying a day with you, will it?' And without waiting for 
an answer, he answered himself: 'Why, I was told to find out, and here I am 
finding out . . . Only you must let me go into the middle . . . into the 
real . . .' 

'Into the real, real thing . . .' Denisov said, smiling. 

'Why, what would it be to you? Ah, you want a knife?' he said to an 
officer, who was trying to tear off a piece of mutton. And he gave him 
his pocket-knife. 

The officer praised the knife. 

'Please keep it. I have several like it . . .' said Petya, blushing. 'Heavens! 
Why, I was quite forgetting,' he cried suddenly. 'I have some capital 
raisins, you know the sort without stones. We have a new canteen-keeper, 
and he does get first-rate things. I bought ten pounds of them. I'm fond of 
sweet things. Will you have some?' . . . And Petya ran out to his Cossack 
in the porch, and brought in some panniers in which there were five pounds 
of raisins. 'Please take some.' 

'Don't you need a coffee-pot?' he said. 'I bought one from our canteen- 
keeper! He has first-rate things. And he's very honest. That's the great 
thing. I'll be sure and send it you.' And suddenly, dismayed at the thought 
that he had let his tongue run away with him, Petya stopped short and 
blushed. 

Petya's attention was diverted by the arrival of Dolohov. He had heard 
a great many stories told in the army of Dolohov's extraordinary gallantry 
and of his cruelty to the French. And therefore from the moment Dolohov 
entered the hut Petya could not take his eyes off him, and flinging up his 
head, he assumed a more and more swaggering air, that he might not be 
unworthy of associating even with a hero like Dolohov. 

Dolohov's appearance struck Petya as strange. 

Denisov was dressed in a Cossack coat; he had let his beard grow, and 
had a holy image of Nikolay, the wonder-worker, on his breast. Dolohov, 
on the contrary, though in old days he had worn a Persian dress in Moscow, 
looked now like the most correct officer of the Guards. He was clean- 
shaven; he wore the wadded coat of the Guards with a St. George medal 
on a ribbon, and a plain forage cap, put on straight on his head. He took his 
wet cloak off in the corner and, without greeting any one, went straight up 
to Denisov and began at once asking questions about the matter in hand. 

'We must find out what troops they are, and what are their numbers,' 
said Dolohov. 'I like to do things properly. Come, won't one of you gentle- 
men like to come with me to pay them a call in their camp? I have an extra 
uniform with me.' 

'I, I . . . I'll come with you!' cried Petya. 

'There's not the slightest need for you to go,' said Denisov, addressing 
Dolohov; 'and as for him I wouldn't let him go on any account. 1 

'That's good!' cried Petya; 'why shouldn't I go? . . .' 

'Why, because there's no reason to.' 



496 WAR AND PEACE 

'You will take me?' he cried, turning to Dolohov. 

'Why not? . . .' Dolohov answered, absently. 

'But you know if they do catch me— and you too— it will be the nearest 
aspen-tree.' 

To all Denisov's efforts to dissuade him from going, Petya replied 'I shall 
most certainly go, and don't try to prevent me; it won't be any use . . .' 

Petya and Dolohov, after dressing up in French uniforms and shakoes, 
rode to the clearing from which Denisov had looked at the French camp, 
and coming out of the wood, descended into the hollow in the pitch dark- 
ness. When they had ridden downhill, Dolohov bade the Cossacks ac- 
company him to wait there, and set off at a smart trot along the road 
towards the bridge. Petya, faint with excitement, trotted along beside him. 

'If we are caught, I won't be taken alive. I have a pistol,' whispered Petya. 

'Don't speak Russian,' said Dolohov, in a rapid whisper, and at that 
moment they heard in the dark the challenge: 'Who goes there?' and the 
click of a gun. 

Petya clutched at his pistol. 

'Uhlans of the Sixth Regiment,' said Dolohov, neither hastening nor 
slackening his horse's pace. 

The black figure of a sentinel stood on the bridge. 

'The password?' 

Dolohov reined in his horse, and advanced at a walking pace. 

'Tell me, is Colonel Gerard here?' he said. 

'Password?' repeated the sentinel, making no reply and barring their way. 

'When an officer makes his round, sentinels don't ask him for the pass- 
word . . .' cried Dolohov, suddenly losing his temper and riding straight 
at the sentinel. 'I ask you, is the colonel here?' 

And not waiting for an answer from the sentinel, who moved aside, Dolo- 
hov rode at a walking pace uphill. 

Noticing the black outline of a man crossing the road, Dolohov stopped 
the man, and asked where the colonel and officers were. The man, a soldier 
with a sack over his shoulder, stopped, came close up to Dolohov's horse, 
stroking it with his hand, and told them in a simple and friendly way that 
the colonel and the officers were higher up the hill, on the right, in the 
courtyard of the farm, as he called the little manor-house. 

After going further along the road, from both sides of which they heard 
French talk round the camp-fires, Dolohov turned into the yard of the 
manor-house. On reaching the gate, he dismounted and walked towards a 
big, blazing fire, round which several men were sitting, engaged in loud 
conversation. There was something boiling in a cauldron on one side, and 
a soldier in a peaked cap and blue coat, kneeling in the bright glow of the 
fire, was stirring it with his ramrod. 

Both paused, and peered into the darkness at the sound of the steps of 
Petya and Dolohov approaching with their horses. 

l Bonjonr, messieurs/' Dolohov called loudly and distinctly. 



WAR AND PEACE 497 

There was a stir among the officers in the shadow, and a tall officer with 
a long neck came round the fire and went up to Dolohov. 

'Is that you, Clement?' said he. 'Where the devil . . .' but becoming 
aware of his mistake, he did not finish, and with a slight frown greeted 
Dolohov as a stranger, and asked him what he could do for him. Dolohov 
told him that he and his comrade were trying to catch up their regiment, 
and asked, addressing the company in general, whether the officers knew 
anything about the Sixth Regiment. No one could tell them anything about 
it; and Petya fancied the officers began to look at him and Dolohov with 
unfriendly and suspicious eyes. 

For several seconds no one spoke. 

'If you're reckoning on some soup, you have come too late,' said a voice 
from behind the fire, with a smothered laugh. 

Dolohov answered that they had had supper, and wanted to push on 
further that night. 

He gave their horses to the soldier who was stirring the pot, and squatted 
down on his heels beside the officer with the long neck. The latter never 
took his eyes off Dolohov, and asked him again what regiment did he belong 

to. 

Dolohov appeared not to hear the question. Making no answer, he lighted 
a short French pipe that he took from his pocket, and asked the officers 
whether the road ahead of them was safe from Cossacks. 

'The brigands are everywhere,' answered an officer from behind the fire. 

Dolohov said that the Cossacks were only a danger for stragglers like 
himself and his comrade; he supposed they would not dare to attack large 
detachments. 

No one replied. 

'Well, now he will come away,' Petya was thinking every moment, as he 
stood by the fire listening to the talk. 

But Dolohov took up the conversation that had dropped, and proceeded 
to ask them point-blank how many men there were in their battalion, how 
many battalions they had, and how many prisoners. 

When he asked about the Russian prisoners, Dolohov added: 

'Nasty business dragging those corpses about with one. It would be better 
to shoot the vermin,' and he broke into such a strange, loud laugh, that 
Petya fancied the French must see through their disguise at once. 

Dolohov's words and laughter elicited no response, and a French officer 
whom they had not seen (he lay rolled up in a coat), sat up and whispered 
something to his companion. Dolohov stood up and called to the men, who 

held their horses. 

'Will they give us the horses or not?' Petya wondered, unconsciously 

coming closer to Dolohov. 

They did give them the horses. 'Bonsoir, messieurs, said Dolohov. 

Petya tried to say l Bonsoir; but he could not utter a sound. The off 
were whispering together. Dolohov was a long while mounting his horse, 



498 WAR AND PEACE 

who would not stand still; then he rode out of the gate at a walking pace. 
Petya rode beside him, not daring to look round, though he was longing to 
see whether the French were running after him or not. 

When they came out on to the road, Dolohov did not turn back towards 
the open country, but rode further along it into the village. 

At one spot he stood still, listening. 'Do you hear?' he said. Petya recog- 
nised the sound of voices speaking Russian, and saw round the camp-fire the 
dark outlines of Russian prisoners. When they reached the bridge again, 
Petya and Dolohov passed the sentinel, who, without uttering a word, paced 
gloomily up and down. They came out to the hollow where the Cossacks 
were waiting for them. 

'Well now, good-bye. Tell Denisov, at sunrise, at the first shot,' said 
Dolohov, and he was going on, but Petya clutched at his arm. 

'Oh!' he cried, 'you are a hero! Oh! how splendid it is! how jolly! How 
I love you!' 

'That's all right,' answered Dolohov. 

On reaching the hut in the wood, Petya found Denisov in the porch. He 
was waiting for Petya's return in great uneasiness, anxiety, and vexation 
with himself for having let him go. 

'Thank God!' he cried. 'Well, thank God!' he repeated, hearing Petya's 
ecstatic account. 'And, damn you, you have prevented my sleeping!' he 
added. 'Well, thank God; now, go to bed. We can still get a nap before 
morning.' 

'Yes . . . no,' said Petya. 'I'm not sleepy yet. Besides, it's not my habit to 
sleep before a battle.' 

Petya sat for a little while in the hut, joyfully recalling the details of his 
adventure. Then, noticing that Denisov had fallen asleep, he got up and 
went out of doors. 

It was still quite dark outside. The rain was over, but the trees were still 
dripping. Close by the hut could be seen the black outlines of the Cossacks' 
shanties and the horses tied together. Behind the hut there was a dark blur 
where two waggons stood with the horses near by, and in the hollow there 
was a red glow from the dying fire. 

'Why, aren't you asleep, sir?' said a Cossack, sitting under the waggon. 

'No; but . . . you know I have only just come back. We have been call- 
ing on the French.' And Petya gave the Cossack a detailed account of his 
adventure. 

'Well, you must be sleepy; get a little sleep,' said the Cossack. 

'No, I am used to it,' answered Petya. 'And how are the flints in your 
pistols— not worn out? I brought some with me. Don't you want any? Do 
take some.' 

The Cossack popped out from under the waggon to take a closer look 
at Petya. 

'For, you see, I like to do everything carefully,' said Petya. 'Some men, 
you know, leave things to chance, and don't have things ready, and then 
they regret it. I don't like that.' 



WAR AND PEACE 499 

'No, to be sure/ said the Cossack. 

'Oh, and another thing, please, my dear fellow, sharpen my sabre for me; 
I have blunt . . .' (but Petya could not bring out a lie) . . . 'it has never 
been sharpened. Can you do that?' 

'To be sure I can.' 

Petya stood and heard the martial sound of steel and whetstone. He 
clambered on to the waggon, and sat on the edge of it. The Cossack 
sharpened the sabre below. 

Petya closed his eyes and began to nod. The branches dripped. There 
was a low hum of talk and the sound of some one snoring. The horses 
neighed and scuffled. 

'Ozheeg, zheeg, ozheeg, zheeg . . .' hissed the sabre on the whetstone. 

'It's ready, your honour, you can cut the Frenchman in two now.' 

Petya waked up. 

'Why, it's light already; it's really getting light,' he cried. The horses, 
unseen before, were visible to the tails now, and through the leafless boughs 
there could be seen a watery light. Petya shook himself, jumped up, took 
a rouble out of his pocket, brandished his sabre to try it, and thrust it into 
the scabbard. The Cossacks were untying the horses and fastening the sad- 
dlegirths. 

Denisov came out of the hut, and calling to Petya, bade him get ready. 

Rapidly the men picked out their horses and formed into parties. Denisov 
stood by the hut, giving the last orders. The infantry of the detachment 
moved on along the road, hundreds of feet splashing through the mud. 

Petya held his horse by the bridle, eagerly awaiting the word of command 
to mount. His face glowed from a dip in cold water, and his eyes gleamed. 
He felt a chill running down his back, and a kind of rapid, rhythmic throb- 
bing all over. 

'Well, have you everything ready?' said Denisov. 'Give us our horses.' 

They brought the horses up. Denisov was vexed with the Cossack because 
the saddlegirths were slack, and swore at him as he mounted his horse. 
Petya put his foot in the stirrup. The horse, as its habit was, made as chough 
to nip at his leg; but Petya leaped into the saddle, unconscious of his own 
weight, and looking round at the hussars moving up from behind in the 
darkness, he rode up to Denisov. 

'Vassily Fyodorovitch, you will trust me with some commission? Please 
... for God's sake . . .' he said. Denisov seemed to have forgotten Petya's 
existence. He looked round at him. 

'One thing I beg of you,' he said sternly, 'to obey me '.lnd not to put 

yourself forward.' 

All the way Denisov did not say another word to Petya; he rode on in 
silence. By the time that they reached the edge of the wood, ir was per- 
ceptibly getting light in the open country. Denisov whispered something 
to the esaul, and the Cossacks began riding by Petya and Denisov. When 
they had all passed on Denisov put his spurs to his horse, and rode dOM nhill. 
Slipping and sinking back on their haunches, the horses slid clown into the 



500 WAR AND PEACE 

hollow with their riders. Petya kept beside Denisov. The tremor all over 
him was growing more intense. It was getting lighter and lighter, but the 
mist hid objects at a distance. When he had reached the bottom, Denisov 
looked back and nodded to the Cossack beside him. 

'The signal,' he said. The Cossack raised his arm, and a shot rang out. 
At the same moment they heard the tramp of horses galloping in front, 
shouts from different directions, and more shots. 

Petya gave the rein to his horse, lashing him on, heedless of Denisov, who 
shouted to him. It seemed to Petya that it suddenly became broad daylight, 
as though it were midday. He galloped to the bridge. In front Petya saw 
men of some sort— the French he supposed— running across the road. 

Cossacks were crowding about a hut, doing something. A fearful scream 
rose out of the middle of the crowd. Petya galloped to this crowd, and the 
first thing he saw was the white face and trembling lower-jaw of a French- 
man, who had clutched hold of a lance aimed at his breast. 

'Hurrah! . . . ours . . .' shouted Petya, and giving the rein to his excited 
horse, he galloped on down the village street. 

He heard firing in front. Cossacks, hussars, and tattered Russian prisoners, 
running up from both sides of the road, were all shouting something loud 
and unintelligible. A gallant-looking Frenchman, in a blue coat, with a 
red, frowning face, and no cap, was keeping back the hussars with a 
bayonet. By the time that Petya galloped up, the Frenchman had fallen. 

'Too late again,' flashed through Petya's brain, and he galloped to the 
spot where he heard the hottest fire. The shots came from the yard of the 
manor-house where he had been the night before with Dolohov. The 
French were ambushing there behind the fence in among the bushes of 
the overgrown garden, and firing at the Cossacks who were crowding round 
the gates. As he rode up to the gates, Petya caught a glimpse in the smoke 
of Dolohov's w T hite, greenish face, as he shouted something to the men. 
'Go round. Wait for the infantry!' he was shouting, just as Petya rode up 
to him. 

'Wait? . . . Hurrah! . . .' shouted Petya, and without pausing a moment, 
he galloped towards the spot where he heard the shots, and where the smoke 
was the thickest. There came a vollev of shots with the sound of bullets 

J 

whizzing by and thudding into something. The Cossacks and Dolohov gal- 
loped in at the gates after Petya. In the thick, hovering smoke the French 
flung down their arms and ran out of the bushes to meet the Cossacks, or 
fled downhill towards the pond. 

Petya was galloping on round the courtyard, but instead of holding the 
reins, he was flinging up both arms in a strange way, and slanting more and 
more to one side in the saddle. The horse stepped on to the ashes of the 
fire smouldering in the morning light, and stopped short. Petya fell heavily 
on the wet earth. The Cossacks saw his arms and legs twitching rapidly, 
though his head did not move. 

After parleying with the French senior officer, who came out of the 
house with a handkerchief on a sword to announce that they surrendered, 



WAR AND PEACE 501 

Dolohov got off his horse and went up to Petya, who lay motionless with 
outstretched arms. 

^ 'Done for,' he said frowning, and walked to the gate to Denisov, who was 
riding towards him. 

'Killed?' cried Denisov, even from a distance recognising the familiar, 
unmistakably lifeless posture in which Petya's body was lying. 

'Done for,' Dolohov repeated, as though the utterance of those words 
afforded him satisfaction; and he walked rapidly towards the prisoners, 
whom the Cossacks were hurriedly surrounding/'No quarter!' he shouted 
to Denisov. Denisov made no reply. He went up to Petya, got off his horse, 
and with trembling hands turned over the blood-stained, mud-spattered 
face that was already turning white. 

Tin fond of sweet things. They are capital raisins, take them all,' came 
into his mind. And the Cossacks looked round in surprise at the sound like 
the howl of a dog, that Denisov uttered as he turned away, walked to the 
fence and clutched at it. 

Among the Russian prisoners rescued by Dennisov and Dolohov was 
Pierre Bezuhov. 

The party of prisoners was on the 22nd of October not with the troops and 
transport in whose company they had left Moscow, though no fresh in- 
structions in regard to them had been given by the French authorities. Half 
of the transport with stores of biscuit, which had followed them during the 
early stages of the march, had been carried off by the Cossacks, the other 
half had got away in front. Of the cavalry soldiers on foot, who had 
marched in front of the prisoners, not one was left; they had all disappeared. 
The artillery, which the prisoners had seen in front during the early stages, 
was now replaced by the immense train of Marshal Junot's baggage, con- 
voyed by an escort of Westphalians. Behind the prisoners came a transport 
of cavalry accoutrements. 

The French had at first marched in three columns, but from Vyazma 
they had formed a single mass. The symptoms of lack of discipline, which 
Pierre had observed at the first halt outside Moscow, had by now reached 
their extreme limits. 

The road along which they marched was strewn on both sides with the 
carcases of dead horses. The tattered soldiers, stragglers from different regi- 
ments, were continually changing, joining the column as it marched, and 
dropping behind it again. Several times there had been false alarms. and the 
soldiers of the convoy had raised their guns, and fired and fled, trampling 
one another underfoot. Then they had rallied again, and abused one another 
for their causeless panic. 

Of the cavalry transport, which had at first consist eel of < ne hundred and 
twenty waggons, only sixty were left; the rest had been carried off or 
abandoned. Several waggonloads of Junot's baggage, too, had been dis- 
carded or captured. From the talk he overheard among the ( fermana, Pierre 
learned that a more careful watch was kept over this baggage-train than 



502 WAR AND PEACE 

over the prisoners, and that one of their comrades, a German, had been 
shot because a silver spoon belonging to the marshal had been found in the 
soldier's possession. 

The convoy of prisoners had dwindled even more than the other two 
convoys. Of the three hundred and thirty men who had started from Mos- 
cow there were now less than a hundred left. The prisoners were a burden 
even more irksome to the soldiers than the cavalry stores and Junot's bag- 
gage. The saddles and Junot's spoons they could understand might be of 
some use, but why cold and starving soldiers should stand as sentinels, 
keeping guard over Russians as cold and starving, who were continually 
dying and being left behind on the road, and whom they had orders to 
shoot— it was not only incomprehensible, but revolting. 

The arrangement made at the start from Moscow, that the officers among 
the prisoners should march separately from the common soldiers, had long 
since been given up. All who could walk marched together; and at the 
third stage Pierre had rejoined Karataev and the bow-legged, purple-grey 
dog, who had chosen Karataev for her master. 

On the third day after leaving Moscow, Karataev had a return of the 
fever which had kept him in the Moscow hospital. 

Chilled by the dying fire on the previous night's halt, Pierre had got up 
and moved to the next fire, which was burning better. There Platon was 
sitting, with a coat put over his head, like a priest's chasuble. In his flexible, 
pleasant voice, feeble now from illness, he was telling the soldiers a story 
Pierre had heard already. It was past midnight, the time when Karataev's 
fever usually abated, and he was particularly lively. As he drew near the fire 
and heard Platon's weak, sickly voice, and saw his piteous mien in the 
bright firelight, Pierre felt a pang at heart. He was frightened at his own 
pity for this man, and would have gone away, but there was no other fire 
to go to, and trying not to look at Platon, he sat down by it. 

'Well, how is your fever?' he asked. 

'How is my fever? Weep over sickness, and God won't give you death," 
said Karataev, and he went back at once to the story he had begun. 

'And so, brother,' he went on with a smile on his thin, white face, and 
a peculiar, joyful light in his eyes, 'And so, brother . . .' 

Pierre had heard the story long before. Karataev had told it to him about 
six times already. But well as Pierre knew the story, he listened to it now 
as though it were something new. 

Of all that Pierre did himself afterwards call sufferings, though at the 
time he hardly felt them so, the chief was the state of his bare, blistered, 
sore feet. The horse-flesh was savoury and nourishing, the saltpetre flavour 
given it by the gunpowder they used instead of salt was positively agree- 
able; there was no great degree of cold, it was always warm in the daytime 
on the march, and at night there were the camp-fires, and the lice that 
devoured him helped to keep him warm. One thing was painful in the 
earlier days— that was his feet. 

On the second day of the march, as he examined his blisters by the camp- 



WAR AND PEACE 503 

fire, Pierre thought he could not possibly walk on them; but when thev all 
go up, he set off limping, and later on, when he got warm, he walked with- 
out pain though his feet looked even more terrible that evening But he 
did not look at them, and thought of something else 

He did not see and did not hear how the prisoners that lagged behind 
were shot, though more than a hundred of them had perished in that way. 
He did not think about Karataev, who was getting weaker every day, and 
would obviously soon fall a victim to the same fate. 

At midday on the 22nd, Pierre was walking along the muddy, slippery 
road uphill, looking at his feet and at the unevenness of the road From 
time to time he glanced at the familiar crowd around him, and then again 
at his feet. Both that crowd and those feet were alike his and familiar to him. 
The purplish, bandy-legged, grey dog was running merrilv along at the 
side of the road, barking at the crows that perched on the carrion. The grey 
dog was sleeker and merrier than in Moscow. All around lay the flesh 
of different animals-from men to horses-in different stages of decomposi- 
tion, and the marching soldiers prevented wolves from coming near it, so 
that the grey dog could feast to her heart's content. 

Rain had been falling since early morning; and it seemed continually as 
though in another minute it would cease and the sky would clear, when, 
after a short break, the rain came on again more heavily. The road, satu- 
rated with rain, could soak up no more, and streams flowed along the ruts. 

Pierre walked, looking from side to side, counting his steps, and reckoning 
them off in threes on his fingers. 

It seemed to him that he was thinking of nothing at all. 

'To your places!' a voice shouted suddenly. 

There was a cheerful stir among the convoy soldiers, and a partv of 
well-dressed cavalry soldiers on good horses came trotting up, making .1 
circuit round the prisoners. Pierre had a passing glimpse of the serene, hand- 
some, fat, white face of a man in a three-cornered hat. It was one of the 
marshals. 

While the marshal was driving by, the prisoners had been hustled to- 
gether into one group, and Pierre caught sight of Karataev sitting against 
a birch-tree. His face still wore the same look of joyous emotion as when 
he had been telling the story of the merchant, but it had another expression 
too, a look of subdued solemnity. 

Karataev looked at Pierre with his kindly, round eyes, and there was an 
unmistakable appeal in them. He evidently wanted to say something to him. 
But Pierre was in too great dread for himself. 1 I: nude as though he had 
not seen that look, and hastily walked away. 

When the prisoners set off again Pierre looked back. Karataev was sit- 
ting under the birch-tree by the edge of the road, and two I enehmen Wi 
bending over him in conversation. Pierre did not look again. lie went <m 
limping up the hill. 

There was the sound of a shot behind, at the spot where K.ir.i!.u\ was 
sitting. Pierre heard that shot distinctly, but at the moment that lie heard it. 



504 WAR AND PEACE 

he recalled that he had not finished reckoning up how many stages were 
left to Smolensk, the calculation he had begun before the marshal rode by. 
And he began to reckon. 

Two French soldiers ran by Pierre, one holding a still smoking gun. 
They were both pale, and in the expression of their faces— one of them 
glanced timidly at Pierre— there was something like what he had seen in the 
young soldier at the execution in Moscow. 

The dog began to howl behind at the spot where Karataev was sitting. 
'Silly creature! what is she howling for?' thought Pierre. 

The prisoners, his companions marching at his side, like him, refrained 
from looking back to the place whence came the sound of the shot and the 
dog's howl. There was a set look on all their faces. 

The cavalry transport, and the prisoners, and the marshal's baggage-train, 
halted at the village of Shamshevo. All crowded together round the camp- 
fire. Pierre went up to a fire, ate some roast horse-flesh, lay down with his 
back to the fire, and at once fell into the same sort of sleep that he had 
slept at Mozhaisk, after the battle of Borodino. 

Before sunrise he was wakened by loud and rapid shots and outcries. 
The French were flying by him. 

'The Cossacks!' one of them shouted, and a minute later a crowd of 
Russians were surrounding Pierre. For a long while Pierre could not under- 
stand what had happened to him. He heard all about him his comrades' 
wails of joy. 

'Our own folk! brothers!' the old soldiers cried, weeping, as they em- 
braced the Cossacks and the hussars. Pierre hugged the first soldier who 
went up to him, and kissed him. 

Dolohov was standing at the gates of a dilapidated house, letting the 
crowd of unarmed Frenchmen pass by him. The French, excited by all that 
had happened, were talking loudly among themselves; but as they passed 
before Dolohov, who stood switching his boots with his riding-whip, and 
watching them with his cold, glassy eyes, that boded nothing good, their 
talk died away. One of Dolohov's Cossacks stood on the other side, counting 
the prisoners, and marking off the hundreds with a chalk mark on the gate. 

'How many?' Dolohov asked him. 

'The second hundred,' answered the Cossack. 

L ¥ilez, filez,' said Dolohov, who had picked up the expression from the 
French; and when he met the eyes of the passing prisoners, his eyes gleamed 
with a cruel light. 

With a gloomy face Denisov, holding his high Cossack hat in his hand, 
was walking behind the Cossacks, who were bearing to a hole freshly dug 
in the garden the body of Petya Rostov. 

From the 28th of October, when the frosts began, the flight of the French 
assumed a more tragic aspect, from the men being frozen or roasted to 
death by the camp-fires, while the Emperor, and kings, and dukes, still drove 
on with their stolen booty in fur cloaks and closed carriages. But in its 



WAR AND PEACE 505 

essentials, the process of the flight and disintegration of the French army- 
went on unchanged. 

From Moscow to Vyazma of the seventy-three thousands of the French 
army (not reckoning the Guards, who had done nothing but pillage all 
through the war), only thirty-six thousand were left, though only five 
thousand had been killed in battle. The French army went on melting away 
and disappearing in the same ratio from Moscow to Vyazma, from Vyazma 
to Smolensk, from Smolensk to the Berezina, from the Berezina to Vilna, 
apart from the greater or less degree of cold, the pursuit and barring of 
the way, and all other conditions taken separately. After Vyazma, instead 
of three columns, the French troops formed a single mass, and so they 
marched on to the end. This is how Berthier wrote to the Emperor: 

'I think it my duty to report to your majesty the condition of the various 
corps under my observation on the march the last two or three days. They 
are almost disbanded. Hardly a quarter of the men remain with the flags of 
their regiments; the rest wander off on their own account in different direc- 
tions, trying to seek food and to escape discipline. All think only of Smo- 
lensk, where they hope to recover. During the last few days many soldiers 
have been observed to throw away their cartridges and muskets. In such a 
condition of affairs, whatever your further plans may be, the interests of 
your majesty's service make it essential to muster the army at Smolensk, 
and to rid them of ineffectives, such as cavalrymen without horses, as well 
as of superfluous baggage and a part of the artillery, which is now out of 
proportion with the numbers of the effective army. Supplies and some days' 
rest are essential: the soldiers are exhausted by hunger and fatigue; during 
the last few days many have died by the roadside or in the bivouacs. This 
state of things is growing continually worse, and if steps are not quickly 
taken for averting the danger, we shall be exposed to the risk of being 
unable to control the army in the event of a battle. 

'November 9. Thirty versts from Smolensk.' 

After struggling into Smolensk, the promised land of their dreams, the 
French killed one another fighting over the food there, socked their own 
stores, and when everything had been pillaged, they ran on further. All 
hastened on, not knowing whither or for what end they were going; Lea r 
of all knew that great genius, Napoleon, since there was no one to give him 
orders. But still he and those about him clung to their old habits: wrote 
commands, letters, reports, orders of the day; called each other your 
majesty, mon frere, Prince d'Eckmiihl, roi de Naples, and so on. But the 
orders and reports were all on paper: no attempt was made 60 carr) them 
out, because they could not be carried out. And in spite of their pretence ol 
caring for the army, each was thinking only of himself, and how to make 
his escape as quickly as possible to safety. 

The actions of the Russian and French armies during the retreat from 
Moscow to the Niemen resemble a game of Russian blindmana buff, m 



506 WAR AND PEACE 

which there are two players, both with their eyes bandaged, and one rings 
a bell at intervals to let the other know of his whereabouts. At first he rings 
his bell with no fear of his opponent; but when he begins to find himself in 
a difficult position, he runs away as noiselessly as he can from his opponent, 
and often supposing he is running away from him, walks straight into his 
arms. 

From Smolensk, there were a number of different roads for the French 
to choose from; and one would have thought that, as they stayed there four 
days, the French might have thought out some advantageous plan, and 
undertaken something new. Yet the crowds of them ran back, with no 
manoeuvres or plans, along their old road— the worst one— by Krasnoe, along 
their beaten track. 

In front of all fled the Emperor, then the kings, then the dukes. The 
Russian army, supposing Napoleon would take the road to the right beyond 
the Dnieper— the only sensible course— turned also to the right, and came 
out on the high road at Krasnoe. And here, just as in the game of blindman, 
the French came bearing straight down on our vanguard. Then for three 
days, the separate parts of the French army passed, as it were, through the 
lines of the Russian army. They all abandoned one another, abandoned their 
heavy baggage, their artillery, and half their men, and fled, making semi- 
circles to the right to get round the Russians by night. 

Playing the same game of blindman with the pursuing army at Berezina, 
they were thrown into confusion, many were drowned, many surrendered, 
but those that got across the river, fled on. Whoever could, ran away too, 
and those who could not surrendered or died. 

One might have supposed that the historians, who ascribe the actions of 
the masses to the will of one man, would have found it impossible to explain 
the retreat of the French on their theory. 

But no! Mountains of volumes have been written upon this campaign, 
and in all of them we find accounts of Napoleon's masterly arrangements 
and deeply considered plans; of the strategy with which the soldiers were 
led, and the military genius showed by the marshals. 

The retreat from Maley Yaroslavets, when nothing hindered Napoleon 
from passing through a country abundantly furnished with supplies, and 
the parallel road was open to him, along which Kutuzov afterwards pursued 
him— this wholly unnecessary return by a road through devastated country 
is explained to us as due to various sagacious considerations. Similar reasons 
are given us for Napoleon's retreat from Smolensk to Krasnoe. 

And lastly, the final departure of the great Emperor from his heroic army 
is represented by the historians as something great— a stroke of genius. 

Greatness would appear to exclude all possibility of applying standards of 
right and wrong. For the great man— nothing is wrong. There is no atrocity 
which could be made a ground for blaming a great man. 

l C 9 est grand! 9 cry the historians; and at that word good and bad have 
ceased to be, and there are only ''grand 9 and not ''grand. 9 l Grand 9 is equiva- 
lent to good, and not ''grand 9 to bad. To be grand is to their notions the 



WAR AND PEACE 507 

characteristic of certain exceptional creatures, called by them heroes. And 
Napoleon, wrapping himself in his warm fur cloak and hurrying home away 
from men, who were not only his comrades, but (in his belief) brought 
there by his doing, feels que c'est grand; and his soul is content. 

And the whole world has gone on for fifty years repeating: Sublime! 
Grand! Napoleon the Great. 

And it never enters any one's head that to admit a greatness immeasurable 
by the rule of right and wrong is but to accept one's own nothingness. 
For us, with the rule of right and wrong given us by Christ, there is 
nothing for which we have no standard. And there is no greatness where 
there is not simplicity, goodness, and truth. 



PART XV 



After Prince Andrey's death, Natasha and Princess Marya both felt crushed 
in spirit. They closed their eyes under the menacing cloud of death thar 
hovered about them, and dared not look life in the face. 

But pure and perfect sorrow is as impossible as pure and perfect joy. 
Princess Marya was the first to be called back to life from that world of 
mourning in which she lived for the first fortnight. She received letters 
from her relations which had to be answered; the room in which Niko- 
lushka had been put was damp, and he had begun to cough. Alpatitch came 
to Yaroslavl with accounts. He had suggestions to make, and advised 
Princess Marya to move to Moscow; the house was uninjured, and only 
needed some trifling repairs. Life would not stand still, and she had to live. 

One day towards the end of December, Natasha, thin and pale in a black 
woollen gown, with her hair fastened up in a careless coil, sat perched up in 
the corner of her sofa, her fingers nervously crumpling and smoothing out 
the ends of her sash, while she gazed at the corner of the door. 

She was inwardly gazing into that world where she knew he was. And 
now, now, she thought, she was just penetrating the mystery . . . But at 
that instant, when the incomprehensible, it seemed, was being unveiled 
before her eyes, a loud rattle at the door handle broke with a painful shock 
on her hearing. Her maid rushed abruptly into the room. 

'Come to your papa, make haste,' Dunyasha said, with a strange, excited 
expression. 'A misfortune . . . Pyotr Ilyitch ... a letter,' she gasped out, 
sobbing. 

As Natasha went into the drawing-room, her father came out of the 
countess's room. His face was puckered up and wet with tears. 

'Pet . . . Petya . . . Go, go in, she's calling . . .' And sobbing like a 
child, he tottered with feeble legs to a chair, and almost dropped on to it, 
hiding his face in his hands. 

Natasha felt a poignant anguish, but with the pain she felt an instant 
release from the seal that shut her out of life. At the sight of her father, 
and the sound of a fearful, husky scream from her mother through the 
door, she instantly forgot herself and her own sorrow. 

She ran up to her father, but he feebly motioned her towards her mother's 
door. 

'Natasha, Natasha! . . .' the countess was screaming. 'It's not true, nor 
true . . .' 

508 



WAR AND PEACE 509 

Natasha had no recollection of how she spent that day and that night, and 
the following day and the following night. She did not sleep, and did not 
leave her mother's side. 

On the third night the countess was quiet for a few minutes, and Natasha 
closed her eyes, her head propped on the arm of the chair. The bedstead 
creaked; Natasha opened her eyes. The countess was sitting up in bed, and 
talking softly^ 

'How glad I am you have come home. You are tired, won't you have 
tea?' Natasha went up to her. 'You have grown so handsome and manly,' 
the countess went on, taking her daughter's hand. 

'Mamma, what are you saying . . . ?' 

'Natasha, he is gone.' And the countess for the first time began to weep. 

For three weeks Natasha never left her mother's side, slept on a lounge 
in her room, made her drink and eat. Sonya and the count tried to take 
Natasha's place, but they could not. 

One day Princess Marya noticed that Natasha was shivering with a 
feverish chill, and brought her away to her own room, and tucked her up 
in bed in the middle of the day. Natasha was physically so weak that every 
one was continually talking about her health, and sometimes she was sud- 
denly seized, not simply by a dread of death, but by a dread of sickness, of 
ill-health, of losing her good looks. Sometimes she examined her bare arm, 
marvelling at its thinness, or peeped in the looking-glass in the morning at 
her pinched face, and was touched by its piteous look. 

One day she ran upstairs quickly, and was painfully short of breath. 
Immediately she made some pretext for going down again, and ran upstairs 
again, and put herself to the test. 

Towards the end of January Princess Marya set off for Moscow, and the 
count insisted on Natasha going with her to consult the doctors. 

After the engagement at Vyazma, where Kutuzov could not restrain his 
troops in their desire to break through, to cut off and all the rest of it, the 
further march of the flying French, and of the Russians flying after them, 
continued as far as Krasnoe without a battle. 

The rapidity of the Russian pursuit had as disintegrating an effect on the 
Russian army as the flight of the French had on their army. The only 
difference was that the Russian army moved at its own will, free from the 
menace of annihilation that hung over the French, and that the sick and 
stragglers of the French were left in the hands of their enemy, while Rus- 
sian stragglers were at home among their own people. 

Kutuzov felt and knew, as every Russian soldier felt it, that the French 
were vanquished, that their foes were in flight, and that they must see 
them off. But at the same time he felt with his soldiers, as me man, all the 
sufferings of that march, unheard of at such speed and in such weather. 

Kutuzov is conceived of by the historians as a nondescript, pitiful sort of 
creature, and whenever they speak of him in the year 1812, they seem I 
little ashamed of him- And Kutuzov never talked of 'forty centuries look 



510 WAR AND PEACE 

ing down from the Pyramids/ of the sacrifices he was making for the 
fatherland, of what he meant to do or had done. He did not as a rule talk 
about himself, played no sort of part, always seemed the plainest and most 
ordinary man, and said the plainest and most ordinary things. He wrote 
letters to his daughters and to Madame de Stael, read novels, liked the com- 
pany of pretty women, made jokes with the generals, the officers, and the 
soldiers, and never contradicted the people, who tried to prove anything 
to him. He frequently uttered words, which were quite meaningless— the 
first words that occurred to his mind. 

But he never once throughout all his career uttered a single word which 
was inconsistent with the sole aim for the attainment of which he was 
working all through the war. With obvious unwillingness, with bitter con- 
viction that he would not be understood, he more than once, under the 
most different circumstances, gave expression to his real thought. 

He first differed from all about him after the battle of Borodino, which 
he alone persisted in calling a victory, and this view he continued to 
assert verbally and in reports and to his dying day. He alone said that 
the loss of Moscow is not the loss of Russia. In answer to the overtures 
for peace, his reply was: There can be no peace, for such is the people's 
will. He alone during the retreat of the French said that all our manoeuvres 
are unnecessary; that everything is being done of itself better than we could 
desire; that he wouldn't give one Russian for ten Frenchmen. And he, this 
intriguing courtier, as we are told, who lied to Araktcheev to pro- 
pitiate the Tsar, he alone dared to face the Tsar's displeasure by telling 
him at Vilna that to carry the war beyond the frontier would be mischie- 
vous and useless. 

But words alone would be no proof that he grasped the significance of 
events at the time. His actions— all without the slightest deviation— were 
directed toward the one threefold aim: first, to concentrate all his forces 
to strike a blow at the French; secondly, to defeat them; and thirdly, to 
drive them out of Russia, alleviating as far as was possible the sufferings 
of the people and the soldiers in doing so. 

The 5th of November was the first day of the so-called battle of Krasnoe. 

Many had been the blunders and disputes among the generals, who had 
not reached their proper places, many the contradictory orders carried 
to them by adjutants, but towards evening it was clear that the enemy 
were everywhere in flight, and that there would not and could not be a 
battle. 

Seven thousand French prisoners had been taken that day, and all along 
the road they met parties of them, crowding to warm themselves round 
the camp-fires. Not far from Dobroe they heard a loud hum of talk from 
an immense crowd of tattered prisoners, bandaged and wrapped up in rags 
of all sorts, standing in the road near a long row of unharnessed French 
cannons. At the approach of the commander-in-chief the buzz of talk died 
away, and all eyes were fixed upon Kutuzov, who moved slowly along 
the road, wearing a white cap with a red band, and a wadded overcoat, 



WAR AND PEACE 511 

that set in a hunch on his round shoulders. One of the generals began 
explaining to Kutuzov where the prisoners and the guns had been taken. 

Kutuzov did not hear the general's words. He screwed up his eyes with 
an air of displeasure, and gazed intently at the figures of the prisoners, who 
presented a particularly pitiable appearance. The majority of the French 
soldiers were disfigured by frost-bitten cheeks and noses, and almost all of 
them had red, swollen, and streaming eyes. 

One group of Frenchmen was standing close by the road, and two sol- 
diers, one with his face covered with sores, were tearing at a piece of raw 
meat with their hands. There was something bestial and horrible in the 
cursory glance they cast on the approaching generals. 

'What do you say?' Kutuzov asked the general who tried to draw the 
commander-in-chief's attention to the French flags, set up in front of 
the Preobrazhensky regiment. 

'Ah, the flags!' said Kutuzov. Thousands of eyes were gazing at him 
from all sides, waiting for his words. 

He came to a standstill, sighed heavily and closed his eyes. Then with 
obvious reluctance, he raised his head and began to speak. 

'I thank you all!' he said, addressing the soldiers, and then again turn- 
ing to the officers. In the deep stillness that prevailed all round him, his 
slowly articulated words were distinctly audible: 'I thank you all for your 
hard and faithful service. The victory is complete, and Russia will not 
forget you. Your glory will be for ever!' He paused, looking about him. 

'Hurrah-rah-rah!' thousands of voices roared. 

'And now, brothers . . .' he said, when the shouts had died away. 

And all at once his face and expression changed: it was not the com- 
mander-in-chief speaking now, but a simple, aged man, who plainly wanted 
to say something most important now to his comrades. 

'And now, brothers. I know it's hard for you, but there's no help for it! 
Have a little patience; it won't last much longer. We will see our visitors 
off, and then we will rest. The Tsar won't forget your services. It's hard 
for you, but still you are at home; while they-you see what they have 
come to,' he said, pointing to the prisoners. 'Worse than the lowest beg- 
gars. While they were strong, we did not spare ourselves, but now we can 
even spare them. They too are men. Eh, lads?' 

He looked about him. And in the unflinching, respectfully wondering 
eyes staring persistently at him, he read sympathy with his words. His 
face grew brighter and brighter with the gentle smile of old age, that 
brought clusters of wrinkles at the corners of h' mouth ami his eyes. 

'But after all is said and done, who asked them to come here? It serves 
them right, the b — b ,' he said suddenly, lifting his head. And swing- 
ing his riding-whip, he rode off at a gallop, accompanied b gleeful guffaws 
from the men as they moved out of rank. 

When the Tsar said to the officers gathered about him: You have EMM 
only saved Russia, you have saved Europe,' everv one knew at once that 
the war was not over. 



512 WAR AND PEACE 

Kutuzov alone refused to see this, and frankly gave it as his opinion 
that no fresh war could improve the position of Russia, or add to her 
glory; that it could but weaken her position, and cast her down from that 
high pinnacle of glory at which in his view Russia was standing now. He 
tried to show the Tsar the impossibility of levying fresh troops, and talked 
of the hardships the people were suffering, the possibility of failure, and 
so on. 

Such being his attitude on the subject, the commander-in-chief could 
naturally be looked upon only as a hindrance and a drag on the progress 
of the coming campaign. The war of 1812, in addition to its national sig- 
nificance, dear to every Russian heart, was to take a new European char- 
acter. 

The movement of men from west to east was to be followed by a move- 
ment from east to west, and this new war needed a new representative, 
with other aims and other qualities, and moved by impulses different from 
Kutuzov's. Kutuzov did not see what was meant by Europe, the balance 
of power, and Napoleon. He could not understand all that. 

After the enemy had been annihilated, Russia had been delivered and 
raised to the highest pinnacle of her glory, the representative of the Rus- 
sian people, a Russian of the Russians, had no more left to do. Nothing 
was left for the representative of the national war but to die. And he 
did die. 

Pierre only felt the full strain of the physical hardships and privations he 
had suffered as a prisoner, when they were over. After he had been rescued, 
he went to Orel, and two days after getting there, as he was preparing to 
start for Kiev, he fell ill and spent three months laid up at Orel. He was 
suffering, so the doctors said, from a bilious fever. Although they treated 
him by letting blood and giving him drugs, he recovered. 

Everything that had happened to Pierre from the time of his rescue up 
to his illness had left hardly any impression on his mind. He had only a 
memory of dark grey weather, sometimes rainy and sometimes sunshiny, 
of internal physical aches, of pain in his feet and his side. He remembered 
a general impression of the misery and suffering of men, remembered the 
worrying curiosity of officers and generals, who questioned him about his 
imprisonment, the trouble he had to get horses and a conveyance; and more 
than all he remembered his own dulness of thought and of feeling all that 
time. 

On the day of his rescue he saw the dead body of Petya Rostov. The 
same day he learned that Prince Andrey had lived for more than a month 
after the battle of Borodino, and had only a short time before died at 
Yaroslavl in the Rostovs' house. The same day Denisov, who had told 
Pierre this piece of news, happened to allude in conversation to the death 
of Ellen, supposing Pierre to have been long aware of it. All this had at 
the time seemed to Pierre only strange. He felt that he could not take 
in all the bearings of these facts. 



WAR AND PEACE 513 

During his convalescence Pierre could only gradually become accustomed 
to the idea that there was no one to drive him on to-morrow, that no one 
would take his warm bed from him, and that he was quite sure of getting 
his dinner, and tea, and supper. But for a long while afterwards he was 
always in his dreams surrounded by his conditions as a prisoner. 

And only in the same gradual way did Pierre grasp the meaning of the 
news he had heard since his escape: of the death of Prince Andrey, of the 
death of his wife, and of the overthrow of the French. 

The joyful sense of freedom— that full, inalienable freedom inherent in 
man, of which he had first had a consciousness at the first halting-place 
outside Moscow— filled Pierre's soul during his convalescence. He was sur- 
prised that this inner freedom, independent as it was of all external cir- 
cumstances, was now as it were decked out in a luxury, a superfluity of 
external freedom. He was alone in a strange town without acquaintances. 
No one made any demands on him; no one sent him anywhere. He had 
all he wanted; the thought of his wife, that had in old days been a continual 
torture to him, was no more, since she herself was no more. 

'Ah, how happy I am! how splendid it is!' he said to himself, when a 
cleanly covered table was moved up to him, with savoury-smelling broth, 
or when he got into his soft, clean bed at night, or when the thought 
struck him that his wife and the French were no more. 'Ah, how good it 
is! how splendid!' And from old habit he asked himself the question, 
< Well, and what then? what am I going to do?' And at once he answered 
himself: 'I am going to live. Ah, how splendid it is!' 

Pierre was hardly changed in his external habits. In appearance he was 
just the same as before. He was, as he had always been, absent-minded, 
and seemed preoccupied with something of his own, something apart from 
what was before his eyes. The difference was that in old days, he had 
seemed a good-hearted man, but unhappy. And so people had unconsciously 
held a little aloof from him. Now a smile of joy in life was continually 
playing about his mouth, and his eyes were bright with sympathy for 
others, and the question: Were they all as happy as he? And people felt 
at ease in his presence. 

In old days he had talked a great deal, and had got hot when he talked, 
and he had listened very little. Now he was rarely carried away in con- 
versation, and knew how to listen, so that people were very ready to tell 
him the inmost secrets of their hearts. 

His cousin the old princess, who liked Pierre less than before, now that 
she felt herself under obligation to him, had come to Orel with the inten- 
tion of proving to him that in spite of his ingratitude she felt it her duty 
to nurse him, but after a short time she felt, to her own surprise and 
annoyance, that she was growing fond of him. Pierre di 1 nothing to try 
and win his cousin's favour; he simply looked at her with curiosity. In 
old days she had felt that there was mockery and indifference in his eves, 
and she had shrunk into herself before him, as she did before other people, 
and had shown him only her aggressive side. Now she felt on the COO- 



514 WAR AND PEACE 

trary as though he were delving into the most secret recesses of her life. 
It was at first mistrustfully, and then with gratitude, that she let him see 
now the latent good side of her character. 

The most artful person could not have stolen into the princess's confi- 
dence more cunningly, by arousing her recollections of the best time of 
her youth, and showing sympathy with them. And yet all Pierre's artful- 
ness consisted in seeking to please himself by drawing out human qualities 
in the bitter, hard, and, in her own way, proud princess. 

'Yes, he is a very, very good-hearted fellow when he is not under bad 
influence, but under the influence of people like me,' thought the princess. 

The doctor who was attending Pierre, and came to see him every day, 
though he thought it his duty as a doctor to pose as a man every minute 
of whose time is of value for suffering humanity, used to sit on with him 
for hours together, repeating his favourite anecdotes and observations on 
the peculiarities of patients in general, and of ladies in particular. 

'Yes, it's a pleasure to talk to a man like that; it's not what we are used 
to in the provinces,' he would say. 

In practical affairs Pierre suddenly felt now that he had the centre 
of gravity that he had lacked in former days. In the past every money 
question, especially requests for money, to which as a very wealthy man 
he was particularly liable, had reduced him to a state of helpless agita- 
tion and perplexity. 'Ought I to give or not to give?' he used to ask him- 
self. 'I have money and he needs it. But some one else needs it more. Who 
needs it more? And perhaps both are impostors?' And of all these sup- 
positions he had in old days found no satisfactory solution. 

Now to his own surprise he found he unhesitatingly knew what he ought 
to do and what he ought not to do. The first application of that new power 
within him was in the case of a prisoner, a French colonel, who called on 
him, talked very freely of his own great exploits, and finally delivered 
himself of a request that was more like a demand, that he should give 
him four thousand francs to send to his wife and children. Pierre refused 
to do so without the slightest difficulty or effort, and wondered himself 
afterwards that it had been so easy and simple to do what had in old days 
seemed so hopelessly difficult. 

His head steward came to him in Orel, and with him Pierre went into 
a general review of his financial position. The fire of Moscow had cost 
Pierre, by the steward's account, about two millions. 

The chief steward to console him for these losses presented a calcula- 
tion he had made, that Pierre's income, far from being diminished, would 
be positively increased if he were to refuse to pay the debts left by the 
countess— which he could not be forced to pay— and if he were not to 
restore his Moscow houses and the villa near Moscow. 

'Yes, yes, that's true,' said Pierre, with a beaming smile. 'I don't need 
any of them. I have been made much richer by the destruction of the city.' 

But in January Savelitch came from Moscow, talked to him of the 
position of the city, of the estimate the architect had sent in for restoring 



WAR AND PEACE 515 

the house, and the villa in the suburbs, speaking of it as a settled matter. 
At the same time Pierre received letters from Prince Vassily and other 
acquaintances in Petersburg, in which his wife's debts were mentioned. 
And Pierre decided that the steward's plan that he had liked so much was 
not the right one, and that he must go to Petersburg to wind up his wife's 
affairs, and must rebuild in Moscow. Why he ought to do so, he could not 
have said; but it had to be so. 

During the whole period of his convalescence in Orel, Pierre had en- 
joyed the feeling of joyful freedom and life. But when he found himself 
on this journey on the open road, that feeling was intensified. All the 
people he saw— the driver, the overseer of the posting station, the peasants 
on the road, or in the village— all had a new significance for him. 

Just as it is difficult to explain why the ants hurry back to a scattered 
ant-hill, some dragging away from it bits of refuse, eggs, and corpses, while 
others run back again, and what is their object in crowding together, 
overtaking one another, fighting with each other, so it would be hard to 
give the reasons that induced the Russians, after the departure of the 
French, to flock back to the place which had been known as Moscow. But 
just as looking at the ants hurrying about a ruined ant-heap, one can see 
by the tenacity, the energy, and the multitude of the busy insects that 
though all else is utterly destroyed, there is left something indestructible 
and immaterial that was the whole strength of the colony, so too Moscow 
in the month of October, though without its governing authorities, with- 
out its churches, without its holy things, without its wealth and its houses, 
was still the same Moscow as it had been in August. Everything was 
shattered except something immaterial, but mighty and indestructible. 

Within a week there were fifteen thousand persons in Moscow, within 
a fortnight twenty-five thousand; and so it went on. The number went on 
mounting and mounting till by the autumn of 1813 it had reached a figure 
exceeding the population of the city in 181 2. 

On all sides there were new houses being built, or old half-burnt ones 
being repaired. Tradesmen carried on their business in booths. Cook-shops 
and taverns were opened in fire-blackened houses. The clergy held services 
in many churches that had escaped the fire. Church goods that had been 
plundered were restored as offerings. 

At the end of January Pierre arrived in Moscow and settled in the lodge 
of his mansion, as that had escaped the fire. Every one was triumphant at 
victory; the ruined and reviving city was bubbling over with life. Every 
one was glad to see Pierre; everybody was eager to sec him, and to as* 
him about all he had seen. 

The third day after his arrival in Moscow he learnt firom the D ruber 
skoys that Princess Marya was in Moscow, living in her own house in 
Vosdvizhenka, which had escaped the fire; and he went to call upon her 
the same evening. 

In a room lighted by a single candle, he found the princess, and some 



516 WAR AND PEACE 

one with her in a black dress. Pierre recollected that the princess had 
always had lady-companions of some sort with her, but who those com- 
panions were, and what they were like, he did not remember. 'That is 
one of her companions,' he thought. 

The princess rose swiftly to meet him, and held out her hand. 

'Yes,' she said, scrutinising his altered face, after he had kissed her 
hand; 'so this is how we meet again. He often talked of you at the last,' 
she said, turning her eyes from Pierre to the companion. 

'Only imagine, I knew nothing about him,' he said. 'I believed he had 
been killed. All I have heard has been through others, at third-hand. I 
only know that he fell in with the Rostovs. . . . What a strange stroke 
of destiny!' 

Pierre talked rapidly, eagerly. He vaguely felt that this lady-companion 
in the black dress was a good, kind, friendly creature, who need be no 
hindrance to his talking freely to Princess Marya. 

But as he uttered the last words about the Rostovs, Princess Marya's eyes 
shifted from Pierre's face to the face of the lady in the black dress, and 
she said: 

'You don't recognise her?' 

'It cannot be,' he thought. 'That stern, thin, pale face that looks so much 
older? It cannot be she. It is only a reminder of it.' 

But at that moment Princess Marya said, 'Natasha!' 

And when she smiled, there could be no doubt. It was Natasha, and he 
loved her. 

In that first minute Pierre betrayed to her and to Princess Marya, and 
most of all to himself, the secret of which he had been himself unaware. 
He flushed joyfully, and with agonising distress. He stammered in his 
speech, and stopped short in the middle of a sentence. 

Pierre had not noticed Natasha because he had never expected to see 
her here; but he had not recognised her because the change that had taken 
place in her since he had seen her was immense. She had grown thin and 
pale. But it was not that that made her unrecognisable. No one would have 
recognised her at the moment when he entered, because when he first 
glanced at her there was no trace of a smile in the eyes that in old days 
had always beamed with a suppressed smile of the joy of life. 

'She has come to stay with me,' said Princess Marya. 'The count and the 
countess will be here in a few days. The countess is in a terrible state. 
But Natasha herself had to see the doctors. They made her come away 
with me.' 

'Yes. Is there a family without its own sorrow?' said Pierre, turning to 
Natasha. 'You know it happened the very day w T e were rescued. I saw him. 
What can one say, or think, to give comfort?' said Pierre. 'Nothing.' 

'In these days it would be hard to live without faith . . .' said Princess 
Marya. 

'Yes, yes. That is true, indeed,' Pierre put in hurriedly. 

Pierre made haste to address Princess Marya again with a question about 



WAR AND PEACE 517 

the last days of his friend's life. Pierre's embarrassment had by now almost 
disappeared, but all his former freedom had vanished too. There was now 
a judge criticising every word, every action of his; a judge whose opinion 
was of greater consequence to him than the verdict. As he talked now he 
was considering the impression his words were making on Natasha. 

Princess Marya began telling Pierre of the position in which she had 
found her brother. 'Yes, yes, . . .' said Pierre. 

'What a happy thing that he saw you again,' he said to Natasha, turning 
suddenly to her. 

Natasha's face quivered. 

'Yes, it was a great happiness,' she said in a low, deep voice; 'for me 
it was certainly a great happiness.' 

'All I wanted was to be with him,' she said. 

Dessalle's voice was heard at the door asking whether Nikolushka might 
come in to say good-night. 'And that it all, all . . .' said Natasha. She got 
up quickly at the moment Nikolushka was coming in, and almost rushed 
out of the room. 

Pierre gazed at the door by which she had gone out, and wondered why 
he felt suddenly alone in the wide world. He would have taken leave, but 
Princess Marya would not let him go. 

'No, Natasha and I often do not go to bed till past two, please stay a 
little longer. We will have supper.' 

The big, lighted-up dining-room dispelled the shadows of the past. 

'Tell us about yourself,' said Princess Marya; 'such incredibly marvel- 
lous stories are being told about you.' 

'Yes,' answered Pierre, with the gentle smile of irony that had now be- 
come habitual with him. 'I myself am told of marvels that I never dreamed 
of. Altogether I have noticed that to be an interesting person is a very 
easy position (I am now an interesting person); people invite me and then 
tell me all about it.' 

'We have been told that you lost two millions in Moscow. Is that true?' 

'Oh, I am three times as rich,' said Pierre. In spite of the strain on his 
fortune, Pierre still said that he had become three times as rich. 

'What I have undoubtedly gained,' he said, 'is freedom . . .' he was 
beginning seriously. 

'Tell me, you had not heard of the countess's death when you stayed 
on in Moscow?' said Princess Marya; and she flushed crimson at once, 
conscious that in putting this question to him after his mention of 'free- 
dom,' she was ascribing a significance to his words which was possibly 
not intended. 

'No,' answered Pierre. 'We were not an exemplary couple,' he said 
quickly, glancing at Natasha. 'But her death affected me greatly. When 
two people quarrel, both are always in fault. And one becomes terribly 
aware of one's shortcomings towards any one who is no more. And then 
such a death . . . apart from friends and consolation. I felt very sorry 



518 WAR AND PEACE 

for her,' he concluded, and noticed with satisfaction a glad look of approval 
on Natasha's face. 

'And so you are once more an eligible parti? said Princess Marya. 

Pierre flushed suddenly crimson; and for a long while he tried not to 
look at Natasha. When he did venture to glance at her, her face was cold 
and severe, even, he fancied, disdainful. 

'But did you really see and talk to Napoleon, as we have been told?' said 
Princess Marya. 

Pierre laughed. 

'Not once, never. Every one always imagines that to be a prisoner is 
equivalent to being on a visit to Napoleon. I never saw, never even heard 
anything about him. I was in much lower company.' 

'But it is true that you stayed behind to kill Napoleon?' Natasha asked 
him with a slight smile. 'I guessed that at the time when we met you by 
the Suharev Tower; do you remember?' 

Pierre owned that it was so; and from that question was led on by 
Princess Marya's, and still more by Natasha's, questions to give a detailed 
account of his adventures. 

At first he told his story with that tone of gentle irony that he always 
had now towards men and especially towards himself. But as he came to 
describe the horrors and sufferings he had seen, he was drawn on. 

Princess Marya looked from Pierre to Natasha with a gentle smile. 
Natasha watched Pierre, never taking her eyes off him, and it was evident 
that she understood, not only what he said, but also what he would have 
liked to say and could not express in words. The espisode of the child 
ind of the woman in whose defence he was taken prisoner, Pierre de- 
scribed in this way. 'It was an awful scene, children abandoned, some in 
the midst of the fire . . . Children were dragged out before my eyes . . . 
and women, who had their things pulled off them, earrings torn off . . .' 

Pierre flushed and hesitated. 'Then a patrol came up and all who were 
not pillaging, all the men, that is, they took prisoner. And me with them.' 

'I am sure you are not telling us all; I am sure you did something,' said 
Natasha, and after a moment's pause, 'something good.' 

Pierre went on with his story. When he came to the execution, he would 
have passed over the horrible details of it, but Natasha insisted on his 
leaving nothing out. 

Pierre was beginning to tell them about Karataev; he had risen from the 
table and was walking up and down, Natasha following him with her eyes. 

'No,' he said, stopping short in his story, 'you cannot understand what 
I learned from that illiterate man.' 

'No, no, tell us,' said Natasha. 'Where is he now?' 

'He was killed almost before my eyes.' 

And Pierre began to describe the latter part of their retreat, Karataev's 
illness and then his death. 

Pierre experienced now in telling it all to Natasha that rare happiness 
given to men by women when they listen to them. Princess Marya under- 



WAR AND PEACE 519 

stood his story and sympathised with him, but she was seeing now some- 
thing else that absorbed all her attention. She saw the possibility of love and 
happiness between Natasha and Pierre. 

It was three o'clock in the night. The footmen, with melancholy and 
severe faces, came in with fresh candles, but no one noticed them. It did 
not strike any of them that it was three o'clock in the night, and time to 
be in bed. 

'They say sufferings are misfortunes,' said Pierre. 'But if at once, this 
minute, I was asked, would I remain what I was before I was taken 
prisoner, or go through it all again, I should say, for God's sake let me 
rather be a prisoner and eat horseflesh again. We imagine that as soon as 
we are torn out of our habitual path all is over, but it is only the begin- 
ning of something new and good. As long as there is life, there is happi- 
ness. There is a great deal, a great deal before us. That I say to you,' he 
said, turning to Natasha. 

'Yes, yes,' she said, answering something altogether different, 'and I 
too would ask for nothing better than to go through it all again.' 

Pierre got up, and took leave. 

'Do you know, Marie,' said Natasha, with a mischievous smile, such as 
Princess Marya had not seen for a long while on her face, 'he has become 
so clean and smooth and fresh; as though he had just come out of a moral 
bath. Isn't it so?' 

'Yes,' said Princess Marya. 'He has gained a great deal. I can understand 
how he' (Prince Andrey) 'cared for no one else as he did for him,' said 
Princess Marya. 

'Yes, and he is so different from him. They say men are better friend* 
when they are utterly different. That must be true; he is not a bit like him 
in anything, is he?' 

'Yes, and he is such a splendid fellow.' 

'Well, good-night,' answered Natasha. And the same mischievous smile 
lingered a long while as though forgotten on her face. 

Several days previously Pierre had fixed on the following Friday as the 
date on which he would set off to Petersburg. When he waked up next 
day it was Thursday, and Savelitch came to him for orders about packing 
the things for the journey. 

'To Petersburg? What is Petersburg? Who is in Petersburg?' he un- 
consciously asked, though only of himself. 

At breakfast, Pierre told his cousin that he had been the previous 
evening at Princess Marya's, and had found there-could she fancy \\ horn- 
Natasha Rostov. 

The princess looked as though she saw nothing extraordinary in that 

fact. 

'You know her?' asked Pierre. 

'I have seen the princess,' she answered, 'and I had heard they were 
making a match between her and young Rostov. That would be I \ei\ 
fine thing for the Rostovs; I am told they are utterly ruined; 



520 WAR AND PEACE 

'No, I meant, do you know Natasha Rostov?' 

'I heard at the time all about that story. Very sad.' 

Pierre went to Princess Marya's to dinner. As he drove through the 
streets between the charred wrecks of houses, he admired the beauty 
of those ruins. The chimneys of stoves, and the tumbledown walls of 
houses stretched in long rows, hiding one another, all through the burnt 
quarters of the town, and recalled to him the picturesque ruins of the 
Rhine and of the Colosseum. The sledge-drivers and men on horseback, 
the carpenters at work on the frames of the houses, the hawkers and shop- 
keepers all looked at Pierre with cheerful, beaming faces, and seemed to 
him to say: 'Oh, here he is! We shall see what comes of it.' 

Pierre dined, would have spent the whole evening, but Princess Marya 
was going to vespers, and Pierre went with them. Next day Pierre arrived 
early, dined with them, and stayed the whole evening. Although Princess 
Marya and Natasha were obviously glad to see their visitor, and although 
the whole interest of Pierre's life was now centred in that house, by the 
evening they had said all they had to say. Pierre stayed so late that evening 
that Princess Marya and Natasha exchanged glances, plainly wondering 
whether he would not soon go. Pierre saw that, began to feel awkward, 
but still he sat on because he could not get up and go. 

Princess Marya, foreseeing no end to it, was the first to get up, and 
complaining of a headache, she began saying good-night. 

'So you are going to-morrow to Petersburg?' she said. 

'No, I am not going,' said Pierre hurriedly, with surprise and a sort of 
resentment in his tone. 'No . . . yes, to Petersburg. To-morrow, perhaps; 
but I won't say good-bye. I shall come to see if you have any commissions 
to give me,' he added, standing before Princess Marya, turning very red, 
and not taking leave. 

Natasha gave him her hand and retired. Princess Marya, on the contrary, 
instead of going away, sank into an armchair, and with her luminous, 
deep eyes looked sternly and intently at Pierre. 

As soon as Natasha had gone, all Pierre's confusion and awkwardness 
instantly vanished, and were replaced by excited eagerness. 

'Yes, I wanted to tell you,' he said to Princess Marya. 'Princess, help me. 
What am I to do? I know I am not worthy of her; I know that it is 
impossible to talk of it now. But I want to be a brother to her. No, not 
that, I don't, I can't . . .' He paused and passed his hands over his face and 
eyes. 'It's like this,' he went on, making an evident effort to speak coher- 
ently. 'I don't know since when I have loved her. But I have loved her 
alone, only her, all my life, and I love her so that I cannot imagine life 
without her. I cannot bring myself to ask for her hand now; but the thought 
that, perhaps, she might be my wife and my letting slip this opportunity 
. . . opportunity ... is awful. Tell me, what am I to do? Dear princess,' 
he said, after a brief pause, touching her hand as she did not answer. 

'I am thinking of what you have just told me,' answered Princess Marya. 
'This is what I think. You are right that to speak to her of love now . . .' 



WAR AND PEACE 521 

The princess paused. She had meant to say that to speak to her of love 
now was impossible; but she stopped, because she had seen during the last 
three days by the sudden change in Natasha that she would by no means 
be offended if Pierre were to avow his love, that, in fact, it was the one 
thing she desired. 

'To speak to her now is out of the question,' she nevertheless said. 

'But what am I to do?' 

'Trust the matter to me,' said Princess Marya. 'I know that she loves . . . 
that she will love you,' Princess Marya corrected herself. 

'What makes you think so? You think so? . . .' 

'Yes, I think so,' said Princess Marya, smiling. 'Write to her parents. And 
you should go to Petersburg; it will be better. I will write to you,' she said. 

'To Petersburg? I am to go? Yes, very well, I will go. But I can come 
and see you to-morrow?' 

When Princess Marya returned to her room that night after her inter- 
view with Pierre, Natasha met her on the threshold. 

'He has spoken? Yes? He has spoken?' An expression that begged for- 
giveness for its joy was in Natasha's face. 'I wanted to listen at the door; 
but I knew you would tell me.' 

'What are you crying for? I am very glad for you,' said Princess Marya, 
moved by those tears to complete forgiveness of Natasha's joy. 

'It will not be soon . . . some day. Only think how happy it will be when 
I am his wife and you marry Nikolay!' 

Both were silent. 

'Only why go to Petersburg?' cried Natasha suddenly, and she hastened 
to answer herself. 'No, no; it must be so . . .' 



PART XVI 



The storm-tossed ocean of Europe was subsiding within its shores. It 
seemed to have grown calm; but the mysterious forces moving humanity 
(mysterious, because the laws controlling their action are unknown to us) 
were still at work. Various series of groups of men were joining together 
and separating; the causes were being prepared that would bring about the 
formation and the dissolution of empires and the migrations of peoples. 

The underlying essentially significant feature of the European events of 
the beginning of the present century is the military movement of masses 
of European peoples from west to east, and again from east to west. The 
original movement was that from west to east. That the peoples of the 
west might be able to accomplish the military march upon Moscow, which 
they did accomplish, it was essential first that they should be combined 
in a military group of such a magnitude as to be able to withstand the 
resistance of the military group of the east; second, that they should have 
renounced all their established traditions and habits; and third, that they 
should have at their head a man able to justify in his own name and theirs 
the perpetration of all the deception, robbery, and murder that accompany 
that movement. 

And to start from the French Revolution, that old group of insufficient 
magnitude is broken up; the old habits and traditions are destroyed; step 
by step a group is elaborated of new dimensions, new habits, and new tra- 
ditions; and the man is prepared, who is to stand at the head of the com- 
ing movement, and to take upon himself the whole responsibility of what 
has to be done. 

A man of no convictions, no habits, no traditions, no name, not even a 
Frenchman, by the strangest freaks of chance, as it seems, rises above the 
seething parties of France, and without attaching himself to any one of 
them, advances to a prominent position. 

The incompetence of his colleagues, the weakness and insignificance of 
his opponents, the frankness of the deception, and the dazzling and self- 
confident limitation of the man raise him to the head of the army. The 
brilliant personal qualities of the soldiers of the Italian army, the disin- 
clination to fight of his opponents, and his childish insolence and conceit 
gain him military glory. Innumerable so-called chance circumstances attend 
him everywhere. 

During the wars in Italy he was several times on the verge of destruc- 

522 



WAR AND PEACE 523 

tion, and was every time saved in an unexpected fashion. The Russian 
troops— the very troops which were able to demolish his glory— owing to 
various diplomatic considerations, do not enter Europe until he is there. 

On his return from Italy, he finds the government in Paris in that 
process of dissolution in which all men who are in the government are 
inevitably effaced and nullified. And an escape for him from that peril- 
ous position offers itself in the shape of an aimless, groundless expedition 
to Africa. Again the same so-called chance circumstances accompany him. 
Malta, the impregnable, surrenders without a shot being fired; the most 
ill-considered measures are crowned with success. The enemy's fleet, 
which later on does not let one boat escape it, now lets a whole army 
elude it. In Africa a whole series of outrages is perpetuated on the almost 
unarmed inhabitants. And the men perpetrating these atrocities, and their 
leader most of all, persuade themselves that it is noble, it is glory, that it 
is like Caesar and Alexander of Macedon, and that it is fine. 

That ideal of glory and of greatness, consisting in esteeming nothing 
one does wrong, and glorying in every crime, and ascribing to it an in- 
comprehensible, supernatural value— that ideal, destined to guide this man 
and those connected with him, is elaborated on a grand scale in Africa. 
Whatever he does succeeds. The plague does not touch him. The cruelty 
of murdering his prisoners is not remembered against him. His childishly 
imprudent, groundless, and ignoble departure from Africa, abandoning 
his comrades in misfortune, does him good service; and again the enemy's 
fleet lets him twice slip through their hands. At the moment when, com- 
pletely intoxicated by the success of his crimes and ready for the part he 
has to play, he arrives in Paris entirely without any plan, the disintegration 
of the Republican government, which might have involved him in its ruin 
a year before, has now reached its utmost limit, and his presence, a man 
independent of parties, can now only aid his elevation. 

He has no sort of plan; he is afraid of everything; but all parties clutch 
at him and insist on his support. 

He alone-with the ideal of glory and greatness he has acquired in Italy 
and Egypt, with his frenzy of self-adoration, with his insolence in crime, 
and his frankness in mendacity-he alone can justify what has to be ac- 
complished. 

He is needed for the place that awaits him, and so, almost apart from 
his own volition, and in spite of his uncertainty, the lack of plan, and the 
blunders he commits, he is drawn into a conspiracy that aims at seizing 
power; and that conspiracy is crowned with succc ■;.-.. 

He is dragged into the assembly of the rule-. In alarm he tries to flee, 
believing himself in danger; pretends to faint, says the most senseless thing! 
that should have been his ruin. But the rulers of Franc:, once proud and 
discerning, now feeling their part is over, arc even in m panic-stricken 
than he, and fail to utter the words they should have pronounced to pre- 
serve their power and crush him. 

Though he strains every nerve to fit out an expedition against England, 



524 WAR AND PEACE 

which would unmistakably have led to his ruin, he never puts this project 
into execution, and happens to fall upon the Austrians, who surrender with- 
out a battle. All men, not only the French, but all the countries of Europe 
except England, which takes no part in the events that are to be ac- 
complished, forget their old horror and aversion for his crimes, and now 
recognise the power he has gained by them, acknowledge the title he has 
bestowed upon himself, and accept his ideal of greatness and glory. 

As though practising and preparing themselves for the great movement 
before them, the forces of the west made several dashes— in 1805, 1806, 
1807 and 1809— into the east, growing stronger and more numerous. The 
power of justification of the man at the head of the movement gathers 
more and more force. During the ten years of the preparatory period 
preceding the great movement, this man forms relations with all the 
crowned heads of Europe. The sovereigns of the world, stripped bare 
by him, can oppose no rational ideal to the senseless Napoleonic ideal of 
glory and greatness. They vie with one another in demonstrating to him 
their insignificance. The King of Prussia sends his wife to sue for the 
good graces of the great man; the Emperor of Austria considers it a favour 
for this man to take the daughter of the Kaisers to his bed. The Pope, 
the guardian of the faith of the peoples, uses religion to aid the great man's 
elevation. Napoleon does not so much prepare himself for the part he is 
to play as all around him lead him on to take upon himself the responsibility 
of what is being done and is to be done. 

The invading army flows towards the east and reaches its final goal: 
Moscow. The ancient city is taken; the Russian army surfers greater 
losses than were ever suffered by the opposing armies in the previous wars 
from Austerlitz to Wagram. But all at once, instead of that uninterrupted 
series of successes which had so consistently led him to his destined goal, 
an immense number of circumstances occur of an opposite kind, from the 
cold caught at Borodino to the spark that fired Moscow. 

The invading army flees away, turns back and flees again; and all the 
chances now are consistently not for but against him. 

The commotion among the peoples begins to subside. The waves of the 
great tempest begin to abate, and eddies begin to be formed about the 
calmer surface where diplomatists are busy, fancying the calm is their 
work. 

Natasha's marriage to Bezuhov, which took place in 181 3, was the last 
happy event in the family of the old Rostovs. Count Ilya Andreivitch died 
the same year; and as is always the case with the death of the father the 
family was broken up. 

The events of the previous year: the burning of Moscow and the flight 
from that city; the death of Prince Andrey and Natasha's despair; the 
death of Petya and the grief of the countess fell like one blow after an- 
other on the old count's head. He seemed not to understand, and to feel 



WAR AND PEACE 525 

himself incapable of understanding, the significance of all these events, 
and figuratively speaking, bowed his old head to the storm, as though 
expecting and seeking fresh blows to make an end of him. 

Nikolay was with the Russian army in Paris when the news of his 
father's death reached him. He at once applied for his discharge, and 
without waiting for it, obtained leave and went to Moscow. Within a 
month after the count's death the financial position had been made per- 
fectly clear, astounding every one by the immense sum of various petty 
debts, the existence of which no one had suspected. The debts were more 
than double the assets of the estate. 

The friends and relations advised Nikolay to refuse to accept his in- 
heritance. But Nikolay looked on such a refusal as a slur on the honoured 
memory of his father; and so he would not hear of such a course, and 
accepted the inheritance with the obligation of paying the debts. 

Nikolay accepted a loan of thirty thousand roubles offered him by his 
brother-in-law Bezuhov; and paid that portion of the debts that he recog- 
nised as genuine obligations. To return to the army was out of the ques- 
tion, because his mother now clung to her son as her one hold on life. 
And so he accepted a civilian post in Moscow, and taking off his beloved 
uniform, established himself in a little lodging with his mother and Sonya. 

Natasha and Pierre were living at this period in Petersburg, and had 
no very distinct idea of Nikolay's position. After having borrowed money 
from his brother-in-law, Nikolay did his utmost to conceal his poverty- 
stricken position from him. His situation was rendered the more difficult, 
as with his twelve hundred roubles of salary he had not only to keep him- 
self, Sonya, and his mother, but to keep his mother in such a way that 
she would not be sensible of their poverty. The countess could not con- 
ceive of life being possible without the luxurious surroundings to which 
she had been accustomed from her childhood; and without any idea of 
its being difficult for her son, she was continually insisting on having 
a carriage, which they had not, to send for a friend, or an expensive 
delicacy for herself, or wine for her son, or money to buy a present, as 
a surprise for Natasha, for Sonya, or for Nikolay himself. 

Sonya kept house, waited on her aunt, read aloud to her, bore with 
her caprices and her secret dislike, and helped Nikolay to conceal from 
the old countess their poverty-stricken position. Nikolay felt himself under 
a debt of gratitude to Sonya that he could never repay, for all she did for 
his mother; he admired her patience and devotion, but lie seemed to feel 
a sort of grudge against her for being too p feet She had all the good 
qualities for which people are valued, but little of what would have made 
him love her. He had taken her at her word when she had written to him 
giving him his freedom, and now he behaved with her u though what had 
passed between them had been long, long ago forgotten, and could never 
under any circumstances be renewed. 

Nikolay's position was becoming worse and worse. His hope oi laving 
by something out of his salary proved to be an idle dream. Ft! from sav- 



526 WAR AND PEACE 

ing anything, he was even running up some small debts to satisfy his 
mother's exigencies. There seemed no means of escape. 

At the beginning of the winter Princess Marya arrived in Moscow. From 
the gossip of the town she heard of the position of the Rostovs, and of 
how 'the son was sacrificing himself for his mother/ as the gossips said. 
'It is just what I expected of him,' Princess Marya said to herself. 

Remembering her intimate relations with the whole family— almost as one 
of themselves— she thought it her duty to call on them. But thinking of her 
relations with Nikolay in Voronezh, she was afraid of doing so. A few 
weeks after her arrival in Moscow, however, she went to see the Rostovs. 

Nikolay was the first to meet her. Instead of the expression of delight 
Princess Marya had expected to see on his face, he met her with a look 
of chilliness, stiffness, and pride that she had never seen before. Nikolay 
inquired after her health, conducted her to his mother, and, after staying 
five minutes, went out of the room. 

But after her visit the old countess talked about her several times every 
day. She sang her praises; insisted that her son should go and see her. 

'She is a very good and conscientious girl,' she would say, 'and you 
must go and call on her. Anyway, you will see some one; and it is dull 
for you, I expect, with us.' 

'But I don't at all wish to, mamma.' 

'Why, you always liked her; and now all of a sudden you have some 
reasons or other. Everything is kept a secret from me.' 

'Not at all, mamma.' 

'If I were to beg you to do something unpleasant, but as it is, I simply 
beg you to drive over and return her call. Why, civility demands it, I 
should suppose ... I have begged you to do so, and now I will meddle 
no further since you have secrets from your mother.' 

Nikolay sighed, and bit his moustache, and dealt the cards, trying to 
draw his mother's attention to another subject. Next day, and the third, 
and the fourth, the conversation was repeated. 

After her visit to the Rostovs, and the unexpectedly cold reception 
she had met with from Nikolay, Princess Marya acknowledged to herself 
that she had been right in not wanting to be the first to call. 

'It was just what I expected,' she said to herself, summoning her pride 
to her aid. 'I have no concern with him, and I only wanted to see the old 
lady, who was always kind to me, and to whom I am under obligations 
for many things.' 

In the middle of the winter she was sitting in the schoolroom, super- 
vising her nephew's lessons, when the servant announced that Rostov was 
below. With the firm determination not to betray her secret, and not to 
manifest any embarrassment, she summoned Mademoiselle Bourienne, and 
with her went into the drawing-room. 

At the first glance at Nikolay's face, she saw that he had come merely 
to perform the obligations of civility, and she determined to keep to the 
tone he adopted towards her. 



WAR AND PEACE 527 

They talked of the health of the countess, of common acquaintances, 
of the latest news of the war, and when the ten minutes required by 
propriety had elapsed, Nikolay got up to say good-bye. 

With the aid of Mademoiselle Bourienne, Princess Marya had kept up 
the conversation very well. But at the very last moment, just when he 
was getting up, she was so weary of talking of what did not interest her, 
that in a fit of abstraction, she sat motionless, not noticing that he was 
getting up. 

Nikolay looked at her, said a few words to Mademoiselle Bourienne, and 
again glanced at the princess. 

'Good-bye, princess,' he said. 

'Oh, I beg your pardon,' she said, as though waking from sleep. 'You 
are going already, count; well, good-bye! Oh, the cushion for the countess?' 

'Wait a minute, I will fetch it,' said Mademoiselle Bourienne, and she 
left the room. 

'Yes, princess,' said Nikolay at last, with a mournful smile, 'it seems 
lot long ago, but how much has happened since the first time we met at 
Bogutcharovo. We all seemed in such trouble then, but I would give a 
great deal to have that time back . . . and there's no bringing it back.' 

Her voice suddenly shook. 'You used to be different, I don't know why.' 

'There are thousands of reasons why.' (He laid special stress on the 
word why.) 'I thank you, princess,' he added softly. 'It is sometimes 
hard . . .' 

'Why, count, why?' she cried all at once, involuntarily moving nearer to 
him. 'Why, do tell me. You must tell me.' He was mute. 'I do not know, 
count, your why,' she went on. 'But I am sad, I ... I will own that to you. 
You mean for some reason to deprive me of our old friendship. And that 
hurts me.' There were tears in her eyes and in her voice. 'I have had so 
little happiness in my life that every loss is hard for me . . . Excuse me, 
good-bye,' she suddenly burst into tears, and was going out of the room. 
? 'Princess! stay, for God's sake,' he cried, trying to stop her. 'Princess!' 

She looked round. For a few seconds they gazed in each other's eyes, and 
the remote and impossible became all at once close at hand, possible and 
inevitable. 

In the autumn of 1813, Nikolay married Princess Marya, and took up his 

abode at Bleak Hills. 

Within four years he had paid off the remainder of his debts without sell- 
ing his wife's estates, and coming into a small legacy on the death of a 
cousin, he repaid the loan he had borrowed from Pierre also. 
" In another three years, by 1820, Nikolay hau so well managed his DCCU- 
niary affairs that he was able to buy a small estate adjoining Bleak Hills, 
and was opening negotiations for the repurchase of his mccstral estate oi 
Otradnoe, which was his cherished dream. 

On the eve of St. Nikolay's day, the 5 th of December, 1820, Natasha with 
her children had been staying at Bleak Hills since the beginning oi autumn. 



528 WAR AND PEACE 

Pierre was in Petersburg, where he had gone on private business of his own, 
as he said, for three weeks. He had already been away for six, and was 
expected home every minute. 

On this 5th of December there was also staying with the Rostovs Niko- 
lay's old friend, the general on half -pay, Vassily Fedorovitch Denisov. 

The general opinion was that Pierre was tied to his wife's apron strings, 
and it really was so. From the earliest days of their marriage Natasha had 
made plain her claims. Pierre had been greatly surprised at his wife's view- 
to him a completely novel idea— that every minute of his life belonged to 
her and their home. He was surprised, but he was flattered, and he ac- 
quiesced. 

Pierre was so far under petticoat government that he did not dare to be 
attentive, or even to speak with a smile, to any other woman; did not dare 
go to dine at the club, without good reason, simply for entertainment; did 
not dare spend money on idle whims, and did not dare to be away from 
home for any long time together, except on business, in which his wife 
included his scientific pursuits. Though she understood nothing of the 
latter, she attached great consequence to them. To make up for all this, in 
their own home Natasha made herself a slave to her husband; and the 
whole household had to go on tiptoe if the master were busy reading or 
writing in his study. Pierre had but to express a wish and Natasha jumped 
up at once and ran for what he wanted. 

The whole household was ruled by the supposed directions of the master, 
that is, by the wishes of Pierre, which Natasha tried to guess. Their manner 
of life and place of residence, their acquaintances and ties, Natasha's pur- 
suits, and the bringing up of the children— all followed, not only Pierre's 
expressed wishes, but even the deductions Natasha strove to draw from the 
ideas he explained in conversation with her. 

After seven years of married life, Pierre had a firm and joyful conscious- 
ness that he was not a bad fellow, and he felt this because he saw himself 
reflected in his wife. In himself he felt all the good and bad mingled to- 
gether, and obscuring one another. But in his wife he saw reflected only 
what was really good; everything not quite good was left out. 

Two months previously, Pierre was already settled at the Rostovs' when 
he received a letter from a certain Prince Fyodor, urging him to come to 
Petersburg for the discussion of various important questions that were 
agitating the Petersburg members of a society, of which Pierre had been 
one of the chief founders. 

Natasha read this letter, as she did indeed all her husband's letters, and 
bitterly as she always felt his absence, she urged him herself to go to Peters- 
burg. To everything appertaining to her husband's intellectual, abstract 
pursuits, she ascribed immense consequence, though she had no under- 
standing of them, and she was always in dread of being a hindrance to her 
husband in such matters. 

Ever since the day fixed for his return, a fortnight before, Natasha had 
been in a continual condition of alarm, depression, and irritability. Countess 



WAR AND PEACE 529 

Marya tried to console her by excusing Pierre, and inventing good reasons 
for his delay in returning. 

'It's all nonsense, all idiocy,' Natasha would say; 'all his projects that never 
lead to anything, and all those fools of societies,' she would declare of the 
very matters in the immense importance of which she firmly believed. 
And she would march off to the nursery to her only boy, the baby Petya. 

She was nursing the baby when Pierre's carriage drove noisily up to the 
entrance, and the nurse, knowing how to please her mistress, came inaudibly 
but quickly to the door with a beaming face. 

'He has come, ma'am,' whispered the nurse. 

Running into the vestibule, Natasha saw a tall figure in a fur cloak 
fumbling at his scarf. Darting up to him, she hugged him, and then drawing 
back, glanced at the frosty, red, and happy face of Pierre. 'Yes, here he is; 
happy, satisfied . . .' 

And all at once she remembered all the tortures of suspense she had passed 
through during the last fortnight. The joy beaming in her face vanished; she 
frowned, and a torrent of reproaches and angry words broke upon Pierre. 

'Yes, you are all right, you have been happy, you have been enjoying 
yourself . . . But what about me! You might at least think of your children. 
And you have been enjoying yourself. Yes, enjoying yourself . . .' 

Pierre knew he was not to blame, because he could not have come 
sooner. He knew this outburst on her part was unseemly, and would be all 
over in two minutes. Above all, he knew that he was himself happy and 
joyful. He would have liked to smile, but dared not even think of that. 
He made a piteous, dismayed face, and bowed before the storm. 

'I could not, upon my word. But how is Petya?' 

'He is all right, come along. Aren't you ashamed? If you could see what 
I am like without you, how wretched I am . . .' 

'Are you quite well?' 

'Come along, come along,' she said, not letting go his hand. 

The children and their governesses were delighted at Be/.uhov's return, 
because Pierre it was who could play on the clavichord that ecossaise (his 
one piece), to which, as he said, one could dance all possible dances; and he 
was quite sure, too, to have brought all of them presents. 

Nikolinka Bolkonsky, who was now a thin, delicate, intelligent 1" 
fifteen, with curly light hair and beautiful eyes, was delighted because 
UnclePierre, as he called him, was the object of his passionate love and 
adoration. No one had instilled a particular affection for Pierre Into Niko- 
linka, and he only rarely saw him. Countess M urya, who had brought him 
up, had done her utmost to make Nikolinka love her husband, as she loved 
him; and the boy did like his uncle, but there was a scarcely perceptible 
shade of contempt in his liking of him. Pierre he adored. I le did n<»t warn 
to be an hussar or a Cavalier of St. George like his I nclc Nlkolay; he 
wanted to be learned, clever, and kind like Pierre. 

The old ladies were pleased both at the present he brought them, and 
still more at Natasha's being herself again. 



530 WAR AND PEACE 

Pierre felt the various views those different sets of people took of him, 
and made haste to satisfy the expectations of all of them. 

Though he was the most absent-minded and forgetful of men, by the 
help of a list his wife made for him, he had bought everything, not forget- 
ting a single commission from his mother-in-law or brother-in-law, nor toys 
for his nephews. 

In the early days of his married life his wife's expectation that he should 
forget nothing he had undertaken to buy had struck him as strange, and he 
had been impressed by her serious chagrin when after his first absence he 
had returned having forgotten everything. But in time he had grown used 
to this. Knowing that Natasha gave him no commissions on her own ac- 
count, and for others only asked him to get things when he had himself 
offered to do so, he now took a childish pleasure, that was a surprise to hirr^ 
self, in those purchases of presents for all the household. If he incurred 
Natasha's censure now, it was only for buying too much, and paying too 
much for his purchases. To her other defects in the eyes of the world- 
good qualities in Pierre's eyes— her untidiness and negligence, Natasha added 
that of stinginess. 

Ever since Pierre had begun living a home life, involving increased ex- 
penses in a large house, he had noticed to his astonishment that he was 
spending half what he had spent in the past, and that his circumstances, 
somewhat straitened latterly, especially by his first wife's debts, were be^ 
ginning to improve. 

The countess, as her habit was, was sitting playing at patience when 
Pierre and Natasha went into the drawing-room with parcels under their 
arms. From habit she uttered the words, she always repeated on the return 
of Pierre or her son after absence: 'It was high time, high time, my dear boy; 
we have been expecting you a long while. Well, thank God, you are here.' 
And on the presents being given her, pronounced another stock phrase: 
'It's not the gift that is precious, my dear. . . . Thank you for thinking of 
an old woman like me. . . .' It was evident that Pierre's entrance at that 
moment was unwelcome, because it interrupted her in dealing her cards. 

Pierre, Natasha, Nikolay, Countess Marya, and Denisov had a great deal 
they wanted to talk about, which was not talked of before the old countess. 
Yet they sat as usual at tea in the drawing-room, and Pierre answered the 
countess's quite superfluous questions, which were of no interest even to 
her, and told her that Prince Vassily was looking older, and that Countess 
Marya Alexeyevna sent her kind regards. Such conversation, of no interest 
to any one, but inevitable, was kept up all tea-time. At tea every one sat in 
their own habitual places. Nikolay sat by the stove at a little table apart, 
where his tea was handed him. An old terrier bitch, with a perfectly grey 
face, Milka, the daughter of the first Milka, lay on a chair beside him. 
Denisov, with streaks of grey in his curly hair, moustaches, and whiskers, 
wearing his general's coat unbuttoned, sat beside Countess Marya. Pierre, 
sitting between his wife and the old countess, talked of external social 
events and of the old countess's contemporaries, who had once been a living 



WAR AND PEACE 531 

circle of people, but were now for the most part scattered about the world, 
and, like her, living out their remnant of life, gleaning up the stray ears of 
what they had sown. But they, these contemporaries, seemed to the old 
countess to make up the only world that was worth considering. 

By Pierre's eagerness, Natasha saw that his visit had been an interesting 
one, that he was longing to tell them about it. Denisov, not being a member 
of the family, did not understand Pierre's circumspectness, and, moreover, 
being dissatisfied with the course of events, took a very great interest in all 
that was going forward at Petersburg. 

'Well, what is all this idiocy, Gossner and Madame Tatarinov,' Denisov 
asked, 'is that still going on?' 

'Going on?' said Pierre. 'Worse than ever. The Bible Society is now the 
whole government.' 

'What is that, mon cher ami?'' asked the old countess. 'What are vou say- 
ing about the government? I don't understand that.' 

'Why, you know, maman? put in Nikolay, who knew how to translate 
things into his mother's language. 'Prince Alexander Nikolaevitch Golitsin 
has founded a society, so he has great influence they say.' 

'Araktcheev and Golitsin,' said Pierre incautiously, 'are practicallv the 
government now. And what a government! They see conspiracy in every- 
thing, they are afraid of everything.' 

'What, Prince Alexander Nikolaevitch found fault with! He is a most 
estimable man. I used to meet him in old days at Marya Antonovna's,' said 
the countess in an aggrieved tone. And still more aggrieved by the general 
silence, she went on, 'Nowadays people find fault with every one. A Gospel 
Society, what harm is there in that?' and she got up (every one rose too), 
and with a severe face sailed out to her table in the adjoining room. 

The conversation turned on the scandals of the day in the higher govern- 
ment circles. But Natasha, who knew every thought and expression in her 
husband, saw that Pierre all the while wanted to lead the conversation into 
another channel, his own idea, the idea which he had gone to Petersburg 
to consult his new friend Prince Fyodor about. She saw too that lie could 
not lead up to this, and she came to the rescue with a question: How had 
he settled things with Prince Fyodor? 

'What was that?' asked Nikolay. 

'All the same thing over and over again,' said Pierre, looking about him. 
'Every one sees that things are all going so wrong that they can't DC endured, 
and that it's the duty of all honest men to oppose it to the utmost of their 

power.' 

'Why, what can honest men do?' said Nikolay, frowning slightly. W hat 

can be done?' 

'Why, this . . .' 

'Let us go into the study,' said Nikolay. 

Natasha, who had a long while been expecting to be fetched W h« baby, 
heard the nurse calling her, and went off to the nursery. Countess Marya 
went with her. The men went to the study, and Nikolinka Bolkonsky stole 



532 WAR AND PEACE 

in, unnoticed by his uncle, and sat down at the writing-table, in the dark 
by the window. 

'Well, what are you going to do?' said Denisov. 

'Everlastingly these fantastic schemes/ said Nikolay. 

'Well,' Pierre began, not sitting down, but pacing the room, and coming 
to an occasional standstill, lisping and gesticulating rapidly as he talked. 
'This is the position of things in Petersburg: the Tsar lets everything go. 
He is entirely wrapped up in this mysticism' (mysticism Pierre could not 
forgive in anybody now). 'All he asks for is peace; and he can only get 
peace through these men of no faith and no conscience, who are stifling and 
destroying everything, Magnitsky and Araktcheev, and tiitti quanti . . . 
You will admit that if you did not look after your property yourself, and 
only asked for peace and quiet, the crueller your bailiff were, the more 
readily you would attain your object,' he said, turning to Nikolay. 

'Well, but what is the drift of all this? ' said Nikolay. 

'Why, everything is going to ruin. Bribery in the law-courts, in the army 
nothing but coercion and drill: exile— people are being tortured, and en- 
lightenment is suppressed. Everything youthful and honourable— they are 
crushing! Everybody sees that it can't go on like this. The strain is too 
great, and the string must snap,' said Pierre. 'I told them one thing in 
Petersburg.' 

'Told whom?' asked Denisov. 

'Oh, you know whom,' said Pierre, with a meaning look from under his 
brows, 'Prince Fyodor and all of them. Zeal in educational and philanthropic 
work is all very good of course. Their object is excellent and all the rest of 
it; but in present circumstances what is wanted is something else.' 

At that moment Nikolay noticed the presence of his nephew. His face 
fell; he went up to him. 

'Why are you here?' 

'Oh, let him be,' said Pierre, taking hold of Nikolay 's arm; and he went 
on. 'That's not enough, I told them; something else is wanted now. While 
you stand waiting for the string to snap every moment; while every one is 
expecting the inevitable revolution, as many people as possible should join 
hands as closely as they can to withstand the general catastrophe. I say: 
enlarge the scope of the society: let the mot d'ordre be not loyalty only, but 
independence and action.' 

Nikolay, leaving his nephew, had angrily moved out a chair, and sat down 
in it. As he listened to Pierre, he coughed in a dissatisfied way, and frowned 
more and more. 

'But action with what object?' he cried. 'And what attitude do you take 
up to the government?' 

'Why, the attitude of supporters! The society will perhaps not even be a 
secret one, if the government will allow it. So far from being hostile to the 
government, we are the real conservatives. It is a society of gentlemen, in 
the full significance of the word. It is simply to prevent Pugatchov from 
coming to massacre my children and yours, to prevent Araktcheev from 



WAR AND PEACE 533 

transporting me to a military settlement, that we are joining hands, with the 
sole object of the common welfare and security.' 

Natasha, coming into the room in the middle of the conversation, looked 
joyfully at her husband. She was not rejoicing in what he was saying. It did 
not interest her indeed, because it seemed to her that it was all so excessively 
simple, and that she had known it long ago. But she was glad looking at his 
eager, enthusiastic figure. 

Pierre was watched with even more rapturous gladness by the boy who 
had been forgotten by all of them. Every word Pierre uttered set his heart 
in a glow, and his fingers moving nervously, he unconsciously picked up 
and broke to pieces the sticks of sealing-wax on his uncle's table. 

But Nikolay knitted his brows, and began arguing with Pierre that no 
revolution was to be expected, and that the danger he talked of had no 
existence but in his imagination. Pierre maintained his view, and as his in- 
tellectual faculties were keener and more resourceful, Nikolay was soon at 
a loss for an answer. This angered him still more, as in his heart he felt con- 
vinced, not by reasoning, but by something stronger than reasoning, of the 
indubitable truth of his own view. 

'Well, let me tell you,' he said, getting up and nervously setting his pipe 
down in the corner, and then flinging it away; 'I can't prove it you. You 
say everything is all rotten, and there will be a revolution. I don't see it; 
but let me tell you, you are my greatest friend, you know that, but you 
begin working against the government— whatever it may be, I know it's 
my duty to obey it. And if Araktcheev bids me march against you with a 
squadron and cut you down, I shan't hestitate for a second, I shall go. And 
then you may think what you like about it.' 

An awkward silence followed these words. Natasha was the first to break 
it by defending her husband and attacking her brother. Her defence was 
weak and clumsy. But it attained her object. The conversation was taken 
up again, and no longer in the unpleasantly hostile tone in which Nikolay's 
last words had been spoken. 

When they all got up to go in to supper, Nikolinka Bolkonsky went up 
to Pierre with a pale face and shining, luminous eyes. 

'Uncle Pierre . . . you ... no ... If papa had been alive ... he 
would have been on your side?' he asked. 

Pierre saw in a flash all the original, complicated and violent travail of 
thought and feeling that must have been going on independently in this 
boy during the conversation. And recalling all he had been saying, he feh 
vexed that the boy should have heard him. He had to answer him, however, 

'I believe he would,' he said reluctantly, and he went out of the study. 

The boy looked down, and then for the first time seemed to become 
aware of the havoc he had been making on the writinu -table. Me flushed 
hotly and went up to Nikolay. 

'Uncle, forgive me; I did it-not on purpose,' he said, pointing to the 
fragment of sealing-wax. 

Nikolay bounded up angrily. 'Very good, very good, he said, throwing 



534 WAR AND PEACE 

the bits of pens and sealing-wax under the table. And with evident effort 
mastering his fury, he turned away from him. 

'You ought not to have been here at all/ he said. 

At supper no more was said of politics and societies, but conversation 
turned on the subject most agreeable to Nikolay— reminiscences of 1812. 
Denisov started the talk, and Pierre was particularly cordial and amusing. 
And the party broke up on the friendliest terms. 

Nikolay, after undressing in his study, found his wife still at her writing- 
table. 

He was proud that she was so clever and so good, recognising his own 
insignificance beside her in the spiritual world. 

'I,' he said, 'have behaved badly. You were not in the study. Pierre and 
I were arguing, and I lost my temper. I couldn't help it. He is such a child. 
I don't know what would become of him if Natasha didn't keep him at her 
apron-strings. Can you imagine what he went to Petersburg about? . . . 
They have made a . . .' 

'Yes, I know,' said Countess Marya. 'Natasha told me.' 

'Oh, well, you know, then,' Nikolay went on, getting hot at the mere 
recollection of the discussion. 'He wants to persuade me that it's the duty 
of every honest man to work against the government when one's sworn 
allegiance and duty. ... I am sorry you were not there. As it was, they all 
fell upon me, Denisov, and Natasha, too. . . . Natasha is too amusing. We 
know she twists him round her little finger, but when it comes to discussion 
—she hasn't an idea to call her own— she simply repeats his words,' added 
Nikolay, yielding to that irresistible impulse that tempts one to criticise 
one's nearest and dearest. Nikolay was unaware that what he was saying 
of Natasha might be said word for word of himself in relation to his wife. 

'Yes, I have noticed that,' said Countess Marya. 

'When I told him that duty and sworn allegiance come before everything, 
he began arguing God knows what. It was a pity you were not there. What 
would you have said?' 

'To my thinking, you were quite right. I told Natasha so. Pierre says that 
every one is suffering, and being ill-treated and corrupted, and that it's our 
duty to help our neighbours. Of course, he is right,' said Countess Marya; 
'but he forgets that we have other nearer duties, which God Himself has 
marked out for us, and that we may run risks for ourselves, but not for oui 
children.' 

'Yes, yes, that's just what I told him,' cried Nikolay, who actually fancied 
he had said just that. 'And they had all their say out about loving one's 
neighbour, and Christianity, and all the rest of it, before Nikolinka, who had 
slipped in there, and was pulling all my things to pieces.' 

'Ah, do you know, Nikolay, I am so often worried about Nikolinka,' said 
Countess Marya. 'He is such an exceptional boy. And I am afraid I neglect 
him for my own. All of us have our children; we all have our own ties; 
while he has nobody. He is always alone with his thoughts.' 



WAR AND PEACE 535 

Well, I don't think you have anything to reproach yourself with on his 
account. Everything the fondest mother could do for her son you have 
done, and are doing, for him. And of course he's a splendid boy!' Nikolay, 
who did not in his heart like Nikolinka, always felt moved to acknowledge 
that he was a splendid fellow. 

'Yes, Pierre always was, and always will be, a dreamer/ he went on, 
returning to the discussion in the study, which had evidently worked on his 
feelings. 'Why, what concern is all that of mine-Araktcheev's misdoings, 
and all the rest of it— what concern was it of mine, when at the time of our 
marriage I had so many debts that they were going to put me in prison, 
and a mother who couldn't see it or understand it. And then you, and the 
children, and my work. It's not for my own pleasure I am from morning to 
night looking after the men, or in the counting-house. No, I know I must 
work to comfort my mother, repay you, and not leave my children in beg- 
gary, as I was left myself.' 

Natasha, as soon as she was alone with her husband, had begun talking 
too, as only husband and wife can talk, that is, understanding and communi- 
cating their thoughts to each other, with extraordinary clearness and 
rapidity, by a quite peculiar method opposed to all the rules of logic. 

Natasha talked to Pierre of the daily round of existence at her brother's; 
told him how she had suffered and been half-dead without him; and that 
she was fonder of Marie than ever, and Marie was better in every way than 
she was. In saying this Natasha was quite sincere in acknowledging Marie's 
superiority, but at the same time she expected Pierre to prefer her to Marie 
and all other women, and now, especially after he had been seeing a great 
many women in Petersburg, to tell her so anew. In response to Natasha's 
words, Pierre told her how intolerable he had found the evening parties and 
dinners with ladies in Petersburg. 

'I have quite lost the art of talking to ladies,' he said; 'it was horribly tire- 
some. Especially as I was so busy.' 

Natasha looked intently at him, and went on. 'Marie, now she is wonder- 
ful!' she said. 'The insight she has into children. Yesterday, for instance, 
Mitenka was naughty . . .' 

'And isn't he like his father?' Pierre put in. 

Natasha knew why he made this remark about Mitenka's likeness to 
Nikolay. He disliked the thought of his dispute with his brother-in-law , and 
was longing to hear what she thought about it. 

'It's a weakness of Nikolay's that if anything is not generally accepted, 
he will never agree with it. And I see that that's just what you value.' 

'No, the real thing is that to Nikolay,' said Pierre, 'thoughts and ideas 
are an amusement, almost a pastime. Here he's forming a library and \m 
made it a rule not to buy a new book till he has read through the last he 
has bought-Sismondi and Rousseau and Montesquieu,' Pierre added with a 

smile. t ( 

'So you say ideas to him are not serious . . . 



536 WAR AND PEACE 

'Yes, and to me nothing else is serious. All the while I was in Petersburg, 
I seemed to be seeing every one in a dream. When I am absorbed by an 
idea, nothing else is serious.' 

'Oh, what a pity I didn't see your meeting with the children,' said Na- 
tasha. 'Which was the most pleased? Liza, of course?' 

'Yes,' said Pierre, and he went on with what interested him. 'Nikolay says 
we ought not to think. But I can't help it. To say nothing of the fact (I can 
say so to you) that in Petersburg I felt that the whole thing would go to 
pieces without me, every one pulled his own way. But I succeeded in 
bringing them all together; and then my idea is so clear and simple. I don't 
say we ought to work against so and so. We may be mistaken. But I say: 
let those join hands who care for the good cause, and let our one standard 
be energy and honesty. Prince Sergey is a capital fellow, and clever.' 

Natasha would have had no doubt that Pierre's idea was a grand idea, but 
that one thing troubled her. It was his being her husband. 'Is it possible that 
a man of such value, of such importance to society, is at the same time my 
husband? How can it have happened?' She wanted to express this doubt to 
him. 'Who are the persons who could decide positively whether he is so 
much cleverer than all of them?' she wondered, and she went over in 
imagination the people who were very much respected by Pierre. There was 
nobody whom, to judge by his own account, he had respected so much as 
Platon Karataev. 

'Do you know what I am thinking about?' she said. 'About Platon Kara- 
taev. What would he have said? Would he have approved of you now?' 

Pierre was not in the least surprised at this question. He understood the 
connection of his wife's ideas. 

'Platon Karataev?' he said, and he pondered, evidently trying sincerely to 
picture what Karataev's judgment would have been on the subject. 'He 
would not have understood, and yet, perhaps, he would.' 

'I like you awfully!' said Natasha all at once. 'Awfully! awfully!' 

'No, he wouldn't have approved,' said Pierre, musing. 'What he would 
have approved of is our home life. He did so like to see seemliness, happi- 
ness, peace in everything, and I could have shown him all of us with pride.' 

'What nonsense,' said Natasha suddenly, 'it all is about the honeymoon 
and that the greatest happiness is at first. On the contrary, now is much the 
best. If only you wouldn't go away. Do you remember how we used to 
quarrel? And I was always in the wrong. It was always my doing. And what 
we quarrelled about— I don't remember even.' 

'Always the same thing,' said Pierre smiling. 'Jea . . .' 

'Don't say it, I can't bear it,' cried Natasha, and a cold, vindictive light 
gleamed in her eyes. 'Did you see her?' she added after a pause. 

'No; and if I had, I shouldn't have known her.' 

They were both silent for some seconds. Then all at once, at the same 
moment, they began talking. Both stopped, waiting for the other to go on. 

'You tell me, it wasn't anything, only nonsense,' said Natasha. 

Pierre said what he had been going to say. It seemed to him at that 



WAR AND PEACE 537 

moment that he was destined to give a new direction to the progress of the 
whole of Russian society and of the whole world. 

^ 'I only meant to say that all ideas that have immense results are always 
simple. All my idea really is that if vicious people are united and form a 
power, honest men must do the same. It's so simple, you see.' 

Meanwhile, below in Nikolinka Bolkonsky's bedroom a lamp was burning 
as usual (the boy was afraid of the dark and could not be cured of this 
weakness). Nikolinka had just waked up in a cold sweat, and was sitting up 
in bed, gazing with wide-open eyes straight before him. He had been 
waked by a fearful dream. 

In his dream his Uncle Pierre and he in helmets, such as appeared in the 
illustrations in his Plutarch, were marching at the head of an immense army. 
This army was made up of slanting, white threads that filled the air like 
those spider-webs that float in autumn. Ahead of them was glory, which was 
something like those threads too, only somewhat more opaque. They— he 
and Pierre— were flying lightly and happily nearer and nearer to their goal. 
All at once Uncle Nikolay stood before them in a stern and menacing 
attitude. 

'Have you done this?' he said, pointing to broken sticks of sealing-wax. 
'I did love you, but Araktcheev has bidden me, and I will kill the first that 
moves forward.' 

Nikolinka looked round for Pierre; but Pierre was not there. Instead of 
Pierre, there was his father— Prince Andrey— and his father had no shape or 
form, but he was there; and seeing him, Nikolinka felt limp, and relaxed. 
His father caressed him and pitied him, but his Uncle Nikolay was moving 
down upon them, coming closer and closer. A great horror came over 
Nikolinka, and he waked up. 

'My father!' he thought. (Although there were two very good portraits 
of Prince Andrey in the house, Nikolinka never thought of his father in 
human form.) 'My father has been with me, and has caressed me. He ap- 
proved of me; he approved of Uncle Pierre. Whatever he might tell me, 
I would do it. 

'I know they want me to study. And I am going to study. But some day 
I shall have finished, and then I will act. One thing only I pray Cod for, 
that the same sort of thing may happen with me as with Plutarch's men. and 
I will act in the same way. I will do more.' 



